Forty
Stories
New Writing from
Harper
PERENNiAL
A Fifty-Two Stories Production
with fiction by
Jess Walter
•
Catherine Lacey
Kyle Minor
•
Lindsay Hunter
•
Roxane Gay
Kayden Kross
Shane Jones
Blake Butler
•
Matthew Norman
•
•
•
Ben Greenman
•
•
Jamie Quatro
Greg Bardsley
and more . . .
FOREWORD
BY
CAL
MORGANF orty S tories . Copyright © 2012 by HarperCollins Publishers. All rights reserved. No part
of this book may be used or reproduced in any manner whatsoever without written permission
except in the case of brief quotations embodied in critical articles and reviews. For information
address HarperCollins Publishers, 10 East 53rd Street, New York, NY 10022.
HarperCollins books may be purchased for educational, business, or sales promotional use.
For information please write: Special Markets Department, HarperCollins Publishers, 10 East
53rd Street, New York, NY 10022.
first edition
“Ambivalence” © by Ben Greenman. “Amy Having a Heart Attack” © by Sharon Goldner.
“The Anarchist of Darwin” © by Michael Ramberg. “Another Terrible Thing” © by Catherine
Lacey. “Barnacles of the Fuzz” © by D. Foy. “Basslines” © by Adam Wilson. “Because You
Asked” © by Karon Luddy. “Before the Trip” © by Adetokunbo Abiola. “The Beginning of
the Summation of Our Dead” © by Blake Butler. “Birthright City” © by Eliezra Schaffzin.
“Can a Corn” © by Jess Walter. “Confluence” © by Mesha Maren. “Djeser Djeseru (Splendor
of Splendors)” © by Paula Younger. “Eighty-six Ways to Cross One Desert” © by Alexander
Lumans. “Everyone Loves a Person Who Doesn’t Give a Fuck About Anything” © by Laura
Jane Faulds. “Fire Weather” © by Brady Hammes. “A Girl” © by Lindsay Hunter. “Glossola-
lia” © by Kyle Minor. “God’s Plan” © by Daniel Browne. “Granaby” © by Brandon Hobson.
“Graveyards” © by Scott McClanahan. “Head Down. Palm Up” © by Mitchell S. Jackson.
“Hers” © by O. A. Lindsey. “The Highline Highway” © by Nathan Oates. “House Guests” ©
by Alan Rossi. “I Like Looking at Pictures of Gwen Stefani” © by Elizabeth Crane. “I’ll Take
You There” © by David Williams. “In the Manner of Water or Light” © by Roxane Gay. “Jail
Break” © by Matt Stewart. “Jon and Maeve” © by David Backer. “Miss November” © by Mat-
thew Norman. “Most Wanted” © by Eric Raymond. “The Mountain Population Is Me” © by
Shane Jones. “opal one, opal two” © by Tessa Mellas. “A Plain Kiss (Letters to Allison, 2006)”
© by Jamie Quatro. “Plank” © by Kayden Kross. “Poof” © by Joseph Scapellato. “Some Kind
of Rugged Genius” © by Greg Bardsley. “What Good Is an Ark to a Fish?” © by Kelli Ford.
“You Can Touch This!” © by Jim Hanas. All stories used by permission.
Epub Edition © July 2012
ISBN 978-0-06-223906-8For Carrie KaniaContents
Foreword xi
1.  Ambivalence by Ben Greenman 1
2.   Amy Having a Heart Attack by Sharon Goldner 9
3.   The Anarchist of Darwin by Michael Ramberg 17
4.   Another
Terrible Thing by Catherine Lacey 28
5.   Barnacles
of the Fuzz by D. Foy 33
6.  Basslines by Adam Wilson 44
7.   Because
8.   Before
9.   The
You Asked by Karon Luddy 49
the Trip by Adetokunbo Abiola 54
Beginning of the Summation of Our Dead
   by Blake Butler 6810.   Birthright
11.   Can
City by Eliezra Schaffzin 71
a Corn by Jess Walter 93
12.  Confluence by Mesha Maren 95
13.   Djeser
Djeseru (Splendor of Splendors)
   by Paula Younger 105
14.   Eighty-six
Ways to Cross One Desert
   by Alexander Lumans 125
15.   Everyone
Loves a Person Who Doesn’t Give a Fuck
  About Anything by Laura Jane Faulds 128
16.   Fire
17.   A
Weather by Brady Hammes 141
Girl by Lindsay Hunter 155
18.  Glossolalia by Kyle Minor 159
19.   God’s
Plan by Daniel Browne 175
20.  Granaby by Brandon Hobson 188
21.  Graveyards by Scott McClanahan 202
22.   Head
Down, Palm Up by Mitchell S. Jackson
207
23.  Hers by O. A. Lindsey 217
24.   The
Highline Highway by Nathan Oates 232
25.   House
26.   I
Guests by Alan Rossi 250
Like Looking at Pictures of Gwen Stefani
   by Elizabeth Crane 26027.   I’ll Take You There by David Williams 263
28.   In the Manner of Water or Light by Roxane Gay 274
29.   Jail Break by Matt Stewart 285
30.   Jon and Maeve by David Backer 292
31.   Miss November by Matthew Norman 298
32.   Most Wanted by Eric Raymond 309
33.   The Mountain Population Is Me by Shane Jones 320
34.   opal one, opal two by Tessa Mellas
324
35.   A
Plain Kiss (Letters to Allison, 2006)
   by Jamie Quatro 333
36.  Plank by Kayden Kross 344
37.  Poof by Joseph Scapellato 348
38.   Some Kind of Rugged Genius by Greg Bardsley 351
39.   What Good Is an Ark to a Fish? by Kelli Ford 361
40.   You
Can Touch This! by Jim Hanas 380This book ushers you into many worlds, all of them our world.
It is full of voices, sounds, and people.
Stay with them, and they will stay with you.
The stories here represent eight tenths of a year.
A year that kept slipping, yet also kept giving.
Their writers gave them freely, and we do, too.
Like all stories, they work in a thousand ways. Some lull, some lure.
Some pinch, some stretch.
Some are like a thicket, some a formal garden;
others seem like valleys slick with rain.
All replenish and reward.
They reveal, too:
That we want to be right, but we need to want.
That we’re scared and thrilled when we recognize ourselves in others.
That bruising up against rules, measuring ourselves against them
and despite them, is what we do as a people,
what we share and need to share.
That cynicism is dead and ambiguity is anything but.
That language is alive and so are we.
Thanks to you for writing them and for reading them.
Cal Morgan
June 2012Fort y Stories1.
Ambivalence
by Ben Greenman
When a girl is skinny, and calls you late at night, and you glance at
the calendar, and it is four days before you are scheduled to get mar-
ried, and the girl you are marrying is not the skinny girl but another
girl, a girl who has already departed for the city where your wedding
is to be held, it is your job, most probably, to hang up the phone.
When you do not hang up the phone, you have not done your job.
When you invite that skinny girl to your apartment, and then you
jump into the shower so that you will be clean, taking special trouble
to wash the parts that matter, and then you mess up your hair so that
you will look as though you haven’t gone to any special trouble, then
you are doing another job entirely.
She was a painter. Panos met her through a mutual friend. She
had a boyfriend, who was twenty-two years older than she, and when
Panos first spoke to her, he said that he thought that the age differ-
ence was an atrocity. “Like bombing Cambodia,” he said, convinced
that this was a joke that she would not understand. She surprised
him with a knowing laugh. They talked about his impending mar-
riage, and about the week of freedom he had but doubted he’d use.
She took out a Paper-Mate blue pen and used it to write his phone
number on her hand. She wrote it strangely: not with numerals, but
with letters “O” for 1, “T” for 2, “TH” for 3, “F,” “FI,” and so on.
“So that makes your number ‘Efstooth,’” she said.2
Ben Greenman
“Hey,” Panos said. “That’s my street: Efstooth Avenue.”
“For that joke I award you this pen,” she said, handing it over
ceremonially. “I’ll get it later.”
When she arrived at Panos’s apartment, “Efstooth” was still inked
on her hand, but that was not the first thing he noticed. The first
thing he noticed was that she was carrying a suitcase. It was small
enough that she held it rather than setting it down, but large enough
that it seemed to have winded her slightly on the way up to the third
floor.
“Are you moving in?” he said. “I don’t know how my wife will feel
about this.” She set the suitcase down on the floor, unzipped it, and
flipped back the top. There were white packages there, white sheets,
and when she unwrapped them they were her paintings. She spread
them out on the floor of his apartment. There were ten of them, each
one a small landscape with a single bird flying over a marsh and a
single human figure in the foreground. They were slightly different
shades, one reddish, one greenish, one dunnish, and so on, across a
muted spectrum.
Panos looked at the paintings and asked polite questions about
them that she answered smoothly. “I like to tell people that he’s
trying to capture the bird,” she said. “I always feel hilarious saying
that. But the bird’s not an unwitting victim. He sees the man. You
can be sure about that.” When he asked if they were all pictures of the
same scene, she said that she saw how he’d think so but that no, three
of them were painted from actual photographs of her father hunting
and the other seven were created from imagination. “My father left
when I was a little girl,” she said. “I remember that he yelled a lot,
and that he was mean to my mother, and that she was happier with-
out him. But recently I have been looking for pictures of him. I found
three and made up seven more. No one should have fewer than ten
photographs of her father.”
They turned the TV on but turned the volume all the way down.
They ordered pizza. She sat in a chair across the room from him, and
announced that she hadn’t showered that morning, because the water
in her apartment was too cold. Panos told her she was welcome to
take a shower if she wanted. “We’ll see,” she said, and went aroundA mbiva lence
3
the apartment ticking her finger across the spine of books. “Lots of
history books,” she said.
“Not mine,” Panos said.
“Oh,” she said. “Too bad. I love history books.” She was wearing
tight stretch pants and a tight white shirt. It was obvious to Panos
that she was the skinniest girl who had ever been in his apartment.
She was not wearing a bra, which put her in the company of at least
two other girls who had been in the apartment, neither of whom was
the girl who was, in four days’ time, going to be his wife. His wife
always wore a bra, and even three years into their relationship, she
gave a little involuntary gasp of pleasure whenever he unclasped it.
He figured that it was, at best, a reflex. The history books were hers.
The skinny girl came and stood right next to Panos. She planted
her feet to make it clear that she was ready to address the issue.
“Well,” Panos said. “Here we are.”
“We are here,” she said. “No doubt about that.”
“It’s all in the way you say it,” he said. “‘Here we are’ is more
loaded than ‘we are here.’”
“Is that what we are? Loaded?” she said. “Speaking of which, I’ll
have more wine.” She shook her glass and sloshed out a few drops
onto her shirt. “Shit,” she said.
“I have extra T-shirts,” Panos said.
“I’ll just take this off,” she said, and did.
“Come here,” Panos said.
She sat on the couch and pushed up alongside him. They watched
the TV, which was showing a strongman competition. A fat Swede
was jogging down a short track, the chassis of a car held on his shoul-
ders. “I really stink,” she said. Panos closed his eyes for research. She
was right, in a way: it was the smell of young sweat, of a black flower
blooming. She unbuttoned his shirt and laid her head on his chest.
“Now you’ve got me thinking about my father,” she said.
“I do?” Panos said. “How?”
“It’s not that hard to do.”
“I don’t think I like your tone,” he said.
“I’m sure you don’t,” she said. “No one ever does.” She squeezed
his arm. “You know what my father did? Other than leave, I mean.”4
Ben Greenman
“And hunt.”
“And hunt. No, I mean what he did for work. He was trained as a
lawyer but about a year before I was born he quit to work on a biogra-
phy of his great-grandfather, who was a British intelligence agent who
specialized in code breaking. Do you know about the Zimmermann
Telegram?” Panos shook his head. She didn’t continue right away.
He put his hand on her stomach, and then slipped a few fingers just
inside the elastic band of her pants.
“Tell me,” Panos said.
“What?” she said after a while.
“Tell me about the telegram.”
“Oh,” she said. “Why? Are you really interested?” Panos nodded
and let one finger drift a little lower. “Of course you are,” she said.
“Really,” Panos said. “Keep telling me about it.”
“Fine,” she said. “This telegram was sent from the German foreign
secretary to the German ambassador in Mexico, and it announced
that the Germans were going to support a Mexican attack on the
southwestern United States. The British, including my great-great-
grandfather, cracked the code. When the telegram was verified,
Wilson armed ships to defend against Germany, and a few days after
that, we were at war. World War One.”
“You know, even though the history books aren’t mine, I managed
to figure that out.”
“The code was a cryptogram. We cracked it partly because one of
the top German spies, Wilhelm Wassmuss, had lost his codebook in
Iran the year before. We picked that up and it helped with the Zim-
mermann Telegram.”
“We?”
Now she didn’t like his tone. “We the British. We my great-great-
grandfather.” The strongman competition had ended, and now the
TV was showing dirt bike racing. She got up to go to the bathroom,
and when she came back she started to pack her paintings back into
the suitcase. “What color would you say this is?” she said, holding
up a canvas.
“Blue.”
“And what about this one?”A mbiva lence
5
“Also blue.”
“Right. But isn’t that ridiculous? Two colors that are so different,
but they’re considered the same. It’s almost reason enough to become
a painter, just to try to understand that. Colors are like a code, too.”
“Oh, yeah,” Panos said. “Finish the code story.”
“It was finished,” she said. “Finished enough. I was out of that and
on to color. Blame your bathroom. It’s blue.”
“I didn’t pick that color.”
“It doesn’t look like your thing,” she said. “When are you getting
married?”
“Sunday,” Panos said. “It’s strange. It seems like a million years
away, and also like it’s going to happen the first time I let myself
breathe.”
“You’re not breathing?”
“Not always well.”
“Is it because I stink?”
“It’s because I’m not sure what message I’ll be sending if I do.
Maybe my true feelings will come through.”
“What are those true feelings? I assume they have something to
do with the reason I’m here.” She had her chin tilted up now, and her
words were falling into the space between them.
“Ambivalence.”
“That’s not a feeling. It’s the presence of two feelings at once.
What are the two?”
“Joy and fear? Happiness and hatred? Rightness and wrongness?”
“Wrongness?”
“The most obvious kind of wrongness. Like maybe this isn’t the
right choice. Like there are a million people to love, and how can I
settle on one and be sure that I’m not a fool? I have met others. I
might meet others. What about Eskimos?”
“The Eskimos,” she said. “Of course.”
“Or the Finns or the Malays or all the other people I don’t even
know about. Maybe I could be with one of them without ambiva-
lence. Don’t you have these questions about your boyfriend?”
“He’s a quick story. He’s older, is big like you, has a beard, helps
pay the rent on my painting studio, treats me with what we’ll say is6
Ben Greenman
kind contempt. That often does the trick for me, as it turns out.” She
slipped a hand inside his shirt and hooked her leg over his. “Will you
kiss me?”
“Sure,” Panos said. “But I’m not sure about more. I want to, but
you know.”
“Now that’s ambivalence,” she said. After they kissed, she pulled
her pants down far enough to show him that she wasn’t wearing any
underwear. “Put your hands on my ass.”
“If you insist,” Panos said. “But I want you to know that I feel like
I could stop any time.”
“I’m flattered,” she said, her eyes narrowing.
“What I was going to say,” Panos said, “is that it’s like when a
drunk driver thinks that he’s in control of his car.”
“Oh,” she said. “Maybe I am flattered. Well, do what you want,
or don’t. Your hours are numbered anyway. I have told you so many
state secrets that I’m going to have to kill you. Anyway, it’s not too
long until morning. I’ll be gone soon.” They leaned into each other
and she pretended to concentrate on the dirt bikes on TV.
The sky outside was already starting to change color, from black
to a weaker shade of black. There wasn’t any blue in it yet. “There’s
a bird out there,” Panos said. “I rarely actually see them at night.”
“The man sees the bird,” she said. “You can be sure about that.”
She made birds with her hands and flew them up high so that her
arms were stretching as far as they would go. She was so skinny that
there was something painfully religious about that pose. It was a
pose of appeal to something far beyond him. “Put your head back
down on me,” she said, and he did. She stroked his neck, unbuttoned
his pants, made circles with her fingers on his stomach, exhibited
restraint. Taking off her clothes would have been as easy as asking.
How often are things as easy as asking?
At seven, it was time for her to go. Panos found her shirt and but-
toned up his own. “Okay,” he said. “What’s the way to do this?” He
hadn’t anticipated the need for any secrecy. He had planned to sneak
her out at three in the morning or so. But now his neighbors were
up, and many of them knew his wife, and he wasn’t sure what they
would make of a strange skinny girl leaving his apartment early in
the morning.A mbiva lence
7
“I’ll go down and throw out the trash,” he said. “If I buzz on the
buzzer, that means the coast is clear, so come downstairs quick. The
door will lock behind you.”
“Okay,” she said. “Can you carry my suitcase along with a trash
bag? That way I can get there fast. I won’t have to bump around on
the stairs.”
“It’s like being a spy,” Panos said.
“It’s nothing like that,” she said. “I could tell you stories.”
Did Panos take her to breakfast? Not to take her would have been
rude. But he did not pay. That would have been too conspiratorial,
and too high-handed, both at once. Besides, he was not hungry, just
intensely thirsty, enough so that he bought a half-gallon of orange
juice from the corner store and drank it straight from the carton
while he stood out on the sidewalk. She stopped in a coffee shop and
ordered a toasted bagel; a bit of melted butter ran down her chin
when she ate it. Her chin was slick with the butter. The sky was a
brilliant shade of blue. At that moment, just at that precise moment,
he wanted to invite her back up to his apartment and make all the
mistakes he had avoided making. Instead he changed the subject, for
the last time. “You forgot to get your pen back,” he said.
“You can keep it,” she said. “Remember me by it. That’s kind of
nice, right, to remember someone by something totally anonymous?
When you write with it, it’ll be like there’s an invisible ink message
just under the real message.”
“What does it say?”
“You wouldn’t understand,” she said. “It’s in Inuktitut.”
“What is that?”
“Look it up,” she said. “You have books. I’ve seen them. Okay:
I’m leaving.”
“See you,” Panos said.
“Or not,” she said. “Probably not.”
“Well,” he said, “I hope you enjoyed your time on Efstooth
Avenue.”
“You’re an idiot,” she said. When she leaned in to kiss him good-
bye he smelled it again, the black flower blooming under her arm.
He went back to his apartment and pulled out history books until
he found a listing in the index for the Zimmermann Telegram. He8
Ben Greenman
read a few paragraphs that he didn’t understand. They might as well
have been in Inuktitut. In the front of the book, on a f lyleaf, his
wife had signed her name. His wife, almost. He shut the book hard,
like a trap. He was trying to capture his ambivalence or kill it. Three
days later, he watched his wife sign her name again, on a marriage
certificate, beneath a paragraph he understood completely. The ink
and sky were blue.2.
Amy Having a Heart Attack
by Sharon Goldner
When Amy hears what her father has done, she thinks she is having
a heart attack.
“Are you sure?” she asks her mother, who is out of state in Amy’s
childhood home. Amy is talking loudly because of the din of the
lawnmower going at it next door.
Her mother screams “Goddamn it” and hangs up the phone on
Amy. That’s when Amy thinks she feels the heart attack give birth to
itself. Her whole left breast aches underneath where she suspects her
heart is. Amy tries calling her mother back but she will not answer
and the heart attack lightning-bolts her. It isn’t at all what she thinks
a heart attack will feel like.
“Let it be over quickly,” she says. When there is no response, Amy
answers herself: “Okay.”
Amy caresses her breast, since she can’t get to her heart, and it feels
good; no, it feels better, but good that she can take care of things
herself, with husband and children at school. She thinks about how
things could have been so different. She could have married that
rabbi, freshly ordained, he wanted to marry her, and then there was
that doctor, a heart doctor, now is that some shade of apropos or
what, but he dumped Amy for a famous actress person, thirty years
his senior. So Amy married Ralph instead and she hates him and
hates this marriage, and he is always screaming how he hates her, too,10
Sharon Goldner
and how that time she called 911 because he was screaming so badly
and they told her that they could only send someone out if he hit her
or threatened to hit her. She wondered if 911 would come out if she
thinks it is a heart attack but isn’t really sure. Or if they would tell her
mother to stop hanging up on her all the time.
Amy likes the word “tits” but only in private, and only when she is
by herself. She takes off her shirt to undo her bra and now that it is
undone, she lifts it up and off her shoulders. Sensing their immedi-
ate release, Amy uses two hands to caress and cajole. Her breasts are
loopy and long, having stretched out beside themselves after years
of expensive but essentially nonsupport bras. She considers turning
some music on for mood but that would require the effort of getting
up and the only effort Amy wants is the one right now on her breasts.
She sings to herself instead, trying to drown out the mowers. Living
in a gated community in the suburbs the lawns and gardens of the big
expansive homes are always being fussed over.
Amy has all but forgotten about the pending heart attack. Her
fingers deftly follow the vein down the one breast that starts in the
middle of nowhere. The fingers have gone this route before. She is
feeling the rise of her chest and the boldness of her C-cups elongated
as they hang out with her since her mother hung up on her today. She
doesn’t care if Ralph wants her to have a boob job; he’s got enough
D-cups in his porn collection to start a new nation. “These girls are
not fixer-uppers,” Amy always says.
Amy goes from the middle of nowhere vein all the way down to the
nipple. When she was nursing her youngest many years ago—the swell
of time bruised and bloated—her older child asked about the breast-
feeding. He was precocious enough to be in a gifted-and-talented kin-
dergarten class where he was learning his colors in Español. As she
began to give him the beautiful explanation of the breast as nourisher,
he exhaled words as if they were mucous he wanted to get rid of. “No,
what’s THAT? That blue thing,” he snaked, “on your boob.” Amy
looked down at the vein. “It’s gross!” he screamed. “Mommy’s got
blue boobs.” She had to explain to Ralph that she didn’t show him her
boob, he looked.
The phone rings. When she hears her mother’s voice on the an-A my Hav i ng a Hea r t A t t ack
11
swering machine, Amy’s fingers let go of the breasts. “Why did you
hang up on me?” Amy asks. Her bra looks funny, hanging half on
the kitchen chair. Half off. Which one is it really? “You know I don’t
like when you hang up on me.” The chair almost looks like it is wear-
ing the bra in a very revealing way. Amy’s daughter, the youngest,
recently wondered why nobody thought to dress up furniture beyond
the fabric of cushions or pillows. “It would be funny to see a sofa
wearing a dress. A love seat could wear a skirt and a pair of pants
because it’s a love seat and it could be a boy and a girl together. Of
course, it could be a girl and a girl or a boy and a boy, too,” refer-
ring to her aunt, Amy’s sister, and her wife. This child was gifted and
talented, too.
“What do you mean asking me,” her mother snipped into the
phone, “am I sure? I’m right here. You’re not here. You’re all the way
there. Exactly what part do you think I am not sure about?”
“It’s just that . . . ,” Amy stutters.
“Your father embezzled from a client,” her mother says, reaching
pitches not previously thought possible. “He got caught. It doesn’t
matter to them that he was going to pay it back before they caught
him. He was going to make it right in his own time but they are
going to make him make it right faster than that.” Her mother ex-
hales the last few words in a stream.
“Oh my God. Are you smoking?” Amy asks. She is appalled, par-
ticularly since her mother’s recent cancer diagnosis.
“I already have the cancer,” her mother says, “so what’s a cigarette
in the big picture? It helps me relax and Lord knows I need to relax.
It’s not like your father is going to take me on vacation anytime soon.
And if he gets convicted, well then, that’s really no vacation. And no
sex either. A double damnation. Oy.” Amy hears the tap-tap of the
cigarette into an ashtray.
Knowing her mother, it’s probably a soup can or a soda bottle.
The china ashtrays of her childhood were considered part of the set—
valuable pieces not to be desecrated in any way.
Amy holds the phone a little ways from her ear during the cancer
talk, convinced that maybe cigarette smoke has so advanced itself that it
can travel through the phone lines right into her ear, settling in for the12
Sharon Goldner
night before making the pilgrimage into her brain and any other body
part it damn well pleases. “What about Meg and Bob? Do they know?”
While her mother extols the virtues of her siblings, Amy thinks
back to a particular teenage memory with Meg and Bob. It’s the one
where they were all in one of the bedrooms looking at record albums.
They could hear, in the next room, their parents making love. Meg
and Bob paused for a moment to listen to their parents. They had been
looking at a Grand Funk Railroad album, saying “fuck, fuck, fuck”
out loud a million times, which led to an argument about whether
or not it had been a million times. They decided to take another hit
of the joint they had been passing around before counting the mil-
lion out again, and that is when they were stopped in mid-syllable
by the grunting and alternate groaning of their parents in bed. Meg
and Bob smiled and rolled their eyes, or for them being high, it was
more like they rolled and smiled their eyes. They were lucky, they felt,
luckier than all of their friends to have such cool parents.
“Mom had like six abortions you know,” Meg said. “A few after
Bob and then some before me. We were her chosen ones, Bob! You
were supposed to do a drum roll or something.”
Bob, picking brownie crumbs off his lap and eating them, declared,
“What we just did to those brownies is downright savage. Brownies
have feelings too, you know. Amy, you should have stopped us. When
the brownie police come, we’re going to say it’s your fault, okay?”
Amy, against the wall, heard her parents, louder than her siblings;
and found their sex sounds comforting in a way—that her parents
still wanted to be together like this. Amy is thinking on this, the
sounds of comfort, and doesn’t hear her mother until she hears the
screaming.
“Goddamn it, of course Bob and Meg know. Who do you think
posted bail? Jesus Christ, Amy. As if I don’t have enough going on.
Sometimes I think being a preemie affected you in ways the doctors
have yet to discover.”
Amy heard all the stories about how her mother had to trek back
and forth to the hospital with baby Bob in tow to bond with preemie
Amy. “Well, maybe if you hadn’t smoked and drank during preg-
nancy . . . ,” Amy says. She sits down, her breasts jostled by the
sudden movement.A my Hav i ng a Hea r t A t t ack
13
“Nobody said that was bad for the baby. Everyone did it back then.
Your brother and sister turned out fine.”
“Mom—I’m just saying,” Amy just says.
The phone clicks. Amy has been hung up on again. In the old
days, before the wireless technology, a hang-up was really a hang-up.
It had power. It had oomph. It had drama. It required a physical-
ity—the holding hand removing the phone from the ear, whooshing
it through the air on its way to being slammed down. Now the effect
of the hang-up was not quite the same. And the mowers outside seem
angrier, chopping blades of grass with, ironically, blades of sharpened
steel. Everything gets cut down in life, Amy thinks, drumming her
fingers on the kitchen table. Her father was a respected man in their
community. Everyone loved him.
He gave out sage advice. He volunteered. He served on commit-
tees. He went to fund-raisers and galas. He hosted dinner parties
where he shamed friends into giving hefty sums for charities. He was
stable. A righteous man. Of all the labels you could pitch on a man,
embezzler was not one of them. Of all the labels he wore for this
meeting and that event, who would ever dream he would wear ones
that said arrest? Police? Bail? Trial? This was unfathomable, and the
more Amy sat on the pier inside her mind fishing for explanations,
she realized that maybe anything was possible because really, how
well do you know anyone at all?
The heart attack feeling starts again, rolling in punches of pain,
threatening to explode her rib cage apart. She crosses her arms over
her chest in an effort to straitjacket everything in. The last thing Amy
wants on top of, under, and in between everything else is a mess. The
maid isn’t coming until the following week. Still hugging herself,
Amy’s crossed arms send a message up to her brain that goes some-
thing like this: “Hey, don’t you see what’s happening here? Hello—
remember the breasts?,” and then the rest of her goes, “Remember
the breasts,” and then it occurs to Amy that she can make everything
feel so much better like before.
So Amy uncrosses herself and starts with the breast massaging
again, vigorously and joyfully.
Once the heart attack subsides, Amy finds ecstasy in her breasts,
rolling and folding them. She works efficiently, as does a farmer who14
Sharon Goldner
knows the lay of his own land, except that Amy can close her eyes
for brief intervals because she is not working with dangerous farm
equipment. There is a new pattern to her breathing, and sometimes
her chest stays filled with air for longer than it heaves the air out.
Amy thinks that, as long as she is one with her breasts, the heart
attack can always be averted. She feels full, the way she used to when
she was breastfeeding her children, seemingly long ago. Taking out
the small compact mirror Amy keeps in her pocket, she looks at parts
of herself—it is not the right size for a full view of face or body, and
so she moves it around slowly, glancing at her hair, her eyes, mouth,
and neck.
Just as she moves the mirror down to her chest, intending on one
breast at a time, the phone rings.
“I don’t think you understand the gravity of the situation,” Amy’s
mother says. “Your father could do jail time for this. Can you imag-
ine Daddy in jail? Your father an inmate? Wearing the same exact
clothes as everyone else? That alone will kill him. You know how
much he relishes style. And living with a roommate? I don’t think
they are even called that. They’re cell mates. I mean, they can’t leave
you with something nicer to call it? I have been your father’s room-
mate for some forty-five years now. Did I tell you we were living
together before it was in style? We were pioneers, I tell you. Sharing
living expenses and pleasurable expenses—that’s how he put it. Way
back when they talk about the good old days, well, they really were,
before anything else.”
Amy tugs the phone away from her ear just a little. While her
mother continues to reminisce. Amy closes her eyes, taking herself
back in time to her father coming home from work—she never knew
exactly what he did, but he did have so many clients, and all of those
clients paid for all of the nice things they did have. “Daddy-o’s home,”
he would sing in the doorway, and Amy, faster than Meg and Bob,
would leap down the stairs and into his arms. “You’re too heavy for
me to pick you up, baby,” he would eventually say, but oh how he
would let her wrap herself around him into his cologne and pinstripes.
“He’s going to have to pay back everything, plus lawyer fees,” her
mother says. Amy can hear the grinding of the pottery wheel as sheA my Hav i ng a Hea r t A t t ack
15
talks. Her mother is known in town for her colorful, if not impracti-
cal, ashtrays, mugs, vases, and things that had not been tableware-
invented quite yet. “You know we’re going to have to sell Sunny.”
Amy’s jaw drops. She feels it slip away from the top part of her
mouth, wide open. Her tongue, wet with that elixir of life, spit,
having nowhere to unload its product allows it to sluice out of her
in beads, down her chin. “No, not Sunny!” The expansive home of
Amy’s childhood. Amy loves that house. It has always been there.
Strong, reliable, safe—what a childhood home should be.
Amy loves the breezy modern decor throughout, the theme of
sunflowers in every room, even in her brother’s room, where they
were hand-painted by their mother, camouflage, hanging over his
bed. The real outdoor picnic table in the kitchen, with the umbrella
that really worked. The formal dining room, with the real knotted
tree bark that twisted up from the floor, flattening itself into the ex-
panse of a table . . . how oddly divine the table looked when it was
set for one of the many elegant dinner parties, as regular a feature of
their lives as the four-tier hand-carved chandelier that drove flecked
shimmers of light onto the room. The hiding annex Amy had discov-
ered in her father’s study where she would sit and think and imagine.
The grand entryway with the winding stairwell where Amy would
pretend to be a famous megawatt movie star waving to her fans.
“You can’t do this to me,” Amy says. “You can’t. That’s my life
in there.” She places the phone down, turning it on to speaker. She
holds her breasts up, her face down, and begins sobbing into herself.
“Oh, for Christ’s sake,” her mother’s voice goes, coming through
crackly on speaker. It fills up the kitchen like a noxious gas seeping
into every space, sending its rebel forces all out with threats of over-
throw down every path. “You’re an adult woman, for God’s sake,
blubbering over a house you left long ago. When’s the last time you
visited? Do you ever make it in for the holidays? Practically every
month of the calendar there’s a goddamn holiday that you avoid
coming home for. Your father and I beg . . . they’re our only grand-
children. And NOW you’re crying. Boo hoo for Amy.”
Amy knows there’s a lot more anger in her mother’s hang-up than
the click will allow. She turns the phone back on, waiting for the16
Sharon Goldner
dial tone to die, followed by the recorded operator voice that says,
“If you would like to make a call, hang up and dial again,” followed
by the blast of beeps reminding Amy that the phone is still off the
hook, before going completely dead. Determined to make the day go
the way she wants it to, Amy starts back up with her breasts, fingers
cooing on the skin freckled with perspiration, hips rocking in the
vinyl kitchen chair. She reaches one hand down inside the waist of
her jeans. They pop open, and her fingers scramble inside the dark
denim.
Outside, the edger guy on the path next door motions up and
down to the lawn guy on the mower. The mower smiles, the space
in between his front teeth holding a toothpick captive. He shakes his
head, pushing his baseball cap firmly down, squashing bits of hair
this way and that.
He knows what the edger is gesturing about, and he’s interested,
but no, not really. His wife at home has some really great chest. This
missus here, well, hers are middle-aged and old.
The edger guy mows up as close as he can to the window without
seeming intrusive. He’s a professional, after all. Say what you will
about their line of work, but how many jobs can boast of a little
breast sightseeing on the side? A doctor, for sure. The edger guy
shakes his head—too much school required for that. All he had to do
was read a mower-and-edger manual.
He swipes a look in Amy’s window, baseball cap pulled low over
his eyes, just in case he has to say he wasn’t looking at anything—
nothing at all—and it would seem like it was true.3.
The Anarchist of Darwin
by Michael Ramberg
I come from a small town you never heard of, unless you know about
the big ball of string—biggest one ever done by a single man—that
they keep in a big glass-wall gazebo about two miles off the main
road. Used to, anyway. You probably heard that story, too, how it
got burned down a few weeks ago. It was in all the papers’ News of
the Weird columns and the late-night talk shows, how some freak
or freaks drove in, smashed out one of the windows, threw in some
gas, and tossed in a lighter. Poof. A fireball, busted glass, chaos. The
whole sky turned orange, fading to a dingy black smoke-cloud that
hung over the whole town before drifting off toward the Cities,
eighty miles to the east. The volunteer fire crew spent forty minutes
drowning it with hose-water; it was dawn before they were done and
before noon the whole town knew. It hit everyone pretty hard, as you
might imagine. We didn’t know what to do. One by one, folks came
driving out to pay respects. They parked on the gravel median and
stood shoulder to shoulder, staring at the soggy mess the fire crew
left behind.
Then they held a whole-town meeting at the combined high school
gym. Man, everyone showed up. The grocer, the barber, the manager
of the new Walmart that was driving them all out of business. Every-
one wanted a piece of where the town was headed now that its most
famous citizen was dead. Aside from wanting revenge on the sick bas-18
Michael Ramberg
tard that had done it, they couldn’t agree on much. Some wanted to
rebuild what was left, which was about half the ball, and that mostly
char made soggy and starting to mold already from the soaking that
had put out the fire. Some others wanted to plow the whole site
under and move on with being just another small town dying on the
godforsaken prairie. Small-time thinkers thinking small, but at least
they were trying, seemed to me. This is a pretty typical small town,
and what that means is anyone with big ideas gets run out early for
the Cities, leaving it for the half-wits with delusions of grandeur to
run the show.
After the meeting, little groups gathered out in the parking lot and
talked it over. I ended up with Buddy Summers and Tank Watterman
and their pinched-up little wives, who were all cross-eyed with anger
over the ball of string being gone.
“I think it’s a local,” said Buddy. “I think it’s one of the antis.”
The antis were what we called people who thought the ball of string
was a bad idea. Mostly they lived close to the ball, so they had to put
up with the occasional set of kids from the Cities who drove by at
three in the morning, drunk and looking for some hick, irony-laden
small-town icon to make fun of.
“I think it was some crazy from out of town,” Tank’s wife Mella
said. “I think it was a terrorist.” Mella was four foot ten, five two if
you counted her hair, which she kept piled up and curly in a style
twenty years out of date. It had been really something back in the
eighties, but now it was just kind of sad. I don’t know how her hus-
band put up with her walking around like that, because Tank sold
cars in Plymouth, which was forty miles away, out where folks from
the Cities lived, so he was a little more sophisticated than Mella.
“One thing’s for sure,” said Buddy. “We’re gonna find the guy.
And then he’ll pay.”
“I think it was an anarchist,” I said. “One of those guys who just
wants to destroy stuff for no good reason.” They stared at me.
“What’s a anarchist?” said Mella.
“Like the devil,” Buddy said with an ignorant laugh.
“That’s the anti-Christ,” I said.T he A na rch i st of D a r w i n
19
“He thinks the devil did it.”
“I said anarchists, shithead,” I said. The world was turning red,
and I could feel my face flushing in anger.
“Okay, Spaz-o-tron. Hold your water.”
I closed my eyes until the red went away. People were always saying
dumb things and I was always having to calm down about it. It was
why I spent so much time at home; it was the only way to avoid being
around idiots and getting pissed off all the time. I said, “Anarchists
believe society should be reshaped without a hierarchy of authority,”
I said. “They believe all government institutions are evil, and that
destruction of the current status quo is the best way to achieve a
stateless society.”
“Oh,” said Mella. She rolled her eyes back to think for a second.
“So why burn down the string ball?”
“Because it’s an irrational system,” I said. “With no proven meth-
odology for implementing its core values, it strikes out at anything it
despises.”
“Chris the genius,” said Buddy with a sneer. “J.C. Christ.” Buddy
had never liked me. Even back to grade school he’d been picking at
the scab of my personality, and I was surprised we’d gone this long
without him saying some ignorant, stupid thing. “Is that what you’re
doing, holed up in your house all day?”
“I’m in the book business,” I said. “So I read some of them.” I
bought and sold books on the Internet. I’d started with the collec-
tion my dad had left in the basement after he killed himself, and had
bought and sold enough to be able to pay the taxes on the house that
had become mine, since Mom had died off herself some years earlier.
“If it helps us find this asshole, let him read whatever he wants,”
Tank said. “C’mon. Let’s go out there in the morning. I bet there’s
tons of clues about who did this.”
“They been over and over that lot,” said Buddy. “They even called
in some expert from the Cities. If there’s anything left, he’ll find it.”
“There’s always clues,” said Tank. “Right, Chris?”
I don’t know why he dragged me into it. They turned and looked at
me. Buddy said, “You should miss it more than anyone. Your momma
worked with that thing for twenty years. Put bread on the table.”20
Michael Ramberg
My mother had worked at the visitors’ center, selling postcards and
charging admission to the History of the River Valley exhibit they
kept in the back. It never paid much, and when she died—it was from
lung cancer—the town made it a part-time volunteer job. But I didn’t
feel any sense of gratitude to the string-ball, and why should I? The
way I figure, back in the fifties when Old Man Johnson had begun
winding that thing, twine was 80 percent asbestos. Which means my
mother worked every day for years in the presence of a nine-ton ball
of poison.
“We’ll take a look tomorrow, right?” said Tank.
They were all looking at me again until Buddy said, “Say some-
thing, Spaz-o-tron.”
I don’t remember anything after that. I suppose being called Spaz-
o-tron may go down all right with some people, but not with me.
Most likely I got pissed off and took a swing, or maybe I just stormed
off and came home. But the next thing I remember is waking up in
the morning and diving into my work. I scouted around, looking
for people who were willing to unload books for less than they were
worth just to get rid of them; then I sent some emails to people will-
ing to pay extra for books so they didn’t have to look for them their
own selves. Basically I was cheating two sets of people to make my
profit, but that’s how capitalism works when you get down to it, and
who was I to stand by while someone else took my money? I made a
few deals that put me up about fifty bucks—a slow morning—then
decided to go to lunch.
I went to the Twine-Winder, like I usually do, and ordered a
grilled cheese sandwich with french fries and sat eating it while star-
ing across the lawn at the place where the remains of the twine ball
still lay in the afternoon sun like a big, crumbling turd. People were
still coming by to look at the mess. They stopped their cars and got
out and stood by the yellow police tape keeping people away from
the mass of charcoal and burned out gazebo timbers still dangling
from the one wall that hadn’t caved in. They took pictures. Some of
them dabbed at their eyes like they were starting to cry. There was
even a memorial out front, where people had brought flowers and
piled them up on the lawn between the charred-out string-ball andT he A na rch i st of D a r w i n
21
the visitor center. It was just like those memorials you saw when that
princess died in a car crash, or that spring up every time some stupid
teenager goes nuts and brings a gun to school and thins out the herd
a little. It’s funny how people react pretty much the same way to
what’s important and what isn’t, if you ask me.
“They sure miss that string,” said a voice above me. It was Claire,
come to refill my coffee cup. Claire’d been waiting tables at the Twine-
Winder since she was fifteen. She was still pretty, but she’d never been
bright. She’d had a kid a while back who died of cancer, and after
that her husband moved to the Cities and she’s been struggling alone
ever since. She was about the last person in town I’d think to let near
what was left of my heart, but she was damaged goods now, beyond
my skills to save.
“All them flowers are pretty,” I said.
“Sad to think all that pretty came from the wreck of that string-
ball. Still, people miss it pretty bad, driving out there to pay respects
that way.”
“Pay respects,” I said. “Most of it’s Verna’s overstock.” Verna ran
a flower shop two towns down. I said, “I saw her drop it off couple
nights ago.”
“Still,” said Claire. “It’s a nice thought.”
Then Tank came in and sat at my table. I was about halfway
through my grilled cheese and there was still forty minutes to go
before I had to make a phone call, so I sat and listened to what he
had to say. Whenever I left the house to eat down at the Twine-
Winder, he’d always find me and sit down and talk with me for about
ten hours. I don’t know if what he tells me he tells other people and I
don’t care. Maybe he knows I won’t spread it around. I really didn’t
want much to do with Tank, because he’s such a hypocrite, but he
was one of the few guys who was nice to me, so I gave him some
leeway most times.
As he sat down he said, “Looking good, Chris,” and he gave me
a friendly wink. One good thing about Tank, he never called me by
that other name, the one I hate that followed me out of grade school
like a puppy that grew into the meanest Rottweiler in the world. I
told him I was okay. Then he said, “I been poking around. Turns out22
Michael Ramberg
the ball-burner busted out the glass with a hammer. Soaked the ball
with gas. Then he tossed in a lighter.”
“We all know that,” I said.
“But I found out,” he said, grabbing a fry off my plate, “it was a
Zippo lighter.”
“Yeah?”
“Oh, yeah.”
“Should dust it for prints.”
“Yeah, they did that. That investigator from the Cities, he’s on the
job.”
“Good,” I said. The investigator was a fat, bald guy in thick glasses
who’d stood behind the mayor during the meeting, peering up at us
all with his beady little eyes. He’d looked more like an expert in Big
Macs than in arson.
Tank said, “He says whoever did this was a lucky amateur. Says
that, in a contained area like that, pumping in gasoline creates a con-
centration of fumes in a small space. Basically it was a bomb. Guy was
lucky he didn’t get blasted clear to Iowa.”
Claire filled Tank’s coffee and took his order and asked if I was
okay, then left again, tucking her little notepad into the hip pocket
of her apron. “She likes you,” Tank said. “You oughta get you some
of that.”
“Not much left, what I hear,” I said, regretting it right away. Since
her kid died and her husband left, Claire in her grief had taken on half
the men in town, and some from outside. Men left her house all hours.
Strangers, townsfolk, whoever. I only knew ’cause on nights when I
can’t sleep I take walks and Claire lives near the park, where there’s a
bench I rest sometimes and it, just by coincidence, points me straight
at her house, where there’s no choice but to monitor the goings-on
of Claire and her parade of menfolk. I’d even seen Tank leaving there
once in a while, but I didn’t say anything to him about it.
“Suit yourself,” Tank said. Tank was a guy who’d have sex with
pretty much anyone. He didn’t care that he was married, or if they
were, he just had sex with them. He went to strip clubs with co-
workers, so he knew what he was talking about when he said ev-
eryone in the Cities dresses like strippers now; he said he even hadT he A na rch i st of D a r w i n
23
a couple strippers come in looking to buy a car. He could tell they
were strippers by the superthin eyebrows and the superfake tan, and
because they offered him a two-on-one VIP deal instead of an actual
down payment on a white Tundra with a navigation system and DVD
player. They were going out west to make it in the movies, they’d
said. What he didn’t say was whether he took their down payment or
not; I’d guess he did.
“So did you see anything?”
“What?”
“I know you go out wandering at nights. Claire tells me she’s seen
you in the park. Pretty much everyone sees you, the way you wander
around the town. Thought maybe you saw something.”
“No,” I said.
“I thought the cops could use some help, is all. If you saw any-
thing.”
“I’m tired of everyone thinking they know things about me,” I
said.
“It’s a small town,” said Tank. “You can’t keep too many secrets
here.”
“Don’t I know it,” I said. I’d already said too much, so I kept
my mouth shut. Because this is a pretty little town filled with ugly
little people stuck together in groups of two, and I was the oddball
single, I stuck out for easy scorn and rumor. The rest of the town
was couples, husbands and wives, not that it was any better that way.
Most couples I knew were at each other’s throats all day long. I don’t
understand what it is that keeps people together. It’s a surprise the
whole world doesn’t just go off hiding in seven billion little holes and
die off from disgust at each other’s stupidity. I guess I just don’t have
the stomach for it.
It was an anarchist that took down President McKinley, and from that
we got President Teddy Roosevelt, who basically whupped up on the
Spaniards and everyone else in his way until he’d turned the United
States into what it is today: the biggest badass country in the world,
beloved mostly except by jealous freaks blind to all the good we’ve
done. Irony is, with all our might we just bred bastards resentful of24
Michael Ramberg
our success, stupid blind anarcho-terrorists bent on destroying our
way of life by taking down a couple tall buildings. But to prove how
stupid they were, they didn’t know what a huge favor they were doing
the world by giving us the excuse to take over a couple of shitty coun-
tries headed nowhere and put them on the fast track to the good life.
But try explaining that to people. They may be down with invad-
ing countries run by homicidal madmen, but if you mention that all
this good was caused by a tragedy, by people doing senseless things,
then they shut up fast. In my experience no one understands how en-
twined good and evil are, how God wouldn’t be half the ass-kicker he
was if it weren’t for that creep down in Hell. And sometimes it’s not
as easy as taking sides—sometimes you need to be the one who per-
suades the rest of the world not to follow in your path. You start tell-
ing people things like that and the words get wrapped around each
other till they don’t mean anything and they look at you like you’re
crazy and soon enough you learn not to say a damn thing to anyone.
So you go for long walks. I do. I walked back to town and went
to the park. I sat there on the bench that faced Claire’s house and
watched the yellow glow from her windows as she moved around in
there, doing I didn’t know what. She was alone tonight, which I liked.
Sometimes there were men, and I never stayed long when she had
men. But tonight she moved around near the window, wearing a tank
top that showed the angel tattoo on her shoulder blade I could see
even from across the street and in the park, and she wore small white
panties that flashed when she shook her hips to the beat I couldn’t
hear. She was dancing, by herself, just this pinkish shadow-form glint-
ing in the yellow light of her bedroom. Then she stopped and came to
the window and stood staring out at the park, one hand cupped up by
her shoulder, and she stared out the window and just about the spot
where I was sitting in the dark. She had a curious look on her face, as if
she was about to call out to me, but there was no way she could know I
was there. She must have just stopped to think about something. Like
about all the places her life had gone, and where it could have gone,
all the turns that ended right here where she was. After she left the
window I had the urge, like I sometimes do, to go knock on her door,
but I didn’t. I never did. I just never did.T he A na rch i st of D a r w i n
25
I didn’t know what time it was or how long I’d been there, but
eventually I heard footsteps clicking down the street so I got up to
leave, thinking it was Buddy, playing cop, come to give me a hard
time. But whoever it was, it wasn’t Buddy, because this guy was wide
and his bald head and round glasses shone in the streetlamp like the
eyes of a robot in a fifties sci-fi movie. When he got closer I could
tell it was that investigator from the Cities. He stopped when he got
close and I imagined him staring at me, waiting for me to make the
next move. The move turned out to be me standing up and starting
the walk back to my place.
It was a cool night and a breeze coming off the river put a chill in
the air so I hiked up my collar and started walking a bit faster. My
feet made loud crunching sounds against the gravel so I walked off
to the side on the grass. I could hear whoever it was behind me fol-
lowing close and getting closer. There was a light over the next rise in
the hill that was, of course, the string ball, which they still kept lit at
night, out of habit, I suppose. So it was toward the string ball I was
trying to make my escape, which wasn’t a very bright thing to do, I
guess, but I didn’t have anything to hide, so I kept going.
The string ball was pretty much the same under the lights as it
was under the sun, except the lights were kind of orangey, so every-
thing had a Halloween tint. The charcoal remains were pitch-black
like a ragged hole in the night, and all the flowers in the spontaneous
memory garden were weirdly glowing and the cellophane they came
wrapped in glinted and warped and all the cut greenery looked bright
and more alive than it had ever been when it was in the ground of
wherever they’d cut it from to send out here to mourn for that thing
that had burned down. It was beautiful, like a ship at sea spilling its
treasure on the rocks for no one to ever claim.
I looked around for the investigator, but he was gone.
Then there was another meeting at the high school gym. I wasn’t
going to go at all, as crowds are always hot and sweaty, but I went
anyway, going in late and finding a seat on the far bench. Claire must
have been late as well, because she came in a few minutes after I did
and sat next to me.26
Michael Ramberg
“Why are you sitting here?” I said.
“Free country, honey,” she said. “Did I miss anything?”
“National anthem,” I said. “Mayor Jenkins played it from his
armpit.” She laughed at this, laughed as though it were actually a
funny thing I’d just said and not just a snide, empty put-down.
“Let me tell you something,” she said. “I hope that, when they
find the guy who did this, they give him a medal. The town hasn’t
been this shook up in years. Feels good, doesn’t it? To care about
something? It gets the blood moving.” She shook her shoulders as if
to show how agitated her blood was, and I felt something inside me
that was something almost like what I remembered hope felt like.
Don Jentwich, who’d been running the gas station on the corner
nearest the Interstate ever since Bull Tukkanen, the Mad Finn, who’d
been running it longer than anyone could remember, up and died
four years ago. Don had upgraded the pumps and put them under a
well-lit shelter, which everyone praised him for, and also raised the
price of gas, which put him on the outs. But he was a thinker, and
he had a plan: “We can rebuild it, and we can rebuild it better,” he
said. “There’s this artist in the city who does string sculpture. I’ve
made a call, and he’s interested. He thinks we can take the remains of
the original, salvage what isn’t burned away, and incorporate it into
a sculpture both commemorating the original twine ball and going
beyond it . . . ”
He was still talking, but there was no way to hear a single word
above the shouting and scorn being thrown down from the bleachers.
“Idiots,” said Claire. “That’s the best idea yet.”
“Rubes,” I said.
“Well, that was interesting, Don,” said the mayor when the shout-
ing had let down. “And, I can assure you, when the city council meets
again, we’d be glad to hear more about that . . . most intriguing . . .
proposal. Now, for a further update on the investigation, please wel-
come our friend from the Cities, Lieutenant Mentz.”
The little fat man hopped up to the podium like he weighed about
six pounds. It was weird. He tapped the microphone and winced
along with the crowd at the feedback. “Okay,” he said. “Thanks.
Here’s what we know. We got a profile. Whole deal. This guy—and
I’m pretty sure it was one guy—was well prepared. He came in with aT he A na rch i st of D a r w i n
27
gas pump and a hammer to smash out the glass. He’s a loner, unhappy,
perhaps with a serious associative disorder. Perhaps delusional.”
“Someone like our Chris,” someone shouted. There was laughter;
then the whole crowd turned on me, and someone must have turned
up the thermostat because suddenly it was a hundred degrees in that
crappy gym and sweat was pouring down my face.
“Where were you that night?” someone said.
Everyone laughed as the room went all red, and then they stopped
laughing. Even though I often don’t remember what happens when
I get mad, I remember all that happened after that. The detective
was fixing me with his piggy genius eyes like he’d just drawn into a
straight flush. I heard a woman’s voice—Claire, I figured later—say
my name. She asked if I was okay. I thought about the medal she
might give me. About what the hell difference it made now if anyone
knew or not.
So I just stood up and said Okay. The crowd got quiet and con-
tinued looking at me. Okay, I said again. Okay fine. It was me. You
might as well know. I told them how sick I’d gotten of that string
ball that killed my mother and drove my old man to drink and ruin.
How the whole lazy town just sat around and let strangers come
in and make fun of us for having the stupid thing on the lawn in a
gazebo. I told how I dressed myself up in black clothes and dad’s
old surplus gas mask to keep out the asbestos-poison that would be
released like a mushroom cloud when the thing went up, and I crept
up to that crappy ball of twine with a gas can and a Zippo I got from
a SuperAmerica near the Cities, and I torched it in the dead of night
so the stupid town could have something better to do than worship
a dead idol. I’d been right to do it, I said, because look at how the
town had come together. They should give me a medal, I said.
And when I was done, when I told them what I’d done and why,
the whole room was cold, and quiet like the night had been before
I lit the Zippo. Every pair of eyes was on me, Claire included, and
every one of those nutballs from the city I live in had the same look
on their faces. They were all eyeing me like I was the crazy one. So if
you want to know, it was exactly then that I pretty much gave up on
the whole damn world.4.
Another Terrible Thing
by Catherine Lacey
Another terrible thing was how I met my husband.
He was wearing a suit that day and his tie was a deep red that made
his eyes seem even greener and it brought out the pale pink in his
face. He was thirty-three, but still looked boyish. I was twenty-one
but everyone had always guessed older. We were sitting in a small and
brutally lit waiting area in the University Police office. We sat next
to each other for maybe twenty minutes without saying anything at
all and we didn’t even bend a glance at the other because it’s hard to
do that when you’re thinking about what a woman can do to herself
and how a brick courtyard on a nice autumn afternoon can so quickly
become a place you’ll never want to see again. Police officers were
speaking into phones and walkie-talkies and one of them walked over
to ask me my name.
Elyria Marcus.
Ruby was your sister?
Adopted, yeah, I said, in case they knew that she was Korean and
could see from looking at me that I wasn’t.
The officer nodded and made a note on her clipboard. She looked
at my husband, who was just a stranger sitting next to me at that
point and it hadn’t yet crossed my mind to wonder why he was there
or who he might be.
Professor, we need to ask you a few questions if you don’t mind, she said.A not her Ter r ible T h i ng
29
Of course, he said, and he followed her to the back of the office.
While he was gone my mother showed up, limp and sleepy on
whatever Dad was slipping her these days. Dad wasn’t there of course;
he was still in Puerto Rico doing cheap boob jobs or something.
Mom fell into the seat beside me.
Oh, it’s waaarm, she slurred. What a nice surprise.
She snaked her arm around mine and put her head on my shoulder.
Baby, baby, my little baby. It’s just you and me now. No more Ruby
ring, Ruby slippers, Ruby Tuesday. Oh, our Ruby, Ruby.
It’s normal, I’ve heard, for people to talk a little nonsense at times
like these, but she wasn’t even crying and that just made me feel
worse because I wasn’t either. I tried to seem like I was in shock, but
I wasn’t, not really. Of course Mother didn’t even try to pretend she
was in shock because that’s the kind of beast she is. An officer came
over to offer condolences or have her sign something. Mom offered
him her hand like she expected him to kiss it. He shook it awkwardly
and with a bent wrist, then slipped away.
My Ruby, my Ruby. Precious little Ruby. What was it she always said,
Elyria? Am I your favorite Asian daughter? Elly, you know she was my
only Asian daughter. What on earth do you think she meant by that? I
never understood it. Was that just a joke? Did she ever tell you what she
meant?
I wiped a smudge of lipstick off my mother’s nose. It looked like
she had put it on while talking and driving, which was probably true.
It was a joke, Mom.
Elyria, she was so beautiful. People must have wondered how she could
stand our ugly family.
People must have wondered, even I wondered. I stayed up late at
night just staring at her, wondering how she’d ever be able to stand it. I
guess she just couldn’t take it anymore, our ugliness.
Mom, stop.
It’s not our fault. We were born like this. Well, not really you, dear, but—
If you don’t stop this I’m going to leave right now and never talk to
you again.
I said this kind of thing to Mother a lot back then and she knew it
just meant I’d had enough.30
Catherine Lacey
She sat up, pushed her hair out of her face, and took a lot of air
into her body. She let it out slow, grabbed my hand, looked me in the
eye, and squeezed. It was the first human moment we’d had in years,
but it ended quickly.
I need so many cigarettes, she said, while staggering away. Through
the glass wall in the front of the police office I saw her light what
would become the first of nearly a dozen she smoked in a row. Every
few minutes someone would approach her, almost bowing, it seemed.
Excuse me, I could see their mouths say, pointing to the No Smoking
Within 50 Ft of This Door sign, and she would cut them off with a
shout I could hear through the glass. Have you heard of my daughter,
Ruby? Ruby Marcus? She died today and it wasn’t from secondhand
smoke.
If that didn’t work she added fuck off, I’m grieving, which usually
solved it.
The professor who wasn’t yet my husband came back and stopped
in front of me, standing a few inches too close and looking down.
His paleness was glowing. I noticed his suit was too big around the
middle and the sleeves were a little short.
Do you want to know anything? About her? I was the last one who,
you know, spoke with her.
That’s what they think.
I didn’t particularly care what some professor had said to Ruby.
I’d seen her that morning myself, and she was no mystery. We had
stood together outside Nussbaum and drank paper cups of coffee.
She looked terrible, like she hadn’t slept in days, and she said she
felt even worse and I asked, How much worse? and she said she didn’t
want to talk about it and I wasn’t going to talk about it if she wasn’t
so we didn’t talk about anything. We finished our coffees and walked
in opposite directions. The blame (or at least some of it) was on me,
I knew; I never thought she’d go through with it.
So I really didn’t want to talk to anyone that day, and especially
not about Ruby, but the professor’s voice was so very level and calm.
He sounded like some kind of radio reporter and I wanted to listen
to this personal radio; I wanted his voice to play and play. My mother
was lighting another cigarette outside, leaning her back against the
glass, a dark bra visible through her wrinkled oxford.A not her Ter r ible T h i ng
31
Okay, I told the professor. I’ll listen.
He sat down slowly, his knees angled toward me a little.
I’d only known Ruby since the semester started when she became my
T.A. She seemed determined and focused and very bright. She was tal-
ented, you know, and had been working on some incredible proofs, things
you wouldn’t expect from a person her age.
His sentences were hard and plain, like he had been polishing them
all afternoon.
I never understood what she did here, I said. We never talked about it.
Well ... I don’t know how to describe it, what Ruby seemed like today.
I suppose I have a hard time reading faces, emotions, you know, the
descriptive stuff. I’m more of a numbers person. But she seemed, just—
maybe just a little distracted. She stopped by my office to give me some
papers she had been working on that she wanted me to check over and
then she just left.
What was it?
What do you mean?
The papers. Was it something important?
Ah, um, no. Not really. Just simple things. Some proofs most grad
students could do. She was capable of so much more than that. She’d been
working on some very interesting stuff lately.
Oh.
I’m sorry.
No, it’s fine. I mean, it doesn’t matter that it was just regular math.
No, I mean, the whole thing. That she . . .
Right . . .
And then I wished right then that I could gently cry; just cry so
very little, politely, humanly.
Outside my mother was screaming at someone, her breath making
tiny smoke and steam clouds.
Thank you, I said to the professor.
He nodded his head, put his hands on his knees then leaned back
a little, then leaned forward again. He looked at my mother, who was
still screaming; then he looked at his feet.
Listen, I . . . When I was twenty my mother did it the same way as
Ruby and, I just, well . . . today I’ve been thinking about it a lot, you
know. Probably the most since it happened.32
Catherine Lacey
I didn’t say anything. Mother was lighting another cigarette. A
section of her hair was pushed over her head the wrong way. She
turned around and waved at me with one limp little hand, a royal dis-
missal. She had applied even more lipstick and it rimmed her mouth
like ice cream on a toddler. She sucked on a white cigarette.
I’m sorry for that, he said, for saying that. I know it’s what people
always do, try to tell you they’ve already dealt with what you’re dealing
with, trying to tell you how they grieved—I know it doesn’t help. I’m
sorry. It was just on my mind.
You don’t need to be sorry, I said.
We didn’t talk for a little while. He put his hand on my shoulder
as if he were taking someone else’s advice to do so. Then he let it stay
there for a moment and then water did come out of my eyes and I felt
more appropriate and more human to myself.
When we were children our favorite game was runaway, I said, my
voice all phlegm-filled and real. We’d put our hands under our seat
belts and pretend our mother was taking us away.
The professor put his arms around me and I collapsed into him,
making a wet spot on his navy jacket.5.
Barnacles of the Fuzz
by D. Foy
1.
For punishment, June played her husband, accordion that he was. Of
course she had first had to flatten him into that little lump of tidily
flexible compartments, what had appeared more difficult than in the
end it had proved. Boom! She smashed him once on the head with her
colossal mallet, and the job was absolute.
2.
On the operating table Franno would flatline four times before they
proclaimed him “out of the woods.” They’d have his rib cage open
and all of his organs and a goodly portion of his intestines too on the
table beside him.
Later he would speak of the wedding he never attended. Mostly
those gathered there had got lost in their cups, as goes the wrinkled
saying, but there were some who kept their heads, and these were by
and large folks, as they also say, who didn’t hit the bottle, codgers and
diabetics and regular old teetotalers, not to mention the rugrats and
such who had spent the day on their knees beneath the tables, tying
peoples’ shoelaces in knots and looking at the shapes of their genitals
behind their clothes and in one instance a lady’s koochie that didn’t
have any underwear to speak of; it was hairless, with a tattoo of Tigger34
D. Foy
from Winnie the Pooh in a cleft a little higher up. Every time Franno
looked at June, a faintly serene smile had illuminated her face, one
like Venus’s there on that giant clamshell with the cherubs and favo-
nian winds. Outside, in the rose garden, a woman he had met once
or twice as a child was sitting alone on a bench, crying. The unkindly
sky had been overcast, though, now, kindly, it was clearing. There
were sparrows.
3.
Franno, Timothy, Gentry, and June were in the ditch. Before march-
ing away on this pollywog safari, Franno had gone into Timothy’s
room and found him singing to a clutch of dolls. Each doll, the two
on hand at least, had a name, the girl doll Frankie, the boy Sever-
ine. Tell me the name of my true lover! Franno told him their father
wouldn’t like to catch him like this, he had already caught him like
this and told him as much, more than once, a bunch more times
really, he didn’t want to see it again, goddamn it, son, it breaks my
heart. Someday, though we don’t know it now, nor, for that matter,
do they, June will marry Gentry.
Timothy said, “But why?”
“Go get the nets,” Franno said. “I’ll get the jars.”
“But why?” Timothy said.
In the ditch, in the shade of a culvert, each child would recite as
though some vulgar incantation the graffiti on the walls.
“Fuck,” Gentry said.
“Fuck,” Franno said.
“Fuck,” Timothy said.
“What does it mean?” June said.
“It’s what the toads are doing,” Gentry said.
“Fuck,” June said.
They made a row of bottles at the top of the ditch, clambered
down one embankment and up the next, and began to throw rocks.
After a while an old man stepped into the yard against the ditch and
told them he had better not catch them messing with his pug. The
pug was pretty old too but not old enough that he couldn’t hobble
through the ivy to bark at the kids.Ba r nacle s of t he Fu zz
35
“My cherries too,” said the old man, “or my plums. Go on,” he
said, “go make trouble somewhere else.”
“Up yours,” Gentry said.
Timothy had appeared on the driveway slathered up with lipstick,
rouge, mascara, and the like, and moreover he had adorned him-
self with one rhinestone gorget, one pearl earring (clip-on and fake),
one blond wig in the style of the icon Marilyn Monroe, and the red
leather pumps his mother had on a whim in Capwell’s found adorable
only to relegate to the dark of her overflowing closet. He was holding
a net with a long wire handle. Frankie he had stuffed into his shorts
so that only her blond head was peeking walleyed from above the
waistband.
“Ooooooo,” June had said.
Franno picked one of those spiny pods from the maple tree and
hucked it down the street. Gentry snickered.
“You look like one of those ladies on Saturday Night Live,” he said.
They caught toads, pollywogs, snakes (a garter), mice (one), drag-
onflies, lizards (bluebellies mainly though also they broke off the tail
of an alligator lizard just before it had got into a crack in the rocks),
carp (one, a baby), guppies, and lots and lots of crickets. They found
eleven empty cans from a twelve pack of Olympia some teenagers had
drunk a day or two before, and a whole bunch of cigarette butts,
mostly Camel Lights but also a Salem, that was the one with lipstick
on it. Plus an apple with two holes carved into it, one on top and one
on the side, and some burned up stinky tinfoil, and a bunch of burned
up matches. Gentry had a box of matches. Momentarily he would take
a toad from the bucket of toads slimy with their own eggs and toss it
into the air, whence, he did not know how or why, Timothy would
clumsily catch it, his fingers trembling, shortly to see a wick hissing
with fire and smoke trailing from the toad’s puckered anus. A second
later the toad would detonate. A second after that Timothy would find
himself slick with guts and brains and little bulging eyes, splintery
pieces of shattered bones. He’d still be wearing the blond wig in the
style of the icon Marilyn Monroe. Gentry, by the way, had nearly ten
packs of firecrackers got from his big brother Harry, who had bought
a brick of them off some thugs in Chinatown the week before. June36
D. Foy
will not have been there, having been sent home by Franno because
they were all supposed to be home by then but Franno didn’t want to
get in trouble, June would tell their mother they’d be home in time
for dinner, everything was fine, they had caught lots of stuff, it was
totally, majorly boss.
4.
HALLELUJAH!
Until now, it’s been an endless source of wonder why you guys have
never given Timothy Donohue a spread in your magazine. I thought
he’d either snubbed someone on your staff or failed to grease the
proper palm, since you’ve never even mentioned his name in your
events column. Anyway, I’ve been following this prodigal son since his
first shows up in the boondocks of Petaluma/Santa Rosa. First time
I saw his stuff (over at Pops’s Old Socks, now defunct—bummer), it
felt like maybe I’d just opened the Ark of the Covenant or something.
But with work like his “Fire Iron,” “Dynamite,” “Felinus Thaumatur-
gus,” and “Internal Combustion,” it’s no surprise he’s finally gracing
the pages of your most excellent publication. In my opinion, there
are only one or two others in the genre who can stand by him today,
Zokosky and possibly Swihart. Maybe next time around you’ll do us
all the favor of putting him on the cover and quit wasting copy on the
likes of Coop, PIZZ, Shag, Von Franco and the rest of their lowbrow
(with a LOWer case “l”!) ilk. Praise be the day, and keep on truckin.
Jose Inagaki
Novato, CA
>> Talk about greasy palms. Sheesh.
5.
The man, wearing a sheer white jumpsuit, shot Timothy’s brother
twice in the chest, point-blank, then fled on a rickety bike. Witnesses
confirm both, the jumpsuit and the daring escape.
6.
In her old age June would confess her inability to fathom the day-
mares she had known all those years. She swore she had never lovedBa r nacle s of t he Fu zz
37
Gentry one whit less than she did that day. He was her dreamboat,
her hunka chunka hunka, her Pumpatron baby in the Muzak dusk.
He always had been, and always would. “That is why I just don’t un-
derstand,” she said.
Timothy couldn’t do more as his sister spoke than watch his sugar
dissolve into the oily brown of his ten-dollar espresso. And rightly
so. From then till now, true love had eluded him like words on a
Morbot’s tongue.
“He still webs me gifts,” June would tell him. “Little bottles of
exquisitely distilled Cocotabs, opera tickets with seats on the Gravi-
tational Mezzanine—even codes for those new UltraDio Laser Peels
and DermaPass Tan-Thrus. However could I have thought of harm-
ing him?”
“They’re only just fantasies,” Timothy would say.
“No,” June would say, “but you don’t understand.”
7.
It was most always dark in there, even though the old gal had gas,
I guess she didn’t want to pay for the stuff, which I guess I can un-
derstand, and I was always just waiting there in the gloom for old
Abe Lincoln to come around and spill his guts. I don’t know how I
knew all this, I just did, like any memory I can remember right now,
like right now I can remember the time me and my pops went out
to Sears at the mall and saw all these undercover cops wrestling with
a man who my pops said must have shoplifted something while the
man’s own son stood back on the walk, kind of trying to hide behind
the leaves of those big old plastic looking bushes in the planter by
the door. That kind of memory. This time, though, when old Abra-
ham appeared, he told me he was tired of spilling his guts. He said it
wasn’t worth it anymore, he was just going to do himself in. He had a
pistol there to prove he meant business, too; it was in his hand, right
there, a big old revolver-type monster with a six- or eight-inch barrel,
big enough to do whatever he wanted to with. Then, instead of me
looking at Abraham Lincoln with my own eyes, the eyes of John
Wilkes Booth, I mean, I was looking at the both of them from the
ceiling of the hallway outside my room. I know that sounds cheesy. I38
D. Foy
would change the story if I could, but the point of all this, why I’m
putting it down, is that I have to tell it the way I saw it, and that’s
how I saw it, no matter how cheesy.
8.
As a child, Magritte had seen his mother dragged from a river after
having drowned herself among the logs and moss and reeds. The
image that remained with Magritte all his life was that of his mother’s
body, naked save her face, horribly enshrouded by her own tangled
dress. Henry Darger had painted nothing but watercolors of naked
she-children, some frolicking in meadows, others warring among
themselves with hatchets and sticks, primitive bows and arrows. Eric
White paints grayscale scenes of holocaustic sadness viewed through
the lens of LSD. What majestic visions, do you think, purr beside him
when at night he lays his head to rest?
9.
Franno grew up to be a big strong man. He became obsessed with
martial arts flicks, a lot of Hong Kong stuff, Bruce Lee mostly,
though it’s fair to say too he did rather enjoy the bardic loveliness of
Akira Kurosawa’s sweeping vistas, and the struggles that played out
in those wondrously forbidding castles. Also, being a big strong man
trained in fighting ways of his own, Franno found himself drawn,
as an eye to beauty, to underdogs. In his presence, the Fragila Faint-
lightlys and Puny McWeaks o’ the world need not have feared, for he,
Franno, would no sooner see such a one in plight than he was sure
to pulverize and crush and rip and tear any such bully who had so
unfortunately determined these meek should be lain low, limb from
bloody limb, alas and alack, thou villainous fiend, the hero hath ar-
rived.
10.
“Once,” June will have said in the year 2042, “I imagined he was a
beautiful sculpture carved in ice, a beautiful diving eagle. We were
still young then, just after the towers had collapsed. Exquisite delica-
cies had been arranged all about him, beautiful, lovely morsels really,Ba r nacle s of t he Fu zz
39
bouche de l’homard et crevettes, gougères avec crème frâiche, caviar
osetra. You see? Our guests were having an immensely good time,
good gracious, really, the soirée was a tremendous success. But then
a wind swept up and destroyed them all, and I became a garden hoe.
I hacked and hacked until he lay in pieces, glittering among the dain-
ties.”
11.
. . . but a review of Donohue’s oeuvre could as easily begin with
“Countdown” as it could with “Batrachian Love Nest.” On the sur-
face one might suggest that the only correlation between the two is
manifested by the crudely imbricated, if not wearisomely tautologi-
cal, thematics of sex and death. Indeed, where such a claim would not
be counted as wholly inaccurate, it could not be helped but to regard
it as the product of a certain moral shortsightedness. In “Count-
down” we see depicted a smiling and voluptuous seductress whose
vagina has been packed to an insupportable degree with a sheaf of
dynamite the fuse of which, not incidentally, has been lighted, while
within the creamy penumbra of the woman’s open thighs a deeper,
limb-shaped shadow suggests the presence of an unknown voyeur
(here one is reminded of Bouguereau’s “The Nymphaeum”). With
“Batrachian,” on the other hand, the viewer is confronted with the
hideousness of a mire of quasi-frogs copulating over a store of tick-
ing bombs. Quite clearly, the mythical implications of each are as
resonant as are the religious (e.g., Leda and the Swan, Pasiphaë and
the Bull, Exodus 8:1–7, to name but a few). But this is just to start.
When one begins to interrogate the Marxist/Feminist repercussions
of each in light of the manner with which the entirety of Donohue’s
work has been operating within a definitive counter-sexual/cultural
matrix, one sees . . .
12.
Snapshot #127: haploid disembarks from late-night jitney; haploid
fumbles in pockets for jangle of keys; goon emerges from alley with
blackjack at the ready; goon pummels haploid thrice on head; goon
rifles pockets of KO’d haploid; hero rounds corner; hero lands mighty40
D. Foy
blow to ear of goon, powerful kick to liver of goon, awesome knee
to teeth of goon, devastating jab to eye of goon, and then, for good
measure, doubtless, yet another, albeit doubly powerful, kick to liver
of goon; hero carries haploid to tenement, then vanishes into soup of
foggy night.
13.
Franno really had grown up to be a big strong man, and yet it wasn’t
until he had fully recovered and begun giving talks to groups of vic-
tims who had survived gunshot wounds, cops and ex-gangbangers
and such, that he had been able to record in his diary the dream he
swore to have had just minutes after falling to the nightclub’s sticky
floor. Only it wasn’t so much a dream as it was what he had heard so
many of those boneheads on shows like True Stories: Psychics Tell All
or Tales of the Other Real call “an alternate reality.” His reluctance
to grapple with the thing stemmed in part from his disdain for such
“jerks.” He couldn’t remember how many times he had heard some-
one say, And then I floated to the ceiling and looked down onto the scene
below me. To my surprise, I was staring at myself lying peacefully upon
the bed ... The boobs he saw on these shows were the same boobs who
stumbled through the world believing Snapple was “the best stuff on
earth” and Wonder Bread the “Greatest.” More than once Franno
would refer to them as “fucking vampires”: Dracula sucked blood
from Lucy; they sucked meaning from life. He had spoken of his “ex-
perience”—he hated calling it that, but then again there wasn’t an-
other word for it—just once, however briefly, to his sister. This, too,
plagued him. She never had been able to handle these kinds of things.
He remembered her reaction to the scene where Bambi’s mother gets
whacked by a hunter. For months afterward she insisted on going to
the zoo each weekend. She had to see with her own green eyes that
the mommy deer were all okay.
14.
I can assure you that this won’t be anything like Augustine or Rous-
seau. It’s not a confession. I have nothing to confess. I simply wanted
something on paper, to prove that I had done it. Words, not paint.Ba r nacle s of t he Fu zz
41
I don’t know. Perhaps I shouldn’t have winked at him when I saw
him staring. Isn’t that what had started it? Or would he have found
another reason to do what he did? Either way, he shouldn’t have been
staring. This is the City. He can’t say he hasn’t seen enough of that
before. Or maybe he hasn’t. I don’t know. We were only kissing. I
suppose it’s that I wish Franno hadn’t been there. Well, that’s stu-
pidly obvious. What I mean is, I wish it hadn’t been where Franno
works. That evil little man.
“You pussy-ass little snow queen,” he had said to Jorge. “Why you
with that little faggot gringo, anyway, huh man, when you could have
a vato like me and shit?”
Actually, I’d completely forgotten about Franno, that he was there,
at least until the man had begun to run his hands over Jorge’s legs
and chest and face, not lovingly or sexily, but brutally, with hatred
and spleen and, and, I don’t know, with just plain evil. He had wanted
to hurt Jorge, I think, more than he’d wanted to do the same to me.
“Go get your brother,” Jorge said, slapping at the man.
Franno was across the room, by the stage. I couldn’t call out. The
music was too loud and people too many. But he made it easy. At least
I had thought he had. He had simply taken the man by his shoul-
ders and led him from the room. I don’t know. Perhaps I should’ve
told him, Franno, what the man had said to me, just before Franno
whisked him away, when he squeezed my balls the way he did.
“You better run home now, you little faggot-ass bitch. I come back
and find you here, you going to be like one dead little faggot.”
Perhaps it’s because I didn’t believe him that I didn’t tell Franno.
So many people never do what they say.
15.
. . . I opened my door. Across the hall, at a table in an alcove thick
with webs and dust, there he sat, sad old Abraham Lincoln. His arm
had been blown off. There wasn’t even a stump, just a mess of car-
tilage and muscle and oozing, gluey blood. He heard me open the
door and cocked his head. The look of sadness was still there but the
nobility was gone. It was the saddest, most pitiful look I had ever
seen, just this shy of weeping maybe, or maybe unbearable shame.42
D. Foy
Or maybe it was both. He gazed at me that way for a moment. His
cheeks were empty and dark, and so were his eyes, the air was still,
the hall was silent as light or dark. I was helpless to touch him, even
to reach out or speak. His arm was weeping blood, down the shirt
that minutes before had been crisp and white. And he never spoke,
only turned back to the alcove. In his hand he held a broken vase. It
was full of wine gone bad, you could smell it there in the dryness,
potent and rank. Then old Abraham took up the vase and rammed
its shards into his mouth. His face split open, I could see the wine
spill out and mingle with the blood from his wounds, the ones he’d
made and the ones he’d had. He didn’t stop, either. His arm had just
been blown off, but he didn’t care, he was still alive, a failure it must
have seemed, he just kept on drinking. The blood and the wine con-
tinued to flow, it was endless, he wouldn’t look at me, he just kept on
drinking from his broken vase, sad as a man who’d never made the
grade. Was I me, John Wilkes Booth, or was I him, sad old Abraham
Lincoln? I couldn’t tell, then. Maybe I was both . . .
16.
The ditch narrowed down as it filed into the culvert where Franno
and Timothy and Gentry and June had gone to rest after so much
time in the sun. In the culvert there were little pockets of dirt and
sand on either side of the stream. They were totting up their catch,
comparing what they had caught to who had caught it. Timothy of
course had caught the most, the mouse, for instance, and the lizards,
and the single baby carp. He was wearing the wig, platinum blond, in
the style of Marilyn Monroe. The Fourth of July was only days away.
Gentry had wanted to go back to the row of bottles they had made
and blow them up with firecrackers. But it was nice in the shade, cool
with a breeze, and the others were so tired.
“You’re going to get it when Dad sees you,” Franno had said to
Timothy.
He hadn’t said any such thing all day long, he hadn’t even thought
to say it, there was too much to see and do, the way it is when you’re
a kid, when it’s summertime and everything’s sunny and warm and
there’s soda in the fridge and cake in the cupboard and pillows onBa r nacle s of t he Fu zz
43
the couch where you watch TV, All in the Family and Adam 12 and
Wild Kingdom and Starsky and Hutch, when you’re full of homemade
enchiladas and rice and beans and Mom and Dad are in the yard or
maybe just dozing in a chair with a magazine on their lap and wine
on the table beside them.
“He looks like one of those fake ladies on Saturday Night Live,”
Gentry said. He wasn’t looking at Timothy, just staring into the
stream. “He looks weird,” he said.
Timothy had a tree frog lying on its back on his palm, stroking its
belly with his pinkie. The frog’s throat was gently pulsing, like maybe
its heart was there and not its breath.
“I think he’s pretty,” said June.
“How would you know?” Gentry said.
“I just would,” she said.
“Maybe she would,” Franno said. “How would you know?”
Timothy slipped the frog back under the netting they had stretched
across the bucket. “But I am,” he said, and you could see he believed
it. “I’m pretty.”6.
Basslines
by Adam Wilson
My brother and I are in the backyard. I am in a lawn chair and he is
in a wheelchair. He’s wearing those leather gloves with the fingers cut
off that make him look homeless. He says they’re convenient. It won’t
be long before snow covers all this shit up. Brian passes the joint.
“Tell me what you make of this,” I say.
Brian looks at me, then back at the leaves. The leaves are the same
color as his beard. It feels like a revelation. It’s the kind of thing that
seems interesting when you’re high, but isn’t. “Make of what?” Brian
says.
I can’t remember. I’m thinking about beards: bushy ones, trimmed
ones, Abe Lincolns.
“Fuck,” I say. “I don’t know.”
“How’d it go with that girl the other night?”
“Oh yeah, that’s what I was going to tell you about. Tell me what
you make of this.”
Brian smiles. He likes it when I fuck up.“Shoot,” he says.
“So we’ve eaten, and the date’s been okay so far. I haven’t offended
her or anything. She’s done most of the talking, and I’m just trying
not to stare at her tits. She’s cute, though, and I’ve made her laugh a
couple times, nothing big, but, you know.” He nods.
“So dinner’s over, we’re working on the wine, and I feel like it’s
getting to that point in the night where she’s gonna want me toBa s sl i ne s
45
tell her something profound about my life in order to make her feel
like we’ve bonded emotionally so when we fuck it won’t just be, you
know, cheap or something.”
“Okay,” Brian says.
“So she says, ‘Tell me a story’ in this kind of seductress voice. Now
normally this is when I start bullshitting about Mom dying, or about
some chick that broke my heart.”
“Should have told her you had a brother in a wheelchair. That
would have got her.”
“Not like I haven’t used that one before,” I say.
We both laugh; we know it’s true. “But that’s the point,” I say.
“I’m sick of all that. It’s like a movie I’ve seen too many times.”
“So what did you say?”
“Well, I start telling her about this guy I met at work. He’s a weird
dude. He wears this trenchcoat that’s entirely decorated with patches.
You know, like, of bands and shit, peace signs. Those type of patches.
Iron-ons. His whole trenchcoat is covered in them. There isn’t an
inch of space on the thing. Now he’s working on covering the whole
inside with patches too, but he’s having trouble finding enough new
patches. They all have to be different.
“So every couple of months he comes by the store to see if we have
any new patches in. We never do, but he still comes by all the time
just to check.
“Anyways, the first time he came in I thought he was real strange.
After all, he’s wearing this coat with all the patches. Aside from that
too, he’s one ugly dude. Seriously: acne, big-ass glasses, greasy hair.
But you know, lots of weirdos come into my store, so I don’t think
much of it. Anyways, the first time he comes in, he asks about the
patches and I tell him we’re out. Instead of leaving he introduces
himself and hangs around for a while.”
“So get to the point,” Brian says, although I know he wants me to
keep going. He doesn’t have shit else to do. “You get laid or what?”
“Hold on,” I say, “let me tell you about this guy.”
“You never get laid,” Brian says.
I get laid sometimes, not often. Brian never gets laid.
“So he’s still in the store, and he has these huge headphones on,46
Adam Wilson
you know, like the kind they have in recording studios? He asks if I
want to hear something he wrote. I’m bored, and he’s the only cus-
tomer, so I say okay.
“So I listen to the CD, in his headphones, and it’s just this repeating
four-note bassline with some weird effect on it. I don’t know what you
call it. Like the bass is going underwater or something. That’s it. Just
this bassline. No other instruments or anything.”
“How long did you listen for?”
“Well I was trying to be polite, so maybe a minute, two.”
“Right.”
“So anyway, he keeps coming back every few weeks with new shit
to listen to. And every time it’s roughly the same thing: basslines.
But, you know, I try to be nice.”
“So you told all this to the chick?”
“Sarah.”
“Who’s Sarah?”
“The chick.”
“Oh, right.”
“But the story’s not over yet. Listen, this goes on for a few months
or whatever, maybe he’s come by four or five times by this point.”
“Okay.”
“So one day he shows up and he’s got this backpack. It’s morning
and the store’s empty. He opens it up and there are like fifteen CDs
that he’s made. Says they’re his albums. They’re pretty homemade
looking, but each one has its own cover art. And not just simple
drawings or some shit, I’m talking about serious cover art. Like this
guy must have spent days drawing all these covers. And the drawings
are raw too, all sorts of evil shit, devils goblins, skulls.
“So I’m sitting there admiring, kind of in awe, right, and he takes
out one of the CDs and tells me he made it for me. His Greatest Hits.
He wants me to listen to it with him, see what I think.”
“Sounds like somebody has a little crush on you,” Brian says.
“So I put the CD in the stereo because I don’t want to break
the guy’s heart, and I’m kind of wondering if maybe it won’t just
be basslines this time. CD starts, we listen: basslines. Same shit as
always. But whatever, I leave it on, kind of space out. CD keeps going,
ten minutes, twenty minutes, whatever. Some customers come in,Ba s sl i ne s
47
and I want to turn it off but I don’t. Eventually the customers leave,
more come in, the whole time the CD is still rocking. We’re talk-
ing maybe fifteen tracks so far of just bass. And all the basslines are
basically the same. Like a tiny bit different, but basically the same.
The store empties out again, and I’m getting restless and a little frus-
trated, so I say to him, real softly, gently-like, ‘These basslines are
awesome, man, but have you ever thought about adding any other
instruments, or maybe getting a band together, even just putting
some of the basslines together to make a song?’ And he just gives me
this look; stares right at me as if I’ve told him I fuck his mom up the
ass or something. ‘No,’ he tells me, ‘this is what I do, these are the
songs.’ So now I feel kind of bad, and I just agree with him, tell him
I don’t know what the fuck I’m talking about.
“We keep listening, another two, three tracks. It’s been about an
hour at this point and we’re down to the last track. I’m looking at the
CD case and I notice that this song doesn’t have a normal name. It’s
just a bunch of symbols, like how people swear in comic strips, you
know what I’m talking about? He says he wants to show me some-
thing. He takes out his wallet and pulls out this little piece of paper,
must be folded like eight times. He unfolds that shit, and on it there’s
all these symbols, Greek letters, runes, I don’t know what the fuck
they are. I think pi was in there somewhere. ‘This,’ he says, ‘is what
this song’s about, ‘and it’s the meaning of life.’”
“Still basslines,” Brian says.
“Still basslines,” I say.
“But listen. So he tells me this, and then he folds up the paper
again and puts it in his pocket, and then he takes off the trenchcoat.
He drops the coat to the floor like he’s a stripper stepping out of a
silk kimono. I don’t say a word. He takes off his shirt, lifts it over
his head, dramatically tosses it. I’m not fucking around. He turns
around. His back is like acne city, but he’s got the symbols tattooed
across the entire thing—swear to God—burned into his flesh. And
he stands there with his arms spread, and the bassline just thumps.”
Brian doesn’t seem surprised by the ending to my story and I’m
disappointed. I feel something wet on my neck and think it might be
a snowflake. The tips of Brian’s fingers are white from cold.
“I think it’s snowing,” I say.48
Adam Wilson
“Yeah, man.”
I watch his hands as he maneuvers his chair around and moves
toward the house. The joint has been put out, but our breath is vis-
ible like smoke.
“You fuck her?” Brian asks without turning around.
“Nah,” I say. “I didn’t feel like it.”
I do not tell him that after dinner we took a cab back to her place.
That we fucked each other’s brains out. That I couldn’t sleep. That I
woke her in the middle of the night and felt the urge to tell her about
my brother, his atrophied legs, or the way when I bathe him he closes
his eyes and hums. Instead I whispered, “It was nothing, go back to
sleep,” and waited, watched the ceiling fan revolve until her breath
became gentle and I could slip on my jeans and disappear.
Brian reaches the house. I step in front and open the door, holding
it until he’s inside. I press my palm against the glass of the sliding
door so it makes a print. Then I follow.7.
Because You Asked: an answer in eight parts
by Karon Luddy
1. Midnight Shopper
Your feet are tired from waiting tables all day, but it’s late Friday
night, your favorite time to shop at the super-duper Walmart. You
find a couple of things you need to try on for size. You walk to the
fitting room. No attendant. The stalls are empty. You walk down the
corridor until you reach number seven and enter it. You read the new
sign tacked on the shiny gray wall: Shoplifting is not a prank, or a joke.
It is a crime. Even for a first offense, you can serve jail time and pay
fines up to $2000. So please, don’t incriminate yourself. It will haunt
you for the rest of your life.
You struggle to zip the distressed, size nine Faded Glory jeans.
Damn birth control pills are making you fat, but babies are prepos-
terous. When you look into the mirror and see a twenty-seven-year-
old bloated babe, you wince. But sex is still your best weapon in your
ongoing battle with the Dick Squad, which you usually win, espe-
cially since you lowered your sights good and low. Rob thinks you’re
letting yourself go to the dogs already. You met him three months
ago, but it feels like a couple of lifetimes. He teases you about going
to cosmetology school. Fuck him and all his uncles. One fine shim-
mering day, you will be a great hair artist.
You pull the purple sleeveless shell from the hanger, slip it over50
Karon Luddy
your blond hair. Your auburn roots are two inches long. Being blond
hasn’t improved diddly damn squat. The purple shirt shows off the
red tongue on your Rolling Stones tattoo. You turn your tattooed
arm toward the mirror, look over your shoulder, and wink at yourself.
You rip the tags from the shirt and jeans, stuff them in your pocket.
You grab the hanger with the Tweety Bird nightshirt—a gift for
your daughter’s birthday—you can afford that—it’s only $8.92.
As you turn to leave the dressing room, you notice the last sen-
tence on the Shoplifting is not a prank sign: It will haunt you for the
rest of your life. You grab your Cosmos Café ink pen, and write in
big block letters: IF YOU GET CAUGHT. Then you waltz with the
Tweety Bird shirt all the way to the checkout. You pull out your last
ten dollars and pay the oily-haired cashier. He hands you two shiny
quarters. On your way out, you drop them in the vending machine.
An icy can of Walmart cola clangs to the bottom. You pop the top
and guzzle it, pretending it tastes like the real thing.
2. Daughter
What mothers don’t know, they sure can’t tell you. And since your
mama kept what she did know to herself, well then, Little Pilgrim,
you really got screwed. She never talked about herself, what she
thought, what she wanted. She quoted the Bible like she wrote it. She
prayed like Jesus in the wilderness.
The word strong comes to mind. The word enigma comes to mind.
The word facade comes to mind. The word frozen comes to mind. The
word martyr comes to mind. The word trapped comes to mind.
The word unfucked comes to mind.
Admit it. Your mama is a cave of imponderable desires.
What she didn’t know then and perhaps never will:
1. Sex is the cake, not the icing.
2. God’s love ain’t enough.
3. If it’s anywhere, Heaven is Here.
4. The neighbors don’t give a shit.
5. Blasphemer
* * *Becau se You A sked : a n a n s wer i n eig ht pa r t s
51
God adores transvestites and the inventor of the donut. He marvels at
little girls and wishes he were a boy. His favorite tree is loblolly pine.
He bites his toenails. He hates like hell being an orphan. He’s proud
of thumbs and long sharp thorns, but mourns every detached fore-
skin. He loathes bananas and snorts angel dust. He’s afraid of subma-
rines and zebras. He regrets inventing sorrow, but waxes rhapsodic
about the perfect weakness of gravity. Plus he really digs brunettes.
You know the SECRETS OF GOD. Go ahead—tell every damn one.
4. Exhibitionist
If there’s a gene for exhibitionist, you have it. From an early age, you
loved to shock people. That’s why you begged for those tap dancing
lessons. If you make enough noise, some damn body will notice you.
That’s all you ever wanted. Your mama, God bless her, wanted you
to be a saint or a preacher, but your talents veered off in the opposite
direction. You make shit up right out of the air. You see colors around
people. Your daddy has that chartreuse neon glow and your mama
shimmers with lavender light. Their colors look like shit together.
You don’t understand why certain people are attracted to each other
like helpless creatures. Carl Jung called it the anima and animus. You
had to read that chapter three times before you understood the eso-
teric theory—that each of us carries an ideal image of the opposite
sex in our psyches—that waits like a stick of dynamite to be lit by
someone who resembles it. Just like your mama and daddy. Kaboom!
Day and Night. Field and Plow. Moon and Sun. Your mama a fresh
ream of paper, your daddy a bottle of indelible ink.
5. Sous Chef
Your Recipe for Sorrow:
1
2
1
4
3
8
vile clock
pounds of regret
secret revealed
petrified dreams
shitty smiles
hateful words52
Karon Luddy
1 biting sentence
2.5 paltry excuses
10 liters of sweet lies
Stir all the ingredients. Let dough rise for three days. Spread it out
on a giant cookie sheet. Sprinkle with sea salt. Bake until crunchy.
Crumble into pieces. Fling it to the yawing crows.
6. Daddy’s Girl
For twenty years you’ve been a poet, but you’ve never written a single
poem about your deepest, ugliest, most unacknowledged phantom—
your dear old man, braver than the bottle—stronger than nicotine’s
ugly grip—the Big Star in the Silent Movie of Your Life—the man
who never hugged you, who drunkenly fell down and often couldn’t
get up, who cursed in his sleep, who never saw your despair because he
was too damn intoxicated with his own. By the time you were born,
he was a quart-of-whiskey-sad daddy, who lived in a pup tent pitched
in Hell. Go ahead. Admit it. You owe him your poetic license.
7. Dreamer
All night long you committed adultery with an old lover as gorgeous
as he was fifteen years ago when you fell in love. You couldn’t help
it: his desire shocking—your hunger shameless—your tongues like
wicks of candles burning into each other. You were in an unknown
bed, in an unknown room, in an unknown hotel, in an unknown
city—hell, it wasn’t even in this world.
Oh, the smell of lover’s love being made like patchouli—two fine
glowing bodies praising God and the eternal fucking moment. As
in life, there were intruders: aunts, uncles, his wife, your husband,
sniffing around the bed as if you were invisible. I think you were,
praise God—because they didn’t stop you. You clung to each other,
his sweat like warm honey you licked from his chest.
8. Daughter
Do you remember how you crawled under that huge blue bed and
preached fiery sermons to your congregation of dust bunnies? Do youBecau se You A sked : a n a n s wer i n eig ht pa r t s
53
remember how you pleaded with your mom when she drove too fast?
Your red hair sprung from your head like fresh cedar shavings. Your
bright morning face clouded by worried eyes as you admonished her
Swow down, Mommy.
You were the first miracle in that small town hell of hers. A bubble
of perfection she endeavored to keep from bursting when you came
into contact with all the sharp objects flying around her. Your bubble
never popped. The sun forced its rays through your resilient mem-
brane revealing your spectacular colors while the wind whispered
your secret names: Yellow maiden, Purple poet, Green girl, Red sur-
prise, Orange dream, White peacock, Black butterfly. Once and for
all, you need to set the record straight. The stories about how you
came into this world have been so poorly told that even now you don’t
understand that, from the moment you popped out of her womb, you
have been a bridge—never an obstacle—the final blue answer to the
question, What is love?8.
Before the Trip
by Adetokunbo Abiola
As soon as I came out of my house at 6 Agho Street on the March
morning, someone shouted in my direction: “Hold the debtor! Don’t
let her run away. Hold the debtor!” Without looking at the person,
I knew it was Gomo. In the night of the day before, he sent a note
through my sister, Janet, saying that I’d borrowed money from him
six months ago, money meant to treat the burns on my face and arms,
but I did not want to pay it back. What did I think he was? A Father
Christmas? He would get his money from me in the morning even if
all the people in Benin City pleaded that he should leave me alone.
After reading the letter, I tore it, and Janet asked why. Did I not
know that, when Gomo was like this, he would carry out his threats?
I told her: “Gomo cannot do more than a harmless rat. By the time
he comes, I’ll be at the bus stop for the journey to Abuja.” I told her
that Gomo, like the drunkard he was, would be too busy sleeping
when I began my journey and that Janet should forget him. Unfor-
tunately, Gomo surprised me, as he woke much earlier from his usual
drunken slumber. And I knew all the prayers to Jesus Christ would
not make him give me more time to pay my debts.
Despite this, I decided not to run and headed toward the bus stop,
about eight hundred meters away. Gomo, shouting at the top of his
voice, caught up with me before I covered ten meters. By this time,
some of the women living on Agho Street, attracted by Gomo’s voice,Before t he Tr ip
55
trooped out of their houses. Mama Sarah, a woman who owned the
provision store next door, ran toward us. Mama Johnson tied her
wrapper around her waist and came out to the street. Though men
did not come out, some of them were disturbed by the scene. One
man opened his mouth so wide that his chewing stick fell out of his
mouth to the ground. As he bent to pick it, I turned to Gomo.
“I’ll pay you when I come back from Abuja,” I told him.
“That’s been your story for the past six months!” Gomo shouted.
“Is that what I’ll tell Mama Gbenga when she comes for her money?
I want my money now.”
Mama Sarah told him to have pity on me; after all, Mama Gbenga
had traveled, and I never used to owe money before I was wounded
and disfigured by a kerosene explosion two years ago. Mama Johnson
told him he should have the milk of human kindness and allow me
to go on my trip.
“Will the milk of human kindness save me from Mama Gbenga?”
Gomo shrieked.
“So you don’t want to forgive and forget?” asked Mama Sarah.
“All right, we’ll see.”
Before I knew it, the women grabbed Gomo. Mama Sarah pulled
at the belt of his trousers, swearing, demanding the money for the
bottle of beer he bought on credit for his girlfriend. Mama Johnson
pulled at his dirty shirt and said: “Where is the money for the stick
of cigarette you bought from me two weeks ago?” As they dragged
Gomo from one side of the road to the other, he loosened his grip on
my black blouse, and I pushed his hand away.
While this happened, I hoped more people would not waylay me.
Gomo was not the only person I owed since the kerosene explosion,
and the fear of harassment kept me on edge every time. Even now, if
a dog barked too loudly, I jumped, thinking one of my creditors had
come to say, “Abuja, where is my money?” If I heard a knock at my
door, I scurried under the bed, thinking the landlord had come to
collect his rent, which I could not pay because I’d lost my job over
the burns.
These hassles frequently angered me. We had bought adulterated
kerosene from government filling stations. Then it had exploded,56
Adetokunbo Abiola
scarred our faces, made us lose our jobs, and turned us into paupers.
Government officials promised to help us; instead they abandoned
us, leaving us to fend for ourselves. Have they done the right thing
by allowing us to live like sewage rats?
The Abuja issue came six months ago. Our leader, a man called El-
dorado, told us that God had at last answered our prayers, that some
doctors from America wanted to carry out surgery on our burns in
Abuja. We would not pay anything; it was free. Since then, I became
hopeful that my scars would go away. When the boys in Agho Street
laughed at me over my scarred face and arms, I gloated, saying I
would soon look better than they did, and that everything would be
corrected in Abuja.
I spoke so much about Abuja that the area boys changed my name
from Mabel to Abuja. I first learned this a month ago. As I walked
to the bus stop for a ride to town, one of my most stubborn credi-
tors, a man called Tolu Player, stopped me. Before I could speak, he
waved his hands as though he did not want to listen to more stories.
“That’s why they’re calling you Abuja. I don’t want to hear about any
surgery. Just give me my two hundred naira.” Another of my credi-
tors, Oviedo, a woman selling secondhand brassieres at the nearby
New Market, came to meet me at home, and said, “Abuja, where is
my money?” The day for the journey to Abuja had come, but I was
having problems.
As I hurried down the street, pulling away from Gomo and the
women harassing him, I struggled to overcome my disbelief I could
catch the Abuja-bound bus. People trooped into the street as though
they were ants coming out of their anthills, and many of them were
my creditors. Any of them could stop me and say, “Hey! Abuja, where
is my money?” or say that they wanted to use it to pay the second-
term school fees of their son or hire a band for the second burial of
their great grandmother, wasting the time I could use to catch the
bus.
There was another reason for the doubts that crept into my mind.
I was so anxious not to miss the Abuja bus that I woke by three at
night, staring at the ceiling of my room till five, growing weak from
lack of adequate sleep. When Janet came and saw me, she said that myBefore t he Tr ip
57
eyes were as swollen as a frog’s and my hands shook as though I suf-
fered from fever. I told her I was all right. But as the minutes passed,
weakness overtook me, and pains from the burns on my face and
arms overwhelmed me, making me fall asleep again. When I woke up,
Janet, who returned from morning prayers at a church nearby, said it
was seven, and I knew it would be difficult catching the Abuja bus.
But I could not afford missing it. If I did, Janet would call me a
careless fool. Was it because she provided me with three square meals
daily that I did not find it necessary to cure myself, start work, and
begin feeding myself again? How could I afford missing the only real
opportunity for cure to my burns? If my best friend, Agnes, heard
I missed the bus, she would say, “Ah, ah, Abuja, how can you allow
this to happen?” I was in hot soup. My creditors would say I was care-
less, and they would no longer have pity on me. My fellow tenants, if
they heard, would say the witches that caused the kerosene explosion
in the first place still dogged my life, and that I suffered from “home
trouble.”
I was inclined toward believing the last view. My father had taught
me that when a woman sneezed, a witch was behind it. I believed
him. Were it not so, how did it come about that I bought the killer
kerosene when so many other people purchased the original one? Was
it not because a witch put a spell on me? And now, on the day I was
to go to Abuja for surgery, I was overwhelmed by fatigue because I
had not slept long enough and had to sleep again. Was it not because
my enemies wanted me not to travel? As I walked up the street, I
wondered whether it was possible to overcome the witches on this
all-important day.
While these thought troubled me, I looked up the road and saw
Tolu Player. As soon as I spotted him, I was filled with panic. Why
should he appear on the day I wanted to travel? At the same time,
I was furious. How long would I continue to shake like a cold fowl
when I saw my creditors on the streets of Benin City? Was this not
why I must travel, no matter what happened? And a little fighting
spirit flowed into me.
When Tolu Player stopped in front of me, he scowled, and I knew
at once he wanted to ask for his two hundred naira and would not58
Adetokunbo Abiola
take no for an answer. His scowl was so frightful, Mama Sarah, had
she seen it, would have asked: “Why are you frowning as if an ant has
bitten your face?” His shirt looked rough and threadbare, the kind
the small boys in Agho Street called Okrika, the kind my former boy-
friend, Cletus, would wear “over his dead body.” Tolu’s pair of shoes
was old and dusty, as though dust settled on them after he trekked
tens of kilometers. Had Agnes seen him, she would have asked why
he always trekked on the road and could not board a bus once in a
while. Was he the only one in Benin City who did not have money?
To make matters worse, Tolu was not only a debtor but also never
paid his debts. He once owed Mama Sarah three hundred naira,
money owed for the bottle of beer he bought for his girlfriend. When
Mama Sarah asked him for it, he said he would pay her the next day.
When the next day arrived, he promised to pay the next one. Exasper-
ated after six months, Mama Sarah shouted at him: “Will tomorrow
tomorrow never end?” That was how Tolu acquired the nickname
“Tomorrow Tomorrow Never End.” Even as he stood in front of me,
I was not sure he had paid Mama Sarah’s debt.
Staring at me, he cleared his voice.
“Where’s my money, Abuja?” he asked.
“I told you I’ll pay you when I come back from my surgery op-
eration.”
Before I could stop him, he grabbed my hand, twisted it, and re-
moved the bag I hung on my shoulder, pushing me out of the way.
“When you come back from Abuja, come and take your bag.”
I grabbed his shirt and shouted: “Give me my bag! Give me my
bag!”
“What is happening there?” Mama Sarah, who still held Gomo’s
trousers, hollered.
I told her that Tolu had seized my bag because I hadn’t paid him
his money. Leaving Gomo to Mama Johnson, Mama Sarah headed
toward me and Tolu, who struggled to push me away as soon as he
heard Mama Sarah’s voice. Succeeding, he took to his heels, heading
up the street. But he did not see a cement block in his way, and he
tripped over it, shouting as he crashed to the dusty street.
Groaning, he got to his feet. Dust stained the side of his face andBefore t he Tr ip
59
left arm, and he looked like a dirty masquerade. His shirt was also
stained by dust, and its top right pocket was torn. He staggered on
his feet when Mama Sarah grabbed him by the belt of his trousers.
“Where’s my three hundred naira?” she demanded. “I want it
now.”
“Why are you doing this to me, Mama Sarah?”
Just then someone shouted on the street: “That’s him! Tomorrow
Tomorrow Never Ends!”
Turning, I looked up the road and saw two men run toward us,
shouting at the top of their voices. I knew one of them, a man the
area boys on Agho Street called the Leader. Though he had no job,
he drove a sleek Mercedes and always seemed to be in money. It was
rumored that he was the leader of a ruthless moneylending group
operating in the area. Also, he owned a dog named Bingo, a fearsome-
looking animal that barked anytime I returned home late at night,
only restrained from jumping at me by the gate locked against it.
As the Leader and his friend reached us, Bingo bounded down the
street, tail wagging, his leash trailing on the ground. Seeing the dog,
I shifted away from Mama Sarah and Tolu.
“You can run but you can never hide,” the Leader said to Tolu.
“Give me more time,” Tolu told him. “I’ll pay the money.”
The Leader turned to Bingo and picked up the leash.
“Get him!” he commanded.
Bingo barked at Tolu, and fear gripped me. Had I heard such a
bark when I returned home at night, I would never have come late
again. The big dog lunged in Tolu’s direction, and the debtor cried,
held out a hand against the dog, and dropped my traveling bag to
a nearby patch of grass. Mama Sarah had left him since she saw the
dog. She now jumped over a gutter, almost falling, and disappeared
into the courtyard of the bungalow opposite us, shouting at the top
of her voice. Mama Johnson ran after her friend, holding the end of
her wrapper with one hand to keep it from falling to the street. One
man ran down the street, yelling Bingo wanted to make a meal of
Tolu.
But the dog did not get to Tolu. The Leader pulled back the leash
while it jumped, and Tolu leaped away. Getting to his knees, he60
Adetokunbo Abiola
pleaded he would get the money that very afternoon. A woman in
the next street owed him and promised to pay by twelve. The Leader
would get it immediately after, and he should forgive Tolu for not
paying as it would not happen again.
“Get his shirt, Gatecrasher!” the Leader said to his companion.
“When he pays his money he’ll get it back!”
Gatecrasher gave a wolfish grin and closed in on his prey. Had
Janet seen his chest, she would have said, “That’s the chest of a wres-
tler.” Gatecrasher’s arms were big, and his biceps rippled with mus-
cles. Gatecrasher looked like the kind of men found lurking around
street corners and seedy drinking joints. He grabbed Tolu by the arm
and wanted to kick his legs off the ground. Tolu dodged, flailed his
hands, begging, saying he would pay the money in the afternoon.
“Kneel down!” Gatecrasher roared.
When Tolu hesitated, Gatecrasher clenched his fist and raised it in
the air, aiming to smash it down the debtor’s head, but Tolu pleaded.
He would get the money without fail. Still raising his fist in the air,
Gatecrasher ordered him to remove his shirt and put it in his palm im-
mediately. But I did not want to witness more of this. My bag lay on
the sand five meters from me, so I ran to it, grabbed it, and sprinted
up the street. Bingo barked, and Tolu yelled from Gatecrasher’s blow,
but I did not stop, dashing toward the nearest street corner.
By this time, the sun had climbed a quarter of its way up the sky,
and I felt the beads of sweat that broke out on my face. Worried
about the sun, I quickened my footsteps, noting only a little breeze
blew, unlike at dawn when it blew strongly. As I turned a corner
and stepped into a new street, I caught a whiff of iodine in the air.
I feared the smell because it caused me to gasp, and I hurried down
the street, intent on getting to the bus stop as quickly as possible.
But when I got to the middle of the street, I frowned. Oviedo, the
woman who sold secondhand brassieres to women living in Agho
Street, marched toward me.
An inner voice told me to run, that I stood the chance of getting to
Abuja if this woman did not stop me. I was about to run, but another
voice said I should not risk it, that I was without my usual strength.
Who knew what would happen if I ran? Perhaps I might collapse toBefore t he Tr ip
61
the road, canceling the trip altogether, leaving me at the mercy of
people like Oviedo, Tolu Player, and Gomo permanently. I decided
not to run, to risk facing Oviedo, who stopped in front of me.
A very fat woman in her midforties, Oviedo was a legendary figure
in Agho Street. People rumored that she’d sat on her husband during
a fight and the poor man could not stand up after the incident. He
had to be rushed to the hospital where doctors revived him. Another
account said that he’d stood up after the fight, but he began to sweat,
farting as though his wife’s weight had punctured his internal organs.
Still another woman, giving her account of the incident, said that
Oviedo had taken him to the hospital after the fight and told him:
“Next time you disobey me, I’ll beat you, sit on you, and you’ll never
stand up again.” But one thing was clear in all the accounts: Oviedo
had beaten her husband, she had sat down on him, and he could not
get up. It was rumored that she hated people referring to the issue.
At first, she did not see me, and she spoke to herself as she lum-
bered up the street, abusing someone who owed her and refused to
pay the debt, that she would sit on her and she would not get up.
Looking to my side of the street, she saw me, and she hardened her
face. I felt like running again, not wanting the massive woman to sit
on me, but I felt I could not risk it, so I stopped and faced her.
“Where’s the money, Abuja?” she demanded.
“Let me come back, I’ll give it to you.”
“Come back when?” she roared. “Never! You must pay me now, or
I’ll sit on top of you.”
She veered toward me, and I shouted. It attracted people who sat in
the courtyard of a nearby bungalow, and one man stood up, jumped
over the gutter beside his chair, and came toward us. He pleaded with
Oviedo that she should sympathize with me. Did she not know that
if she sat on me I could choke to death? Did she think she could sell
secondhand brassieres to the women living in the area again if I died?
Oviedo asked him: “If I leave her, will you pay her debt?” When the
man did not answer, Oviedo told him to leave her alone or she would
sit on him as well.
As the exchange went on, a small crowd, attracted by it, stood a
few meters from us, silent. Joe, the local wit, stood in the crowd,62
Adetokunbo Abiola
making fun of Oviedo. “Leave them alone,” he told her. “Do you
want to send them to the hospital?”
“Are you talking to me?” Oviedo asked.
“No,” said Joe. “I’m talking to the fat woman who sits on people.”
“I’ll teach you to stop interfering in other peoples’ business,”
Oviedo said with anger and headed toward him. But she stepped on a
slippery pond in the way, staggered, and fell down, staining her white
lace blouse and wrapper. The crowd laughed, Joe’s voice sounding
above the rest. Angered, Oviedo swore under her breath and stood
up from the pond, beating her dress.
“This will teach you to stop sending people to the hospital,” Joe
said to her.
Yelling, Oviedo stepped out of the pond and ran toward Joe, people
scattering in all directions. One man’s cap fell off his head as he ran,
but he did not stop to pick it from the ground, fearing that Oviedo
would pounce on him if he did. Joe took off up the street, yelling that
Oviedo wanted to sit on him when he’d done nothing, and was it now
a law that she should harass innocent people?
As Joe ran away, I glanced at the sun. It had climbed farther up
the sky, its heat increasing. Already, the surface of the burns on my
hands was swollen; if I did not leave the sun, they would crack and
blood could seep out of the wound. If blood appeared, it would not
cease flowing, and I might as well forget about the journey, since it
would drip all the way to Abuja, discomfiting me and causing nausea
to everyone in the bus through its smell. To make matters worse,
the morning air was still, and I found it difficult to breathe. If I did
at all, I smelled iodine, which meant my condition was desperate. I
checked my time—thirty minutes to ten. If I did not move now, I was
in danger of losing the bus.
Anger over my situation flowed over me once more. Why should
government allow people like us to buy adulterated kerosene from
its fuel stations, making us suffer from its explosion? Were we the
ones who adulterated the kerosene or owned the petrol stations? Why
would government officials say on the radio and television that the
victims were taken care of, that they had not been abandoned and left
to suffer? Were they taking care of me when I had to borrow money
from a Shylock like Oviedo so I would not die from my wounds?Before t he Tr ip
63
I knew we’d been abandoned because no one wanted to take blame
for selling the kerosene. When we met the governor, he had asked us
whether we were sure we’d bought the adulterated kerosene from the
petrol stations. At the petrol stations, the owners said that we hadn’t
bought the kerosene from them, that we’d gotten it from sharp road-
side traders who mixed kerosene and petrol together in order to make
quick profit. They were the ones to blame for our troubles and we
should go and complain to them. One petrol station owner even said:
“You people should be punished for patronizing touts. You’re all en-
emies of progress!”
At meetings with government officials, we would tell them, “We’re
suffering.” But they would say—especially the chairman of the explo-
sion victims’ task force, a man we called Sufferhead—that they were
suffering too, and had not been paid their salaries for three months.
They could not pay the school fees of their children and found it dif-
ficult eating three square meals a day. Their landlords visited them
the previous day for rent and threatened to throw their properties to
the streets if they did not pay before the end of the week. Their wives
had lost their jobs just the day before and they did not know how
they could cope with family expenses.
We were also abandoned by many people living in Agho Street.
When I asked for money from a few of them who were not money-
lenders, they would shake their heads, sigh, and begin to tell sto-
ries. They could not do much, I should know, because they were
not government people, who had no problems with their children’s
school fees, ate three square meals a day, and generally lived off the
fat of the land. These people were all corrupt and selfish. A revolu-
tion organized by good people should come and f lush the rats into
the sea.
And that is the summary of my story in the past two years—until
Eldorado, our chairman, told us that some American doctors wanted
to treat all of us in Abuja free of charge. The American doctors,
thanks to Obama, would even give us stipends for the exercise. But
now the Abuja trip was in danger, due to events I did not foresee a
day back.
As I hurried to the bus stop, I wondered why I was not yet there,
something that seemed so easy a day ago. I remembered how, when64
Adetokunbo Abiola
Gomo appeared just as I got out of my house, my inner voice told me
to run, and how I’d disobeyed the voice, thinking of the pains from
my burns and fatigue. I recalled how Tolu Player stopped in front of
me and the voice told me to run at once and I did not. And I remem-
bered how, when fat Oviedo appeared and asked for her money, I
looked at her like a fool because I feared to take to my heels.
At that moment, I felt the intense heat of the sun on my burns, and
I glanced at my hands. They were more red than they ever were, and
if I wasted any more time in the sun blood would seep out of them. It
might mean good-bye to Abuja and more of the rat race with Oviedo,
Tolu Player, Gomo and the others. I was convinced this could happen
when I smelled more iodine and felt my stomach heave. If it got to
be too much, I would have to sit down under a shade somewhere so
I wouldn’t faint, meaning I would waste more time.
And then I thought of what my father told me—when a woman
sneezed, a witch was behind it. I knew this was at the back of my
mind, weakening my resolve to solve the situation. But when the
inner voice told me to run, was it a witch telling me to stand? If I said
it was to the small boys living on our street, will they not ask, “Did a
witch put a wedge between your legs?” I remembered when Oviedo
appeared and I could have run but did not; was it a witch that whis-
pered into my ears I should not run? If I told Agnes it was a witch,
would she not ask, laughing, whether a witch had tied a piece of rope
around my ankles?
Thinking about this, I checked my watch and found I had ten
minutes left to get to the bus stop. If Gomo, Oviedo, Tolu Player, or
any other creditor arrived, I vowed to run because I suspected it was
the only way out. After making this vow, I turned the corner into the
road leading to the bus stop but stopped. Gomo stood twenty meters
down the street.
Sixty meters behind him, I saw the bus taking us to Abuja parked
under a mango tree, but I knew Gomo could intersect my path before
I get to the vehicle, so I decided to be cautious.
“I knew you’ll pass here,” Gomo told me. “That’s why I came to
stand here.”
He looked terrible. Even though he constantly harassed me overBefore t he Tr ip
65
his money, I was shocked by his appearance. I wanted to ask him,
with a straight face: “Gomo! Who beat you like this?” But I did
not; instead, I stared at him. His torn green shirt revealed a chest
stained by caked mud and charcoal, making him look no better than
a madman. Had it not been that I knew him, and was desperate to
catch the bus, I would have turned back and taken to my heels, shout-
ing that people should save me from a madman. His trousers were
stained by sand and dust as though he’d fallen into a pond, or rather,
as if Mama Sarah and Mama Johnson pushed him into a gutter. He
reminded me of the pig that came to the back of our yard, grunt-
ing, foraging through the yam peeling, rubbish, and rotted plants
we dumped there. The children living on Agho Street, had they seen
him like this, would have said that Gomo had suddenly gone crazy
and stayed away from him. But since I was aware of my mission, I
decided not to stay away.
“Won’t you leave the road and allow me to pass?” I asked him.
He coughed and pointed a forefinger to the ground like a native
doctor who buried a charm in the soil.
“I want my money today,” he said. “If I don’t get it you’re not
going anywhere.”
Behind him, I saw three women come up the street, but I did not
bother to look at them because I was thinking of how to run past
Gomo.
“I promise you, when I come back from Abuja, I’ll pay you,” I told
him.
“Are you deaf?” he shouted. “I said I want my money now. I bor-
rowed the money to you in Benin City. I know about Benin City. I
don’t know about Abuja!”
“What is happening there?” one of the three women, who had got
to where we stood, demanded, and I recognized her. She was Mama
Gbenga, the woman Gomo spoke about earlier in the morning. It
was rumored that Gomo had borrowed some money from her, saying
he wanted to use it for the burial ceremony of his mother, but used it
to run after women and drink beer up and down Agho Street. Mama
Sarah told me that Gomo had jumped out the window of his room
two days ago when Mama Gbenga surprised him and came to his66
Adetokunbo Abiola
house. Agnes told me that Gomo would be in soup if Mama Gbenga
ever caught up with him. Now that she had, I was afraid it could
complicate matters for me, as she would ask for her money and Gomo
would insist that I pay him. I might miss the bus in the course of the
trouble.
“Gomo!” Mama Gbenga yelled, “Where’s my money?”
“That’s what I’m looking for now,” Gomo replied in a subdued
voice. “Once I get it from Abuja, I’ll give it to you.”
“Was that our agreement?”
“No, but . . . ”
“Hold him!” Mama Gbenga said to her friends. “Immediately.”
Before Gomo could run, the two women with Mama Gbenga
grabbed him by the shirt. Turning, he stretched out his hand and
grabbed my blouse. At the same time, the driver of the bus taking
us to Abuja stepped out of a bungalow down the street and waddled
toward the vehicle. One of us, a woman called Lizzy Babe, ran down
the street after him.
While this happened, Mama Gbenga shouted at Gomo that he’d
lied to her. He’d promised to pay his debt within a week, but had not
done so after three years. What did he think she was? His mother?
If he did not pay her at once, she would strip him naked, take his
clothes to the nearest secondhand trader in New Benin Market, and
sell them.
As she droned on, the feeling that I would lose the bus grew inside
me. Could my father be right? I thought. When a woman sneezed, a
witch was behind it! Could someone somewhere not want me to go
for the surgery operation that would cure me of my pains?
While I mused on this, Mama Gbenga began to beat Gomo’s
hand. “Leave her!” she shouted. “What has she done to you? Leave
her alone!”
The other women joined her, trying to make Gomo loosen his
grip on my hand. After a few seconds, I was free. The first thought
coming to me was that no witch stood in my way to Abuja. At that
moment, I felt the heat of the sun on my burns, and I knew that
blood could seep out at any moment, but I did not care. Without
thinking of my fatigue, or the weakness that came from not havingBefore t he Tr ip
67
a proper sleep the previous night, I ran toward the bus, shouting
at the top of my voice. The bus moved as I got to its side; but I
stretched out my hand, beating the window several times, scream-
ing, saying that the bus should stop, and one of my mates saw me
and told the driver, who brought the bus to a screeching halt.9.
The Beginning of the Summation
of Our Dead
by Blake Butler
Blood violence. Scrying violence. Schools doors’ locked door to door.
Homes surrounded with a netting. Pastries rolled up with the asp.
Tomahawks in hands of children come down on dolls and friends,
come down on ants, come down on me. Fathers kill their fathers and
their sons. Sons kill their friends. Wives kill their husbands and their
doctors. They kill the babies in their guts. War violence in the home.
Sky violence writing itself white into the cover of the hour with the
screens’ electrifying prismlight. What would have been watched in
place of doing is become doing. Runes are written on the heads.
Lawns are cut in slurs or glyph stakes, calling for the meteor or blank
invasion. A burning planted somewhere in every city near the homes.
The wash of the bathwater on the drowned self. The pills. The pills
to erupt the cells out of the body. The naked turned to breadloaves.
The football hero with the Luger to his temple on the fifty-yard line.
The banker handing back a withdrawal in the form of a sheet of his
own skin. Gas station attendants robbing the customers of their con-
sciousness. Of blood. The dogs walking the dogs. “What is happen-
ing in America? The homeland commissioner is up in arms. We must
act now. This is our home.” The black rabbit in the east sky rises and
eats a column of dust onto the air. Troops deployed in precaution ofT he Beg i n n i ng of t he Su m mat ion of O u r Dead
69
the nature of the coming people stab each other in the chests. Intes-
tine dinners. Ageless, graceless. The face of God: torn in strips off of
a billboard and used to wrap the dead. This is an art project, some-
one stutters, and the teeth fall out of their mouth onto the ground
and are eaten by the starving some days later. Enamel over all. Video
game machines going blank. Wires doing blank. Email reading these
same words in every head. A package is delivered to the homeland
commissioner and he opens it on live TV, knowing it will explode.
The dogs’ names are changed to Darrel. The children’s names are
changed to Darrel. The nation’s name is changed to Darrel. Michael
Jackson’s name is changed to Darrel. Human instances of Darrel
are made piggish, crucified inside the streets as nonbelievers. The
name of Darrel in the mass of names is something else. The days.
The occasionally clean are surrounded by their own flesh and bone.
No metaphor left behind. No building not written whitely with the
curse word over the crush of any city now called Darrel. Order again
is demanded. Vegetable delivery is mandated by the state to arrive
each evening in a long white limousine. This we believe in, which
makes us calmer. It does not happen. Another 340,000 die. Another
417,550. Another 589,000. The rising numbers count themselves in
blue of pigs blood in cursive on the sky below the blank where there
might have been a moon once, and still might be, though we can’t
remember where to look. The instance of the number is attacked by
Air Force bombers to obliterate as smoke. The smoke maintains the
will of concrete underneath the clusterbomb. The fallout rains us
birds. We eat them. The flesh of the bird delivers word. A mechanic
kills a man who’s come to have his wheel replaced; he kills using the
machine of his daily labor; another day he might have simply changed
the wheel. Someone is counting on the fingers of those who pass him
in the street. Something underneath the street puts the sound in cats’
mouths and the houses rub where none of them touch. Someone
with a hammer appears in one in 144 houses in one evening, mimick-
ing at once a series of different people in one body, tolling the present
number of the murdered bodies higher. There is no going backward.
The faster we die we all will die. Sickness is not a shaking but a way
of looking across a breakfast table or giving thanks. Anywhere this70
Blake Butler
does not happen yet, the air remains. Turnips in fields turn up with
dried blood centers. The trees bow down to kiss the ground. 700,010
dead. 880,789 dead. Telephones. Locks sold from the hardware sta-
tion come without a key. Each four killed make eight kill eight more
and then kill themselves or kill another set of eight, bodies branch-
ing off of each eight killed kill at least sixteen or toward twenty-four,
each body desisted initiates a system in the spool of those surround-
ing by physical creation or by name, or by walking past the wrong
place in the right street in an hour of the wake or having heard; not
by plague or viral idea or passion or brutal ministry or campaign,
but by something they’ve not named but has a name, and in the un-
naming of the so named the day goes on and renders shorter while
the skin flies at the light above in reams of hiss and collects in lath-
ered wreaths around a something unseen around a something. The
remaining bodies of their living go on tasting each other’s body in
their mouth in the bite of the chew of the grand air and the cerebral
matter of waking up and laying to bed. The colors of us giving up
only one color, of little sex. The cars turning themselves on. A day to
come of old form. Crystal visions. Winking paper. So ends the begin-
ning of our summation of the dead.10.
Birthright City
by Eliezra Schaffzin
“Israel,” my father said. He was an oral surgeon. It was December
and I was getting a Hanukkah present. “Two whole weeks!” my
mother added. She was a mother. She packed my bags: a two-month
supply of tampons stashed in Ziplocs and tucked into my shoes, yards
upon yards of floss, a pepper-spray key chain, and a family-pack of
Dove soap, which, she always said, was pH-balanced for my vagina. I
was sixteen. I knew by this time in my life that she did not mean my
vagina, but a whole community of vaginas in need of balanced cleans-
ing, to which, by virtue of my own parts, I apparently belonged.
It was 1986. It was New Jersey. I had Madonna posters on my
bedroom walls, though I distrusted Madonna; she was loud and crass
and seemed, well, fake. I was embarrassed by the particular way she
put her hands on herself in her videos. But I’d needed something
to replace the Kristy McNichol posters I’d had on my walls since
the seventies. Kristy McNichol had always struck me as trustworthy:
she skateboarded and had played someone named Buddy on TV, and
her pain struck me as the real deal. Once, when I was in elementary
school, I’d sent her a letter telling her to be careful, since I’d seen
some of the kids who had to have dental work done in my dad’s office
after they fell off their skateboards, and she sent me a 3-D poster of
herself on a skateboard and cellophane glasses I could use to look at
her from my bed. But Kristy McNichol was old news. And though72
Eliezra Schaffzin
I was without doubt a weird kid, I wasn’t stupid or developmentally
out of whack or anything. I knew how to masturbate, hypothetically,
and even had a name for my vagina. My friend Sarah and I had come
up with it in middle school, when we realized that the three girls
in our grade named Jodi with an “i” (there were none with a “y”)
were totally alike: they all wore frilly clothes, they were all dog-faced,
and all the boys liked them and chased them around at bar mitzvah
parties. “Just like a vagina,” I’d said, and so Sarah said “Like your
vagina,” which is how mine got the name. Jodi.
I’d always liked nicknames. Madonna was not a nickname, but
Buddy was—and I thought it was a pretty good nickname, as long
as it was attached to a girl. While this is not necessarily true now,
at the time, whenever I thought about nicknames, I thought about
vaginas. Maybe it was Sarah’s fault, though Sarah had stopped hang-
ing out with me sometime around the start of eighth grade. By then
I’d learned the difference between a vagina and the other parts, so I
also named my other part: Heidi Clitowitz. I’d chosen a nickname for
myself, too. It was Misha. Misha was a Russian bear from the Moscow
Olympics, an exclusive bit of knowledge I’d picked up from a girl in
the neighborhood who’d been to Tel Aviv when American televisions
had banned the games, but they’d been broadcast in Israel over the
Jordanian station. I’d never seen Misha; I just liked the sound of it.
The problem with nicknames, at least as far as I understood them at
the time, was that someone else had to make them up for you—you
couldn’t give one to yourself. So, as with the bear, no one knew about
my nickname. Everyone called me Michelle.
It was 1986, almost 1987, and I was going on a two-week winter-
break trip to Israel with a whole bunch of other Jewish kids from the
Tri-State Region. Somebody was bound to know somebody, though
when I waited in line to check my bags at the El Al counter, I didn’t
recognize anyone. I found my parents in the waiting area, where they
were sitting side by side in a row of those airport chairs that had coin-
operated televisions on the armrests. My mom and dad still had their
puffy coats on, and they were wedged into their seats so tightly they
were more or less immobile from the necks down. Once my parents
snagged their seats, they really liked to keep them. When I got closerBi r t h r ig ht C it y
73
I saw they were both nodding at a woman in a fur coat who sat across
from them on a regular old plastic bench. She needed the space: she
was big, and the coat made her bigger.
“Michelle, this is Rhonda Seligson,” my mother said, gesturing
with her head towards the fur-coat lady.
“No, Carol, it’s Lowenthal now,” the woman corrected. She lifted
her hand and wiggled a few fingers in my direction.
“To us you’ll always be a Seligson,” my mother insisted. To me
she said, “Your father and I know Rhonda from camp. Her brother
Danny was my wonderful swim instructor for five summers.”
My father’s eyes had wandered to the newsstand just beyond the
woman formerly known as Seligson, where a skinny blond girl my age
walked her fingers along a row of glossy magazines. She wore a tie-
dyed tank top stretched over a chest that wasn’t so skinny, and jeans
that were more hole than denim, billowing out from her bare legs as
if a big wind were blowing through them, somehow, in that airless
terminal. Rhonda née Seligson looked over her shoulder and then
stood up suddenly, excusing herself.
“That’s Rhonda’s girl, Jodi,” my mother said. “She’s going on the
teen tour too.”
Rhonda yanked a magazine out of Jodi’s hands and stuck it in the
wrong place on the rack.
I didn’t know for sure then, but I pretty much figured this Jodi
came with an “i.” What I imagined saying at that moment was, Jodi’s
going on the teen tour too. I imagined jutting my crotch out a bit
when I said it, a move that was more Elvis than Madonna. Or maybe
I thought of all that later. Regardless, I wasn’t going to do anything
of the sort. What I actually said was, “Jodi’s a babe.”
“Michelle!” my mother scolded, freeing one arm to point at me
over the mini-television. “Women don’t say things like that.”
Like most of my mother’s pronouncements at the time, this struck
me as both very true and oddly unimportant. But the real truth was
that even before she’d complained, I’d felt myself backing down, as if I
needed to offer an explanation. “I mean, she’s lucky, she’s really thin.”
“But her mother turned out zaftig,” my father contributed.
“I see Shlomo!” my mother exclaimed, struggling out of her seat.74
Eliezra Schaffzin
Shlomo was our guide, a fact I’d learned from the literature my
parents had handed me in a blue-and-white envelope, the tangible
evidence of my Hanukkah present. My mother had known someone
related to Shlomo, an aunt or something, at her synagogue when
she was growing up. I hadn’t met him yet. He was in his twen-
ties, scruffy in his short beard and hiking boots. A pair of girl-
ish leather sandals dangled from the straps of his carry-on—the
footwear he would don when we got off the plane in Tel Aviv and
would continue to wear until he saw us back to JFK again. He in-
troduced himself and instructed us to say our good-byes; we had to
get through security.
I got a window seat, jammed in next to an Orthodox rabbi and
his wife who didn’t seem to want anything to do with me. I don’t
know why I was surprised to hear the usual announcements not
just in English, but in Hebrew as well—maybe because this Hebrew
sounded nothing like the slow, methodical language recited by the
American teachers at my school. I didn’t understand one word of
it. It wasn’t until after takeoff that I realized there were two kids
from the tour seated right behind me: Jodi and some boy who had a
crocheted Yankees yarmulke attached to his head with a bobby pin.
I didn’t see much of them; I just heard them talking. Their conver-
sation primarily concerned Shlomo, who’d started circulating in the
aisles as soon as the seat-belt sign was off, just sort of nodding hello
to his charges where they were scattered about the aircraft. He was
apparently in transitional footwear mode; he’d unlaced his boots
and was padding around in socks.
“What’s with his name? Shlomo?” This was Jodi. “It sounds like
a clown or a pet ferret or something. Or a word my grandparents
would use for penis.”
It did sound like a dirty Yiddish word, though I knew it was
Hebrew for Solomon, and I figured the boy with the yarmulke knew
it too, but he wasn’t sharing that particular insight. He just giggled at
the word “penis.” It occurred to me, then, that there was an amazing
coincidence going on, what with Shlomo and Jodi and all—and I felt
a sudden urge to get up on my knees in my seat, lean over the head-
rest, and tell Jodi Lowenthal all about it. But as I’ve said, I wasn’tBi r t h r ig ht C it y
75
totally stupid. I didn’t do anything. I put my headphones on—they
were sort of tubular back then, the kind that just brought the sound
up in rubber tunnels, one for each ear. If you wanted, you could skip
the earphones, sit on the floor, and put your ear to the armrest, and
you’d hear the same thing you’d hear with the contraption on. The
music on the El Al channels was definitely not Madonna. I pretty
much slept through the entire flight, and for most of the bus ride
from Ben Gurion to Jerusalem, which was our home base. The bro-
chure called it our “birthright city.” It said going there would feel
like coming home. We’d been on the road for nearly an hour when
Shlomo woke everyone up with the bus’s built-in P.A. system and
made us pile out at a misty overlook. The wind was strong and there
was a light horizontal rain, though everything in the distance still
looked parched.
Shlomo led the group to a cluster of stone benches, shouting
“Keep up the end, keep up the end!”—a suggestion clearly intended
for Jodi, who lagged slightly behind everyone else, her ripped jeans
ballooning when she turned into the wind. She shuffled up and im-
mediately sat down, hugging her bare shoulders. I could hear her
muttering.
“Fuck, it’s cold. Isn’t Israel supposed to be a desert?”
Shlomo introduced us to Jerusalem: the new city with its glossy,
modern white buildings to the west, the Old City with its greasy-
looking white walls to the east. Even the hills were different shades
of dusty white. Shlomo’s arm jumped around as he talked about one
mount and then another. He taught us an Israeli army trick: when
you want to point out a faraway spot to your buddies, you determine
its relative distance from other faraway spots with a unit of measure
called “fingers.” He demonstrated this with a small Arab village that
squatted in a dry valley, holding up his hand and counting three
fingers to the village from the Old City’s sealed Messiah Gate. I held
up three fingers of my own, but when I set them against my view of
the gate, my hand didn’t reach the village, ending instead at a small
Arab girl riding a clumsy donkey down a winding path. The animal
was a whitish gray, the girl covered in dust, and I hadn’t noticed the
two until I focused on my hand. I inched my arm over to the right76
Eliezra Schaffzin
so I could reach the village Shlomo wanted us to see. The girl was
obliterated behind my fingers.
Behind me on the bench, the boy from the plane had seated himself
next to Jodi again. Apparently he had offered her the warmth of his
coat, if she was willing to cuddle up under his arm while he contin-
ued to wear it. Jodi was willing. The boy’s skullcap rose periodically
from his head, flapping in the breeze. This boy, I later learned, was
one of the most religious in our group. He refused to light a match
on the Sabbath due to the rabbinical prohibition against fire, but
would smoke pot on that day if someone else got the joint started.
In the days that followed, the boys of the teen tour would seat them-
selves next to Jodi, shuffle with her behind the others, press their
thumbs into her back for a quick massage, and offer her the warmth
of their coats while Shlomo pointed out hills of dirt and walls of
stone. I wasn’t sure how much of Israel my traveling companions
actually noticed. But I wasn’t sure how much of it I was getting,
either: Jerusalem, where we spent the first week, was nothing like
I’d imagined, though I gathered that was because we hadn’t been to
the Old City yet. There’d been a fatal stabbing of a Yeshiva student
near the Temple Mount just before we’d arrived, and Shlomo said
we’d have to wait to visit that part of town; we would be taken to
the Western Wall as a very special finale. The new city, the only place
we were allowed to explore, seemed to me full of shabby gloom, its
downtown streets lined with squat, dark storefronts featuring the
kind of merchandise I’d seen in the most forsaken parts of North
Jersey, decrepit housewares and dusty books and bewildered-looking
mannequins lost in indeterminate fashion eras. Each morning, our
bus would trundle out of the city center to open, manicured, chalky-
white spaces where we’d visit the Holocaust museum or the Knesset
or the Great Synagogue or the miniature model of ancient Jerusalem
at the Holy Land Hotel, and then, when visiting hours were over, we
were trundled back to the center and set loose—to mingle, presum-
ably, with our Israeli counterparts, noisy, aggressive, lively kids who
spewed the impenetrable language I’d heard on the airplane, who
passed us on the shopping strips or sat one table over in a slightly-off-
looking pizza joint, accustomed, it seemed, to a presence like ours,Bi r t h r ig ht C it y
77
and therefore oblivious to it. I tagged along as the kids from the bus
searched for something to do, something to recognize; when they’d
given up on that, the girls turned their sights on something to buy,
the boys on someone to torment. They’d lead us into the McDa-
vid’s—oddly decorated in red, white, and blue—and complain to the
management that the ketchup was seasoned incorrectly or attempt,
repeatedly, to order a bacon double cheeseburger. Or, when we’d
crowded into a corner falafel stand, where the old men behind the
counter handed us heaping portions in soft, warm bread pockets, the
boys would shout “Coke? Coke?” and the men, responding “Coca
Cola, yes,” would head for the refrigerator until the boys appeared to
change their minds, yelling “Pepsi? Pepsi?”—knowing quite well that
there was no Pepsi to be found here, since Pepsi, we’d been told, had
chosen to maintain its vast Arab market by shunning the tiny Israeli
one. When the falafel men hesitated, uncertain how to respond, the
boys would ramp it up: “Dr. Pepper? Mountain Dew? Orange Shasta?
Mello Yello? Fizzy Jism?” until the old men, clean-shaven and brown
in their faces, swift and guttural in their speech, nothing like our
German and Russian grandfathers, finally gave up, flustered.
At night, we stayed in youth-hostel rooms, girls on one hall, boys
on another. I was always first in bed, the bottom of a corner bunk.
I’d pull the blanket up past my nose, nearly but not completely cover-
ing my eyes, so that I could feel my lashes against the top sheet when
I blinked. I was an only child, and had never slept in a room with
anyone else before, as far as I could recall. I wasn’t in the habit of
looking at people in those days, either, at least not when they could
look back at me, so this method of hiding myself behind the covers
had freed me up, without my actually intending it, to take a nightly
inventory of my roommates. No one paid me any notice, but even
then I avoided faces, scanning instead from the necks down: round
bodies with heavy breasts that filled extra-large Benetton T-shirts
doubling as pajamas, tall bodies stretched taut and thin over sturdy
frames, with long, muscular legs that reminded me of frogs splayed
out on dissecting pans. Nothing I could find on myself was either as
pronounced or as defined. My own hand searched in vain for the hip
bones I saw protruding beneath exposed skin when someone reached78
Eliezra Schaffzin
up to grab the ladder to an upper bunk. I could not see, when I at-
tempted to consider myself in that mix, what it was that supposedly
made us all alike; all I saw, when I peered out from under the starched
and stamped youth-hostel bedding, was what I was certain I did not
have in common with the rest of them, what I was supposed to be
but felt certain I was not, something soft but burgeoning, something
gleefully awakened—to what, I hadn’t a clue. Each night the girls
primped for bed as if sleeping were a party, until Shlomo popped his
head in, never bothering to knock, and declared we’d reached “The
We-Bitching Hour”—a term he used nightly, to no one’s particular
amusement, or, I suspect, comprehension, except that it meant lights
out. Most nights, he’d use the opportunity to usher Jodi through the
door from wherever he’d found her. She’d plop into her bottom bunk
just as the room went dark.
I was fully aware of the fact that my parents were hoping that, in ad-
dition to connecting with the homeland, I’d come back from the tour
with new friends—with any friends, actually, since my loss column
had pretty much overtaken the gains in the friendship department
from the start of high school. It seemed they’d decided to blame it
on the fact that my options were limited to my small private school,
to our little cul-de-sac community. They’d already made me try all
kinds of clubs, stuff for smart kids, stuff for artists, stuff that tried
to turn what you did in your room at home into who you were. I’d
tried a whole lot of things, but then I finally refused to try anymore. I
didn’t really belong to anything. Once I’d overheard my father, when
he thought I was asleep in my room, tell my mother he was worried
because everyone else my age seemed to have a “thing.” I knew what
he was talking about: He always said my generation needed a thing
if they wanted to get into a good college, have a good career. My
mother laughed and said, “Oh, one of these days she’ll fall in love,
and then she’ll find her thing soon enough.” Sometimes I felt like she
was speaking a dead language. Still, I harbored a constant, nagging
sense that I owed my parents something, so I didn’t complain about
the Israel trip. And I was, I suppose, kind of curious, if you could call
it that. Israel was so far away, so very old; I figured something really
different couldn’t hurt. Once I was there, it struck me as kind of cuteBi r t h r ig ht C it y
79
that their good intentions were so pathetically misplaced, consider-
ing how the kids on the teen tour were exactly the same as the ones
at home—only amplified, what with the whirlwind intensity of our
Israel adventure. But in retrospect, I understood that my mom and
dad weren’t really willing to grant me a true change of scenery. They
wanted desperately for me to find my place anywhere in the world, in
any little community, as long as it was just like theirs at home.
About a week into the tour, we were told to pack for a few days’
excursion: we were going to mock-military boot camp. This was a
place Israeli high-school students went for an entire week, to prepare
for the real thing—army service—when they graduated. For us, the
youth of the Diaspora, they offered the three-day version. I’d known
from the brochure that they were going to give us guns. Not for
keeps, of course, just for a session on a shooting range, and a few en-
counters before that, for the sake of getting acquainted. We arrived at
night, in another light rain, and were greeted by uniformed soldiers,
who, barking at us in accented English, made us line up right outside
the bus and stand at attention, our bags on the damp ground beside
us. We were separated—not just for sleeping this time—into platoons
of boys and girls, but the soldiers bossing us around were all female,
which everyone took as a pretty clear sign of how phony the whole
boot camp thing was. After some shouting and leering and warnings
about how hard we’d work for the next few days, they gave us each a
little stack of army-green shirts and pants and sent us off to our bar-
racks, which looked just like another youth hostel.
I was brushing my teeth in the dorm-style bathroom, jockeying
for position at the sink, when Jodi marched in, taking the stall just
behind me. A moment later she screamed.
“Goddammit! Does anyone out there have any corks?”
I hesitated, looking at the other girls, who busied themselves at the
sinks. In my memory, their faces are clouded in the water-damaged
mirror; I can’t remember their names, except for the fact that no one
else was a Jodi. None of them showed any indication of having heard
Jodi’s distress call. I thought of a few things I might say, didn’t say
any of them, and then decided to say something after all.
“Wait a second! I’ll be right there!” I ran back to the room, wiping80
Eliezra Schaffzin
the foaming toothpaste from my lips with my T-shirt. I was back in
a flash, tossing a Ziploc full of tampons over the bathroom stall with
the full momentum of my run.
“Holy Jesus, you rock!”
I heard her tear open a tampon behind the stall door. I rinsed my
mouth and started to introduce myself, raising my voice above the
flushing toilets. I wanted to be sure she knew who her supplier was.
“I know who you are,” she said, coming out of the stall. “My
mother told me at the airport. Your mom was Uncle Danny’s swim-
suit girl. Michelle, right?”
I said, “It’s Misha.” I stepped aside from my place at the sink so
she could wash her hands. She wore her hair in a ponytail with an
elasticized piece of flannel that matched her flannel boxer shorts. Her
legs had remained perfectly smooth since JFK. She looked up at me,
not directly, but in the mirror. I looked away, at myself. It felt stupid.
I didn’t know what else to say.
“Decent nickname,” she said. She picked at something tiny on her
chin. Then she shuffled off to our room. The lights were out by the
time I felt my way to bed.
The girl soldiers were all corporals, a rank they said was called
“Rabat” in Hebrew, which sounded a whole lot like “Rabbi” to me.
Which made the subtle differences between bat mitzvah tutoring and
faux boot camp all the more apparent. For two days, we labored
in our single-sex squadrons, cleaning bathrooms, peeling vegetables,
lumbering through obstacle courses, learning not to light a match
while on night patrol, all the stuff, they said, the Israel Defense
Forces were supposed to do. We also studied the guns, and handled
them a bit—M16s, a pretty serious-looking rifle that we disassembled
and cleaned, with oil and handkerchiefs, right on the mess hall tables.
The thing soldiers seemed to do most, though, was stand at atten-
tion, and the girls’ corporal, Rabat Osnat, liked to line us up and
shout at us a whole lot. I noticed she had a stronger accent than the
rest—you couldn’t tell if she was trying to say we should “get over the
wall” or the “war,” if she thought we were “hungry” or “angry.” On
the morning of the third day, the day when we’d fire our weapons,
we endured an especially long and unintelligible lecture. We were allBi r t h r ig ht C it y
81
standing stiffly, arms behind our backs and faces straight ahead, when
someone broke ranks and headed toward the latrine—I didn’t need
to turn my head to know it was Jodi, but I shifted a little anyway, just
so I could see what would happen next. Rabat Osnat demanded an
explanation, and Jodi spun around. I could see the tie-dye peeking
out at the neckline of her fatigues. Her shirt was unbuttoned at the
bottom and tied into a knot at her midriff, and her pants were cuffed
tightly around her calves, creating her signature ballooning about the
knees. An elaborate system of safety pins sparkled at the pant cuffs,
just above her thick pink socks and mud-stained K-Swiss.
“I’m on the rag, sister. I don’t suppose you stop the real war for
that, but the Fisher-Price version can sure as hell wait.”
I wasn’t sure they’d let Jodi fire a gun after that, and in fact, when
they lined us up at the range, each of us standing at the edge of an
army-issue blanket on which an M16 sat alongside giant, airfield-
style earmuffs, I didn’t see Jodi. But then there she was, person-
ally escorted by Rabat Osnat to an unoccupied blanket not far from
mine. I figured she’d pointed out to Shlomo, who was there some-
where at the camp, slapping around in his sandals, that her mom had
paid the big bucks to let her shoot guns in Israel, and Shlomo had
convinced the soldiers in charge to let her stay. We’d been briefed a
hundred times, it seemed, on shooting-range protocol: there was a
command for waiting, a command for lying on our stomachs by the
gun—which had been propped for us on a stand at the blanket’s far
edge—a command to load the cartridge, another for placing the blue
plastic muffs on our ears and lifting the butt of the gun so it rested
against our shoulders, one to take the trigger off the safety setting
(and move it to semiautomatic, not automatic), and a command to
fire. There were targets across the way—not in the shape of people
or anything, just black concentric circles on a white sheet of paper.
We weren’t even supposed to hit the middle; we just had to try to get
the five bullets we fired to hit somewhere close to each other. I wasn’t
really sure what that was all about—weren’t you supposed to hit the
right enemy in the right place the first time? But I wasn’t in a think-
ing mood: after we were reminded, for the umpteenth time, never to
lift the guns from their stands, we got the signal to hit the floor. With82
Eliezra Schaffzin
my face close to the ground and the headset over my ears, I could
smell the blanket’s musty scent, but the rest of the world seemed far
away. I looked down the row of would-be shooters and saw Jodi, her
ponytail high on her head, her jaw working its way around a wad of
gum, her painted nails splayed out before her—just some chick in
front of a pile of Seventeen magazines. The corporals must have saved
their best shouting for the range, because their voices were the only
clear sounds coming through the mufflers. The command came to
release the safety, and I saw one of Jodi’s hot pink fingernails slide
into the trigger. I continued to see it even when I turned to my own
target and fired five times. I saw nothing up ahead; I felt nothing but
a shove in my shoulder with each shot.
Once we were done, which seemed about as soon as we’d begun,
we rested our guns in their stands, pulled off the headsets, and
awaited one final command to smile as the Rabats came around for
our cameras, preserving the moment on film. I had my old plastic
Kodak with me, the one my parents had given me for my bat mitz-
vah, filled with the same roll of 126 I’d cranked into it at the start
of the trip. Rabat Osnat took her best shot—the snap of the shut-
ter sounded small but sharp after everything else—and then placed
the camera on the blanket beside me. I sat up and fumbled with it,
trying to advance the reel, realizing my hands were sweating. Osnat
was making her way down the row, and I watched her wrestle for a
while with a complicated-looking 35mm gadget that belonged to the
girl next to me. Ahead, Jodi was still prone on her blanket, headgear
hugging her blond head. She made eye contact and paused her gum-
chewing to smile a toothy grin; her hand formed a thumbs-up beside
her face, which she tilted toward the butt of the M16. I realized she
was posing for me, and I brought the Kodak to my eye and snapped.
She winked and stuck her tongue out a little, letting it hover over
the rifle, like she was just about to give it a good lick. I snapped
again. She wriggled on the blanket, propping herself on one elbow
and using her free hand to make a move on the gun that looked
something like the Wicked Witch of the West—you know, when she’s
going after her crystal ball, poppies, poppies—a kind of air-caress that
then reached under the barrel, almost cupping it, and before I couldBi r t h r ig ht C it y
83
snap again I saw Rabat Osnat yank Jodi’s hand back right through my
viewfinder. Then another set of hands snatched my camera.
Somehow I was implicated in this affair, as if I’d encouraged Jodi
with my camerawork, as if my little plastic box was as likely to burn
my hand—or fire a spare bullet—as Jodi’s rifle. For our punishment,
we were to be excluded from a weekend trip down south to the beach,
left instead with a host family back in chilly Jerusalem. The tour bus
actually dropped us off on the way out of town, taking a winding road
that hugged the Old City walls, the closest we’d come to them so far.
They were massive, the stones much larger than they’d seemed from
the overlook, and neatly landscaped with grass and space-age-looking
spotlights. We turned up a hill—the city was all hills—and stopped
in front of a public bus stop, with people there—an old woman with
a bulging plastic bag at her feet and a long-haired man with a baby
in a stroller. I was sitting up front, just behind Shlomo, hugging my
overnight bag, but he made cheerful use of the loudspeaker to let
us—me and Jodi—know that this was our stop. I didn’t turn around
to watch Jodi make her way to the exit from her usual spot in the way
back; I just bounded down the steps after Shlomo, nearly tripping
over the guy with his stroller. His name was David, and he was a
friend of Shlomo’s, and he would be our host. Nobody said anything
to the old lady; I figured she was just waiting for her bus. When Jodi
caught up, the tour bus took Shlomo and the rest of the kids into the
Judean Desert and toward the Red Sea, while we followed the guy
with the baby home.
I thought we were going to stay with an Israeli family, but David
and his wife were just Americans who had been living in Israel for a
while, sort of religious hippies with matching long brown hair; when
Shoshanna got home, my first thought was that the two of them
looked like brother and sister. It was still a few hours until the sun set
and Sabbath began, but they put us to work right away, washing the
white tile floors with a squeegee and pushing the dirty water down
a drain in the balcony, chopping vegetables for chicken soup. Jodi
wasn’t too talkative, and I couldn’t think of anything interesting to
say, so I just listened while they told the story of how they’d fallen in
love with Jerusalem and with each other all at once, and while they84
Eliezra Schaffzin
fed afternoon snacks of soup veggies to their little boy, Bentzi, the ap-
parent result of all that falling in love. When they finally sent us into
the dining room to set the table, I passed Jodi a stack of plates and
whispered “Faux-faux-boot-camp,” and she let out a little chuckle.
At dinner they sang but didn’t make us sing; they drank wine but
didn’t make us not drink. “No drinking age in Israel,” Shoshanna
said, pouring us each a new glass. Bentzi mashed soup carrots into
a Sesame Street book I recognized from when I was a kid. He held
it out to me with an oily hand. “Grover is a goy,” he said. It cracked
his parents up.
Over dessert, they invited us to Sabbath morning services at some
kind of do-it-yourself synagogue—a whole group of religious hip-
pies like themselves—that met in the bomb shelter of a neighbor-
ing apartment building. I wondered if the wine had loosened up my
facial muscles, since David could tell I was pretty alarmed by that last
detail, the bomb shelter. He said it was a normal thing in Israel, that
there was one in the basement of every building. Mostly kids used
them, he said, to have parties or make out. All of a sudden Jodi had
something to say.
“Thanks for the suggestion and all, but Misha and I are going to
the real synagogue down the street.”
I had no idea what Jodi was up to, since I was pretty sure she
wasn’t planning to attend any Sabbath services, but I nodded anyway.
It was the first time anyone ever called me Misha. In any event, they
didn’t seem to care, David and Shoshanna, where we did our praying.
They were clearly all about freedom of expression. David scooped up
the baby, probably to go wash the soup off, and Shoshanna showed
us to the little room in the back of the apartment where we were sup-
posed to sleep. I’d assumed it would be Bentzi’s room, full of Sesame
Street paraphernalia and a crib and a couple of sleeping bags for us,
but this room had nothing in it but a wall of built-in cabinets and one
full-sized bed. Jodi was apparently done saying everything she was
going to say to our hosts for the night, since she dumped her bag on
the floor by the cabinets, pulled a bunch of junk out, and disappeared
into the bathroom. I was feeling a little woozy, so when Shoshanna
left me there, I just sat on the edge of the bed for a while, facing theBi r t h r ig ht C it y
85
wall unit, looking at all the different-sized brown laminate rectangles
with their matching handles, wondering which actually had hanging
closets behind them and which had shelves and which were drawers,
and when Jodi got back in her tank top and flannel boxers, her bare
legs still looking like they never needed to be shaved, she stood and
stared at me for a minute, combing her fingers through her hair to
wrangle it into a ponytail, and said, “What’s the matter with you?”
I wasn’t really sure how to answer that, so I just sat there for an-
other minute, which forced Jodi to choose the side of the bed away
from the cabinets. I could feel her making little tugs on the blanket,
trying to yank it out from under my butt, so I finally stood up and
turned around, and as she got under the covers, she looked right at
me and laughed, which made me feel even more disoriented, as if I’d
never actually seen her before, and now I would have to fall asleep
beside her. She said it again, “What’s the matter?” Then she said,
“They’re just making us share the covers. No one asked you to get
into my haunted house or anything.”
When she said it like that, I really did feel frightened for a moment—
like when you’re a little kid and the mere mention of a haunted house
gives you the creeps, dread and excitement all at once. But I wasn’t
that terribly horribly stupid. I knew Jodi was talking about her Jodi,
so I laughed right back, and went to brush my teeth and get into my
sweats. By the time I turned out the light and climbed into bed she
had her face to the wall. She’d used something for her skin—like Sea
Breeze, that mouthwash-blue stuff my mother would never let me
try—and the smell hovered over the bed, all cool and scrubbed-clean.
I turned my back to her and faced the complicated wardrobe. It was
probably the first time I’d ever had bed spins. I could feel the edge of
the mattress underneath me, all along my length, my body balanced
as far out as it could go without falling off. I felt like I would fall
anyway, forward or backward, it didn’t matter—I was sure it would
be a long way down, to some place at the bottom I knew perfectly
well but still couldn’t see. Or maybe I didn’t think exactly that, not
right then. Maybe I thought about all of that later. I’m not sure
how long I’d been in bed, spinning, when I felt Jodi shift under the
covers. The blankets lifted a little—I remember a moment of coolness86
Eliezra Schaffzin
beneath them, as if for a second, I was suspended in air, in contact
with nothing—and then Jodi was there, pressed against me, a warm
body and breath on my neck and back. I could feel her breasts, one
nestled just below each of my shoulder blades. Her bare knees fit
against the backs of my own, through my sweatpants. I didn’t know
where she’d put her arm—not the one beneath her, which I could feel
vaguely on my back as well, but the one on top, that was free to move
where she liked; it did not wrap around my front, or even rest on my
shoulder. I imagined she’d laid it along her side, her hand resting on
her hip, or maybe it was folded in at the elbow, coming back up to
touch her own shoulder. I wasn’t sure how she’d managed to balance
that way. I didn’t dare look. The warmth of her made her visible to
me, though, and a thought occurred to me unlike any other I’d had
before: to feel a person pressed against you in darkness was to see that
person as if in a full, radiating light. I saw her, not as she was in the
airport terminal or the firing range or the back of the bus, not even
as her particular assemblage of parts that bore a resemblance to one
girl’s torso, another’s calves. It was a different kind of vision, one that
I could feel on and in myself, with perfect clarity, perfect recognition.
It was with that sort of intensity that I felt Jodi lock herself into me,
and remain there. I was conscious for a long while of not breathing,
so I wasn’t sure how it was, exactly, that I was still alive. I was more
than awake. When I was little, my mother used to say you couldn’t
fall asleep until you believed you were going to fall asleep, and so I
grew to accept myself as the heretic I was always meant to be, a child
insomniac of insufficient faith. As Jodi lay there, unmoving but still
progressing—the steady pressure of her body an advance further and
further into mine—I was more the heretic than ever. I knew I would
not sleep a wink. Yet what I knew turned out to be wrong: some-
how that condition of complete wakefulness, of illumination, slid me
seamlessly into a soft darkness, and into sleep.
When I opened my eyes the room was bright. Jodi was no longer
at my back, though I could feel the tension in the blanket where
she lay claim to her half of it, somewhere behind me still. I hadn’t
stirred an inch from where I’d placed myself, face to the wardrobe,
the night before. I lay there and waited. Soon I could hear Bentzi’sBi r t h r ig ht C it y
87
babbling, an original mixture of English and Hebrew. Then there
was the low murmur of his parents’ voices in the hall, the jingling of
keys. The front door had barely clicked shut when I felt Jodi rise; I
automatically brought the covers to my lashes. Jodi crouched on the
floor beside the wardrobe and riffled through her bag, yanking out
an extra-large men’s shirt that she pulled over her head. It fell past
her tank top, hitting low on her thighs. She tugged the boxer shorts
down from underneath the shirt and stepped out of them, pulling
a pair of leggings up instead. She carefully smoothed her ponytail,
repositioning it to one side of her head. Then she stepped into her K-
Swiss, faced the bed squarely, put her hands on her hips, and looked
right at me. It hadn’t occurred to me that she could see my eyes. Her
voice contained the usual impatient mocking.
“You ready yet?”
I remember thinking, Maybe, yes, wait, for what?
“We’re going to the Old City,” she said. “I can totally find my way.
I watched from the bus.”
“What about David and them?” I was having trouble speaking
properly. I lowered the blanket to just below my chin. “Won’t they
see us from services? They said their synagogue was next door.”
“It’s in a bomb shelter, genius. I’m pretty sure those things don’t
have windows.”
When I grabbed my clothes and headed for the bathroom, I
thought I heard Jodi’s chuckle follow me out of the room, but I
couldn’t be sure; I don’t think I was really sure of anything that
morning, except that Jodi had replaced Shlomo as my tour guide,
and I was allowing her to lead me into the surprisingly clear day, out
of the neighborhood where we’d slept and onto unfamiliar streets,
shady, long blocks of office buildings marked ministry of one thing
or another, all closed up and quiet, abandoned for the Sabbath holi-
day. Jodi blazed our trail without hesitation, though it seemed to
take us an awfully long time to retrace the path the bus had taken
the day before. We walked silently for a long while, until we reached
the sunny end of a road that opened out onto the Old City walls.
This wasn’t the same spot we’d passed the day before: there were no
trimmed lawns, no evenly spaced spotlights. The streets were full88
Eliezra Schaffzin
of grit and trash, the sidewalks erratically paved, as if there’d been
an idea of work that was later forgotten. The plaza between us and
the grand gate ahead—a dark, pointed arch between two thick, ara-
besque towers—descended into the archway in wide stone steps cov-
ered by boxes of goods for sale and the vendors who squatted beside
them. We both paused, taking in the sudden chaos, and then Jodi
plunged into the throng. I followed quickly now, directing my feet
around ground-level spreads of salt and pepper shakers, children’s
underwear, flashlights, wind-up toys in shrink-wrap, pocketknives.
Women shoppers, dark scarves encircling their heads, stooped over
cardboard flats crammed with live chicks. We made our way through
the crowd and into the gateway, a deep chamber inside the city wall.
The gate did not deposit us immediately, as I’d expected, into
the familiar, white open; instead, the crowd thickened and our pace
slowed as we moved into deeper darkness. As my eyes adjusted I
saw the shops: hardware stores, money changers, produce stands, all
tucked into the dank corners that routed us along a sharply angular
path, preventing direct access to the city. We had entered a living
arm of the Arab market. I found myself unable to direct my own
movement, squeezed as I was into the mass of people moving in both
directions, somehow, through the gate. An old woman with a leafy
branch of figs tied around her in a sling pressed her knuckles into
my back, urging me forward, and I tried to oblige, eager to keep
up with Jodi’s sideways ponytail. At last I stumbled out of the arch
and into an alleyway—there was only slightly more sunlight here,
slightly more air—where I hurried to Jodi’s side. Storekeepers sat on
low stools on a slim margin of pavement and stared. Some cooked
meat on small grills or sipped tea in tiny shot-sized glasses, tossing
dice over backgammon sets. Music blared from many radios—string
instruments that played in dizzying, descending scales, an accompa-
niment to wailing voices, Arabic words.
“Cool,” Jodi said. “Hold still a minute.” She rested a hand on my
shoulder. I stood perfectly still, just as she’d said, while she lifted one
foot to pull a pebble from the bottom of her sneaker. The shoe had
barely reached the ground before she continued onward, up an in-
cline, the alley rising on broadly spaced concrete steps that made myBi r t h r ig ht C it y
89
gait feel clumsy, halting, as I continued to follow. A boy navigated a
cart of sesame breads downhill, riding a tire loosely attached to the
cart’s rear, bouncing lightly off each low step. There was something
solemn about the market—it was just shopping, of course, almost the
same junk you could buy at a second-rate mall back home, but there
was something weighty here, like the people took it all very seri-
ously. It was a deliberate mix of Times Square and supermarket and
city park and someone’s cousin’s backyard. There were alleyways with
flashing string lights and boom boxes for sale and posters of painted,
dark-haired, zaftig ladies who must have been someone’s idea of
a movie star, and there were alleyways hung entirely with massive
pieces of meat, some cut and skinned, some freshly killed; there were
rows of stalls with keffiyehs and olivewood crosses, and there were
neatly swept aisles with glass-enclosed storefronts, women’s fashions
draped elegantly inside. We had turned up another incline when a
boy gave a shout; he rode his bread cart much faster than the one
before him, and Jodi and I separated, making room for him to pass.
As I backed out of his path I felt my head touch some sort of display
and turned around to find a dozen hanging mirrors, my blank face
swaying gently in each of them. They were framed in black cloth em-
broidered in deep reds and purples, a pouch of fragrance fitted in on
top. Jodi moved to my side of the alley and, parting the mirror-vines,
stepped up to the shop window and cupped her hands over her face
to peer inside. I stepped up with her: it was an embroidery shop, the
entire space piled high with loose fabrics, dresses, bags, all decorated
in the same ornate patterns of the mirrors. As Jodi looked, one of her
hands left her face and moved again to my shoulder; then it slid down
my sleeve, pulling me with her as she swung open the shop’s door
and brought us both inside.
The room was filled with the fragrance of the mirrors and with a
placid quiet, as if we’d traveled far from the noise of the marketplace
just outside. An Arab man—balding, round—sat on a mound of car-
pets with two tall blond women—German tourists, I thought, from
their light coloring and emphatic speech—and fanned a sampling
of fabrics out between them. He kept an eye on us as he spoke to
them in his own accented English. Jodi didn’t seem to notice; she90
Eliezra Schaffzin
dropped my arm and ran her hand along the hanging fabrics, unfold-
ing blouses from their stacks and spreading them out against herself,
stirring scarves in overflowing baskets. She chose a dress on a hanger
and handed it to me.
“Here—hold this up to see if it fits,” she said, spreading her arms
out before me, as if submitting to be frisked. I held the dress out,
awkwardly, a gown for a paper doll. It dragged a little on the rug.
“Pull it up so the collar reaches my neck, silly,” she said, and I obeyed,
pushing it closer to her body, grazing her nose a little with the hang-
er’s tip. She laughed, just as she had the night before, so I just stood
there and kept the dress aloft while she lifted her arms farther to
unzip it a bit at the back and extract the wire hanger, which she
tossed on a nearby stack. She wrapped the dress more closely around
her, smoothing it against her chest, her hips. “Hold it there for a sec,”
she whispered, and my ears pricked at the softness, the confidence in
her tones. I felt a little off balance again, so I inched my feet nearer,
steadying myself as I pressed the dress to the places she’d shown me.
Jodi wasn’t looking at the dress anymore—instead her eyes met mine,
broadcasting a bewildering glint of determination. Which is why it
took me a moment to realize that she’d brought her hands behind her,
reaching for two fistfuls of scarves from a basket just within reach.
I stood there, still holding the dress up high, while she slipped the
scarves into the pockets of her blouse, shot a look across the room,
and stepped out from behind the curtain I’d created for her, heading
for the door. With my back to the shopkeeper, I didn’t see him rise,
but I heard his shout, a kind of “Wullah!” that sent Jodi right out the
door and back down the alley we’d just climbed. I pulled that dress
back toward me then, and just kept hugging it to my own self while
the storekeeper rushed past me and out the door, shouting more now,
rousing two young men lounging in a doorway across the alley. They
took off in Jodi’s direction—I couldn’t see her ponytail anymore,
though I couldn’t see much from where I was glued to the carpet.
The German women brushed past me next, slowly, staring, and dis-
appeared out the door as the shopkeeper returned.
To me he said, “Sit,” pointing to the pile of rugs. He took the
dress from my hands and I sat. He spun around to search the pilesBi r t h r ig ht C it y
91
behind him until he found the hanger, forcing it back into the dress
as he spoke.
“The Israeli bolice,” he said, pronouncing it Is-ra-el-i, each syllable
distinct. He hung the dress in its place and paced the room. “I call
the Israeli bolice. Your barents—they are at your hotel? They do not
know you are here?”
“No,” I said. “My parents don’t know.”
The policeman came, in blue and white, though we’d waited so
long, I couldn’t imagine he’d have any luck finding Jodi. He spot-
ted me right away where I sat on the carpets in the back, but didn’t
acknowledge me beyond that first glance, speaking instead to the
shopkeeper in a steady monotone—Hebrew or Arabic, I couldn’t tell.
A few women in headscarves stood outside the shop window, cup-
ping their faces as Jodi had done, staring inside, at me, I figured. My
eyes traced the patterns of embroidery everywhere in the room. The
perfume felt heavier than before, the store a cavern within a cave. I
retraced our steps in my mind, trying to remember when we’d last
been fully outdoors, in the sunlight, under an open sky. I wasn’t sure.
At last I heard a stirring in the small crowd at the window, and
the door opened: there was Jodi, hesitating at the entrance, someone
holding the door for her—a soldier, a boy soldier, fresh-faced, like
the more palatable boys at my school, a rifle slung over his shoulder.
He stood there, waiting, holding the door open wide, peering about
as if he’d brought Jodi in to do some shopping, wanted to make sure
they’d found the right place. As Jodi stepped over the threshold she
lifted a gentle hand to his arm, the one with the gun, then let go.
She stayed there by the front, her arms crossed, her look indignant.
I didn’t see any scarves. I imagined them cast off somewhere in the
ancient city—bright flecks of color against black, wedged into a crack
in massive white stone. It was only when the soldier followed Jodi
inside that I saw that with his free hand he gripped the arm of an
Arab man only slightly older than himself—I recognized him as one
of the young men who had chased Jodi down the alley. The soldier
tugged at the Arab, then pushed him into the store in a way that
struck me not as rough, but decisive, older than his years. They let
the glass door swing shut behind them and again we were enclosed92
Eliezra Schaffzin
in silence. The young Arab did not move, did not look to anyone; the
soldier resumed his grip. Something about the pair made we want to
recede into the embroidery, but I did the opposite: I stood. We all
stood there, Jodi and the soldier and the young Arab man and the
older man and the policeman and me.
The policeman spoke first, to the soldier—in Hebrew, I was sure,
because I heard the word freicha, one of the slang words Shlomo had
taught us, a word that meant bimbo. The soldier listened, looking in one
moment hardened, in another confused, shifting his gaze between Jodi
and the man still in his custody. Maybe because I couldn’t understand
what it was they were saying, my eyes felt free to wander to everyone’s
faces, taking in the look of hesitation in the soldier, and the mute fury in
the young man, and the exasperation in the older man, and the fatigue in
the policeman, and, in Jodi, the cruelty and the beauty and the fear. I’d
felt something, finally, in this bizarre gathering, something strong and
undeniable, a commitment at last—a breaking away. I had stepped up,
joined in, and though no one paid me any mind, I knew I’d soon find
my voice and speak, confess everything, an offering of clarification and
exoneration and responsibility that would mean absolutely nothing, not
just because it would change nothing, fix nothing, but because it would
not include the truth, the one I’d understood right then—and later as
well, for sure, for every day afterward, but also, I remember perfectly,
right then in that moment, when I began at last to separate in earnest,
irrevocably, from everything, relinquishing everything I was supposed
to be and everything I was not, turning, at last, far away from everyone,
as I would always, infinitely, from then on. I remember that moment
better than any other, because it was the one in which I fell, as my
mother had predicted, in love—permanently, devastatingly—with my
own distance, the thing I finally understood would be my rightful
salvation, my rightful ruin.11.
Can a Corn
by Jess Walter
Ken took dialysis Tuesdays and Thursdays. It fell to Tommy after his
mom passed to check his stepdad out of the Pine Lodge Correctional
Facility. Drop him at the hospital. Take him back three hours later.
Ken groaned as he climbed up the truck. —Whatcha got there,
Tom?
Tommy looked over the backseat. —Pole and tackle.
—You goin’ fishin’ this weekend?
—I ain’t skydivin’.
Ken stared out his window. —You stop me by a store?
There was a downtown grocery sold Lotto, fortified wines, and
forties. Ken hopped out. Tommy spun radio stations till Ken come
back with a can a corn.
—Oh, no you ain’t, Ken.
—So got-damn tired, Tom. Can’t sit on that blood machine today.
—You’d rather die?
—I’d rather fish.
—No way, Ken.
He drove toward Sacred Heart. But when Tommy stopped at a red
light Ken reached back, got the pole and jumped out. Fine, Tommy
thought. Die. I don’t care. The old man walked toward the Spokane
River. Tommy pulled up next to him, reached over and rolled down
the passenger window.94
Jess Walter
—Get in the damn truck, Ken.
Ken ignored him.
—That pole ain’t even geared.
Ken walked, facing away.
Tommy drove alongside for another block. —Get in the truck,
Ken.
Ken turned down a one-way. Tommy couldn’t follow.
Fine. Stupid bastard. Tommy went back to work, but the only
thing in the pit was a brake job on some old lady’s Mercury: four
hundred in repairs on a shit-bucket worth three. Pissed, Tommy gave
the Mercury to Todd and drove back downtown.
He parked, got his tackle box from the truck and walked back
along the river. Found his stepfather under a bridge, dry pole next
to him.
Tommy gave him hook and weight.
Ken’s gray fingers shook.
—Give it here. Tommy weighted and hooked the line. He pulled
a can opener from the tackle box and opened Ken’s corn. Carefully,
Tommy pushed the steel hook into the corn’s paper skin until, with a
tiny spurt, it gave way.
He handed the old man back the pole. Ken cast it.
Half-hour later, Ken reeled in a dull catfish, yellow-eyed and spiny.
No fight in the thing at all. Almost like it didn’t mind.
Ken held it up. —Well I will be got-damned.
Tommy released the fish. It just kind of sank.
He dropped the old man at the front gate of the prison, his breath-
ing already shallow. Rusty. He was so weak Tommy had to reach over
and pop his door.
—Hey that wadn’t a bad got-damn fish. All things considered. His
eyes were filming over already. —We should go again Tuesday.
—We gonna start playin’ catch now, too? Tommy asked.
Ken laughed. —I doubt it.
Then Tommy watched the dying old man pass through the metal
gate. The fucker.12.
Confluence
by Mesha Maren
I push my fingers into the dark green fabric, smooth the starched
jacket out over the back of the kitchen chair. Through the front
windows the wind kicks red sand up into the paloverde bushes. My
fingers trace the stitched letters on the front of the jacket: J ohn M c -
C arty U.S. B or der P atrol . Outside the sunlight is a pale milky
version of its angry summer self, but it grows hotter every day. John’s
footsteps pound in the hall. I press my nails deeper into the gold let-
ters of his name.
“Layna,” he booms in his preacher voice, “what are you doing,
honey?”
My shoulders stiffen before his hands even reach me.
John lets out a mouthful of air. “Give me my jacket, Layna.”
I don’t lift my hands.
“What are you doing?” he asks again. “Laying hands on it? Trying
to curse me?”
“Laying on hands is for healing,” I say, lifting my fingers and stick-
ing them into my apron pocket.
He rests his right hand heavy on the base of my neck and grabs
the jacket. He smells of mint toothpaste, Old Spice, and hair gel. I
breathe deep, smell for something more. I found a bottle in his truck
the other day, an almost empty liter of mezcal with a pale worm bob-
bing at the bottom. In the glove box, beside the mezcal, lay a silver96
Mesha Maren
bracelet and pink hair clip. I didn’t ask him about them. He would
have told me some illegal alien left them, told me he forgot to throw
them away.
John lifts his hand, guiding his arms into the stiff sleeves of his
jacket. “Layna honey,” he says, “you worry yourself too much.”
The linoleum under my bare feet is gritty with sand. It’s time
to mop again, fourth time in one week. That devil sand won’t stay
outside. At night it opens the door, slips in, and settles itself into the
seams of my furniture, the eyes of my child.
From the cabinet I pull out a bag of yesterday’s biscuits, take two,
and place them inside the mouth of the microwave. Behind me, John
fixes his belt. I wrap the warmed biscuits in tinfoil, set them beside
John’s thermos, and busy myself with the few dishes left from last
night’s dinner.
John grabs the thermos. “Thanks,” he says and walks toward the
front door, leaving the biscuits sitting on the counter.
He turns his pickup around in the dirt yard and maneuvers out
between the prickly amargosa, driving past the rusting Oldsmobile
parked under the cottonwood tree. He brought it out here a few
months ago and fixed it up pretty good. Taught me how to drive stick
shift in the evenings after work, bouncing the old boat over the sand
hills until the sun got too low and the coyotes came out.
I set the last dish in the rack and open the tinfoil package of bis-
cuits. They are dry and I’m not hungry. If only we had a dog to give
scraps to. One of our dogs got killed by javelinas three months back
and John shot the other one to save him from the same fate. He said
a gun is better protection than a dog any day. He took me out into
the dry creek bed and taught me to shoot the .22 he keeps in the
hall closet. For a moment things felt like they did when we first got
together, before His Beautiful Blood Holiness Church told us they
didn’t want John to be their preacher anymore, before we moved
halfway across the United States. He held his hand over mine and
gripped the gun just like he’d traced my fingers along the pages of
Job and Exodus back in Tennessee. But when I tried to kiss him he
ducked his head away.
On the front stoop, transplanted prickly pear clippings and night-
blooming cereus sit in cut-open milk jugs. I grab my watering canC on f luence
97
from behind the rocking chair and fill it at the side of the house. The
first few months out here my transplanted pansies and mums shriv-
eled to a crisp. I took to looking at a desert plant book from a shop
in Arivaca. I grew what I could.
The perimeter of the yard is outlined in amargosa, creosote, and
ocotillo. Fat red buds nest among the crucifixion thorns of the amar-
gosa at the end of the driveway. Just past the bush, a chaos of foot-
prints spill across the shifting dust of the road. The footprints run all
together, one over another like a cattle trail. Illegals. We live out here
for just this reason. John’s boss owns the house but never comes out.
He used it for a hunting cabin of sorts but then he started finding
evidence of the aliens staying here. Aliens were sleeping in it, coming
across the border in droves and holing up before making the last trek
to Arivaca. He lets us stay for practically no rent, just to keep the il-
legals off his land. Only they don’t stay off. At night their shadow
footsteps surround the house. Most of the time they’re out in fields
beyond the mesquites but sometimes they come right up in the yard.
They’ve got babies with them and old folks sometimes. John sleeps
with his 9 mm on the bedside table.
My eyes search the clumps of buckbrush for movement. They mostly
go by at night, but it worries me some. One time, an illegal came up
out of the bushes once and grabbed my leg as I unloaded groceries
from the truck. He was old, his skin like the leather of a baseball
glove, his small eyes sunken into his skull. He spoke words like the
devil whispering in the trees, and saliva dripped from the corner of his
mouth. John said he probably hadn’t had water in two or three days,
said the rest of his group probably left him. John took him on into
Arivaca to the border patrol office.
The sun sears the skin along the back of my neck. I pick up my
watering can and head back inside to check on my baby. Nathan’s six
years old, but he’s special. Advanced Muscular Dystrophy is the medi-
cal term, but John told me when he was born that it meant we were
blessed, for the meek shall inherit the earth.
Nathan lies in his crib and stares at the ceiling where a water leak
made a tree pattern. I flip the switch, toggle it up and down a few
times, but the light won’t come on.
“Hey buddy,” I call to him, “hang on a second.”98
Mesha Maren
In the kitchen the clock on the coffeemaker does not glow and the
overhead light will not turn on. John must have forgot to pay the bill.
We don’t get mail out here so he pays the bills when he goes through
town. I cross the kitchen and pick up the phone, listen to the steady
rhythm of the dial tone for a minute before deciding not to call. John
hates for me to phone him at work, says it’s embarrassing, says every-
body else’s wife seems to get along fine without calling in grocery
lists every day. Our stove runs off propane and we’ve got a bunch of
candles and one of those old-timey lamps in the closet somewhere.
John can pay up tomorrow.
Nathan lies on his side, face pushed up against the wooden rails of
his crib. I lift him up, kiss his cheek, and carry him to the changing
table. His body is so small and immobile, like the delicate shells the
cicadas leave behind.
“The amargosa’s gonna bloom real soon,” I whisper, “today
maybe.”
He blinks. My finger traces his lips. Nathan rarely smiles.
We spend the morning at the kitchen table. Nathan sits strapped
into his high chair with a plastic bib around his neck while I guide
tiny spoons of applesauce into his mouth. With the electricity out
and all, I plan to go for an easy dinner. Cornbread and beans and
wieners, maybe. I wonder if our money’s run low. John never talks
about money but he works long hours and we hardly spend anything
living out here.
I wipe Nathan’s face, pull a small baseball cap down onto his silky
head, and carry him out front to the amargosa bush. The blood petals
are packed in tiny fists among the thorns. Nathan coos. Among the
roots of the bush two big ants struggle to carry the body of a third.
We sit and watch the funeral procession play out across the miniature
sand dunes.
The sun is too strong, so I carry Nathan inside. Lay him down in
his crib and lay myself on the couch. I should sweep and mop the
floor, should go look for that oil lamp. But I don’t like the sound of
all the quiet, the way the wind rakes the branches across the tin roof
and taps at the windows, so I plug my ears, close my eyes.
The sun has passed the tops of the cottonwoods and mesquites. WithC on f luence
99
the electricity out there’s no way to tell time, but it seems like it must
be past five. John will be home in an hour. I visualize the ingredients
for dinner mixing and preparing themselves.
Nathan sits in his chair with his teddy bears and watches me cook.
By the time the sun sets out the western windows, John is still not
home. By May the sun never sets before seven-thirty. John’s usually
home by six. I light candles in the windows and call the office in
Arivaca, but Agent Malone says John left work early, took off some-
time around four. I hang up the phone and press my forehead against
the wall. My mind goes to the mezcal, the silver bracelet and pretty
hair clip in John’s truck, the dark shadow images of the woman who
might have worn them. My belly moves like it did during my preg-
nancy with Nathan. I push the vague thread of thoughts away and
tell myself he left early to go get groceries and pay the overdue bill,
then the truck broke down and he’s out there working on it, on his
way home soon.
After Nathan goes to sleep, I get the .22 out of the hall closet and
lay on the couch, the gun beside me and my eyes trained on the front
door. The sand slips inside and coyotes bark from the bluff out back.
Our house is a small vessel in a shuddering sea of darkness and wind
and voices I can’t quite make out.
Nathan’s whimpers wake me. My muscles ache and my fingers strug-
gle to unclench their grip on the .22. I stumble into the kitchen,
wiping my eyes, and lift the phone to my ear. No dial tone. Only
empty air. My gut twists. Nathan burbles from the other room but
I can’t go to him. Panic questions fill my mind and Nathan doesn’t
have any answers. I look out the window toward the Oldsmobile.
The day is hot already. The sky is blinding blue and the metal car
door burning to the touch. I duck into the seat, push the key into
the ignition, and turn it. The car coughs and whines, trying faintly
to turn over. I pull the key out and take a deep breath, fit it back
into the ignition and turn again. This time there is no noise at all.
A wave of fear leaps up in me, swells my tongue, and wets my eyes.
My mind skips to John and I don’t even know what lies to tell myself
about him now. I lean back in the seat, push the sweaty hair off my
forehead, close my eyes and picture the cool green of the creek at my100
Mesha Maren
Grandpapa’s house back in Tennessee, the creek that ran down to
the well-house where you could lift the cedar bucket, bring the cold
metal ladle to your lips and drink long swallows with your toes spread
out across the slippery rocks of the well house floor. White hot light
sears my skin through the glass. I get out of the car, leave the door
hanging open and the key in the ignition.
I sit on the couch and watch the shadow of a mesquite tree jump
across the kitchen wall. My eyes follow the line out to the tree and
beyond into the endless landscape. Just where the brown sand meets
the brilliant blue something moves, a flicker of a coyote or a dog or
an illegal. The more my eyes focus on it the more it disappears.
Nathan whines again from the bedroom so I set his breakfast out on
the table and go to fetch him. When it’s just me and Nathan at home,
my mind wanders. The doctor said it’s good to engage him a lot,
but after running through the list of songs and patty-cake games my
mind just wanders. Mostly it doesn’t seem to bother Nathan; he’s an
old soul and he understands me. But sometimes the silence out here
gets so loud. I wish like hell he could talk. With the electricity off,
there isn’t even the radio to listen to. The Gospel Hour out of Tucson
usually comes on at noon. It’s especially for housewives, runs from
twelve to two. They’ve got good songs on there, spirited enough to
make you want to get up and mop the floor.
We stay at the table long after Nathan is done eating. He smears the
applesauce across his cheeks and into his hair. Out the front window a
jackrabbit leaps, then freezes. A vulture hangs motionless amidst the
puffs of clouds. The sun inches along its course across the horizon
and Nathan falls asleep in his high chair, head resting on his shoul-
der. I go to move him, to wipe his face and carry him into his crib,
but my arms are too heavy to lift. The stripes of sunlight on the wall
above the stove move and change color. Must be past two. Gospel
Hour would be over. On a normal day I would turn the radio off and
run a bucket full of suds to mop the kitchen floor. I can almost see
myself doing it. Mopping and drying, pulling potatoes out of the bin
and chicken breasts out of the freezer.C on f luence
101
* * *
The bedroom closet is a jigsaw puzzle of cardboard boxes and suit-
cases. I pull open five containers before finding the lamp. On my way
out I pass the bedside table and stop. John’s 9 mm is gone and his
wedding ring lies in its place.
My throat constricts. I turn on my heel, cross the room, and jerk
the top bureau drawer open. My eyes search for the gold gleam of
John’s granddaddy’s pocket watch, but there is only a nest of hand-
kerchiefs with a small coil of money inside. Three twenty-dollar bills
curled in a circle like a snake. I let myself go, dropping down onto
the floor. The bureau drawer forms a roof above my head. I try to
concentrate but my mind keeps bouncing, keeps mixing up images of
silver bracelets and pink hair clips and the twenty-five miles of sand
and chaparral that separate me from civilization.
Nathan moans. My fingers press flat against the floorboards till my
knuckles turn white.
On the third day a river forms, spreading out from the Deepfreeze
and into the hall. I pull up the lid, stare for a moment at the mound
of thawing chicken, hamburger, ribs, and pork butt, then snap the
top closed. Out the window the amargosa bush shakes in the wind,
its blood blossoms spread wide open.
Nathan is already awake, so I lift him from his bed and bring him
outside in his pajamas. The bush trembles with the faint fluttering
motion of hundreds of small brown moths. Ignoring the growing
heat, they hover and descend among the clusters of red petals and
yellow stamens. We sit down in the buckbrush and watch the quiv-
ering amargosa while the sun burns strong and stretches shadows
across the sand.
When Nathan pants and sweat drips down his forehead, we head
inside. I set him on the kitchen floor with two stuffed bears for com-
pany and turn the oven on. We cook all through the afternoon and
as I lift the last burger out of the frying pan the sun dips behind the
amargosa. A rush of deep orange through tangled blossoms.
Nathan is busy devouring his teddy bear.
“You hungry, buddy?” I ask him, pointing to the towering stack of
meat. Nathan can’t eat meat. He can’t chew good enough.
The kitchen grows thick with shadows. I pull the glass dome off the102
Mesha Maren
oil lamp and twist the wick up. Oily smoke curls into the darkening
air. There’s not a whole lot of fuel in it, but it’ll do for a while. The
room smells rich with meat, but the thought of eating makes me sick.
“Well, we won’t go hungry,” I say to Nathan.
The lamp on the windowsill turns the glass into a funhouse mirror,
reflecting and distorting my sunburnt face. Over the regular pattern
of night noises, the rhythm of crickets and katydids, comes the soft
yet undeniable sound of footsteps and the whimper cry of a baby. I
reach for the lamp, ready to extinguish it. But the silence of the house
has grown so heavy that these strange human rustlings don’t scare
me like they once did.
A knock sounds out sharp against the wood of the front door.
There is a pause and then the sound comes again over the back-
ground of shuffling feet and whispering voices. I gather Nathan and
his bear up into my arms and cross to the front door. The metal knob
is cold in my palm as I open it.
A man stares up at me with dark diamond eyes. His right hand is
raised, ready for another knock. Behind him crowd five others. An
older woman, three teenage boys and a mother with a baby tied to
her back. They look worn out and used up. They’ve become a part
of the desert, shifting sand people. Fear darts across their faces like a
bird in a house.
The man says something, and his words come out all jumbled up
and unintelligible. I squeeze Nathan. The man’s words mean noth-
ing to me and he has not taken a step back; in fact he leans his stocky
body forward into the frame of the door, nearly touching my elbow.
There is a form like the curve of a pistol butt below his cotton T-shirt,
tucked into the waistband of his pants. He says the words again,
raises his right hand in a drinking motion, and lifts an empty milk
jug up toward my face.
“Oh . . . water,” I say, “you all need water.”
My relief at the simplicity of their request is so complete that I turn
quickly toward the kitchen, leaving the door open. The man enters
with me and my stomach flips but I keep walking. The others follow
us inside, each carrying an empty milk jug.
In the kitchen the smell of the meat hits me full in the face. If theyC on f luence
103
need water they are probably starving too. John has told me how they
lose their way sometimes, wander for days with no food or water. I
set Nathan in his high chair and point to the kitchen sink. They line
up quietly. The first man fills his jug halfway and then steps aside and
empties it down his throat in vicious audible gulps. The baby begins
to fuss and the mother passes her jug to the older woman and shifts
the child from her back to her chest. No one breathes a word but
their eyes jump to the plate of meat on the counter.
“Do you all wanna eat?” I point to the platter.
The man who knocked looks up at me and mumbles more foreign
words. I pull a stack of plates down out of the cupboard and set them
beside the food.
“Go on,” I say, “eat.”
And the Mexicans eat, right there at my kitchen table. The mother
shifts her baby from her chest to her back, tightening the blanket in a
knot between her breasts. I wonder if I could carry Nathan that way.
He’s bigger but he doesn’t weigh much. While the Mexicans eat, I go
to the hall closet, pull a sheet out and tear it down the middle with
my teeth. Hold the larger half up to my body and drape it around
my shoulder. I can’t let the only humans I’ve seen in three days go
and leave me alone again. If we walk at night the sun won’t hurt
Nathan. The more of us there are, the less the coyotes and javelinas
will bother us. We can’t walk twenty-five miles in one night, but
there must be shade someplace where we can wait the day out. I have
no plan beyond arriving in Arivaca. The full fear of waiting out here
alone blooms open in my chest and leaves me breathless.
The kitchen is full of the clang of forks and strange voices. I fill
an empty gallon jug for myself, wrap the rest of the meat in tinfoil,
and put it in a grocery bag. The head man stands and the others
rise with him. There is no way to tell them that I am coming along.
The mother is last in line. She turns and smiles at me and I hold up
the ripped sheet, point to Nathan and then back toward myself. She
wrinkles up her nose with laughter but helps me all the same. She
bends me over and sets Nathan on my back. His knobby knees fit on
either side of my spine, curled up just like when he was inside me. The
mother pulls the sheet tight across my chest and laughs once more104
Mesha Maren
then waves good-bye. Shaking my head, I look back at the kitchen
table filled with scattered dishes. My mind glances lightly over John,
wondering if he will recant and come back looking. A part of me
itches to leave his three twenty-dollar bills there on the table. But I’m
not stupid; we’ll need food and bus tickets. I blow out the lantern
and the room goes dark as a river at night.
Outside, the sky is so full of stars there is hardly any space be-
tween them. The milk jug pulls painfully at my fingers. The weight
of Nathan presses down on my shoulder blade and my mind goes to
the ants under the amargosa, struggling across the sand.
The Mexicans form a line behind the man and I step in place at the
end after the mother. She looks back over her shoulder and wrinkles
her forehead. She says something to the woman in front of her who
sends the message up the line. When the man in front hears, he steps
out, putting his hand up to halt us all. He walks back toward me,
shouting. His words are jumbled up but his intention is clear. He’s
a short man, comes only to my nose, but he is strong and angry like
some enraged animal, all muscle and shout. My heart leaps inside my
ribs but I do not step back. I will not stay out here alone.
The man’s teeth flash in the moonlight as he bellows and points
toward the house. My eyes glance away across the yard to the shadow
shape of the amargosa, filled now with more moths, white ones and
dark ones, swarming so that the blossoms are almost invisible. His
breath feels hot on my neck. He sounds like he is speaking in tongues
the way they did at the revivals back in Tennessee. My fingers grip
tight to the milk jug and I pretend it is the Lord’s words he is bur-
bling and not the Devil’s. The man kicks sand at me. I move closer
to the mother. He spits at my feet but turns then and marches back
to the front of the line. The mother glances over her shoulder and
her mouth twists into a tiny smile. My feet fit into the tracks of the
six who walk before me. I follow them through the dark and my eyes
trace their soft shapes against all that desert and all that sky.13.
Djeser Djeseru (Splendor of Splendors)
by Paula Younger
At Luxor’s airport, Patty panics about corrupt taxi drivers until she
sees a man holding a Thomas Cook sign with her name. Tufts of
black chest hair poke out from his thin dress shirt. The right amount:
manly but not apelike. She greets him with a simple “sabah” instead
of the full hissing/gargling of “sabah el-kheir,” a sound that must be
similar to a snake choking on a sock.
He shakes her hand like a Westerner instead of kissing her cheek
like an Egyptian. “I am Hossam. Nice to meet you, Batty.” Just like
the seminarians, unable to say Ps. He leads her to his white Peugeot in
his flat leather sandals, the type that don’t give support or protection.
Patty heads for the back of Hossam’s car, but he says, “Sit up front.
Keep me company.”
She doesn’t have to keep playing the part of consecrated virgin,
as the seminarians called her. During her two months of teaching
English at the Coptic Catholic seminary, she kept her divorce and
former married status tucked away. But she is in Luxor now, on vaca-
tion after all, eager to play the part of tourist, and a tourist wouldn’t
know better.
Patty moves to unroll her window, but no knob. The heat begins
in her head and then flows over her chest. She dabs the sweat off
with a bandana. Forty-five and already suffering from menopause.
The end of her marriage and reproductive life happened the same106
Paula Younger
summer. Patty eyes the air-conditioning switch and then, miracu-
lously, Hossam turns it on. Her first car in Egypt with working air-
conditioning and a driver willing to use it; the rest swear it makes
them sick.
Hossam says, “You are a good woman, I can tell.” She asks how.
He says, “Your clothes are respectful.”
“You can hardly tell that from clothes.” Patty’s tank top clings to
her stomach, hidden beneath her long-sleeved cotton top, part of her
conservative clothing arsenal.
He raises an eyebrow. “You are not good?”
“Oh, I’m good.” And she laughs at how ludicrous she sounds. Her
sexual experience is limited to one man before her marriage, an un-
fortunate effect of her Catholic upbringing and inability to have sex
without attachment. Those two men in her past work out to one man
every thirteen adult years.
Hossam glances at the ring on her left hand. “You have husband?”
Patty explains that she wears it to keep men from bothering her.
Sexual harassment has no age restrictions in Egypt, and the attention
both thrills and disgusts her. Her real wedding ring is tucked in her
underwear drawer at her house in San Diego. When she returns, her
ex-husband will still be living in a downtown loft with the Brazilian,
who is about to pop out his spawn. He probably married her by now,
but Patty stopped reading his emails weeks ago.
“You are very pretty not to be married.”
Patty scans Hossam’s wrist, no cross tattoo. She asks, “Are you
Muslim?”
“We all believe in Abraham’s God.”
At least his religion accepts divorce. She admits, “My husband left
me.” She feels lighter sharing that information. The seminarians and
priests would have asked too many questions that require complex
answers, not simple parsed-out English.
Hossam asks, “Any children?”
Patty shakes her head and rests a hand against her flat stomach.
“You don’t want children?”
“Of course I do, but my husband didn’t.”
“Husband bad man. Against will of God to deny children. Pur-D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
107
pose of marriage is children.” Hossam gives her a grazing look, un-
usual for an Egyptian man introduced to a woman. Patty likes it. He
says, “You must have married young. My mother married when she
was fifteen.”
“Something like that.” Patty believed that within her first year of
marriage she would have a child like her mother did. Patty wanted
three, a good number. She keeps mum about the new phase in her
life. She hasn’t told her mother and sisters yet, unwilling to feel like
a failure now that the fires of menopause have scorched her eggs and
left behind a barren desert. Patty should have at least had a daughter,
some companionship insurance. She could have been in college by
now. An art major, or some sort of degree that would cause Patty to
worry that her daughter wouldn’t be able to find a job, but would
help with traveling. She would know different dynasties, art periods,
and symbolism. She might even fall in love with a handsome young
Egyptian man and become fluent in Arabic.
To steer the conversation away from her, Patty asks, “Do you have
children?”
“A boy. Fever kill him. Then wife leave.”
“Asif,” Patty trips over her answer and adds, “asif gedan.” But
Egyptians don’t say “sorry” when hearing bad news. They say some-
thing about God and praying, like most Egyptian sayings, whether
the person is Christian or Muslim. Patty learned a curse that trans-
lates to “may God destroy your house.”
Hossam says, “Insha ’Allah will give me pretty, good wife again.”
“I’m sure He will.”
Along the road is a Mubarak billboard, the thirteenth one that
Patty has seen. Outdated pictures of him in a wide-lapel suit and
sideburns are planted all over Egypt. Patty has a set of photographs of
herself standing beneath Mubarak billboards, but after a month the
novelty turned into an annoyance. She resents the all-seeing, judging
Mubarak clinging to his youthful image and power. Twenty-seven
years under emergency rule should be enough for anyone.
Hossam asks, “You like Luxor?”
“It’s beautiful.”
Cruise ships with names like Nile Goddess and Alexander the Great108
Paula Younger
crowd the river’s banks. Westerners and Egyptians walk along the
Nile’s elegant corniche. For this one week, Patty wants to shed her
layers and join the other Western women in their sundresses and
shorts. After this trip, Patty will visit her favorite seminarian and his
family in his village, where she will redon her conservative clothes
and careful behavior, and sleep on another rock-hard mattress and
rectangular pillow in another hot room while his family squashes
together to make room for her.
Hossam pulls up to the Iberotel. Patty suffered biting ants, beans
for breakfast, and no air-conditioning at the seminary. But the Ibero-
tel’s brochure promises a pool that floats on a barge in the Nile,
omelet station, soft pillows, and “il-hamdu lillah,” air-conditioning.
Patty visualizes lounging next to the pool, unfortunately in her con-
servative, skirted swimming suit, the one she wore to the Red Sea
with the seminarians, but better than the alternative of the burqini
or wading in full-veiled clothing. Also in Patty’s suitcase is a red sun-
dress that she brought, just in case.
Cramped shops selling hieroglyphic rulers and evil-eye necklaces
flank the hotel’s skinny marble entrance. The bellboy, an older man
with a hunched back, takes her suitcase from the trunk. Patty pulls
out her wallet to tip him when a man in a Bob Marley T-shirt asks,
“Want a felucca ride?” Another man with a silvery beard suggests
a ride in his buggy and then points to his horse, “He is strong and
good.” A woman wearing mesmerizing green eye shadow descends
on Patty and says, “Madame should come for sugaring. It’s better
than waxing, less painful. Makes skin nice and smooth, good for
touching.” She rubs her forearm as evidence. The hawkers pin Patty
next to the Peugeot. She clutches her wallet to her chest. Arabic ex-
plodes around her.
Hossam starts yelling, probably bringing shame into it—the magic
word to use against all Egyptian men. The people start to disband
and Hossam apologizes for their impolite behavior.
A man in a gray galabaiya, a traditional robe that looks like a bland
muumuu, walks by and leers, “Want an Egyptian husband?”
“Fil mish mish,” Patty replies. She doesn’t understand how “fil mish
mish” translates to “in your dreams” when mish mish is an apricot.D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
109
Hossam claps his hands and grins. “Ah, you Egyptian woman. Fil
mish mish. Very good.”
His lips might taste like the salty Mediterranean Sea. Patty imag-
ines him as someone ancient, one of St. Mark’s descendants before
St. Augustine infected the Church with his views on sex, before the
Catholic Church even existed, a time when most Egyptians were
Christians in defiance of Rome. But Hossam is Muslim, part of an-
other culture, another conquest. It must be impossible to have a sin-
gular identity when your country has been repeatedly conquered.
The abrasive desert where Persian armies disappeared in sandstorms
kept Egyptians huddled to the one water source that flows south to
north, bringing people to Egypt, but rarely out of it. Even Cleopatra
was Greek.
First on Patty’s list is Hatshepsut’s Temple, site of Egypt’s first female
pharaoh, whose reign, like Patty’s marriage, lasted for twenty-one
years. The sun beats down on the dusty earth. Hossam wears a red
baseball cap with an awkwardly stitched NY, as if someone unsure
of English letters had created it. His mustache shades his thick lips,
unlike her ex’s spotty facial hair.
Patty gives Hossam four hundred pounds, eighty dollars, and says,
“For tickets today.” She was told to sneak money to her guide, be-
cause it’s shameful for a woman to pay.
Hossam hands her tickets at the entrance and says, “I wait.”
“You’re not going with me?”
He tsk-tsks her. “I driver, not guide. Other sites, yes. But this one
is too important.”
“I thought you were a driver and a guide.”
“No one is a driver and a guide.”
“Come with me. I’ll pay you to be my guide.”
“They think I take business from guides. They ask for license. Just
driver. I study engineering, not tourism.”
“You went to college?”
“University. My friend Mahmoud,” Hossam waves at another
mustached man standing next to another white Peugeot, “is a social
worker. No jobs in Egypt. Some go to Gulf to work.” Hossam hands110
Paula Younger
her a bottle of water and adds, “Be careful. Wear your hat. Take care
of your pretty white skin.”
Hossam returns to his car, about to become a roasting tin can. The
temple is a three-level structure carved out of the base of a limestone
cliff, looking ’70s modernist in its simplicity. Patty gets on the shut-
tle and hands over her ticket that cost twenty-five pfisters, five cents.
Everyone has to be paid and tipped, even for distances that would
take a ten-minute walk. At the airport, a man’s job was to push the
button to lift the parking arm.
Patty tries to read her guidebook on the first terrace of the temple,
but one of the guards grabs her arm and says, “Madame, here. Look
here.” He lifts up a red rope to let her into a cordoned-off area. She
backs away, unwilling to damage thousands of years of history for
her own gratification. He sticks his hand out, palm up, and flexes his
fingers repeatedly, as if to say, “gimmee gimmee.”
Guides lead Italian and Spanish tour groups unmolested, but each
part of the temple lands Patty into a section of baksheesh-seeking
men who are supposed to guard the sites but instead subsidize their
measly pay by opening restricted areas. Clusters of guides hang out
in the front, but they look shifty. Hossam should have entered the
temple with her, even if he would have broken some driver/guide
rule. After all, she’s paying.
Patty hears a slip of English, blessed English. A short Egyptian
guide leads a British man with bursts of red in his hair along the
temple’s lower terrace. Patty lags behind. Her water bottle is danger-
ously low. She should have brought a Camelbak like her ex suggested.
The guide points out the gaps where Hatshepsut’s images and
cartouches were chiseled off the temple’s limestone walls. Many of
her statues were torn down and smashed or disfigured before being
buried in a pit, and the official history was rewritten without her.
Still, in some places, especially ones outside the line of sight, her
image remains.
Patty asks, “How could they erase her like that?”
The Brit turns around. “Quite fantastic, don’t you think?”
Patty says, “If her reign had been filled with wars and economic
disaster, they would have left her image up so everyone would re-
member a failed female pharaoh.”D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
111
The guide says, “That’s just an opinion,” then turns his back to
Patty.
The men walk up to the middle terrace. Patty follows. The guide
keeps looking back and begins to walk faster. But the Brit stops and
asks, “Are you here alone?”
Patty nods, hoping she doesn’t appear too pathetic.
“Brave to be wandering here without a guide, especially as a
woman.”
“Or dumb. I hired a driver but not a guide.”
“I did the opposite. I figured I could walk, but not read my guide-
book and fend off these hooligans.”
Patty introduces herself and learns the Brit’s name is Edmond.
The guide points to Edmond and says, “I call him Khwaga. It’s a
better fit.” The Egyptian equivalent of gringo.
She asks him, “Esmak eh?” Proud that she knows how to ask
‘what’s your name?’
“Ashraf.” He has the familiar cross tattoo on his wrist. But unlike
the seminarians, he doesn’t have a mustache.
Patty asks, “Are you Coptic Catholic?”
Ashraf wags his finger. “No no. Coptic Orthodox.”
Pope Shenouda declared that a Coptic Orthodox woman would be
better off marrying a Muslim man than a Coptic Catholic, the ulti-
mate insult. The seminarians complained about the pope betraying
his Christian brothers and Patty reminded them they follow the pope
in Rome, not the one in Alexandria. Still, rejection from a minority
must be humiliating, like wandering around a Middle Eastern coun-
try alone as a divorced, childless, barren, middle-aged woman.
Edmond says, “Please join us. We wouldn’t be gentlemen if we left
you alone in the desert fighting off baksheesh-seeking men.”
Ashraf stiffens until Patty announces, “I’ll pay too.”
He leads the tour again, slowing down, answering questions,
hoping for a larger tip. Ashraf says, “Hatshepsut called this place
Djeser Djeseru, Splendor of Splendors. It also translates to Holiest of
Holies. Splendor and holy can have the same meaning.”
Edmond looks at the topless men in kilts carved into the temple
wall and says, “Back then they knew how to dress in this infernal
heat.”112
Paula Younger
Ashraf points to a cow with a sun disc between its horns. The cow
smiles coyly, as if it is the original Mona Lisa. He says, “The God-
dess Hathor symbolizes love, sexuality, and motherhood. Egyptians
believe no woman is truly a woman until she has a child.”
Patty’s body probably reeks of infertility, a smell she imagines as a
musty basement. She dabs her forehead. “Why does she have to be a
cow? Rabbits are known for their fertility.”
Edmond says, “But cows are mighty. A rabbit goddess could be
squashed.”
At the center of the middle terrace Ashraf announces, “This is
where they died.”
“Who?”
His English slips and his “tourists” sounds like “terrorists.” “Gov-
ernment calls it ‘the accident.’ Ten years ago, terrorists dressed like
security and killed sixty-three people. They still remember that day.”
Ashraf points to men waiting on the cliffs, ready to offer donkey and
camel rides to tourists hiking from the Valley of the Kings over to
Hatshepsut’s Temple.
After Patty mailed the divorce papers and announced her travel
plans, her ex sent articles about tourists attacked in Egypt. A mother
covered her daughter with her body to protect her, but they both
died. Patty imagines being pinned between the pillars as security
guards fired into the group of tourists. She almost expects someone
to come running down the cliff and end her life. What would her
ex do when he received the news? Would he name his baby after
her? Patty rubs her flat belly, wondering if she had a daughter if she
would have sacrificed herself too. Each year she told herself that her
ex would change his mind, that all men at some point want to have
children, although she believed it a little less each time, especially
when he called children “small people with needs.”
Edmond touches her arm. “Don’t worry. That was the last major
attack here. Just stay out of Sharm el-Sheikh.”
Ashraf points behind one of the main temple doors and says,
“Senenmut designed and built this temple, as well as Luxor and
Karnak. Many people believe he was Hatshepsut’s lover. He was too
low in society to marry her, so he ruled through her bed. In her tomb,
men carved sex acts between them. He did great things for Egypt.”D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
113
Patty’s shoulders tense. “She didn’t need a man. She made herself
one.” She points to the statue’s slender arms and rounded breasts,
which contrast with the pointy beard. Maybe some of Hatshepsut’s
powers will seep into Patty through the three-thousand-year-old
sandstone. Hatshepsut didn’t bear a son, but instead of being rel-
egated to a favored second wife after her husband’s death, she made
herself co-regent for her stepson and took power. She was too busy
bringing prosperity to her people to cry over dried up eggs and
whether a man wanted her or not.
Patty asks Ashraf if he lives in Luxor.
He frowns. “No, no. Cairo. It’s a much better city.”
“But Luxor is cleaner than Cairo, and prettier.”
“Yes, but it’s boring. Not for tourism, of course. There are many
wonderful sights and tourists who love them, but Cairo is for Egyp-
tians.”
Traffic laws seem to exist in Luxor and there are fewer donkey pull-
carts along the road than in Cairo. Trash is properly concealed instead
of piled along roads or in massive roadside dumps. The sky looks wider
and bluer without high-rises blocking it. So different from Cairo’s over-
loaded city, where iron rods poke out of incomplete concrete buildings,
waiting for the next level that won’t come, where people live on roofs
with goats and no ceilings because its owners are skirting the tax laws.
Luxor is a tourist mecca, too important for the government to allow its
skyline to be marred with incomplete buildings. The land of the dead
attracts plenty of the living.
At the end of their tour, Edmond mentions he is also staying at the
Iberotel. Patty asks Ashraf if he is a guest there too. His face darkens.
Edmond explains, “We can’t stay at the same place. The nice hotels
worry about prostitution. They see a Western and Egyptian man to-
gether, and they assume.”
Edmond and Ashraf stand close together, their bodies loose and
comfortable. Men hold hands with their male friends in Egypt and
kiss their cheeks. Affection within the same sex is allowed in public,
and Patty admires that. Still, they look too comfortable. Patty says,
“But homosexuality is illegal here.”
Ashraf wags his finger. “You should not use that word. That’s
worse than cursing someone’s mother.”114
Paula Younger
Edmond smiles. “Sometimes things are more accessible because
they’re taboo.” He explains that in Egypt, if a man is the giver, he’s
not considered homosexual. Some see it as a way for men to satisfy
their desires until they can afford to marry, which may take years or
never happen. But these poor men have sex drives and good women
remain virgins until marriage to maintain their family’s honor. What’s
a man to do?
Ashraf adds, “Our government makes us scrounge from tourists.”
He glances at Edmond and adds, “Too many poor people and too
many khawagaat.”
“Please, I just cut hair.”
Edmond’s skin is turning pink. He should have worn a hat. Ashraf
suggests waiting at a restaurant until the temperature cools, then
walking back to the ferry landing where boats take people from the
west, the land of the dead, to the east, the land of the living. Patty
offers them a ride with her and Hossam.
They walk the gauntlet of aggressive shopkeepers when Hossam
appears from one of the stalls with a sealed bottle of relatively cold
water. “You must drink,” he says and hands the bottle to Patty. She
gulps it. He gives a polite hello to Edmond and Ashraf, and ma feesh
mushkila, no problem, about giving them a ride. Hossam grabs Pat-
ty’s hand and leads her through the shopkeeper onslaught. His hand
is surprisingly soft. Most Egyptian husbands and wives don’t hold
hands or touch each other in public.
She says, “Hatshepsut was a smart woman.”
“She was good leader. Women wise, not snake. Many men think
woman has two face, cause of sin and evil in world. They forget
woman is the mother, the sister, the friend, source of love and emo-
tions.”
He’s probably saying it for a larger baksheesh, but it’s worth it to
hear feminist words emerge from an Egyptian man’s mouth. Some
of the seminarians would say woman is the temptress for men, the
reason for original sin. Others seemed too interested in women. One
night after dinner, Patty’s favorite seminarian invited her on their
usual walk. He bought her the requisite drink, a pineapple Fanta, de-
spite her preference for water, which he deemed not special enough.D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
115
He asked how could he become a celibate priest when he doesn’t
know what he is giving up, but then stopped and said, “Aye, but I
forget. You are the consecrated virgin.” She almost told him about
sex and her ex-husband. Instead, Patty hugged him. His hand grazed
the side of her breast. He gave her a suggestive look and she knew
he was hoping she would sleep with him. And she felt gratitude.
This young man, boy really, was twenty years her junior and wanted
her. She imagined sneaking him into her room, but hers was situ-
ated between the other female teachers; the section the seminarians
dubbed the haremlik. She dismissed it as a silly, momentary thought.
Still, she couldn’t help but look at the seminarians’ young bodies and
think they were the type of men for her—nice and brown with just
the right amount of facial hair.
Hossam strokes Patty’s index finger. Because of sexuality taboos,
Egypt feels a little more romantic. Each glance, each movement, car-
ries more meaning and intention.
At the car, Patty heads for the front seat when Ashraf says, “No,
no. Disreputable women sit in front. Good women sit in back. It’s not
right to be next to a man unless he is your husband.”
Away from the seminary two days and she’s already the bad woman
in Egypt. She slides into the back. Hossam blasts the air-conditioning.
It cools her skin as another rush of heat starts from her head. She
mops her forehead with her bandana, hoping the men don’t notice.
They cross the bridge to the eastern side and Edmond asks why
she’s traveling alone. She tells the tired story about her ex-husband.
He says, “The bastard.” She loves his immediate allegiance. She asks
how he knows Ashraf. Edmond is a hairdresser who travels to Egypt
once a month. He has wealthy oil clients and likes to spend his free
time soaking up the sun and sights. Ashraf is the nephew of one of
his top clients, and a licensed tour guide. Edmond helps Ashraf with
his English and Ashraf helps Edmond make the most of his trips. Life
is much cheaper, and more pleasurable, in Luxor than in England.
Patty asks Ashraf, “Have you been to England?”
“I will.” No insha ’Allah. The first Egyptian man she met who
doesn’t make his future plans dependent on God.
Edmond asks, “Any interest in joining forces? My tour guide for116
Paula Younger
your driver? You can play the part of my wife. We could be downright
respectable and have two children at university.”
Ashraf says, as if to prove his worth, “Luxor’s name in Arabic is
El-Qosor. It means the palaces.” The baksheesh she gave him must
have been big.
Patty asks Hossam if it would be okay with him.
“If it makes you happy. Ente mab sota?”
Patty agrees, relieved not to be traveling alone. But outside the
Iberotel, Hossam watches as Edmond walks inside and asks, “Can
you trust him? He might have bad ideas.” Patty assures Hossam that
she is not Edmond’s type.
During their second round of drinks at the Iberotel’s lounge that
night, Edmond tells Patty, “Well-done with Hossam. I like the gruff,
manly type.” Patty protests, but Edmond insists, “You’re a dream
come true for many Egyptian men. You’re well-preserved.”
Patty raises her glass. “Thanks to power walking and yoga.”
Hossam could be a possibility. Someone she wouldn’t have to see
again. She says, “He studied engineering. Such a waste that he shut-
tles people around.”
“It’s best to focus on the sights.”
“Are you going to help Ashraf move to England?”
Edmond glances at his scotch. “I pay him plenty. In a few years
he’ll be able to marry. That’s what they all want.”
Before falling asleep that night, Patty prays to Hatshepsut, thank-
ing her for the gift of companionship.
The next few days Hossam, Edmond, Patty, and Ashraf take turns
playing photographer, memorializing themselves at the various sites
of the dead. Each morning Patty gives Hossam money for the day. He
buys her water and food, and doesn’t give change.
At the Tombs of the Nobles they walk among closed graves, littered
with dust and rocks. Squat concrete houses blend into the limestone
hillsides above. Hossam searches for someone to open the tombs
while Patty, Edmond, and Ashraf take refuge from the sun under
a storefront’s abandoned canopy. Their newest guide insists he lead
the tour. He makes a show of pointing out each loose rock and step,D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
117
but in the Tomb of Userhat he holds up a jagged mirror to illuminate
the artwork with reflected sunlight, just like the ancients did, and
temporarily blinds Patty. Hossam steadies her and lectures the man
about his carelessness. After that, Ashraf resumes the lead, making a
show of correcting the man on time periods. Hossam holds Patty’s
hand to ensure her safety. In the tomb of Ramose, Hossam looks at
the image of swaying mourners and begins to sing, a throaty type of
warbling that sounds thousands of years old. Patty leans against him.
When their foursome begins to leave a group of boys come run-
ning out with trails of postcard collections flapping behind them.
Hossam buys Patty two sets. Instead of the standard Egyptian nom
bad el dohr, an afternoon nap, Patty, Edmond, Ashraf, and Hossam
plunge into the next places on their list. Hossam carries Patty’s water
and sunblock. His eyes flick over her, watching for signs of amuse-
ment or exhaustion, but looks away whenever she dabs her forehead
with her bandana. Each day he wears his faded black chinos. Good
Egyptian cotton is exported; the dregs are left for its people. Patty
wishes she had a pair of nice linen pants to give him.
In Deir el-Medina, the Workers’ Village, Hossam walks ahead and
advises Patty when to watch her step. He offers his hand for steep
descents. Most ancient Egyptians lived on the east side of the Nile,
where the sun rises and life begins, but the men who created the royal
tombs and artwork in the Valley of the Kings were sentenced to live
and die here with their families to keep the tomb locations secret.
Every two weeks they received supplies of wheat, beer, onions, dried
meat and fish, equal to the price of a bull. In their free time, the
workers created their own tombs and artwork, scenes of family life
and lovemaking. Hossam holds Patty’s hand and says, “This is greater
than any royal tomb.” She squeezes in agreement and stares straight
ahead at the scene of a husband and wife in supplication to Nut, the
tree goddess, while their bountiful children stand behind them.
Patty takes a picture of a shrub with bright pink flowers. Hossam
asks her what is so special. She says, “There are flowers growing in
the desert.”
He kisses her hand. “Many things bloom in the desert.” Her hand
warms beneath his lips.118
Paula Younger
Ashraf takes her aside and warns, “He is a driver and a Muslim. Be
careful about encouraging him.”
But Patty likes the way Hossam looks at her as if she is special, not
a lower-paid second-grade teacher. She spent too many years craning
her neck up at her college professor husband, forgetting that at one
time they had been equal college students, even forgetting that she
supported them while he studied for his master’s and then PhD.
At the Colossi of Memnon, Ashraf stays inside the car blasting the
air conditioner while Patty, Hossam, and Edmond wander around
the gigantic, faceless statues. Edmond jokes about what other type of
colossi the statues must have had. A young policeman leans against
the giant statue’s toes and his rifle is slouched across his chest as use-
lessly as a beauty pageant sash. Hossam talks to him but keeps watch
over Patty. A little girl follows her selling handmade dolls with vacant
eyes for five pounds. Hossam buys two for forty pounds. He shoves
the scrawny straw dolls into Patty’s hand and then grabs her camera.
As if on cue, the girl latches on to Patty’s thigh. On their way out,
the young policeman points to a blond European couple kissing. The
woman’s shorts barely cover the tops of her pasty thighs. The police-
man asks Patty, “Why do Westerners like to make sex in front of us?”
Each night Patty and Hossam part ways with Edmond and Ashraf.
Hossam hires private feluccas to ride down the black Nile lit by the
moon, and to take Patty across to the western side, where the Thebes
necropolis waits and where Hossam lives. At the different local res-
taurants, Patty feels like he is splurging on her, then remembers the
large amount of money she hands him each morning and the change
he doesn’t give her. Each night ends on the Sheraton hotel’s rooftop
bar, where Hossam drinks at least three beers, odd for a Muslim man.
On the fifth night, Hossam takes Patty to Sofra, a restaurant in the
backstreets of Luxor. It’s filled with foreigners and carved wooden
furniture, inlaid with hundreds of iridescent mother-of-pearl pieces.
Hossam and Patty sit on the rooftop terrace, the night still heavy
with heat from the day. Patty wears her just-in-case red sundress, feel-
ing naked without sleeves, but sexy too. Hossam tells her, “You look
like the goddess Isis.” He offers her a gift: an ankh pendant, a sign
of everlasting life. He clasps the chain around her neck. His breathD je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
119
caresses her shoulders. Patty rubs the ankh, feeling part of something
ancient, enjoying the surprise even though she gave him five hundred
pounds that morning. He orders their meal and a sheesha, flavored
apple. The waiter sets the tall water pipe in front of Hossam, the
spiraled glass a delicious ruby red. It feels decadent to smoke before
eating, and careless too.
Patty clasps her lips around the reed’s plastic end. She sucks in, but
nothing happens.
Hossam says, “You try too hard. Look like you play flute.”
She relaxes and the smoke glides through her mouth and out her
nose like a dragon.
Hossam smiles. “You pro.”
A familiar buzz settles in, reminding her of when she would smoke
pot with her ex. Patty’s head floats. She asks, “What type of engineer-
ing did you study?”
“Electric. Egypt’s electricity is very bad. I want to help my village,
but I do not have government friends or money for baksheesh. But I
have a car and license, so driver is good.”
“Why don’t you become a tour guide?”
He taps his chest. “Too old for school. Too much money. People
need drivers.”
The candle flickers on the table. She puts her hand on Hossam’s
knee, a bold move, especially in a public setting. His thigh tenses
beneath the thin cotton. “What I really want to know is, how does
‘mish mish’ translate to ‘your dreams’ when it means apricot?”
Hossam scoots a little closer. “Sweets are important because we
have them so little. They are special and rare, like you.”
Through the restaurant’s speakers, a woman’s throaty voice sings
in Arabic. The melody makes Patty feel as if a beautiful moment is
happening and ending at the same time.
She says, “I love this song,” and fixes her eyes on Hossam.
He leans in. “This song by Fairuz. Beautiful Lebanese singer. She
sings: Visit me once a year, just don’t forget me, I fear that love would
come in a glimpse and go.” His words sound smooth and big for
him, rehearsed even, but, Patty tells herself, sincerity isn’t necessary
for romance.120
Paula Younger
Around the room other foreign women breathe in sheesha or eat a
decadent meal, some with their boyfriends or husbands, others with
Egyptians, but they fade into the dark lighting and it feels like it is
just Patty and Hossam.
His hand brushes along her bicep. The hairs on her arms stand on
end. He says, “First time I saw you, I feel I know you before, from
years ago. You are the moon.” The compliment rests on her shoul-
ders. To say a woman is the moon means she is the embodiment of
perfect beauty and femininity.
Patty recites a silent prayer to Hatshepsut that she doesn’t embar-
rass herself, then says, “If anything happens, it won’t mean anything.”
He says, “I know this.” The desert inside her stirs, turning into
something lush and filled with splendor.
Patty says, “It doesn’t mean anything,” a couple more times as
they walk back to Hossam’s apartment, a slinky bounce to her step,
as if she is wearing high heels instead of flat sandals. She says it once
again when she steps inside his concrete walls, bare except for a poster
of a red racing car. She says it once again when she sees an inferior
Egyptian condom in Hossam’s hand and wonders why he has one
anyway. But, she reminds herself, he is Muslim and he probably hasn’t
slept with anyone other than his wife and he thinks she’s beautiful
and this is just a fling.
Patty wants to rest, but Hossam’s twin bed doesn’t have the space or
the spring. So few things are soft in Egypt, no wonder people spend
most of their time socializing along the Nile’s corniche, next to the
water and away from their concrete homes. At Patty’s house in San
Diego, and it is her house now thanks to the divorce settlement, she
has rooms she forgets to use, a plush sectional, and sheets with a
twelve hundred thread count. Her ex declared traveling too much of
a hassle and spent their extra savings on a home theater, an outdoor
living room with a privacy fence, and a king-sized mattress adjustable
on each side so that they wouldn’t have to agree on the firmness.
A home so comfortable he couldn’t feel comfortable anywhere else.
The Brazilian’s loft better be minimalist, with uncomfortable boxy
furniture.D je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
121
Patty calculates a way to return to the Iberotel when Hossam sug-
gests they go for a drink. On the Sheraton’s rooftop, he finishes a
whiskey and then announces, “Insha ’Allah, you will marry and have
children with me.”
Patty laughs, but he stares at her. She thinks of his cheap cotton
clothes, his car’s window handle without the knob. If she married
him, she would have the power.
He leans forward and says, “I can give you children. I am a better
man than your husband.”
“I’m too old to have children.”
“No no, not too old. Beautiful woman.”
“How old do you think I am?”
“Thirty-five.”
“I’m forty-five.”
His face falls and he looks at her more closely. She asks him how
old he is.
“Thirty-three.” His eyes look yellow and his nose red and lumpy.
He announces, “We adopt.”
That word has lurked inside Patty’s mind since she learned about
the Brazilian’s pregnancy. Hossam probably would be a good father.
Her mother and sisters would forgive the Muslim detail for a baby.
Patty states the obvious. “I’ve known you for five days.”
“I tell you my hard stories. Now time to share life with me. We can
live abroad. Egypt no good.” He tells her again about his wife leaving
him and his dead daughter. But didn’t he say dead son before?
Hossam clutches her hand. “It’s hard life alone. A woman should
have a man take care of her. I can be a good American man.”
Patty forces herself to ask, “How old is your mother?”
He looks down at his whiskey. “Fifty-three.”
Patty’s widowed mother often complains that men her age either
want a nurse or a purse. Patty looks at Hossam’s thin sandals and
says, “I don’t want to pay for you.”
He protests, but she stands and says, “I no longer need your services.”
She has a shawl in her purse, but she leaves her shoulders bare as
she waves down a taxi. A black-and-white one pulls over, the ones no-
torious for overcharging. The young driver whistles and begins tell-122
Paula Younger
ing her how pretty she is. She shames him, asking if he would talk to
an Egyptian woman this way. At the Iberotel, she rejects his inflated
fare and haggles for a fair rate.
At the front desk, she leaves a message for Edmond that she isn’t
feeling well. She sleeps late, then spends the rest of the day next to
the pool in her skirted black swimming suit, which the seminarians
called a bikini, their name for any Western swimwear. The European
bikini women lounging around the Iberotel pool would blow their
seminarian eyes out. Patty sips piña coladas, margaritas, and every
other fruity alcoholic concoction she can think to order from the full
Western bar. On their honeymoon, she and her ex stayed at a hotel
like this in Hawaii. She was young and firm in her bikini, and was
served alcoholic drinks in pineapples. She saw a future for them like
the beach, spread out and seemingly infinite.
Her mobile fills with missed calls from Hossam and Edmond. Patty
is ordering a banana daiquiri when she spots a leathery, midfifties Italian
woman next to a much younger Egyptian man two beach chairs down.
He slathers baby oil onto her hardened back. Her skin would fit in at
the Khan el-Khalili’s leather souq. She turns to him, glistening, but he
retreats to his laptop.
Edmond and Ashraf appear next to Patty’s lounge chair. Edmond
says, “Where’s your eye candy? I expected him to be feeding you
grapes.”
Patty bites into her pineapple slice and imagines Hossam staking
out the ferry landing, waiting like a man afraid of missing his last
ship out.
Edmond asks, “What does he want? Some clothes? Shoes? An
apartment? Things are cheap here. Probably not as expensive as you
think.”
The pineapple lodges in her throat. “Marriage.”
Edmond laughs. “Now that’s greedy.”
“He’s thirty-three. Can you believe that?”
“It’s a hard life here.” Edmond pats Ashraf’s leg. “No offense.”
“That’s why you will take me to England. I must live abroad.”
The leathery Italian cajoles her younger Egyptian cohort withD je ser D je ser u (Splendor of Splendor s)
123
words like mi amor and per favore. From Hatshepsut’s temple to Sofra
restaurant, women like her waited in the background, with their dyed
hair and fancy sunglasses. Their laughs and smiles were too big, they
touched the young men’s arms too much, and they leaned in too
close, hoping for the same second act men get. Those women Patty
chose not to see because she was doing the same thing. Hers and
Hossam’s connection was an illusion, like an oasis in the desert.
Edmond takes Patty’s hand. “It’s time for you to rejoin the living.”
Ashraf says, “Hossam is just a driver. Not important for a good
Christian woman like you.” He glances at her empty daiquiri glass
and adds, “He drinks too much, especially for a Muslim.”
“What about you?”
“I smoke hubble bubble. It’s from nature. A gift from God.” Ashraf
taps his shirt pocket. “Want some hashish?”
Edmond says, “Brilliant idea.”
Ashraf leads them down to the pier and then sits on a rock next to
the Nile, tucked against the corniche, out of sight. The granite pokes
Patty’s rear end as she sucks the hashish in. The police might come,
but she could probably mollify them with baksheesh too.
Afterward, Edmond and Ashraf lead her deep into the eastern side
of Luxor. The city looks like it’s floating in a fog. They order at a
falafel stand when a burst of trilling interrupts from the opposing
sidewalk. People form a protective circle around a groom and his
bride in a Western wedding dress. The women welcome the newly-
weds with their ululations, that ancient Arabic sound of female joy or
grief that reminds Patty of Indians in old Western films.
Ashraf says, “Arabic word ‘farah’ means wedding, but also joy and
merriment. We all hope for a wife and children. Someday I will have
this, but in a better place, far away.”
She admires the newlyweds’ simple pleasure, happy to be marry-
ing one another, not worrying about careers or accomplishments or
children. They radiate the young’s innocence and happiness, before
love is convoluted with too many needs and wants. Whatever else
happened in their story, Patty and her ex had been that way once.
Edmond says, “Thank God that’s not for us. Can you imagine one
person the rest of your life?”124
Paula Younger
He wraps his arm around her waist. She rests her head on his
shoulder. If Hatshepsut could return to glory in Egypt after being
carved out of history, then Patty can find her way too.
Ashraf and Edmond walk ahead on the high sidewalk, built steep
to protect pedestrians from erratic drivers. Patty lunges up to follow
and the women’s trilling cries of joy trail behind her.14.
Eighty-six Ways to Cross One Desert
by Alexander Lumans
When curious about the depth of a strange river, do you throw in a
nearby rock? If so, how long does it normally take you to realize the
futility of this supposed gauging? Do you ever? Do you run away
instead? Are you someone of the temperament who prefers to “go
it alone”? Is that the naked truth? Have you ever closed a wound
with hot glue? Is it the same moon every night? Will it rain today? If
it rained some object other than rain today, would you go out into
the streets to celebrate? What if it were raining down lobster claws?
Or Olympic gold medals? Or Japanese woodcuts of copulating but-
terflies? What would you be willing to go out into the streets to cel-
ebrate other than the wet wet rain?
Did you have any allergies that I didn’t already know about?
They’re explained as overreactive immune systems—what’s akin to
firebombing an amateur sniper, or just an amateur whatever with a
gun out in the desert looking for asylum in the heavily walled city
of your body—does this sound true? When did the phrase “uncon-
ditional surrender” migrate into our everyday lexicon? Are most cre-
vasses judged too short? Too far? Or just right? Should I sleep with
one eye open?
Have you ever witnessed a butterfly’s first flight? Would you want
to? Would you, with me? In “silence, exile, and cunning” is a nice
way to go, no? Would you be honest with me, or would I have to ask126
Alexander Lumans
you to be honest with me in order for you to be honest with me? Is
there a problem here, officer? Are the graves ready?
When you “break up” with someone, doesn’t that phrase summon
the image of an Antarctic explorer’s ship foundering in a sea of pack
ice with the frostbite sinking in and the sled dogs baying at the moon
and the one football lost in the falling snow?
Are you coming back?
How many meters are we from the nearest bomb shelter? Is that
nearer or farther than the nearest white flag?
Was it my piano hands? My large feet? My lazy eye, the one I keep
open while sleeping? (Is it not possible that my other eye is simply
more alacritous?) Is the truth always naked? Could I dress up the
truth so ornately that it’s no longer said to be truth, dressed in, say,
a kimono or a lobster suit? If such were possible, then the truth is
clearly mutable, and therefore no truth at all, and so to change or to
come back to old loves is no crime whatsoever—so what about me
needs to change? Do you trust shamans?
Why not award gold medals for screaming? Do they even make
lobster suits? I imagine that if more celebratory items were made with
an eye toward actual proportionate sizes of anatomy, we would have
a much more educated populace, is that too much to ask? In a perfect
world, would you hot glue claws in place of these feeble little feelers
called hands? Alone, can you cook?
Wasn’t Ernest Shackleton an amazing fucking person?
Is your idea of a nice afternoon one spent in the company of six-
teen hundred butterflies in an artificial rain forest, or does that strike
you as a nice afternoon filled with sheer terror, one bound to end in
bloodshed? Butterflies taste with their feet, isn’t that frightening?
Would you, could you, opt for this transference of sense from tongue
to toes? Wouldn’t the day be filled with mostly the taste of sock and
sole? Would you walk into rivers to taste them, rather than to gauge
their depth? Or would it be best then to walk on your hands? Drop
stones and bombs with your lips?
Are you vexed by sorting recyclables? Do you keep an updated
travelogue? A running tab? A bird count? A wallet card listing known
allergies? Would you hit a nail with your Stradivarius in order to beE ig ht y-si x Way s to C ros s One De ser t
127
awarded another Stradivarius? Who’d take the fight: Shackleton, or
Jackie Joyner-Kersee? Is a gate not a gate unless it creaks?
In Goodnight Moon, why does no one say goodnight to the tele-
phone?
What is a body pillow, if not a bed? Was poetry once a forte of
yours? Is Irish something you only claim to have in you? Did firing
your first gun confirm or refute your suspicions concerning the
danger of a loaded weapon in the home? When did safety equipment
not come with safety labels? Why must we turn the gun’s safety off?
Given a black-and-white photograph, could you tell the difference
between the Antarctic tundra and the Saharan desert? If I had a nice
large mirror, would you look into it?
Are you comforted or dispirited by the fact that we no longer live
in a time when lazy-eyed trolls under bridges are a daily concern?
Will “cool” ever not be cool? Urns: a treasure? A burden? Or a talk-
ing point? If the moon could speak, what wouldn’t it say? Are you
being honest with me? Honestly, a man like Shackleton would not
have survived this lengthy desert crossing. Do you still not trust sha-
mans?
What strikes you as the most advantageous to survival: the fear
of bridge trolls, the fear of foundering in pack ice, or the fear of
butterflies? If, in an imperfect world, I unknowingly awakened in
you an allergic reaction, would you be mad, even though I specifi-
cally related to you the analogy of the amateur gunman storming the
body’s gates? Is there time for an unconditional surrender before the
bombing raids begin? What if I were that sniper, and you the target?
If I came dressed not as an amateur or as a gunman, but as a lobster
crawling over dunes on my anatomically correct claws, would you be
put off or intrigued by a large crustacean crossing the Sahara? If I
said, “I come in something, exile, and something else,” what next? If
I said, “I’m rain,” would you drop a rock on me? Or would you come
out into the streets to celebrate me falling from the sky?15.
Everyone Loves a Person Who Doesn’t
Give a Fuck About Anything
by Laura Jane Faulds
For every, really, every single thing she’d ever done: every movement,
moment, choice that had ever really been hers—the nights, days,
springs, summers, winters, falls, or sorry autumns, all the PG–13s
and the Xs and the Rs, for every kiss, man, cherry in season, leg
spread, sundown, green sunrise, girl, movie, all her friends, every
mind-blow, comedown, heartbreak, fever, holiday, her entire child-
hood, meeting him, marrying him, the album coming out and seeing
their two glossy faces looking sullen and impressive on the cover like
anyone in the world would kill to be them—it was still so easy to
believe that this thing she’d just done—just now, fifteen seconds ago,
after he’d gone to bed, where she looked forward to him going all day
every day, pawing across the kitchen, her feet def initely still bleeding,
uncorking a bottle of Cave d’Irouleguy Gorri d’Ansa, which she was
so in love with these days, every intention in the world of drinking it
all to herself (which she did) —was the point, the absolute, what all
the rest of it had been leading up to.
Plopping her bony ass down on the swivel chair in front of the
desktop she wasn’t really supposed to use (because it was his and she
broke things), opening up Word and saying a hello that fell through
her whole chest to her best friend the picture of the page (well, thereEver yone L ove s a Per son W ho Do e sn’t G ive a Fuck
129
were two pictures of the page, just as there had been two moons
(drunk)) and, in her beloved twelve-point Bodoni, so “flattering” she
liked to say, she wrote:
Everyone loves a person who doesn’t give a fuck about anything.
She was twenty-eight years old, turning twenty-nine on the thirty-
first, and if there was one person in the world who, if you asked
anyone who ever met her, would be the last person to ever stop giving
a fuck about anything, if they remembered her, they would tell you:
Allison Altamont, who was, and once thought she always would be,
a person who cared.
Which was exactly what had gotten her into this mess. She’d
thought she was really cool for it at the time. Sometimes she’d walk to
the bookshelf and find that old notebook: red with a bendy binding, a
heart on the cover drawn in ballpoint surrounding her initials, Triple-
A (her parents were so clever), and inside, closer to the beginning than
the end, there they were. She’d written them drunk and alone in her
father’s basement five years ago, the night she sold out her commit-
ment to never listening to any record past 1972 that anyone said was
any good and heard Charlie Caswell by Charlie Caswell:
dandelions and gravel, or black cherry magic markers and black
cherry mixed with Coca-Cola Slurpee, and the real serious permanent
markers, the toxic kind of headache-inducer, Citroëns and crinoline,
citron Citroëns, standing at the gas station pumping gas into his Pon-
tiac Parisienne. Biting down on someone else’s teeth. Hearing your
alarm clock go off on a TV commercial and the ensuing hit of lethargy
LASSITUDE. The words “bagel nosh” but not anything real about a
bagel. Maybe a soft pretzel? Mr. Stupid Peanut and his monocle and all
other such mascots who are similarly smug assholes. Glass shards in your
bedsheets, sniffing in subzero temperatures, drunk in the middle of the
day in either spring or fall but definitely not summer or winter. Prob-
ably a Sunday. Beethoven went deaf and that’s sad. My ear-worm, my
phantom limb. A hot man baking black-and-white cookies at his deli day
job and watching The Simpsons on a brown tweed couch in his mother’s
basement, jerking off and Kleenex roses and chubby basslines tumbling,
inaudible through the pink cotton candy lined with pictures of the Pink130
Laura Jane Faulds
Panther’s face plastered behind his mother’s basement’s plaster walls
plastered with posters of the Who. Charlie Caswell alone in terrible un-
derwear, hopelessly lighting a lighter on and off with his opposite hand,
adjacent to the beer and Coke can graveyard.
She’d never romanticized jerking off before, but on him, it felt
right.
That was such a heavy month in her life, the month leading up to
the night she knew she’d meet him. It sounds really negative and
embarrassing written down, but she basically starved herself all Sep-
tember—pineapple chunks, almond Snickers, Onion Blossom Prin-
gles stacked as high as a roll of quarters, cottage cheese mixed with
tropical fruit muesli, apples, baby carrots. She went to the gym every
day for thirty-seven days, even fucked up on Dayquil with a head
cold and, with every bounce on the elliptical, a brick was lifted from
behind her eyes to the top of her skull. She saved up all her money
to buy this really sick Karen Walker minidress, this gray little A-line
made out of T-shirt material and covered in all these little ruffles ar-
ranged in a shield over the bodice and fanning out like lamb’s ears
at the shoulders, these fucking gorgeous Rachel Comey pumps in a
blue kind of leopard-looking print, thinking up her opening line and
rehearsing her opening line and imagining herself saying it, wowing
him, like, you’d have to actually be the dumbest idiot in the world
not to fall for it:
“Hi, I’m Allison Altamont. We both have alliterative names.”
When she finally got to say it, he replied, “Huh. Huh-huh, wow.
I’d never thought about my name being an alliteration before,” and
she kind of wanted to kill him for a second: How had he never con-
sidered that?
“Let me buy you a drink,” Allison offered, “Because you’re such a
giant fucking genius.”
“Mmmkay,” he sniffed, looking as he was saying it like he was
coming to terms with it: his strange new life of stranger-girls offer-
ing to buy him drinks for being such a giant fucking genius, which
maybe could be something other than all bad.
“What do you want?”Ever yone L ove s a Per son W ho Do e sn’t G ive a Fuck
131
“A beer,” he said, “Whatever’s cheap.”
“I don’t drink beer. I don’t know what’s cheap. Just ... what kind
of beer do you want?”
“A Stella?”
Allison laughed. “That’s probably the least cheap beer there is.”
He didn’t look apologetic. He was numb in the face, impossible to
see through. “Okay, um, a Heineken.”
At the bar, Heineken and Stella Artois cost the same, but she went
with Heineken, because it was manlier, and she preferred the idea of
herself as a Heineken-drinker’s girlfriend. Stella made no sense on
him, as he wasn’t a banker. She would rather die than be a banker’s
girlfriend.
She realized fast that Charlie was a completely different game than
every other man she’d had, and once she realized how easy it came,
she loved herself for being the person she’d suspected she would
become once she was with him, grew more confident, twisted and
turned herself and him around her, leading.
“You must be so lonely, so sad,” she said.
“I don’t know. Why?”
“I don’t know, I just think . . . you don’t have a band up there.
People in bands, like, always have someone to hang out with.”
“Yeah,” he said, “I was thinking about getting a drummer.”
“That’s cool,” said Allison, “I love the drums.”
He nodded into the neck of his Heineken. “Yeah, I didn’t really
used to, but I’m coming around to them.”
“Yeah, it’s really easy to listen to a song and, like, not hear the
drums at all. But then if you like listen to a song from the perspective
of I’m gonna listen to the drums, like, hear them first over everything,
it sounds like a completely different song.”
This amused him. “What are you going to do tonight? After you
leave here?”
“I don’t know,” she shrugged. Her legs were crossed over his
knees. “I guess just check the Internet and then like lie in bed and
think about how this happened. What about you?”
“Um. Play piano, I guess.”
“Are you just gonna, like, make stuff up?” she asked, and he chuck-132
Laura Jane Faulds
led, looked at her with a faint awe in his eye and she saw, thought
“Thank God”—he wanted to love her.
To him it wasn’t make stuff up, it was composition, and though he
knew “an endearing innocence” was not a major one of her selling
points, she was stupid about the biggest thing he wasn’t, his music,
which drove him crazy and hung out at the core of everything he was
and he felt lighter with her legs around it.
“Yeah,” he chuckled, “I’m just gonna make stuff up.”
And so began the phone calls, the late-night phone calls, Charlie
having just played a show to a cramped room full of a thousand cool
people. They thought he was coolest, but he didn’t think he was even
cool at all. This all was so confusing for poor Charlie Caswell. This
was how it went.
It was so cool to like Charlie Caswell, comparable to when it was cool
to like Ariel Pink, or the White Stripes circa White Blood Cells or the
Strokes before their first album came out or Odd Future the day after
they fucked shit up on Jimmy Fallon. Charlie Caswell and his crazy
song lyrics, long song titles, usually sentences, a singing saw on “Coco,”
backmasking the likes of which had not been seen since Revolver. His
shiny chocolate pudding bowl of a haircut hanging down over almost
all his moony face. From the audience, he was only his chin jutting
out like the bottom hammock of a fingernail moon, reminding Allison
Altamont of that picture that always came up in childhood: a little boy
fishing off the side of the moon, fishing for stars.
And after the phone calls became too much to bear, he flew her
out to San Francisco, and together they traveled North up the West
Coast in a big brown van, eating carbohydrates remorselessly, kiss-
ing so, so delicately in hotel rooms, the tiniest pause of lip pressed
up against lip, damp as two dogs’ noses. Pulling away, that face you
make when you love him and your shoulders heave, you’ve got ques-
tion marks in place of pupils, he asking her and she asking him “How
could you love me?” It’s always such a surprise.
He didn’t ask her to marry him in any cool or interesting way. Actu-
ally, he didn’t even ask her.Ever yone L ove s a Per son W ho Do e sn’t G ive a Fuck
133
Disillusioned with fame, in what Allison marveled at being the
least annoying instance of any rock and roll musician ever being dis-
illusioned with fame ever, Charlie decided that he wanted to move
to France: specifically Lyon, a bummy sort of half-city noteworthy
mostly for being a major player in the international biotech scene. If
Lyon belonged to any other country in the world, it would be a Pitts-
burgh. It was so, so like Charlie not to want to move to Paris. When
he first said “I want to move to France” and Allison—naturally—
had asked him “Paris?” he curled up his lip as if she’d asked him
“Baghdad?”
“Will you come with me?” he asked.
“Well, of course I’d love to, but I don’t really see how that could
be possible ... I’m an alien! A foreign alien!”
Always so adorable.
“My Dad’s Irish,” said Charlie, “So I have EU citizenship.”
“My Dad’s not Irish,” said Allison mournfully. “So I don’t have
EU citizenship.”
Charlie didn’t say anything.
“I could, like, sham-marry you,” said Allison, “And, like, bogart
off your EU citizenship.”
Charlie didn’t say anything.
“Sorry,” said Allison, “‘Bogart off your EU citizenship’ doesn’t
really make any real English sense.”
“Yeah,” said Charlie, after an impressively long pause, “We could
do that.”
“I’d be into doing that,” said Allison, dying inside but masking it,
“I mean, if you’d be into doing that.”
“Sure,” said Charlie, “Why not?”
She wondered what he’d think if he knew how hard she’d been
scheming all along, how scared she’d been in the spaces between the
schemes she’d crafted being pitched and the pitch being received,
the scathing heat of every night she convinced herself it wouldn’t
work this time and it was over. And even though she was the shit-
tiest/slowest/least reliable email/text message-responder she’d ever
met in her entire life, she still felt her entire spine and life collapse
when he didn’t write her back within four seconds, how hard she’d134
Laura Jane Faulds
cried the night she brought up phone sex when he was in Osaka, so
the time difference was way off and she couldn’t call him, she had no
idea, what if he never wrote her back ever ever and she’d just ruined
it? Over stupid phone sex? Terrorized by pulsatile tinnitus and in-
somnia, pressing her thumbs against her earlobes and taking deep
breaths to make it stop to no avail, she flicked the lamp on, walked to
the computer crying and searched “pulsatile tinnitus” on Wikipedia.
She wanted to understand if excess of fear in one’s heart was a key
trigger, maybe, but the entry was mostly just a bunch of science and
acronyms. At its very bottom, she found a list of “Notable Individuals
with Tinnitus” and it shocked her to see: sandwiched between Peter
Brown and Eric Clapton, Charlie Caswell.
“What a life,” she thought, what a life she led. “Wikipedia knows
more about my boyfriend than I do.”
Fresh from her Farewell Dinner—nachos and sangria with her girl-
friends, a few of their boyfriends, a couple gay guys—she listened
to “C.R.E.A.M” by Wu-Tang on headphones and contemplated the
eternal question: “Does cash rule everything around me?”
Deep in the dark, dark thicket of Claver meeting Ashtree by the
hostel, she crossed paths with a cut, hipstery black guy, the kind of
guy she and Eliza once referred to as “The Dream.” It made her re-
member her old life, when whenever she passed a black guy on the
street while listening to Wu-Tang or Wu-Tang solo or whatever on
headphones, it killed her how he couldn’t automatically know it: “See
that cute white girl at three o’clock? She’s listening to fucking Wu-
Tang, and she’s, like, real about it.” And she’d always felt so powerless
in those moments: if only he could know it, he’d fall in love with her
that second, he really would, she was sure of it, but what could she
do? She couldn’t just kill the magic and grab him by the wrist and
tell him, “Hi! Would you believe that I’m listening to Wu-Tang right
now?” because it would be creepy, and also racist.
But it didn’t matter. Her life had answered itself, and there was no
longer any need to indulge the dream of a hot hipstery black guy be-
cause she’d done way better, she didn’t have to do that anymore. She
was marrying a famous rock star and whenever she wanted to listenEver yone L ove s a Per son W ho Do e sn’t G ive a Fuck
135
to Wu-Tang or Wu-Tang solo or whatever, he was the only man who
mattered, and whether he thought, “Thank God for my hot white
wife, her love of rap music is so genuine,” or “What the hell is this
racket?,” she felt prepared to be cool with it forever.
The first two months were bliss. All Brie and baguettes and Oran-
gina and Malbec, so much Orangina and Malbec that Orangina may
as well have flowed out of faucets and Malbec from the drinking
fountains. Tuna and black olives and hard-boiled egg on baguette: in
France, you could get that anywhere. It was like Subway.
After posing for the picture, he told her she could do whatever
she wanted, so she ran in the mornings, and wrote him a story. She
called it Charlie: An Introduction, the concept being the Seymour:
An Introduction Buddy Glass never wrote because he kept digress-
ing: a descriptive and invasive account of the only subject in the
world she really cared to write about: her husband’s face. The simile
flowed out of her like Orangina from faucets; the obsessive misuse
of “sanguine” spewed like the bottle of Chambord she knocked off
their strong kitchen table in January, which inspired her to write the
sentence “Chambord spewed sanguine,” assuming that “sanguine”
meant “like blood.” She wrote a peach smashed into a newspaper and
The Sazerac of Dudes and his Strawberry Fields Forever-ly hazel eyes
and his Ibexy shoulders and He looked like a strapping young lad who
played running back at Yale in 1917 and I’m looking at a faded black-
and-white photograph of the whole squad on some Tumblr at noon on a
Sunday and there is one particular dude who stands out as being the
beauty, and it’s him.
She’d wanted to marry on New Year’s Eve; it’d been her plan her
whole life to marry on New Year’s Eve. New Year’s Eve necessar-
ily blows, so if New Year’s Eve is your wedding anniversary you’re
granted a free pass out of ever participating in anyone’s corny New
Year’s Eve celebration again—but Charlie had found the idea of a
New Year’s Eve wedding very corny. They married on December 14,
making Valentine’s Day their two-month anniversary, and on that
day Allison climbed into bed with four fried eggs on two croissants
and Charlie, folded in half. When she came back from her shower136
Laura Jane Faulds
he’d pulled his brow into a knot and shook his head, shook his head,
the most frenetic gesture she had ever seen beam from her normally
stolid, rocklike man.
“Is this what you’re gonna do now?” he asked, his voice quivering
and becoming louder over the course of the sentence’s delivery like a
picture of a cone, getting bigger, “You’re just gonna sit around and
write about me? You think that’s gonna get you a book deal? You
think everyone’s gonna wanna read about me? Charlie Caswell, by his
fucking wife? You think that’s what writers do? Sit around, writing
about their husbands’ faces? Insipid. Insipid, Allison. Write a story.
That’s what writers do. That’s the difference between a writer and a
fucking . . . teenager.”
She nodded at the floor and chewed on the inside of her mouth,
walked to the front door still nodding and slipped on a disgusting
pair of Toms that belonged to both of them. She walked to the end of
the driveway and stood at its very end, kind of pretending or imagin-
ing that it was the edge of a cliff. Through the gray-yellow sky, she
squinted at the sun, confronting, if only for a moment, the unspeak-
able burn of knowing—for sure, now—that she was the one who was
loved less.
Two blasts from the past in quick succession: 1) the twenty-first anni-
versary of her mother’s death, 2) Eliza at De Gaulle in her Sunday best.
“Please,” she begged, “Please be good.”
“Be good?” Charlie asked, disgusted, “Sorry, I didn’t realize I was
your son. I didn’t realize I was a character in the fucking Bible.”
“Sorry, I don’t know what to say to that,” said Allison, and made
a big show out of sweeping out the bedroom door the way she imag-
ined Carole Lombard, an actress she had never seen act in any movie,
would sweep, hitting a scarf over her shoulder like it was the last
thing in the world she cared about but it still happened to land per-
fectly in a really beautiful scarf way that flattered her chin.
In the cab, she wondered how a life story this romantic could
extend to the depths of this godawful. She didn’t know how to feel
about Eliza coming. Eliza was the only friend from home who had
visited her in three years, since all her friends from home were way tooEver yone L ove s a Per son W ho Do e sn’t G ive a Fuck
137
broke and poor to afford a plane ticket. She knew they all thought
about how hard they hated their lives, and then they thought of her.
She couldn’t know whose lives really were worse, hers or theirs.
Shittiness of life is relative, a shitty life is a shitty life no matter what,
and every day she woke up in the morning and ate a bowl of oatmeal
and drank three cups of black tea and watched movies and didn’t eat,
ate a handful of baby carrots, pressed her ear to the door of Char-
lie’s studio, listened to a bunch of guitar drone that she worried was
garbage, ran for forty-five minutes on the treadmill, did two hun-
dred and fifty upper ab crunches and two hundred and fifty lower
ab crunches, three sets of twelve reps of bicep curls and overhead
extensions, took a shower, blow-dried her hair, straightened her hair,
put her hair in a ponytail, figured out dinner with Charlie, ate dinner
with Charlie. Sometimes he would try to tell her what he’d done that
day, and she’d purposely antagonize him: “Dude, I don’t even know
what a G even is!” “Whatever, Ross Gellar!” “Do I look like a person
who reads books from a long time ago?”
After dinner, he’d return to composing, and Allison would binge-
watch entire series of TV shows while crying in bed and eating baby
carrots. Charlie went to bed early, and Allison would leave the room,
get wasted alone, and Tweet a bunch of bullshit.
She never kissed him, never touched him, barely looked at him.
She cried into Eliza’s big chest at the airport, acting like it was be-
cause “Oh God! It’s been forever!” but by the time the cab pulled up
to the cottage, the pieces of hair that hung closest to her face were
soaked straight through. She’d told Eliza everything, and Eliza, the
ferocious best friend, said “Let’s not even give him the chance to be
good.”
They changed into pajamas and scrubbed their faces, drank wine and
ate fraises confites and pralines a l’Ancienne with their fingers. Eliza
told Allison all the gossip that had happened since Allison moved
away. Lily and Jared got married, and they’d had the most embar-
rassing wedding:
“So, they decided to do, like, this canapé wedding? Like, instead
of having, like, a sit-down, actual meal, they just had a bunch of cana-138
Laura Jane Faulds
pés. Really stupid canapés. Michelle and I were so drunk. They had
these, like, ridiculous fucking, like, crostini—”
“Oh God. Crostini. It doesn’t get much tackier than crostini. In
this day and age.”
“Uh—yeah. So, yeah, there were these crostini, and, like, some
cheese, and tomato jam. Michelle was so fucking drunk, and she kept
doing this whole ‘tomato jam’ shtick she made up, like, ‘Tomato jam?
That doesn’t even make any sense! Jam is for strawberries!’ That was
her big line: ‘Jam is for strawberries!’ It was fucking classic. She got
so out of control with it. At one point, the guy came up with the tray
and she was just, like, ‘Getitthefuckawayfromme.’ We were dying.”
Allison felt sad. She wished she had been at the wedding, making
fun of the wedding, saying “Jam is for strawberries” with Eliza and
Michelle. She would have been so good at “Jam is for strawberries”!
That was her exact sense of humor style.
“But anyway, that’s not even the point,” Eliza continued. “The
point is, Lily and Jared are retarded. Trying to be all classy with their
canapé wedding, but it was so fucking retarded. Everyone was so
hungry. There were fucking kids there. You can’t, like, not feed kids,
you know? So, okay, this is the best part—everyone just fucking left.
To go find food. And the only restaurant in the vicinity was a fuck-
ing Wendy’s. So everyone comes back to the fucking reception, with
fucking Wendy’s. Steaming paper bags of fucking Wendy’s. The entire
fucking place smelled like Wendy’s. Can you imagine? Can you imag-
ine that being your wedding?”
“It could be kind of cool, you know. If you actually, like, planned
it like that. Like, you had the whole ceremony, and then everyone
was so hungry and it was time to eat and you were like, “Hey! Guess
what? You get to eat Wendy’s now!” And all the waiters would put
paper bags of Wendy’s down on all these expensive china plates, and
everyone would be so stoked. Sorry to be contrary.”
“No, I get it,” Eliza nodded, “That would be cool. But it, like, so
wasn’t like that.”
“Yeah, I know,” said Allison, “They’re retarded.”
Charlie walked in.
“Hi, girls,” he said. For the first time in months, he wasn’t wearingEver yone L ove s a Per son W ho Do e sn’t G ive a Fuck
139
his pale denim housecoat over plaid pajama pants and no shirt with
flip-flops. He stole a chocolate out of the Alain Rolancy box, ate it,
and sucked the chocolate off his fingers.
“France!” he announced happily to Eliza, “It’s something swell,
isn’t it?”
It’s something swell, isn’t it? Any dumb jerk can prance around with
that showy English in front of any woman in the world, and she’ll fall
for it, point finale, no questions asked. Allison watched the lights go
on in Eliza’s eyes and it was over; it wasn’t going to play out anything
like she’d expected. All it took was that one stupid sentence, and now
Eliza wouldn’t want to hate on Charlie anymore. Now Eliza thought
Charlie was charming, and would, in true “women are bitches to
each other” fashion, think Allison to be “ungrateful.”
“There are two sides to every story,” was the unwarranted advice
she gave as they said good-bye, “He’s a really great guy. I know you
can make this work.”
“I don’t,” said Allison, “I don’t know that at all.”
She never knew what day of the week it was. Charlie stopped leaving
his studio. He slept on the floor of his studio.
“I should probably do something,” Allison decided, and climbed
into his makeshift bed: stacks of towels arranged like Jenga pieces and
covered with a blanket. She rubbed his back.
“Your feet smell,” he said into his pillow, “Your feet smell fucking
disgusting.”
Allison called her dad and told him everything.
“I don’t know what to do!” she cried, sobbing, and her dad said
nothing, because he didn’t know what to say.
“FUCK YOU,” she screamed into the phone, threw the receiver at
the wall, took a sip of Orangina, and tried to walk somewhere. She
tripped over a loose cable and stubbed her toe really hard into the
ground.
“FUCK,” she screamed and, making her body go limp like an idiot
trying not to get arrested, fell over, still holding one drippy ice cube
and the rest could all go fuck themselves for all she cared.140
Laura Jane Faulds
She imagined every little girl in the world standing in a line in
front of her, asking her what to do.
“What should we do, Allison?” they chirped, “Please tell us what
to do!”
“Don’t do what I did,” she told them, slipping the disgusting
Toms on. She rode her bike to the Jardin botanique with Ghostface
on headphones, bangin’, found a pond, impulsively threw the Toms
into the pond, tore every petal from a water lily and played that old
game, gratefully concluding, He loved her not.
Her feet were still bleeding, cut up from the pedals, when she wrote
the sentence. She hadn’t bothered to bandage them, even wash them,
just let the blood cake and hopefully get infected when all the nasty
dirt percolated into her bloodstream. Her lips were stained blackish
from the wine, she limped to the studio and realized he was sleeping
in the bedroom tonight, whatever that meant.
She got into bed and whispered “Wake the fuck up, asshole!”
Grinning, feeling happy, she shoved her bleeding feet into his sleep-
ing face.
“What the fuck?” he asked, waking up, and she pushed her feet
harder and harder into his eyes and cheeks, curling her dirty toes
around his hawkish, beautiful “statement nose,” laughing so he’d see
it was a joke, and he laughed. He grabbed her by both ankles in one
hand and flipped her over, laughing so hard, climbed on top of her,
and she kissed his neck.
“What’s this?” he asked, pulling a lily petal out of her hair.
“Oh, it’s a lily petal,” she said, pulling it out of his fingers, “I guess
you love me.”
“Yeah,” he nodded, “It’s something swell, isn’t it?”
And whichever book or movie he’d stolen that line from, which-
ever man he imagined in place of himself as himself to himself, she
didn’t really mind. It worked.16.
Fire Weather
by Brady Hammes
The fires began the day of the appointment, and the repercussions of
both events are making it difficult for Kate to breathe. To find some
peace, she busies herself by preparing for her guests who are sched-
uled to arrive shortly. She washes the wineglasses and empties the
ashtrays. She runs the vacuum and puts clean sheets on the guest bed.
She pours a cup of coffee and walks to the front porch, where she
can see the mountains burning north of the city, mushroom clouds
of smoke that press against the atmosphere and cement into giant
hanging anvils. To Kate the anvils represent a kind of punishment
for her recent mistakes, and she would very much like to speak with
whomever is controlling the system of ropes and pulleys. She would
like to get this over with.
Phil is lost. Kate’s directions make no sense, and the afternoon sun
burns pink through the smear of the bug-splattered windshield. They
left Tulsa yesterday morning, doing eighty across the flats of North
Texas and through the scorched canyons of Arizona, finally arriving
amid the filthy, breathing traffic of Los Angeles sometime around
rush hour. It’s spring break for the kids, and Phil promised them a
week in Southern California. He promised them Hollywood and the
beach and Universal Studios, but money is tight and a curtain of fire
is closing in on their destination, so he’s a little unsure how this will142
Brady Hammes
all play out. “These street names aren’t even in English,” he says,
straining to read the little blue signs.
“What are we looking for?” Abby asks. Abby is sixteen and, ac-
cording to what she told her friends back home, about one month
away from celebrity. She said she was coming to LA to get headshots
and a nice tan and maybe talk with some agents her cousin Kate
knows, Kate being a pretty good actress herself.
“San something,” Phil says.
“San Rafael?” Abby asks.
“No.”
“Because I just saw San Rafael.”
“It’s not San Rafael.”
“It could be. You said it was San something.”
“Cut it, Abby,” Phil says, riffling through the mess of papers on
the dashboard. “Where are those directions, Claire?”
Claire grabs Phil’s hand and redirects it back to the steering wheel.
“Honey, keep your eyes on the road.”
“My eyes are on the road. But it doesn’t do me any good if I don’t
know where the hell I’m going.”
Phil is an impatient man with the temperament of an ostrich, and
in their twenty years of marriage Claire has learned to negotiate
his fits with the caution of a zookeeper. She hands him the Subway
napkin he scribbled directions on during lunch in Barstow.
Phil glances down at the napkin, then back at the road. “San Fer-
nando,” he says, suddenly pleased, as if remembering a song title that
had temporarily escaped him. “We’re looking for San Fernando.”
They pull into a gas station. Claire and Abby run to the restroom
while Phil gasses up. Miles, the youngest, climbs a small hill to get
a better look at the fires. Miles is eleven and large, not fat really, just
overinflated. Prior to arriving, he had no interest in this vacation; Los
Angeles was not his first choice. His first choice was Alaska, where he
knew a kid from his online geology club, a junior volcanologist who
invited Miles on a three-day trip to the Chigmit Mountains, home of
Mount Redoubt, the most active cone on the North American plate.
Aside from the slight chance of being thrown from bed by an eight-Fi re Weat her
143
plus magnitude earthquake, Miles expected very little from this trip,
geologically speaking. But now, with this new, unexpected display
of nature, everything has changed and suddenly LA isn’t so boring.
“Dad!” he yells, pointing to the sky. “Look. Pyrocumulus.”
“Pretty neat,” Phil says, capping the tank. He pulls his phone from
his pocket and dials Kate. He says they’re a little lost. He doesn’t see
San Fernando but he sees a cement river, a truck selling tacos, and a
billboard for a movie about robots. He asks if she has any idea where
they might be, and, to his surprise, she does. She gives him turn-by-
turn directions and says to park on the street.
Abby returns from the mini-mart, Diet Coke in one hand, a maga-
zine in the other. “Was that her?”
“Sure was,” Phil says.
“Who?” Miles asks, crawling back into the van.
“Your cousin Kate,” Phil says.
“Do I know her?”
“She was around when you were little. You may not remember her.”
“I don’t remember her.”
Phil closes the door and keys the ignition. “You’ll like her. She’s a
real California chick.” He says this as if she were a type of exotic fruit.
When her uncle Phil called two weeks ago to ask if he and the family
could shack up with her for a few nights while they were in LA,
Kate scrambled for a reason that wouldn’t work. She had a mental
file of excuses for whenever she was asked to take part in something
she found unsavory. It was stunning how quickly she remembered
the dinner plans with an old co-worker who was leaving town, or the
college friend she was planning to visit down in Huntington. But at
seven a . m . on a Sunday, hung over and half asleep, she had noth-
ing. So instead she said, yes, of course, she’d love to have them, and
ended up committing herself to a weekend of entertaining family she
barely knew.
Kate’s father was the eldest of four boys. Phil, the youngest, worked
for a senator in DC and was rarely around, appearing only very briefly
with his family on Christmas Eve or Easter morning. One of Kate’s
few memories of Phil is from the Christmas before she moved to LA,144
Brady Hammes
when she saw him slap a five-year-old Miles after the boy flicked a
spoonful of mashed potatoes on their grandmother’s Nativity set.
Kate recognized that her cousin was being a little shithead, but the
fury it unleashed in her uncle was something she hadn’t seen before.
She watched Miles fall into a heap of wailing fat on the kitchen floor
as Phil stood over him, threatening to knock his head clean off if he
didn’t quit his goddamn whining and clean up the mess. An hour
later the boy and his father were curled up on the couch in a post-
dinner defeat, and Kate remembers the entire day as one big com-
plexity of feeling.
Kate sees them approaching from the street, a cloud of ash swirling
like fine snow around their heads. “We got dinner,” Phil says, hold-
ing bags from In-N-Out Burger in each hand, displaying them high
and proud, like a savage returning with the severed heads of rival
tribesmen. He hands the bags to Miles and throws his arms around
Kate. “So good to see you, kiddo.”
“You too,” she says.
“You look wonderful, honey,” Claire says. “I just love your little
house. It’s so cute. Abby guessed which one it was when we drove by.”
Abby gives Kate a bashful wave. “Hi, I’m Abby. Not sure if you
remember me.”
Kate wraps her arms around her younger cousin. “Of course I re-
member you.”
“Sooo . . . ” Claire says through an eager smile. “Give us the grand
tour.”
Inside, Phil and Miles tear through their burgers, while Kate walks
Claire and Abby through the house. When they return to the kitchen,
Phil tells Kate about the drive: the lightning storm outside Phoenix
and how the Grand Canyon was closed because some animals acci-
dentally fell in. “Can you believe that?” he asks.
“No,” Kate says.
“Good. Because I was making that part up.” He lets out a thick
belly laugh that leaves Abby shaking her head in a kind of routine
mortification.
“Always the comedian,” Claire says, smiling at her husband.Fi re Weat her
145
Phil has close-cropped hair and some farm in the face. He reminds
Kate of someone, someone on television, but it isn’t until they’ve
started in on cocktails that she realizes that person is Glenn Beck.
After dinner Miles retires to the living room and flips through the
TV channels, finally settling on local news coverage of the fires. A
man with a field of white hair stands in front of a satellite map. He
explains that the fire’s erratic behavior is due to something called
coupled fire atmosphere dynamics, the result of the fire and the at-
mosphere interacting with each other and creating its own microcli-
mate. “You guys,” Miles yells. “Come check this out.”
Kate, Phil, and Claire walk to the living room. “This is crazy,”
Miles says. “Basically what’s happening is that the fire is creating its
own weather patterns. I’ve never heard of anything like this before.”
Kate has never heard of anything like this either, but it makes per-
fect sense to her now.
Abby enters the living room holding a doll that emits a piercing
wail from a tiny speaker in its back. “Mom,” she says. “Will you hold
this thing a sec?”
“Shut it up!” Miles says. “I can’t hear the TV.”
“You shut up, you fat turd!” Abby yells back. She hands the doll to
her mother, then fishes through her backpack for a bottle.
Kate looks the doll over. “What is that?”
“This is Baby Think It Over,” Claire says, rocking the plastic child.
“They give these to the kids at school. It makes them think twice
when they’re necking at some party.”
Abby finds the bottle and takes the doll back from her mother. She
inserts the nipple into the baby’s mouth and the crying subsides. “It’s
the dumbest thing in the world,” she says. “They act like it’s the same
as a real baby, but it’s not. I keep the stupid thing in a backpack.”
“I think it’s great,” Claire says. “It cries every so often and if you
don’t feed it or change the diaper, it sends a message that says you’re
neglecting the child. I think it really works.”
Baby Think It Over. Kate likes that. That’s clever. And such good
advice, too—applicable to so many things. Like how about Drunk
Driving Think It Over, or Cocaine Think It Over, or Getting-
Impregnated-By-Some-Guy-You-Met-At-A-Bar-And-Then-Aborting-146
Brady Hammes
The-Baby Think It Over. Do they make a doll for those things? She
guesses they do not. She’d had to think that last one over for a long
time. She stayed in bed for forty-eight straight hours thinking it over.
She drove to Bakersfield and back thinking it over. She thought it
over in the shower, beads of water racing down her belly and the sum
of her mistakes brewing inside. She was raised Catholic and knew
that, of all the unkind things she’d done in her life, this was the only
one that might not be forgivable. She worried that, when she finally
did meet someone she loved and wanted to have children with, she
wouldn’t be able to, that the judgment might come cold and swift,
something like: I’m very sorry, Kathryn, but you had your chance and
you blew it.
“Wanna see it?” Abby asks, extending the doll.
“No thanks,” Kate says.
With her guests down for the night, Kate pours a glass of wine and
sneaks out to the patio for a cigarette. After a moment, the sliding
glass door opens and Abby appears with the crying doll, holding a
bottle in its mouth. Kate hides the cigarette.
“You don’t have to hide that from me,” Abby says. “I have lots of
friends who smoke.”
Kate takes a drag and points to the crying doll. “What’s wrong
with your baby?”
“It’s hungry again,” Abby says. “Stupid thing eats like a horse. I
swear I’m never having kids.”
“You don’t know that.”
“Yes, I do. Or at least not until I’m old like you.” Abby pulls out a
chair and sits. After a moment the doll stops crying, letting her know
that it’s full. She sets it on the table and looks to Kate. “So you’re an
actress?”
“I’m a bartender. Sometimes I’m an actress, but usually I’m a bar-
tender.”
“Do you go on lots of auditions?”
“Not anymore.”
“Have you done any big movies?”
“I’ve done some small movies. I’ve done lots of commercials.”
“For what?”Fi re Weat her
147
“Pizza Hut. Office Depot.”
“Oh,” Abby says, disappointed. “How was that?”
“Take a guess.”
“Do you have a boyfriend?”
“Nope. You?”
Abby tells Kate about a guy she had been dating, a senior with an
El Camino and a wild streak. Not surprisingly, her father wasn’t fond
of the kid and went so far as to slash his tires when he found the car
parked on the street and the boy hiding under his daughter’s bed. At
school the next day, Abby discovered a note from the boy taped to
her locker. He wrote that her father was crazy and a little scary and
that he couldn’t imagine a scenario in which he’d ever be welcome in
their home, so it was probably best if they end the relationship before
someone got hurt. He wished her a lifetime of happiness and said she
owed him eighty bucks for the tires. “That’s about the extent of my
dating,” she says. “Pretty pathetic.”
“Your dad’s tough, huh?”
“He makes my life hell.”
“I’m sure he has his reasons.”
“That doesn’t make it okay.”
Kate wants to tell her that it could be worse, that it will get worse
(oh, you sweet thing, so much worse), but then it will get better too,
and back and forth like this it will go forever, sometimes in exag-
gerated leaps and falls, but more often in very subtle ways she won’t
always notice. She wants to tell her all of these things, and she wants
to tell her none of them, because she herself remembers what it’s like
to be sixteen and certain.
“What do you think will happen if the fire makes it to the city?”
Abby asks, staring at the distant flames.
“I don’t know,” Kate says. “Burn it down?”
It’s one hundred degrees by noon the next day, so they decide to
head to Venice Beach in search of cooler temperatures and cleaner air.
Overnight, a layer of ash has collected on the van, and as they pile in
Miles scoops up a handful and throws it in his sister’s hair.
“Prick,” Abby says, kicking him in the shin.
“Abby!” Phil yells.148
Brady Hammes
“He just dumped ash in my hair!” Abby says.
“Be nice, Miles,” Claire says.
“Yeah, Miles,” Kate says, grabbing him hard by the neck when no
one is looking. “Be nice.”
When they arrive at the beach, parking is nonexistent and Kate can
sense her uncle losing patience. He inches the car forward at a crawl,
as if expecting one of the parked cars to suddenly disappear. Kate
suggests they visit the pay lot but Phil refuses. According to him,
only assholes pay for asphalt.
The car behind them, a white truck, lays on the horn. It’s not a
polite reminder, not a simple excuse me, sir, but rather a sustained
bellow, the kind of honk that conveys a message of deep hate.
“Fuck you, pal,” Phil yells out the window, flipping the driver the
bird.
“Phil!” Claire says.
“Jerk’s more than welcome to just go around me.”
The truck darts in front of them and stops. The driver, a tattooed
surfer, gets out and walks to the van.
“Dammit, Phil,” Claire says. “He’s probably got a gun.”
“Just go, Dad,” Abby says.
Phil rolls down his window. “What?” he says in his toughest voice.
“No, no, no,” the surfer says, shoving his middle finger in Phil’s
face and smiling. “Fuck you!”
The surfer walks back to his car and Phil rolls up the window.
Miles stares at the floor mats, and Claire shakes her head because
her husband has done it again. There is a silence in the car, the kind
found in long hallways, and it stays like this until Abby spots an an-
drogynous figure crossing the street with a bulk-size package of toilet
paper. “Dude or chick?” she says to Miles, breaking the silence.
“I don’t know,” Miles says. “But whatever it is, it’s got a butt hole.”
Claire picks a spot near a lifeguard tower and spreads a bedsheet on
the sand. With the tide heading out, Miles takes to beachcombing
while Abby f lips through a magazine. Phil, still seething, attempts
to sleep it off with a nap. Baby Think It Over lies facedown in the
sand.Fi re Weat her
149
* * *
Kate stands and looks at the ocean, studying it like a map, then
starts sprinting toward it, high-stepping through the retreating tide-
water and throwing her shoulder into the breaking waves. She dives
below the surface and swims away from shore. Her stroke is ungainly
but effective, and before long she’s a hundred yards into the sea. The
water is now too deep to stand, so she dog-paddles for a moment,
looking back at Abby waving from the beach. She swims on, farther
yet, until the shore is a distant thing, a foreign country and a lan-
guage she doesn’t speak. She remembers a newspaper article she re-
cently read about a man who fell from the balcony of a cruise ship late
at night. She remembered the wife saying that although she knew her
husband was likely dead, what upset her most was the fear he surely
felt, the fear every person must feel if alone in a black sea, all life
moving slowly away. With this in mind, Kate swims farther still, until
the tanker ships that once seemed so distant now appear within reach.
She continues on, pushing and pulling through the heavy water. Her
arms tire and her breathing quickens. There’s a place in the ocean,
a sort of fence or line, and she knows that if she goes past this point
she won’t return. She swims until she reaches that line, then touches
it with her foot and heads back to shore.
“How was it?” Claire asks.
“Nice,” Kate says, the ocean dripping from her.
“You were way out there. We couldn’t see you after a while.”
Kate falls onto her stomach and presses her face into the towel. “I
couldn’t see you guys either.”
Miles returns with a handful of shells and stands next to his sister,
casting a shadow on her face. Unable to get her attention, he leans
over and lets his wet hair drip onto her back.
“What are you doing?” Abby says, annoyed.
“Look,” he says, displaying his treasures.
“Wow, you found shells at a beach. Congratulations.”
Miles sits in the sand and begins categorizing his loot, separating
the univalves from the bivalves, the keepers from the dreck.
“Kate,” Abby says, slapping her magazine shut. “Let’s go to the
boardwalk.”150
Brady Hammes
“What’s a boardwalk?” Miles asks.
“Don’t worry, you wouldn’t like it.” Abby stands and slides into
her flip-flops. “We’ll be back in a bit,” she says to her parents.
“Be careful,” Phil yells as they walk away. “Don’t talk to weirdos.”
“That might be tough,” Kate says under her breath.
The boardwalk is a salt-stained strip mall, kiosks and small tables
situated along the sand. There are women applying henna tattoos
and men selling paintings of sunsets and a girl dancing to the beat of
tribal drumming. Abby spots a cute boy painting portraits outside a
Winnebago decorated with driftwood and Jamaican flags. She grabs
Kate by the shirt and tells her to follow.
Abby approaches, smiles at the boy. “What do you do?” she asks.
“I paint,” the boy says. “Want me to paint your picture?”
“How much?”
“I don’t charge the cute ones. Sit down.”
Abby looks to Kate for permission.
“Go ahead,” Kate says. “I’ll go get something to drink and meet
you back here in a bit.”
Abby sits on a pair of stacked crates, brushes her hair from her eyes,
and feigns elegance.
The boy pulls a clean sheet of paper from his bag of art supplies
and fastens it to the easel. “I’m Zylan,” he says. “Like Bob Zylan.”
“I’m Abby.”
“You from around here?” he asks, beginning to sketch the outline
of her face.
“No, but I’m moving here soon.”
“Oh, yeah?”
“Yeah, I’m an actress. I just got cast in a new TV show.”
“Cool, what show?”
“It’s on the CW. It hasn’t aired yet.”
“Isn’t that channel all cartoons?” Zylan asks, coloring her eyes
with all kinds of blue.
“You’re thinking of the Cartoon Network,” she says, staying very
still. “The CW is really great. The executives are all super nice. They
let you be as creative as you want. It’s like a big family over there.”Fi re Weat her
151
“Wow, so you’re about to be famous?”
“We’ll see,” Abby says, giggling.
“Shhh . . . ”
“What?”
“Don’t say anything for a minute. I’m doing your mouth.”
Kate buys a frozen lemonade and wanders the boardwalk. The fires
aren’t as pronounced this close to the ocean, and for the first time
in a week she is able to take a deep, satisfying breath. She notices an
elderly man with a sign that reads: Saul the Spiritual Healer (As Seen
on YouTube). She approaches and asks what he does.
“I heal people,” he says. “Spiritually.”
“Yeah, but what does that mean?”
“I work on the inside. I clean the soul—fix karma problems. Stuff
like that.”
“Sounds vague.”
“Are you feeling spiritually drained?”
“I just feel drained.”
“Maybe I can help.”
“I doubt it,” Kate says, “but thanks.”
As much as she’d like to believe in Saul’s healing power, she’s
pretty sure he doesn’t have the necessary tools, almost certain those
instruments don’t exist. It’s worse at night, this malaise, when she
lies awake in bed with the sheets weighing on her like lead aprons.
The thing with the baby was a big part of it, but there’s also the
singledom and the forward march of time and the realization that
maybe she isn’t very good at the thing she always thought she was
really good at. Whatever it is has been festering for weeks, like a
squatter siphoning her resources, leaving her unhinged and rotten,
wanting for something she cannot put her finger on. She has little
faith the hippie can help.
* * *
Zylan finishes the portrait and presents it to Abby. Though lovely,
it looks nothing like her, and she wonders if he’d even been paying
attention, or just painting the only girl he knows how. “It’s really
good,” she lies. “Are you sure you don’t want some money for it?”152
Brady Hammes
“Nope,” he says, handing it to her. “This one’s on the house.”
Abby grabs a pen from his easel and signs her name in the bottom
right corner. “You keep it,” she says, handing it back. “It might be
worth something someday.”
Zylan takes the portrait, then looks to the ocean, as if fielding
ideas. “Come with me,” he says. “I want to show you something.”
“What the fuck?” Kate says when she returns to find her cousin and
the artist gone. She walks the boardwalk a hundred yards in both
directions and then, not finding them, goes to deliver the news.
“What do you mean she’s gone?” Phil says.
“She’s not gone,” Kate says. “They probably just wandered off
somewhere.”
“They?”
“She made a friend.”
“A boy?”
“Yeah.”
“Dammit, Kate,” Phil says. He pulls on his shirt, slides into his
sandals, and grabs his cell phone. “Call me if she turns up,” he says,
walking away.
This is the kind of shit that drives Phil nuts, this testing of bound-
aries. He believes in the sanctity of order and the importance of
consequences, which is why he will search every square foot of this
goddamn beach until he finds his daughter, and when he does he
will have some choice words for the little shit, words that he’s cur-
rently arranging in his head as he weaves through the archipelago of
beachgoers.
The area under the pier smells of dead fish and urine. Deflated bal-
loons and punctured soccer balls collect in the shallow water sliding
along the sand. If this is some kind of club, it’s one Abby has no in-
terest in joining. It’s grossly unromantic and she wonders why Zylan
brought her here. “What do you think?” he asks.
“It’s nice,” she lies. “Do you come here a lot?”
“Kind of. It’s like my tree house without trees. I come here to
think,” he says, pulling a pipe from his pocket. “And to get stoned.”Fi re Weat her
153
Abby has never seen a pipe like this before, all glass and swirling
colors. The only one she’d ever known was the smooth wood piece
her grandfather used to pull out after hearty meals. Zylan twists off
a small bud and presses it into the bowl. “Do you get high?” he asks.
Abby says yes, though the truth is she does not. The only people
she knows who get high are the stoners at school, brooding kids with
dirty hair and poor attendance. She remembers a story a teacher once
told her about a girl who smoked pot and jumped in front of a train.
She was terrified by the idea of smoking anything that might make
her want to jump in front of a train, and so when the joint was passed
her way at parties or after football games she always politely declined,
claiming an impending drug test or some lingering virus. But look-
ing square in front of Zylan is not an option, so she puts the lighter
to the bowl and feels the burn crawl down her throat. She coughs and
hands the pipe back to him.
“You okay?” he asks.
“Fine,” she says, letting out a few more hacks. “Just went down
the wrong tube.”
Zylan steps closer and puts his hand on the small of her back. “You
sure you’re okay?”
“Fine,” she says, smiling, eyes watering. “Totally fine.”
“Are you sure sure?” he says again, this time wrapping his arms
around her waist and pressing his lips to hers. His mouth goes to
work, wide and ravenous, devouring the bottom half of her face, like
a boy eating a large sandwich. Abby has never been kissed like this
before and prays he isn’t leaving marks her father will notice. After a
moment, Zylan pulls away and smiles.
“Wow,” she says. “You’re a passionate kisser.”
“Duh,” he says. “I’m an artist.”
Zylan has her in the sand now, one hand through her hair, the other
searching her pants. This is the furthest she’s ever gone with a boy,
and she recognizes the moment as something important, a milestone,
a memory she will carry with her for some time. Zylan kisses a line
down her stomach, then looks across the beach. “Uh-oh,” he whis-
pers into her belly button. “We’ve been spotted.”154
Brady Hammes
Standing fifty yards away, Phil has now seen everything he needs
to see and starts jogging toward the young couple. Abby, spotting
her father’s large frame charging toward them, pulls her shirt down
and says, “Oh, shit,” because she knows whatever is about to happen
will not be good. Zylan, a little confused, stays real still and watches
as Phil grabs him by the shirt and throws him in the sand. He drags
the boy into the shallow water and puts a knee to his back, pinning
him with the weight of his body. Abby screams, “Stop it, Dad! Stop!”
but her dad doesn’t stop, instead taking it further, now holding the
boy’s head under water and rubbing it back and forth in the sand,
like a man scrubbing a dirty dish, all the while screaming, “That’s
my daughter, you little shit!” as if his words might reach the boy with
his head under water.
Kate arrives in time to see Zylan wrest himself from Phil’s control
and sprint away. She watches her uncle standing in the shallow water,
his hands trembling, while Abby sobs dramatically in the sand. Kate
looks to the north, where the fire has quieted significantly, now just
a smoldering mass of embers, then begins walking away, not feeling
sympathy or pity so much as relief that a little order has been restored
and the fire on the mountain has finally run out of things to burn.17.
A Girl
by Lindsay Hunter
There was a girl gone missing a few years back. Her mama standing
out front of the Dairy Queen, eyeing your cone like you was hiding
her child within. You seen Dee? Dee Switcher? You seen her? Nope,
was always the answer, but I’ll keep an eye out. And before you knew
it that cone was gone.
That was the year that old bitch Miss Shane was teaching us alge-
bra. Solve for x, children. Chalk dusting her dress like she had a ghost
dress on over her other one. Them arms like dough on a spit.
That missing girl used to do her eyeliner during class. Over and
over, underlining her eye like Miss Shane underlined them nasty
equations. Solve for x.
We all had plans for that girl. She had a chest. She smoked them
long thin lady cigarettes in plain sight of the custodian. When that
retarded boy ran into the girl and knocked her purse down a condom
spilled out, flashing there in its gold wrapper, looking for all the
world like a coin.
The girl picked up her lipsticks and wallet and hair things and left
it there, left that condom on the ground and walked off. Us thinking
hard about ways to spend that coin.
There was other girls of course. The entire cheerleading team
could get you going, save for the chubby one, but she’d do in a pinch.
The majorette, Glenda was her name, rumor had it she’d drink too
much at parties and beg you to fondle her.156
Lindsay Hunter
So it wasn’t like this girl was the cream of the crop or nothing,
there was plenty of girls. We wanted them all, Dee Switcher included.
Her mama was the town skank. Everybody knew. So you couldn’t
take her all that seriously when her girl went missing. Stay home all
night for once, our own mamas would whisper to each other, swat
each other on the arm. You so bad. I know it.
Nobody ever picked up that condom. It got kicked around and
pushed into corners, and once Dee went missing we all got scared of
it, and kicked it harder. Girls would shriek should they see it rocket-
ing toward them. Some boys too.
Then one day we all realized it wasn’t there no more. Probably the
custodian got it. Or it was somewhere no one cared to look.
Her daddy came to the school on a Monday morning. No one
had seen her daddy in years but here he was asking where was Dee,
why did the school let her skip so easy, where was the truant officer,
demanding to know who took her, who had his girl. We watched the
principal pet his shoulder like you would a sick animal, watched Dee’s
daddy get led to the door; it was a bright day and for a second he got
swallowed up by the glare. He didn’t come back.
There was a big homecoming dance a few months after the girl
went gone. We all paired up and parted our hair and wore suit coats
and danced slow when we were told to.
Dee’s mama showed up at the dance in a fancy nightgown dress
thing, asking could she chaperone. We watched the principal lead her
over to the punch bowl, but Dee’s mama wasn’t there for long; no
one came for punch and after a few songs she walked out with her
head so high you worried for her neck.
Some of us met at the diner after, eating pancakes while our girls
fiddled with our belt loops under the table, if you were lucky. Others
of us went to the after party at the Days Inn, but that turned out
to be a bust. The stereo ran out of batteries and Miss Shane’s fresh-
man boy showed up and puked into the trashcan and everybody went
home.
Dee had left school after fifth period, was the story. Snuck out
while everyone was scrambling for their lockers. Rumor had it she
was going with an older boy, he might could even be called a man.A G i rl
157
One day a skinny lady cop came and asked a few of us what we knew,
but really we didn’t know nothing.
We skipped school all the time, was the thing. Sometimes it felt
like if you didn’t skip you’d close your eyes and die, right there in
the middle of Civics, so you did skip, and you’d go to the Circle K
to buy Slim Jims or over to a friend’s house to look at his dad’s titty
magazines. And nothing bad ever happened.
The lady cop seemed to find us not knowing nothing a relief.
That’s what I figured, she’d say in agreement with you. Which meant,
to us, solving for x really was an impossibility, a waste of time, so why
bother?
At Christmastime Miss Shane told us she had skin cancer, she
wouldn’t be back the next semester. We stared at that mole on her
cheek, as we had done for months. That’s what I figured, some of us
wanted to blurt. Miss Shane’s eyes went wet, we started feeling soft
toward her, but after she assigned two chapters of homework for over
the break we went back to hating her guts, which felt better, more
normal, than feeling sorry for her, so in a way you got to feeling
grateful toward her for being such a cooze.
Over the break we saw Dee’s little brother at the movies by his-
self. We forgot all about him, but there he was with his money in a
wad, staring up at the listings like he couldn’t read. We went on in
and spent all our money on arcade games. Then later that night, in
your bed that smelled like socks and sweat and secretions and powder
Tide, if you weren’t careful you’d start thinking how when you came
out the boy was gone, and how maybe you should feel regretful about
not inviting him to man the firetorch gun, really the best gun to have
if you were playing Immortal Fear and you made it past the first two
rounds, which everyone did.
But he had gone.
That winter someone found the girl’s yellow purse on the side
of the road. The strap was gone. One of us heard their dad saying
how you could use a strap to strangle someone, or at least tie up
her hands. Her perfume bottle was smashed. That girl ain’t coming
back, we told each other, shifting our nuts like we’d seen our dads do
whenever they said something serious.158
Lindsay Hunter
But really, we already knew that. You just had to say some things
out loud.
During the spring semester Miss Shane’s boy got in a fistfight with
the custodian. No one knew why but we figured it was stressful,
having a bitch mom who had cancer. Then on Palm Sunday a dog
found a skull and carried it to his master’s doorstep. There was excite-
ment for a time but it turned out to be the skull of an infant, probably
buried by some of them country folk who can’t afford no funeral.
A rumor got spread that a girl tasted like a nine-volt battery down
there. It got hot, hotter than the last summer, and a old lady died in
her house ’cause she was too weak to open some windows.
We’d see Dee’s mama working as the greeter at the Walmart. If she
recognized you she’d say, Seen Dee? Dee Switcher? and most of the
time we just shook our heads, stared at our shoes till we got to the
magazines aisle. Guns and girls, we needed more info on both.
Some of us got for-real girlfriends. Some of us snuck in to their
rooms at night and made love, you had to call it making love or your
girl got mad, to these girls while you listened to their dads sawing
logs just to the other side of the wall, you biting your girl’s pillow
hard so you wouldn’t make no noise, you ignoring how sometimes
your girl just laid there, her fingertips on your back limp and unin-
terested, you despite the dud your girl turned out to be feeling like
your bottom half was exploding up into your top.
Dee one time punched a girl in the mouth, she’d been crying hard
just before, her face ruined, black smears down her cheeks and her
upper lip all glistened with snot. By that time we knew girls some-
times got ugly. Dee got sent home, came back the next day with her
makeup all set again. Lips all wet. Eyes so blue you got to feeling
indecent. See, we had seen Dee, we’d seen her a lot, but back then we
had our eyes on all the girls, and over time it got to be hard to see
how losing one was such a tragedy.18.
Glossolalia
by Kyle Minor
“Are you interested in me because I’m a girl or because I love Jesus?”
“I am interested in you because I like you.”
“But if I didn’t love Jesus, would you still be interested in me?”
“I would like to think that I would be interested in you no matter
what.”
“But if I didn’t love Jesus, I don’t think I would be the same
person.”
“If you didn’t love Jesus, I think in some ways you would be the
same person.”
“But I wouldn’t see the world the same way, I wouldn’t read the
same things, I wouldn’t make the same choices, I wouldn’t be around
the same people.”
“But I think you would still like a lot of the same things. You
would still be a ski instructor in the winter. You would still spend
the summer here on the beach. You would still run. You would still
bodysurf. You would still be physically very beautiful. You still would
be a person who cares about other people, and you still, probably,
would have taught me to bodyboard.”
“But I used to be a person who didn’t love Jesus. I used to make
different choices. Like when I was a freshman in college, there was
this older guy, and he used to come into my room and sleep in my
bed and he knew how to do things with his hands and his mouth. He
knew how to make me feel things.”160
Kyle Minor
“You didn’t have sex with him even though you didn’t yet love
Jesus.”
“I didn’t have sex with him because I had an idea of Jesus, but I
didn’t yet really know Jesus. I thought I did, but I didn’t.”
“But you prayed to Jesus, didn’t you?”
“I did pray to Jesus, but not in tongues.”
“When you start to pray in tongues?”
“When I was filled up with the Holy Spirit.”
“Is that when you stopped messing around with this guy?”
“No. It was later. There were other guys. In Madrid, this one guy
took me to an R.E.M. concert.”
“Did it make you feel dirty to mess around with him?”
“No. It made me feel good. But I still felt empty inside.”
“How did you learn how to pray in tongues?”
“I prayed to be filled up with the Holy Spirit, and then I was given
the gift.”
“Can you do it on command?”
“I can do it anytime, if that’s what you mean.”
“Can I hear you do it?”
“Would you like to pray with me?”
“Will you do it if I pray with you?”
“When I pray I do it. It comes naturally.”
“How do you know what it is you are saying if you are speaking a
language you don’t know?”
“I don’t know what I am saying. It is my spirit that knows what I
am saying. My spirit is communing directly with God’s spirit. I can’t
explain it, but I can feel it, like this energy pulsing through me.”
“If I held your hand, could I feel the energy, too?”
“I feel like you are being glib.”
“I am not being glib. I just feel like this is something I don’t un-
derstand but I really do want to understand. I want to be a person
who is open-minded to new experiences.”
“Take my hand. Here. Take my other hand. Let’s pray.”
“What did you think just now, when I was speaking in tongues?”
“I thought a lot of the sounds were repeated and there were aG los sola l ia
161
lot of consonant clusters. I heard maybe some sounds that sounded
like German and some sounds that sounded like Hebrew or Arabic
maybe. There were also a lot of sounds that you don’t make when
you speak in English, like rolling your R’s and flattening out your O
sounds.”
“That’s true. I have noticed those things, too.”
“Do you ever try to think about recording what you say when you
say it? Like, maybe you could do some code-breaking and make a
dictionary.”
“Again, I feel like maybe you are being glib.”
“Hear me out. I’m being serious. The idea is, you are speaking a
language that people don’t speak on Earth, except people who speak
the language of angels. So consequently, if you follow the logic, it’s a
real language. So wouldn’t it have the things a real language has, like
grammar and syntax and vocabulary? And if that’s so, couldn’t you
study it just like you could study any other language?”
“That’s movie stuff. That’s like something starring Patricia Ar-
quette.”
“Why not, though? There’s people who do this for a living. They
go over to Papua New Guinea or wherever, and they spend time
around a language, and then they reconstruct it, even though when
they first get there they don’t know the first thing about it.”
“That’s missing the whole point.”
“Why?”
“Because if you knew the language, then the purity of the com-
munication would be lost. You’d start crafting all the words instead
of the spirit that indwells in you crafting the words.”
“But—and here I’m not being glib, I’m just trying to under-
stand—don’t you want to know what it is you are speaking to Jesus
or the angels or whatever?”
“You don’t pray to angels.”
“But it’s an angel language, right?”
“The idea is that you’re not in control. You’re giving yourself over
to it.”
“Is that why you jerk your body to the left when you pray in
tongues?”162
Kyle Minor
“That’s a manifestation.”
“Why do you do it?”
“I don’t do it. It comes over me when I give myself over to the
Spirit.”
“Does it happen to everyone who speaks in tongues?”
“Some people fall down like they are dead.”
“That’s slain in the Spirit.”
“Right. Some people fall into fits of laughter. Some people bark
like dogs, but not too many people. I don’t want to judge, but I think
sometimes when that happens a lot it can be for show. But I don’t
know.”
“That’s something that worries me. It’s a little bit frightening,
don’t you think, like on TV, when a lot of people are doing it all
around, and there’s this ungodly cacophony?”
“That’s the fear of the Lord you’re feeling.”
“How can you be sure?”
“How can you be sure of anything? You know. I know. I know that
I know that I know.”
“Here this stuff is at odds with logic, maybe, I think.”
“I think that’s a wrong way to think about it, but tell me what
you’re thinking.”
“I took this philosophy class. Dr. Willard Reed. He was talking
about the distinction between belief and knowledge. He said that
knowledge is problematic. You can’t really know stuff that isn’t some-
how verifiable. Like you didn’t see it with your own eyes, or experi-
ence it yourself, or there hasn’t been some kind of consensus among
the people who study the thing. And even then there’s problems.
How do you know you aren’t fooling yourself? Or how do you know
the consensus might not be wrong? Like the consensus used to be
that the earth was flat. And on top of that, how do you know that the
universe didn’t just begin two seconds ago? After a while, everything
starts to be belief.”
“I don’t guess it matters much which is which, then, if it’s all so
slippery.”
“I don’t guess it does.”
“But what kind of way is that to live? Walking around not being
sure of anything. Everything tentative. No place for boldness. NoG los sola l ia
163
place for meaning. Wouldn’t that just throw you into some kind of
paralytic feedback loop or something? Wouldn’t you just be staring
at your navel forever?”
“Not necessarily, but I don’t know. You just described a lot of the
way I think a lot of the time.”
“That’s why you have to let go control. That’s what praying in the
Spirit is. You’re letting go that control and giving yourself over to
your Creator. It’s an act of faith in the unseen. Although, I have to
tell you, there are things I have seen.”
“What kinds of things?”
“Visions. Gold dust.”
“Gold dust?”
“There have been meetings where the Spirit of God has come
down and the manifestation was gold dust that began to appear on
everyone’s shoulders.”
“Manifestations, like the jerking to the left.”
“I’m not going to say any more if you’re going to mock every-
thing.”
“Honestly, I’m not mocking. I really want to know. Tell me about
the visions.”
“Once I was praying in the Spirit, and I had a vision of a golden
vessel.”
“Like a ship?”
“Like a vase or a container. It was on a cloth of purple silk. There
was an angel there, and he was holding out his hands.”
“What did the vision mean?”
“For a long time I didn’t know what the vision meant. But then my
friend who is a prophetess—quietly, quietly a prophetess, like, literally,
hardly anybody knows. She said it was a message about being a vessel
for the Spirit, and about a royal calling, but I had to give myself to it.”
“That’s why you write the magazine articles?”
“That’s why I’m writing the books. That’s why I’m traveling
around so much. To speak into people’s hearts and lives.”
“But you like it, too. You’re good at it. You don’t want to work at
a desk job.”
“That’s true. I don’t want to be chained to a desk. I was made this
way for a reason.”164
Kyle Minor
“Any other visions?”
“Yes.”
“Tell me.”
“Another time. Later.”
“All right. It’s a lot to risk, right? Telling me all these things?”
“It’s nothing to risk. I already have given myself over to all of it.”
“I can wait. I want to get to know you.”
“Would you hold me now?”
“Yes.”
“Don’t come over here inside my blanket. You stay inside your
blanket and I’ll stay inside my blanket, and you can hold me that way,
with the separate blankets.”
“Do you like it here?”
“I’m uncomfortable here.”
“Why?”
“I don’t like the cold, and I don’t like all the soldiers in their uni-
forms, and I don’t like all the military songs. I think I might be a
pacifist.”
“But these are the men and women who give their lives to keep us
free.”
“I like watching the football game, and I don’t mind cheering for
Air Force, but I am uncomfortable with the whole martial atmo-
sphere. It seems to me to have a lot to do with death and killing.”
“But sacrificial death and killing, don’t you think? Not death or
killing that anyone wants to do.”
“I don’t know if that’s true. That’s what basic training is for, I
think. To break down the part of a person’s conscience where they
have this inhibition against killing, so they can want to kill, so they
can kill at will, to save their lives or save their buddy or fulfill their
mission.”
“I think that’s a selfish way to think about it. Because it’s because
of these guys and gals here that you have the freedom to say some-
thing like that.”
“I can’t deny it. I know that’s true. That complicates the way I feel
about it.”G los sola l ia
165
“You are shivering. Here, let’s combine our blankets.”
“Can we put them under our legs, too, because these bleachers are
so cold.”
“You know, if you moved out here with me, I wonder if you could
take the cold all winter, if this is what it does to you.”
“Are you really here for good? I mean, you were in Florida, and
now you’re here, and you’ve been back and forth. But maybe you
would just end up back in Florida.”
“I don’t want to be anchored anyplace. I want to be free to move
around. But I like cold places. I wouldn’t mind moving to Alaska. My
aunt has a hotel in Alaska. I like the idea of spending some time there
with her, helping her run it for a while.”
“What if you—even we—had children? Wouldn’t you want to stay
put for a while, for the sake of stability?”
“I don’t want to have children, ever. I mean, I love children. I
think I would be an okay mother. But the things I’m meant to do
with my life would, I think, make it very difficult to have children.”
“I didn’t know this about you, that you wouldn’t want children.
It surprises me.”
“This is why it’s good, I think, you came out here. We need to sort
these things out. We need to find out if we love each other.”
“I feel like you’re holding some things back.”
“That’s true, but here we are, and I want to watch this football
game since I paid forty bucks each for the tickets.”
“Is it okay with you if I put my hand on your knee while I drive?”
“Yes. I’m very happy that you put your hand on my knee.”
“It’s interesting, you know. Whenever I relate to you in a physical
way, you respond very positively. But whenever I relate to you in a
spiritual way, it gets complicated, and I don’t know how to read you,
exactly.”
“I feel like in some ways they are different issues.”
“I don’t think they are in any way separable.”
“I feel like the physical expressions of love are very important and
they mean something.”
“I don’t disagree. That’s why I won’t let you kiss me.”166
Kyle Minor
“But it’s strange. You will let me do other things that seem to me
to be more intimate than kissing is.”
“I feel like, if you and I were kissing, I would be giving myself over
to you in a way that I’m not ready to do.”
“Why is that?”
“Because I think that spiritually we are in very different places. I
think you’re open to spiritual things, but I don’t think that you are
really very far along. And I can’t tell if you are open to them because
you really desire them or if you are just open to them because you
want to be closer to me.”
“That’s a fair question to raise. I don’t know, either, sometimes.
There’s a lot of things going on very quickly, and it can be confusing
to me.”
“Also, I don’t know if I love you.”
“Do you think love is some kind of lightning flash? Like it strikes
you and then the reverberations just ring out forever?”
“That’s how love is with God, I think. And I think that’s one
thing you haven’t really entered into the fullness of.”
“I think that maybe love is a choice that people make.”
“That’s not very romantic.”
“I don’t know what good romance is, sometimes. I mean, it’s good
to be romantic, and it’s good to have feelings. But I’ve had feelings
for people before, and they’ve had feelings for me, but what was lack-
ing, I think, was a choice to make a life together. A commitment.”
“It’s very scary to me to hear you speak that way. Because it seems
very mechanical to me. It seems in keeping with many of the things
that seem cold about you, to me. Everything seems so reasoned, so
calculated. It makes me think that everything about the way you ap-
proach me must be some kind of calculation.”
“If that were true, though, wouldn’t I just tell you everything you
wanted to hear all the time? It seems to me evidence of good faith
that we have these kinds of conversations all the time, and that we
have these, for lack of a better word, arguments, or disagreements.”
“I don’t enjoy arguing or disagreeing.”
“Me either.”
“I’m just going to keep my hand on your leg here, except when IG los sola l ia
167
have to shift gears, until we get up to the top of the mountain, okay? I
just want to enjoy the ride and enjoy you and enjoy this kind of close-
ness while we look at the mountains and enjoy the creation and all its
wonder. It’s not a slight to you. It’s just something I need right now, if
it’s all right with you. But I want to keep my hand on your leg, okay?”
“Of course. I love that you have your hand on my leg. It is really
nice.”
“That right there is called Witch’s Titty.”
“Why?”
“Because look at it. It looks like a Witch’s Titty.”
“Yeah. I guess it does.”
“You know what I think whenever I pass this place?”
“Tell me.”
“There was this dance in high school, and there was this boy, let’s
call him Bob, he asked me to this dance. He was a senior and I was a
freshman. I got all dressed up and he got me a corsage. When you go
with a senior and you’re a freshman, it’s exciting, you know, because
he picked you. You’re the one he picked, and he passed over older
girls to pick you. And before I left, my dad told him he could keep
me out until midnight but no later. And he kissed me on the cheek,
my dad, and he said I love you and we trust you, me and your mother.
So we went to this dance, and it was all right. There was music, there
was food, there was dancing. And afterward, I wanted this guy, Bob,
to kiss me. It was something I really wanted. I had built it up big-time
in my mind. He drove me out to this park I’m going to take you to
later, out by the ski lifts. It was the place where all the kids went to sit
in their cars and make out. We had to drive past Witch’s Titty to get
there. And I knew that was why we were going to this park, and it was
okay with me. But when we got there, this guy, Bob, he started acting
really nervous. He was staring straight ahead and he started sweating
at his forehead. I felt sorry for him because I could tell he was very
nervous. Then he said, like he was apologizing, “This is just some-
thing I really have to do.” And he leaned toward me and I thought
he was going to kiss me. But then he put his hands up my dress. I
wanted to say no to him, but I was so surprised I guess my voice168
Kyle Minor
caught in my throat. And then I put my hand down there to push his
hand away and he grabbed my wrist and held it so hard that it bruised
a ring around my wrist where he was holding it. Then he put his hand
in my panties and he stuck his finger up inside me and poked around.
It didn’t hurt. It didn’t feel good, either, but it didn’t hurt. Then he
just held his finger in there like that for a while and moved it around.
Then he drove me home.”
“What did you do?”
“I didn’t do anything. I went inside and went to bed and stared
at the ceiling for a long time. It wasn’t until a lot later that I cried.”
“So nothing happened to him?”
“He’s still around. We became friends again later. I forgave him.”
“I don’t forgive him.”
“You don’t have to. But that’s something you’ll have to work
on. Unforgiveness. Like the things you sometimes say about your
mother.”
“I just feel protective of you. I don’t like it that for him there were
no consequences.”
“You carry the consequences around inside yourself, don’t you?”
“Me or him?”
“Something about you reminds me of him sometimes.”
“That makes me feel terrible that you would say that.”
“I just think there’s things you should know about me if we are
really going to think about being together.”
“Is that what we’re doing?”
“It’s just something I thought of because we were driving by
Witch’s Titty. That’s all.”
“When a long time passes like this and you’re so quiet, I wonder
what you’re thinking.”
“Do you think you have the right to know what I’m thinking?”
“I had a girlfriend in college one time who used to say things like
that. She used to say, ‘You know what I like about my thoughts?
They’re mine. I don’t have to share them with you.’”
“Did she say that after you were prying at her to give up her
thoughts?”G los sola l ia
169
“Usually, yes.”
“All right. What do you want to know?”
“So many things.”
“You choose one thing. Any one thing. I’ll tell you.”
“One thing. Okay, the visions. You told me one time you would
tell me more about the visions.”
“You see this here?”
“What? The road? The mountains? The sky?”
“The motion, through space. Through time, too. Once I was
driving this road, and I had a vision of motion through space and
through time.”
“While you were driving?”
“I saw all of creation as though it were a liquid, and we were swim-
ming through it. Me, and all the creatures, land creatures and water
creatures, too. The water was a deep blue, sparkling, but also translu-
cent. You could see through it. And the rock faces were shimmering
like precious jewels.”
“Was this a distraction while you were driving?”
“It was almost as if I were no longer driving anymore. I had given
up control and although in the physical world my hands were on
the wheel, and even though in the vision I was moving through a
space not unlike the one we are moving through right now, and even
though I had given up control, and even though there was that drop-
off there just out your window, a couple thousand feet, maybe, I
wasn’t afraid. What I was mostly was in awe.”
“Was it like you imagined seeing these things, or was it like you
actually were moving through these things?”
“It was physically real. I could even smell the perfume of it.”
“What did it smell like?”
“There was a sweetness to it. There was a honey-and-almond qual-
ity to it.”
“Was the car moving through it, too?”
“The car went away. It was just my body being carried forward on
the current of it.”
“Sometimes when you talk about these things, I want to believe
you, and I want to understand, because I do believe you, but it is170
Kyle Minor
very hard to believe you, and it is very hard to try to know how to
understand.”
“Because you aren’t yet seeing with the eyes of the Spirit.”
“Because I haven’t had experiences like this, and I’ve never known
anyone else who has. There is a certain light that gets in your eyes
when you talk about them, and it is a little bit frightening to me.”
“That’s something you have to let go.”
“Maybe so, but I don’t know how.”
“You do it by doing it.”
“That’s easy to say, but if it were easy to do, wouldn’t many other
people do it? If nothing else, to speak the tongues of angels and har-
vest the gold dust and sell it at market rate?”
“When you speak of it that way, it makes me angry.”
“I don’t mean to make you angry, and I am not making fun. I like
you and possibly want to love you. I’m just trying to look at what
you’re saying from all different directions and turn it over in my mind
that way.”
“That’s not letting go. That’s holding on to control.”
“I don’t know what to say.”
“Maybe it would be better not to say anything else for a while.”
“Okay. All right. Okay.”
“Rise and shine.”
“I’m so tired.”
“It’s morning.”
“It’s dark.”
“The idea is to hit the slopes early.”
“Really, I’m wiped. I’m sorry.”
“I’m turning on the light.”
“Please don’t. Really. I don’t know if it’s the altitude or the nonstop
going or just maybe general emotional exhaustion. I’m not trying to
bail out on you. I’m still willing to ski. But my body doesn’t want
to get up so early right now, and I feel like I should listen to it so I
don’t get sick.”
“It smells like sickness in here. Your breath has a sinus quality to it.”
“That’s what I’m talking about.”G los sola l ia
171
“The only way out is through. Please, get up. Let’s ski.”
“You know people there. Why don’t you go on without me, and let
me catch up with you this afternoon.”
“Really?”
“Please understand.”
“Really? This is really the choice you are making?”
“Please?”
“There are many ways in which I feel more like your mother than
like a person with whom you might be falling in love.”
“This is because I didn’t go skiing this morning.”
“It’s so many things. You are, I have come to believe, a fundamen-
tally passive person.”
“What do you mean?”
“Like it was me who drove all the way here from Colorado Springs.”
“I can’t drive a stick shift.”
“I offered to teach you.”
“Don’t you think it would be horrible to try to learn while driving
up the steepest mountains in the whole country?”
“Those are in Alaska.”
“Those drop-offs, though.”
“But that’s a spirit of fear.”
“That’s a spirit of safety. I want to be safe. I want you to be safe.
I don’t mind learning to drive a stick, but I want to learn in a park-
ing lot.”
“I have to ask you to clean up after I make dinner, or to do the
dishes.”
“We’re staying in all these houses where friends of yours are out
of town for the winter. I don’t know what I should and shouldn’t be
touching or when it is an imposition to take the initiative. It’s a situa-
tion where I feel like you’re in the driver’s seat and I’m mostly taking
my cues from you.”
“I’m thinking about gender roles here. It seems to me like the
man should be taking the leadership roles in a relationship. But you
are always taking your cues from me. I am the de facto leader, even
though I am a woman.”172
Kyle Minor
“There have been many instances where I have tried to take the
lead, but you have made it clear that you don’t like the choice I make.”
“That’s what I mean by passive. You just concede the high ground
to me.”
“I don’t think you would respond well to being strong-armed.”
“With love you have to do it. With love.”
“To me, the more loving thing would be more of a give-and-take.
More of a partnering kind of thing.”
“I feel like, because you are so passive, that one day the anger is
going to come spilling out. I feel like you don’t tell me when you are
really angry.”
“I have only one time been angry, but I knew it wasn’t right to be
angry, so I didn’t say anything about it to you.”
“When?”
“When you were still living in Florida and you went to visit that
guy in North Carolina and you rode on the back of his motorcycle
and you called me and told me what a good time you were having
there on the back of his motorcycle.”
“That’s true. That was fun. Really, truly fun. I loved visiting him,
and I loved going for a ride on his motorcycle.”
“That made me angry, but I didn’t say anything because I didn’t
feel like I had the right to say anything because I don’t own you, we
aren’t committed, you have the right to make your own choices.”
“So why get angry?”
“Because I wanted you to be having fun with me and not that guy
on that motorcycle.”
“You don’t own a motorcycle.”
“I don’t even like motorcycles. People I knew kept getting killed
on motorcycles.”
“So you were worried about me getting killed?”
“No, I was mostly worried about you having fun. And one other
thing.”
“What?”
“I know some women who had orgasms from riding motorcycles.
I had a picture of you with your arms around his waist, riding those
mountain roads, holding on to him, having an orgasm.”G los sola l ia
173
“So you weren’t concerned about whether I was going to get
killed?”
“Did you have an orgasm?”
“Of all of the questions you should never have asked, this is the
number one question you never should have asked.”
“Your flight leaves in six hours, so I think we ought to leave in three.
That gives us an hour to get to the airport and an hour for security
and baggage and another hour cushion in case we hit bad traffic.”
“Let me finish packing my things, and then do you want to have
dinner together before I leave?”
“You can have dinner at the airport, and it’s too early anyway,
don’t you think? I don’t think I’ll be hungry until much later.”
“The reason I was thinking dinner was I have a feeling that after
today we may not keep seeing each other anymore.”
“I haven’t decided about that yet.”
“If that is what happens, I want to spend one last nice time with
you and let you know that I cared about you and that I care about
you.”
“That’s something I want, too. I’m going into the bedroom and
lie down while you finish packing. I’m tired, and I know you’re tired.
When you’re done packing, why don’t you come into the bedroom
and lie down and rest?”
“I love holding you.”
“Shh.”
“I mean it. This is something I will take with me when I leave.”
“Shh.”
“The reason I can’t let you kiss me is the same reason as always. Even
though right now I want you to kiss me. Do you understand?”
“I don’t understand.”
“I want you to understand. I don’t want you to be hurt.”
“I will be hurt, but let’s not talk about it right now and interrupt
what is nice.”
“Will you do one thing for me? When we get to the airport?”174
Kyle Minor
“Yes?”
“When you go through the gate, and you want to turn around and
look at me, don’t look back.”
“I know what it means, for you to say that to me now.”
“Shh. Put your face against mine. Touch your face to mine.”
“I don’t know what to say.”
“Don’t say anything. Just put your face against my face.”
“Language fails.”
“Just close your eyes and let go for a while. Let’s be together.
Let’s be.”
“But what does it mean?”
“You don’t have to understand what it means. I don’t understand
what it means. It’s not less beautiful if you understand it.”
“I want it to mean when we get to the gate I’m going to turn
around and take one last look at you.”
“Shh.”
“So I can remember you until the next time I see you.”
“Shh.”
“I love the way it feels, being so close to you.”
“No more words.”19.
God’s Plan
by Daniel Browne
Finally. That’s what I thought when the reporter from the Times
called about Greg.
Every reading I went to, every opening, every show from Chelsea
to Bushwick, I talked about Greg and Cara: about our time together
at Wilmott, Greg’s music, and the tragedy that took him from us. I’d
corner any art-schooled, trust-funded loft-dweller who’d listen and
say, “Someone needs to tell Greg’s story.”
Invariably they’d say, “You’re a writer. Who better than you?” So
I’d have to explain that of course I’d written about Greg, how could I
not, but I only know how to write plays, and getting the backing for
a show about him, enough to do it right, on the scale he deserved,
was tough right now. If they knew me, or knew of me, this would sur-
prise them. “Didn’t you win that Kennedy Center Young Playwrights
thing?” they’d ask. “That’s got to count for something, right?” I’d tell
them that was a long time ago, another lifetime, when Greg was still
with us and I believed Broadway was just waiting for me to remake it,
and Cara was the spark that kept the fire burning in both of us. The
music industry had nearly missed out on Greg, and I wasn’t going to
just wait around for the theater industry to wake up from its stupor.
What I needed was someone who could get the word out right away.
Someone who could make Greg’s story, our story, into news.
I never doubted the call would come. I’d prayed for it. Don’t get176
Daniel Browne
me wrong: that wasn’t the source of my confidence. I mean, I figured
God owed us one, me and Cara, but I’m not the kind of Christian
who thinks of Him as a wish-granting genie. The reason I was so cer-
tain was that I’d put in the time. I’d gotten to know the right people.
That was why the three of us had come to New York in the first place.
Truth be told, Greg and Cara never really settled in. They missed
Ohio something awful, especially Wilmott, with its red brick and
redder maples. I tried to get them excited about steampunk exhibi-
tions and political burlesque, but the two of them preferred to hole up
in their crummy apartment in the East Village, playing at the domes-
ticity they would have had if they’d stayed behind: Cara canned green
beans; Greg searched the animal shelters for an Irish setter in need of
a home, though he knew their place was too small. I’d forward them
invitations, and Greg would just say he was allergic to cheese cubes.
So I had to network for all of us. You see, I said silently to Greg when
the reporter called, I told you it would pay off in the end.
He said his name was Mike. “Amy Wright told me about your
friend.”
Amy had been in a few of my one-acts back when I was killing
myself trying to get into festivals. You try hard not to be too im-
pressed by people in this town, but I was impressed that Amy had
an in at the Times. I’d been hoping to get to someone at New York
magazine, maybe Esquire. But the Times?
“How do you know Amy?” I asked.
“We dated last summer,” Mike said, which didn’t exactly answer
the question but was enough for me. That’s what I admire about New
York: people are sophisticated about their relationships. They hook
up, they break up, but they stay cool, keep each other in mind. The
door is always open to exes—and friends of exes.
“What she told me was really sad and interesting,” Mike went on.
“She said I needed to talk to you to get the whole story.”
I waited a beat to answer. I’m an award-winning playwright. I
know how to build suspense.
“He was a genius and cancer ate his brain. That’s the story, man.”
Mike cleared his throat. Some directors and actors I know hate
that sound, but I understand what it means: someone in the audience
is unnerved. You’ve got your hook in him and he feels the pull.G o d’s Pla n
177
“Could we meet in person, maybe tomorrow?” Mike said. “It
doesn’t feel right to talk about this on the phone.”
“I’ve got prayer group till ten,” I said, “and I teach an improv class
at five. Anytime between, I’m yours.”
I suggested we meet at the High Line. I can’t stand hanging out in
the coffee shops, surrounded by all the laptop jockeys working on
their “projects.” None of the successful artists I know do it. If you
want to be out in the world, be out in the world.
For decades, the High Line was a blight; now it’s an inspiration,
tall grass and taller flowers sprouting between rusted rails, all kinds
of cool art installations claiming the dead space between buildings.
And who’s responsible? Just a couple of guys—one of them a writer—
guys with a vision, guys who knew how to line up the right people.
The High Line is my kind of place.
Mike was about my size, which is to say short, but he was stocky
where I was wiry, grizzled where I was clean-shaven. And his
clothes—no comparison there. The summer between high school
and Wilmott, I signed up for an exchange program, spent a month
in China. The lasting legacy of that trip was the five three-piece suits
I had made to order, still the best hundred bucks I ever spent. I was
wearing the gray pinstripe for my meeting with Mike, a white shirt
open at the collar, no tie. Mike was wearing jeans and a Columbia
hoodie. Taking him in, I had to revise my opinion of Amy just a little.
She slept with him? New York Times, I reminded myself.
“Which section do you write for?” I asked.
Mike took one hand out of the marsupial pocket of his hoodie and
scratched his beard. “I freelance for a few different sections.”
A freelancer. I smiled to hide my annoyance. I wondered if he’d
pitched the story yet, if the Times was even interested.
“I think this would be a good fit for Our Towns,” Mike said.
I’d never heard of Our Towns. The name made me suspicious that
he was going to portray us as a bunch of hicks who’d been chewed
up and spit out by the big city. Be cool, I told myself. He hasn’t even
heard what you have to say yet.
“Hey, you’re the writer of this little piece,” I said. “I’m just the
subject.”178
Daniel Browne
Mike squinted at me. “Isn’t Greg the subject?”
“Source,” I said. “I meant I’m just a source.” On impulse, I
grabbed his shoulder and squeezed. “But you’ve got to understand.
This is a story about the three of us. Greg, Cara, and me.”
I looked Mike straight in the eye and waited. He nodded and
pulled his other hand out of that baggy front pocket. It was holding
a tape recorder.
“How do you want me to start?” I asked. But I already knew how
I was going to start.
“Amy said you met Greg in college?”
All three of us were from small towns outside Cincinnati. Wilmott
was something else altogether, a tiny campus lost in rolling farm-
land. It was a place for church-raised kids to prepare for a decent,
thoughtful life of hard work and service. But even out in the heart-
land, among the righteous, there are the weirdos, the ones who can
recite every word of Monty Python by heart, who hear God’s voice
more clearly in Jeff Buckley than the chapel hymns. That was me
and Greg. He was the first to respond to my bulletin board posting,
“Sketch Comedians Wanted for Something Completely Different.”
And when I played him “Hallelujah” for the first time—the two of
us sitting Indian-style on my dorm room floor—the tears streamed
down his face onto the lumpy dun carpet.
Years later, when Nonesuch finally called with the contract offer,
Greg told me he owed it all to me. If I hadn’t introduced him to Jeff
Buckley that night, he would’ve never known to write his own songs.
If I hadn’t been there to lead the charge, to grab him by the scruff
of the neck, and say, “I know this is what God wants for us,” he
would’ve never come to New York. The Kennedy Center thing was a
real boost for a young artist, but Greg’s success and the part I played
in it—that’s what I’ll always be most proud of.
Mike nodded every so often, but it was hard to read him. He could’ve
been hanging on my every word or weighing his dinner options.
“So you and Greg were tight from the start,” he said. “Where does
Cara come in?”G o d’s Pla n
179
I smiled, the way only the thought of Cara can make me smile.
“Cara? Cara doesn’t come in, man. She’s the through line.”
Mike opened his mouth, but before he could ask for an explana-
tion, inspiration struck. As they often do, the right words just came
to me: “Greg and I were the stars of our little universe, okay? Cara
was the sky.”
Greg and I majored in Divinity, took Introduction to Pastoral
Ministry together our second semester. Cara was the only girl in
our section. Of course, we both noticed her severe beauty: long,
straight hair; sharp nose and chin; delicate, ballet-slippered foot
tapping under her desk, like an urgent telegraph. I also noticed
her noticing Greg. How could she not? The guy was six feet tall,
captain of the swim team, jaw like Batman; he played guitar on the
quad and held his sides when he laughed. I saw from the begin-
ning how it would play out. I swear I even saw myself presiding at
their wedding. And I was never once competitive or even jealous,
because I knew I would be her best friend, just as I was Greg’s, and
the intimacy among the three of us would be absolute. That was
God’s plan for us.
She was always the practical one. In that first class together, while
Greg and I debated the finer points of theology, challenging our pro-
fessor on predestination and biblical literalism, she asked questions:
How does a ministry support itself? Do pastors get 401ks? A year
later, when Greg and I had the shared revelation that our true calling
was art, she switched majors without thinking twice, graduated with
a degree in business administration. I teased her, of course, called her
“Business in the Front, Business in the Back,” but she was unflap-
pable. “Someone’s got to have their feet on the ground,” she said.
“God knows you boys don’t.”
She booked Greg gigs around campus and even a few engagements
at townie bars, unheard of at the time. For me, she found rehearsal
space, wrangled budget-conscious alternatives to my grandiose set
and costume designs. When my first student play went up, she lorded
over the till, refused to let us blow the take—all forty-five dollars
of it—on a celebratory keg. I knew then, no matter who I ended up180
Daniel Browne
sharing a bed or a name with, I’d never be more cared for. I’d never
feel more loved.
Our senior year, when I found out I’d won the Kennedy Center
award, she was the first one I told. The play was about a minister who
defends a painter accused of making sacrilegious art. I’d been reading
about the showdown between Giuliani and the Brooklyn Museum,
saw the potential there. Sure enough, there was interest in New York.
I’d known for a year the city was our next move, but I also knew I’d
need Cara’s help convincing Greg.
He’d spent the previous summer gigging around Ohio, winning
converts in Cincinnati, Columbus, Cleveland. Somewhere along the
way, he’d found his voice. The crowds in those coffee shops and base-
ment clubs must have felt like they were at the Gaslight in ’62 seeing
a kid named Dylan for the first time, only Greg could sing like an
angel and work a room like Sinatra at the Sands. Sometimes the stories
he told—dead-on impressions of his brothers, Billy Graham, the Irish
setter he had as a kid—went on longer than the songs, which admit-
tedly were still working themselves out. Seriously, if you didn’t get to
see him live, you really missed something. Seems like the record com-
pany finds a new Jeff Buckley concert in the archives every few months.
The only tape of Greg singing live is in a shoebox in my closet.
The point is Greg was happy with the way things were going. The
buzz was building; the tour he had planned for the summer after
graduation would take him as far as Chicago. He could be an artist
and still be close to home. Cara was thinking about a house with a
yard, trading stocks on the Internet, a kid bobbing on her knee. But
all I had to say was, “You know he’s too good to stay.” She let it go
with a sigh.
“God’s plan?” she said.
I took her hand. “No doubt.”
A few days after we made the decision, the two of them gave me
a card with a picture Greg had drawn: three hands clasped together.
Inside, Cara had written in her precise hand, “Will you marry us?”
I still have it in the same shoebox with the tape of Greg performing.
By then, I was an ordained minister. Greg hadn’t bothered taking the
licensing exam. He figured, I’m an artist now, what’s the point? I wasG o d’s Pla n
181
just as committed to writing as he was to music, but remember, I’d
seen this moment coming. Besides, I figured being a man of the cloth
would set me apart once we got to the godless cesspool of New York.
I performed the ceremony in the backyard of his parents’ house.
Cara walked down the aisle barefoot in a simple white slip dress.
Greg and I received her, he in a rented tux, me in the most formal of
my Chinese suits. I spoke of what it means to have a path in life, of
how important it is to have companions walking that path alongside
you, and how blessed I felt to be walking with Greg and with Cara on
the same path, together. They kissed, and then Greg sang a song he’d
written just the day before that brought all of us to tears. After the
picnic-style dinner, he and I dusted off some of our freshman-year
sketch comedy repertoire. I’ve got to say, we killed.
Cara and I made the move in June. The plan was to live together
until Greg joined us in September—he had to go through with the
tour—and then I’d find my own place. I was living off my Kennedy
Center prize, taking meetings with agents and producers. I tried to
convince Cara to take it easy for a while, explore the city with me,
but being Cara, she signed up with a temp agency right away. We’d
reconvene in the evenings in our fourth-floor walk-up. No furniture,
so we’d lie side by side on the floor, just like we did at Wilmott, drink
wine out of pint glasses, talk about our days, about Greg.
“Was it different when it was just the two of you?”
Easy, I told myself. He’s a reporter. He has to ask.
“Man, everything was different. I was a professional writer. Me,
a preacher’s son from Nowhere, Ohio. Living above a lesbian biker
club. Cara was the only part of my life that wasn’t different.”
Mike obliged me with a half-smile. “I just find it amazing. Greg’s
off doing his thing while his bride and his best friend are living this
exciting new life together. And he’s cool with it?”
“Greg was an amazing guy,” I said. “Isn’t that the whole point of
this?”
Mike broke eye contact to look out at the river behind me. I could
almost hear the machinery in his skull humming as it generated cyni-
cal thoughts.182
Daniel Browne
“I talked to Greg on the phone every day,” I said. “I could hear in
his voice how badly he wanted to be here.”
Mike shifted his gaze back to me. “And you?”
I stared back as hard as I could. “If I’d known how little time we
had, I would’ve told him to drop everything. I would’ve told him not
to stop for red lights.”
That last bit was a spin on an old Aaron Sorkin line. You know
what they say: good writers borrow, the great ones steal. But the heat
I put behind it was all mine.
Mike looked a little crumpled, like a balloon slowly losing air. A
soft click broke the silence between us: the tape in his recorder hit-
ting the end of Side A.
“How long was Greg here before he died?”
I wanted to tell him to flip the tape first, but I pushed the thought
out of my mind. An audience is like a wild animal—a moment’s hesi-
tation, and you’re dead.
“Ten months,” I said. “But we packed ten lifetimes into them.”
It took me a while to find my own place, so we all crammed in to-
gether for a few weeks. Even once I moved out, I ended up crashing
with them half the time anyway. It was the three of us again, the plan
was finally coming together, and it was both exactly and not at all like
I’d imagined it.
The friendship was strong as ever. Greg and I still cracked each
other up with our Cockney accents and inside jokes. Cara still rolled
her eyes. We still stayed up all night, playing each other music, won-
dering out loud why there’s so much great rock and roll made by
Christians but no great Christian rock. Cara still kept us honest and
on task, saying, “If you boys are just going to jerk each other off, we
could’ve stayed in Ohio.”
The part that didn’t live up to my expectations was the work. No,
not the work—Greg and I were both coming into our own as artists,
discovering what we could really do, realizing that God had given us
the green light. The problem was the city. The city didn’t care. My
play went up in a decent-sized black box off Broadway, but no one
reviewed it. Greg was getting gigs, even an industry showcase, but hisG o d’s Pla n
183
style wasn’t connecting with the skinny-jeans-and-mullets crowd. He
was too openhearted to play it cool.
After a couple of months, he started pining for his fan base back
home. “They want to like you. Here, they want to hate you.” I was
frustrated, too, but I wouldn’t give in to homesickness. Did he think
we weren’t going to struggle? He knew Proverbs as well as I did. “By
long suffering is a prince persuaded.” He answered me with, “Like
vinegar on a wound is one who sings songs to a troubled heart.” I
asked him if Cara was putting pressure on him, and he said no. I told
him if we left without making a name for ourselves we’d always feel
small-time. He said he wasn’t sure he minded being small-time. I
begged him to give it a year. He agreed.
Of course, no one has a more twisted sense of humor than God.
I should’ve known that when the big break came it would come
for Mr. I Don’t Mind Being Small-Time. One night, after opening
for an established local act, Greg left the club to find David Byrne
waiting for him on the street. Byrne said he’d never seen anything
quite like Greg before; the closest was this indigenous singer in Peru
who mixed plaintive ballads with traditional storytelling. He asked
to hear Greg’s demo, and when Greg said he didn’t have one, he of-
fered up his home studio. A month later the brass at Nonesuch were
drooling over the tape. A month after that, Greg’s voice was purling
through a Volkswagen ad—you know, the one with the good-look-
ing guy and the good-looking girl racing up opposite sides of a hill
in matching Rabbits. They both stop on a dime when they reach the
summit, the grilles of the cars almost touching, as if they’re about
to go at it like . . . well, rabbits. Greg sounds amused by the whole
thing, practically sighing, “See you there, see you there, with the red
leaves in your hair.”
When I saw that commercial, I’ll admit, I was finally jealous of
Greg. A singer-songwriter can just drag his guitar from joint to joint
until David Byrne steps out of the woodwork to be his guardian
angel. A playwright needs actors and directors and stagehands and
technicians. I’d decided I’d have to form my own company if I was
going to get anything done, but the prize money was dwindling, and
I didn’t have any upcoming commitments to entice the right people,184
Daniel Browne
the ones who could give my words the treatment they deserved. I
felt myself becoming a guy who’d done something once, while Greg
was striding from strength to strength, unassuming as ever. It had all
happened too fast. At my weakest, I wondered if I should’ve let him
go back to Ohio, if it would’ve made things easier for me.
God took care of that nonsense, too. The day of Greg’s first re-
cording session for his debut album, the headaches started. By the
end of the month, the tumor had been diagnosed, and I’d never be
jealous of my friend again. I knew if I did nothing else in my life but
help him through his trial, keep his spirits up so he could finish the
album and find peace, I’d have fulfilled my purpose.
Right before all this happened, Cara got a full-time job with one
of the companies she temped for. If it wasn’t for her health plan, Greg
wouldn’t even have gone to the doctor for his headaches. Eventually,
he would’ve collapsed, and even if we’d gotten him to the hospital in
time, we wouldn’t have been able to afford treatment.
As Greg got sicker, Cara wanted to quit so she could take care of
him. But she couldn’t lose the insurance. So I took care of him while
she worked. I slung his arm over my shoulder and helped him down
the four flights from his apartment to the street. In the studio, I held
him upright while he sang, even though he was a foot taller than me.
During those final sessions, he was determined to manage the pain
and pour every last drop of himself into the songs. Even when he
went blind in his left eye, his right eye just shined brighter, as long
as the tape was rolling and he was making his music. At the end of
the day, the light would go out and he’d collapse with exhaustion. I
spent the last of my money on cabs to take us home from the studio.
After Greg checked into the hospital for good, Cara and I would
stay with him most nights, sleeping in chairs. Once I woke up to the
sound of her choking on her own tears. Before I was even fully con-
scious, I’d reached over and laid my hand on hers.
Between sobs, she whispered, “How could God do this?”
“Do you think God gives people cancer?” I asked.
“Do you hear him screaming?” she said. “He’s begging for mercy.
Why won’t God show him mercy?”
I watched her chin tremble—the chin I’d always thought of as im-G o d’s Pla n
185
perious—and raised my hand to cup it. “He did,” I said, turning her
face toward mine. “He gave him you.”
Her lips parted for a moment, then closed again: the saddest smile
I’d ever see.
“And you,” she said. I wiped away a tear with my thumb.
Afternoon had faded into evening. I’d already blown off my improv
class. I still had my key to the walk-up, so I figured I’d wait for Cara
to come home from work. I sat on the futon where I’d slept so many
nights, looking through the doorless doorway at the cramped bed-
room. The bed was unmade, the sheets snarled and kicked aside. I
thought about how much better I liked this place when there was no
furniture in it, when Cara and I slept on an air mattress on the floor.
When the door opened, I was staring at a framed photo of Greg,
Cara, and me back at Wilmott, Cara smiling properly at the camera,
while Greg and I mug on either side of her. I’m fingering my chin
like a philosopher lost in thought, Greg raising his eyebrow like it’s
Santori Time.
“Who are those people?” I heard Cara say over my shoulder.
I set the picture aside. “Just a bunch of kids with a crazy dream.”
I got what I wanted: the Cara eye-roll. She dropped her company
tote bag on the floor. “Sorry I didn’t go to that thing last night. I
just . . . well, I didn’t want to, to be honest.”
“I met a reporter today,” I said. “To talk about Greg.”
Cara glanced at me, then ducked her head into the fridge. “So you
got what you wanted then. Beer?”
“He wants to talk to you.”
Cara didn’t answer. She was searching the one drawer in her kitch-
enette for a bottle opener.
“We can do it together,” I said.
“Did you tell him I was too fragile to do it myself?”
I moved the picture so she could sit beside me. “No. I told him you
might not want to talk, but he said the piece needs your perspective.”
She sat on the coffee table facing me. The three of us had found it
on the sidewalk and hauled it up the stairs together. “My perspective.”
“It’s the Times, Cara. Greg’s going to be in the New York Times.”186
Daniel Browne
She looked at me blankly, took a sip of her beer. “And your project?
Is your project going to be in the Times, too?”
“My project?” But I knew what she meant. I’d told her I was work-
ing on a new play, a musical actually. I was writing it around Greg’s
songs. After he died, I was paralyzed for a time. But at the end of the
day, I was still a writer, and there was only one way I knew to deal
with the grief. The show would be a celebration of his music and his
life, his devotion to his art, his faith, his friends. I told Cara it was
going to be bigger than Spring Awakening.
I reached out to take Cara’s hand. She let me, but there was no
response to my touch.
“Hey,” I said. “I didn’t say anything about the project. Come on.”
She cocked her head to the side as if she needed to see me from a
different angle. “You didn’t tell him you and Greg started working
on it together before he died?”
I pulled my hand back. “Hell no. Cara, look at me.”
She was already looking straight at me. Still, I felt the need to say
it again: “Look at me. I didn’t say that. I promise you I wouldn’t say
that.”
Cara put her beer down between her slender thighs and sighed
through her perfect nose. “Good. It’s better if I say it.”
I wanted to answer her, but something happened to me then,
something I’d never experienced before: the words didn’t come.
“I’ll say you suggested it to keep his spirits up,” Cara said. “He
always felt better when he was working.”
“Cara . . . ”
“I’ll say it was all he could talk about. He thought of himself as
just a guy with a guitar, but you, you were going to be the poet laure-
ate of our generation.”
My tongue felt dense in my mouth. “Did he say that?”
I thought the smile she’d given me at the hospital that night was
the saddest I’d ever see, but I was wrong. I closed my eyes.
“He loved you,” Cara said. “And I love you. So I’m going to do
this interview for you. But after that, I’m going home. I can’t be here
anymore. Do you understand?”
I could’ve gotten on my knees and begged her to stay. I could’veG o d’s Pla n
187
said, “I don’t know if I can make it in this city without you,” and
I would’ve been telling the truth. Then again, I could’ve said, “I’ll
go with you.” “Forget the Times, forget Broadway. We’ll go home
together. Have an Irish setter and a boy named Greg. You can trade
stock on the Internet, and I’ll spend my life raking the red leaves in
the yard.”
But I didn’t say any of that. God has a plan for each of us. I know
it. And I knew this was all part of his plan for me. So I just said,
“Whatever you want.” Cara leaned over and kissed me on the fore-
head. Then she told me she was tired.
As I walked down the stairs, I recalled what it was like having to
hold Greg steady as we negotiated those four flights, one step at a
time. It made me feel light, unburdened. I took my phone out of the
pocket of my vest and started scrolling through my address book, all
the poets and painters and dancers I’d met since I came to the city. I
wondered where everyone was tonight.20.
Granaby
by Brandon Hobson
Crowe Street is quiet at night. Murphy likes it this way, though most
nights he has trouble sleeping. For weeks he hasn’t gotten a good
night’s rest, averaging four or five hours each night, sometimes less.
He attributes his restlessness to his worries about his job at Granaby
Youth Corrections. At thirty-six, he’s the youngest administrator
since the facility was built in the early nineties, but in truth he hates
it. He wants to believe in the kindness of strangers, the fierce pos-
sibilities of hope, the beauty of color. Some nights after work he sits
on the back porch and watches fireflies and moths while his son Ste-
phen plays with their dog, Rufus. Lately he has to supervise Stephen
outside. Stephen is six, and for several weeks he’s been trying to hurt
the dog—poking him with a stick, pulling his tail, throwing rocks
at him. Last month Murphy talked to his wife Kate about counsel-
ing, but neither of them got around to calling anyone. Murphy’s so
beaten down by work lately he can’t concentrate on anything.
Much of what he describes about his work to Kate is corroborated
by the younger guys from his neighborhood who’ve been through
the system and talk openly about being locked up when they were
minors. Outside the Portuguese market down the street, Murphy
listens to their stories and pretends to be interested. In the apartment
building next door, one of the upstairs tenants, Jack, has Monday
Night Football parties that Murphy’s never been invited to. Jack,G ra naby
189
who’s slightly dyspneic and overweight, talks about his life as a delin-
quent, all the times he smoked hydroponic pot with his friends in a
dim basement while listening to Jane’s Addiction and eating Nutter
Butters. When Jack was seventeen he got drunk and stole a car from
the neighborhood, put it through the window of a Repo Records,
and then got out and asked if they had anything by the Del Fuegos.
“But that’s all history,” he tells Murphy. Another tenant, a thirty-
four-year-old construction worker named Lyle, says he was caught
trying to steal a rosewood-handled boot knife from an estate sale.
Ever since, his father refers to him as slightly worse than useless.
About once a week Kate sends Murphy to the Portuguese market
even though she knows Murphy can’t stand the food. Codfish, pick-
led onions, red peppers, chourico, pork pudding, cacoula, and so on.
Murphy can’t stand any of it. On nights she cooks that stuff he pur-
posefully works late, then stops by Anchor Tom’s on his way home
for a slice of pizza or a bowl of chowder to go. But the truth is that
Murphy never minds going to the market because he has a small crush
on the woman who works there. Her name is Mina; she’s divorced
and dark and in her thirties. Murphy can tell she has a good bullshit
antenna, so he hasn’t even attempted to flirt with her. She shrugs off
the guys who try, or else tells them straight, “Sorry, not interested.”
Murphy has never once seen her smile. The way her mouth droops
on one side is basically the way she looks all the time, but somehow
he finds this sexy. He imagines sleeping with her and searching her
face. Her expression, her mouth, the whole time looking like she’s
just been handed a used sock.
Tonight, yet again, he is thinking about her as he lies in bed next
to Kate. “Do we need anything from the market?” he asks quietly in
the dark. “I was just thinking.”
“What? It’s midnight.”
“I meant for tomorrow. I could dash over there real quick.”
“Stop talking.”
“Just trying to help out.”
“No.”
He loves Kate absurdly. He loves that she’s neurotic, afraid of spi-
ders and planes, worried about catching colds or a sore throat. Before190
Brandon Hobson
they married, he sometimes playfully gave her Indian rub-burns on
her arms while they watched Letterman at her apartment in West
Haven. She grew up with three older brothers, so she didn’t mind
playing rough. In the beginning they were spontaneous; he often
took her against the wall in a sort of arabesque position, but that was
several years ago. They married just out of college. He was working
as a program coordinator in a small juvenile detention center. Now
all he thinks about is quitting his job or fucking some stranger, like
Mina from the market.
Although, more and more frequently, he is aware of how incredibly
lucky he is. He reminds himself of this. Stephen is a joy regardless of
his recent behavior with Rufus. Sometimes at night they gather in
the living room and play board games or draw pictures. On Sundays,
Murphy helps Kate with yard work. When the weather is nice they
take walks through the neighborhood, Stephen riding his bike in
front of them. “We’re blessed,” Kate said one Christmas Eve when
Stephen was a baby. “We have to remember how blessed we are.”
Murphy sits up in bed and turns on the TV, mutes the sound, finds
a nature program on cable. A magnified butterfly sits on a leaf. The
butterfly materializes, pulsing, then flutters away.
Murphy’s boss, Hank Drucker, says the city doesn’t like runaways
or delinquents. Hank, who’s been a detention director for twenty-
five years, is overweight and asthmatic and drinks heavily. He spends
most of the day in his office, sucking on his inhaler and leaving
Murphy to supervise the staff and handle the residents. For as long
as Murphy’s known him, Hank’s been a man who speaks his mind.
“I need someone to put out fires,” he told Murphy when he hired
him several years ago. He pumped his inhaler in his mouth and sat
back in his swivel chair. “The juveniles at Granaby are runaways and
criminals. Some get kicked out of youth shelters for getting high or
stealing from staff. Others get picked up by the police and brought
in. I’ll worry about the court documents and paperwork. I need you
out there on the floor, putting out fires.”
For the past fifteen years, Murphy has seen these kids come in and
out of juvenile detention. Sometimes the court places them in the cus-G ra naby
191
tody of social services and they sit in detention and wait to be placed
in group homes. Then they run away from the group homes and
return to the streets, and the whole cycle starts over again. Murphy
is the assistant director and serves as a sort of in-house counselor.
The juveniles he talks to during intakes, after they’ve changed out of
their street clothes and showered and put all their money and jewelry
in baggies, after they’ve carried their bed sheets and pillows down
the hall past the medical supply room to their rooms, they tell him
what happens when they return to the streets. They always want to
talk their first night. Especially the newcomers. Part of Murphy’s job
is just listening to them. He thinks they see enough in six months
to provide a lifetime of nightmares. Some of the Hispanics tell him
they stand in the alley behind MG’s Liquor on Albany Street and see
skinheads in leather jackets and camouflage pants walk by and stare at
them. The skinheads smoke cigarettes and throw bottles. The skin-
heads lean against the fence and piss in the street and yell at them.
“We’re not scared of them,” Paolo says. “I’ve seen these guys and
they don’t do anything.” Paolo is sixteen and from the north side of
Hartford. He’s lived in six different foster homes since he was twelve.
His father is part of a large Latin gang and is doing time for posses-
sion of firearms and drug trafficking after what the FBI called one of
the largest raids since the prohibition era. Paolo tells Murphy about
pickpocketing tourists in Boston on the subway T train from Govern-
ment Center to Harvard Square. For two months he stole toilet paper
every day from Captain Jack’s Fish House’s bathroom until the place
closed down due to failing health inspections. For a while, before he
was picked up and sent to the shelter, he slept wherever he could—in
the homes of strange men, under a pavilion in a park on Albany, on
the wood floors of abandoned houses. As he talks to Murphy, he
looks at the dried blood in his fingernails from scratching the scabs
on his scalp. He has lice. Impetigo of the scalp. Tonight the staff will
treat his hair with olive oil and a lice comb. They’ve been through
this before.
Later in the night, Paolo is upset. His hand is bleeding from punch-
ing the concrete wall, and he’s threatening to kill himself. He’s made
threats like this in the past. After he calms down, two staff members192
Brandon Hobson
help him into the medical room and wrap his hand. His fingers are
swollen and bloody. Murphy thinks Paolo’s fingers might be broken,
so he and Paolo’s probation officer, Rob, have to transport him to the
hospital. Rob cuffs Paolo’s hands in front rather than behind his back
since his hand is injured, then puts on the ankle restraints.
“Always a flight risk,” Rob says.
Paolo sits in the backseat with his head down. They drive toward
downtown to St. Francis. Been here before, Murphy has, but not
for a long while. They pass liquor stores, beauty parlors, sheet metal
wholesalers, old warehouses and apartment buildings. Downtown,
Seymour Street’s darkness is broken at intervals with the yellow light
of apartment windows, the open doors of restaurants and bars. The
scent of decay emanates from the parking lot as they help Paolo from
the car and walk him into the emergency room. Low priority emer-
gency, so they will have to sit and wait as usual. Nobody’s really at-
tempted suicide at Granaby, but Murphy tells the staff they have to
take threats seriously, especially when a kid like Paolo is punching a
wall until his hand bleeds.
“You need to sit up,” Rob says in the waiting room. But Paolo is
exhausted, sitting slumped with his head resting against the wall. He
can’t keep his eyes open. When the nurse takes them to a room, Rob
uncuffs him so she can check his pulse and take his blood pressure.
She takes his hand and studies it. “Can you move your fingers?”
Paolo moves his fingers but winces.
“They’re pretty swollen,” Murphy says.
Paolo sits on the exam table, staring at Rob’s military-style crew
cut. The nurse writes something down on a clipboard, tells them
the doctor will be in soon and leaves the room. Murphy knew they
would be there at least a couple of hours, so he brought along the
Courant. He unfolds it and starts on the New York Times crossword
but struggles to keep his eyes open.
“I could fall asleep right here,” he says.
Rob sits next to him and chews on a toothpick.
By the time they return to Granaby it’s late, after eleven. The grave-
yard crew is there, starting laundry. All residents are in bed. Murphy
takes Paolo to his room in wing A and logs the prescribed antibioticG ra naby
193
in the medical room. Nothing broken, thankfully. He tells Cliff, the
eleven-to-seven supervisor, to have someone from the morning shift
go to the pharmacy and fill the antibiotic.
“We’ve got other problems,” Cliff says. “Thomas in Wing C.”
Murphy can already guess. Thomas, a fourteen-year-old, seriously
unstable kid from Allston who’s in for rape by instrumentation on
his five-year-old stepsister. Thomas will possibly be charged as an
adult and remain locked up until he’s twenty-one unless the long-
term treatment is successful and the justice system considers him re-
habilitated. These kids, they’re called youthful offenders, which is a
polite term for sex offenders. They’re unlike the others in detention
in that most of them are socially inept, immature, obsessive about
little things like hiding extra toilet paper in their pillow cases and
masturbating two or three times a day in the main bathroom with
the door open. Thomas always wants attention. His father is one of
those low-grade knuckleheads who wears f lannel shirts and drives a
1993 firebird and chews Red Man. During weekend visitation, he
once told Murphy he drinks Stolichnaya vodka only. Thomas has an
unfortunate facial tic that Murphy thinks he exaggerates for atten-
tion at certain times throughout the day, like during meals when
no talking is the rule. He’s been in detention for more than ninety
days while he’s waiting to be placed in residential treatment. This
week he’s in room confinement for making inappropriate remarks
about sharpening a broomstick and using it as a weapon on deten-
tion officers.
“I can already guess,” Murphy says.
Sure enough. In Wing C, Murphy opens Thomas’s door and sees
him sitting cross-legged on the floor with his shirt off. His shirt is
crumpled on his bed, and feces are smeared on the wall and all over
the floor. Feces, everywhere. Murphy radios a staff member to Wing
C and Thomas looks up.
“What’s wrong with you?” Murphy says. “Again?”
Thomas doesn’t say anything. But there is shame, if not embarrass-
ment, and Murphy has to remind himself that most of the state cus-
tody abused kids like Thomas developed a habit of smearing feces in
bed or shitting in their underwear to ward off their predators. These194
Brandon Hobson
are the times that test Murphy’s patience, and residents like Thomas
are good at grating on his nerves. Before he started working with de-
linquents, Murphy taught ninth-grade civics at a public high school
in East Hartford but got fired for cursing at the students. Murphy,
at twenty-four, young and just out of college, still single and staying
out late at night, then hungover the next day and trying to deal with
hyperactive adolescents with mood swings and hormones. The day
he got fired he lost his temper. His students were talking and laugh-
ing and being generally disruptive as he stood at the blackboard,
and after several attempts to quiet them, he threw his head back and
screamed, “Can’t you people ever shut the fuck up and listen to me
for one goddamn second?” He has to remind himself of those days
when his job gets stressful, as it does trying to deal with Thomas.
“You know the drill,” Murphy says.
Thomas gets up and follows Murphy to the closet, where they fill
a mop bucket and get a spray bottle full of cleaner and paper towels.
Thomas spends the next thirty minutes cleaning his room and then
takes a shower while everyone else in Wing C is trying to sleep. A
staff member relieves Murphy so he can go home after such a long
day. A twelve-hour day, in fact, and he doesn’t get paid overtime. The
extra hours accrue as comp time, which means he can at least take off
early tomorrow.
“Try not to call me at home tonight if there’s a problem,” Murphy
tells Cliff.
“Don’t call you?”
“Let’s hope for a smooth night. I need sleep.”
At the market, Murphy pays for the jar of pumpkin jam on the coun-
ter and waits for Mina to say something as she opens the register and
hands him his change. He is nervous near her, edgier every time he
sees her. She has an insouciant manner about her that makes him
burn with anticipation. And yet he will not tell her he finds her at-
tractive, he knows this. He doesn’t trust himself—how else but by
silence can he hope to keep her a stranger? When he doesn’t fill the
silence, she does: “Sleeping any better?” she asks, putting the jar in
a little brown paper sack, and he remembers he’d told her about his
insomnia a couple of weeks ago.G ra naby
195
“I think about work too much,” he says.
“Oh, so you’re one of those people.”
“Pretty much.”
“I feel sorry for you,” she says, and he notices she’s joking. “Were
you a deprived child? No SweeTarts, right? No candy except on holi-
days?”
She stops at the sight of what has come over him. He feels flushed,
nervous. He crosses his arms so that she can’t see his wedding ring.
On the counter behind her, in fastidiously arranged rows, are stacked
cartons of cigarettes, Marlboros and Kools and Camels, and for the
first time in four years, since he quit smoking, Murphy feels the ago-
nizing craving for a cigarette. What is it about her?
She inhales sharply. “Look at you, all embarrassed.”
“No, no,” he says. “I mean, it’s work.”
“Lack of sleep.”
“Especially that.”
“Have nice dreams,” she says, and as he leaves he hates himself.
At home, he no longer feels tired. Why does this happen? He goes
to the back porch and tends to the dog. He empties the water bowl,
refills it with the water hose. He fills the other bowl with dry dog
food. Murphy’s dog Rufus, a terrier mix he adopted from the shel-
ter nine years ago, eats with civility. Murphy scratches Rufus on the
scruff of his neck and goes back inside.
Upstairs, Kate is asleep. When he gets into bed, she turns over and
asks him how work was.
“Fine. We had to take a kid to the hospital.”
She yawns. “Yeah, I thought so.”
“I would’ve called but I didn’t want to wake Stephen.”
“Tonight I caught him hitting Rufus with a broom.”
“Jesus,” Murphy says. “Why?”
“He didn’t say anything. I took the broom and sent him to his
room.”
“I don’t know what to do. I thought about taking him fishing on
Saturday.”
Kate turns over. “That would be good.”
Murphy turns on the television, flips through channels. For a
while he watches some sort of fishing show on cable. A man in a fish-196
Brandon Hobson
ing boat, holding a bass by its open mouth. The man tosses the fish
into the water. Murphy leans over to embrace Kate, resting his arm
against the sheets. “Hey,” he whispers.
“Tired,” Kate says, and yawns.
Mark, a detention officer on the seven-to-three shift, is filling out
Intake papers on a resident when Murphy arrives to work. The resi-
dent is Eddie, a seventeen-year-old boy who’s been to Granaby twice
in the last year. Eddie’s been in juvenile detention centers since he
was twelve, when he was caught stealing cold medicine and beer from
a Cole’s pharmacy. For a while he was living off and on with a man he
calls his uncle. Eddie has seizures, so the staff has to be careful with
him. The seizures are mild. He once told Murphy that his seizures
taste like battery acid. He came in several months ago with damp
clothes and a fever, burns, and chills, and spent the next day vomiting
in his room. He’s the only resident who can beat Murphy in chess.
Today, at rec time after lunch, they play chess in the Day Room.
Eddie plays fast, moving his queen out early. Murphy is all defense;
before he can make an aggressive move, Eddie puts him in check-
mate.
“You’re really terrible,” Eddie says.
“You’ve gotten better or I’m worse,” Murphy says.
“Play again?”
Eddie beats him two more games. Afterward, he tells Murphy
he thinks of his mother often. When Eddie was nine, she died in
the hospital. He says he should’ve been with her, that he should be
the one who disappeared. For Eddie, everything feels ragged, as if
he has left behind a thousand lives who depend on him—the ones
he takes care of, the younger boys who are left alone. They creep
around the city at night, through winding tunnels, dark streets,
sidling upon drunken old men and then rummaging through their
wallets, forcing up particle board and removing nails, anything they
can find and use as weapons if they need to. They aren’t afraid.
They struggle to survive.
Later in the afternoon, outside on the basketball court, Eddie runs
for the fence and starts to climb, but two detention officers manageG ra naby
197
to pull him down. He’s taken inside and confined to his room. When
Granaby was built, Murphy’s boss, Hank Drucker, wanted the fence
fifteen feet high with razor wire at the top. So far no residents have
attempted to escape. At staff meetings, Hank is always reading news
stories of juveniles escaping from detention centers around the coun-
try. Just last month in Gastonia, North Carolina, a juvenile escaped
from a detention center and stole a car. “That’s why we need five
detention officers with the residents whenever they’re outside,” Hank
tells the staff. “I didn’t earn my reputation for nothing. I promised
safety.”
Still, there are those in Red Owl with uncertain fears. There are
those who believe the residents will escape. There are those who be-
lieve they have unique and elaborate plans of hurting young children.
Madeleine Simmons, who lives a mile east of the facility, approached
Murphy one morning as he was pumping gas at the 7-Eleven on his
way to work: “My husband and I took our daughter out of Rose kin-
dergarten after a group of those boys started hanging around,” she
told him.
“Sorry to hear that,” Murphy said. “They didn’t run away from
Granaby, if that’s what you were wondering.”
“I’m not blaming you. We’re not saying it’s your fault.”
“Nobody ran away. We’re a lockdown facility.”
“We picketed when the county was trying to raise the tax to have
the place built in the first place,” Mrs. Simmons said. “We know
Judge Arnott and his wife. Just to let you know.”
The community hates him. They hate Granaby’s location on the
outskirts of the city, close to new housing. They wanted the facility to
be downtown by the Bureau of Juvenile Services and the courthouse.
To get through the day, Murphy sometimes has to remind himself
that what he’s doing is a good thing. He decided on this type of work
because he wanted to help troubled kids. He was determined then,
just out of college. He used to play basketball and volleyball with the
residents. Now it’s dominoes and chess.
“But you’re still young,” Hank Drucker wheezes. Murphy’s in
Hank’s office while Hank sits behind his desk. Hank’s swivel chair
squeaks every time he moves or laughs. “Murphy, you miserable198
Brandon Hobson
fucker, you’re still in good shape. Look at me, all old and fat. I’m
from the streets of Houston. I was raised on red meat and grease. I
worked my way here by hard work. No college degree. Just plain old
hard work. I can’t do one goddamn active thing anymore.”
“You look fine.”
“I’m pushing three hundred,” Hank says, leaning way back in his
swivel chair. He sucks on his inhaler and pumps it twice. “Don’t
bullshit me. I drink scotch every night. Johnny Red. When do I have
time to exercise? All I’m saying is get the fuck out there and stay
active with the residents. Play ball. Shoot hoops. Don’t let yourself
turn to shit like I did.”
“Lately I don’t feel like it.”
“Murphy, you miserable shitspeck, I like you. We need to have
drinks sometime. Bernice and I need company. Ever since her hip
surgery she’s a fucking invalid.”
“Sure, I’ll check with Kate.”
“Check with your wife,” Hank says. He laughs and wheezes. His
chair squeaks.
Later, a detention officer radios Murphy that a transport officer is
in the carport to take Paolo to court. Murphy helps Paolo clear out
his room. Paolo changes back into his own clothes and Murphy walks
him down the corridor to meet the juvenile transport officer at the
door. The transport officer cuffs and puts ankle restraints on Paolo
while Murphy unlocks the doors that lead to the carport outside.
“Hope I’ll get released,” Paolo says.
But Murphy knows it won’t happen. He’ll be placed in a temporary
youth shelter or foster home. Then he’ll run away and return to the
streets until he gets arrested again. The transport officer helps Paolo
into his car. From the carport, Murphy sees him sitting in the back-
seat with his head down as the car backs out of the garage.
After work, at the market, Murphy buys a jar of green olives, but
Mina isn’t working. The cashier who rings him up is an older woman
with a veiled, dreamy expression, a kind of pout. She has a rocky
chin and cheekbones, her bangs gray-blond. Murphy’s never seen her
before. When he asks about Mina, she looks at him.G ra naby
199
“I’m new,” she says, “but I don’t think she works here anymore.”
She hands Murphy his change.
“Thanks,” Murphy says, and as he walks out he wonders if Mina
quit. The thought that he won’t see her again is depressing. He’ll no
longer have a reason to look forward to going there. On his way to
his car he sees Antonio Perez, who lives in a small house down the
street. Antonio’s oldest son was placed in detention once for shoplift-
ing from Repo Records, so Murphy got to know Antonio. Fifteen
years ago, Antonio left Queens with his wife and kids and took the
train up here to Hartford. He walks with a limp from getting stabbed
in the foot with a barbecue brochette by his first wife. “We used to
drink whiskey,” he once told Murphy. “Then we’d get into bad fights.
Crazy whore. She pulled a knife on me once a week.”
Tonight, Antonio limps over to Murphy and puts his hand on his
shoulder. “How are you, my friend?” he says.
“Just getting off work,” Murphy says.
“Plumbing problems for me tonight,” Antonio says. “And my son’s
sick. I need cough medicine and a plumber. Any help?”
“What’s wrong with your plumbing?”
“The faucet makes a noise and spits. I don’t know what to do. I
can’t afford a plumber.”
“I can have a look,” Murphy tells him, and after Antonio buys red
peppers and cough medicine inside, Murphy gets into his car and fol-
lows him down the street to his house. The neighborhood is rough,
cars parked in yards, wood-frame houses with dirty paint. Inside, An-
tonio’s wife Rosa is watching TV in the living room with their kids.
“Cough medicine and red peppers,” Antonio says, handing the
bag to his wife. “I brought the miracle man.”
“Are you a witch doctor or a plumber?” she asks Murphy.
“Who knows what I am,” he says, and Rosa laughs. He follows An-
tonio into the kitchen, where Antonio turns on the water. The faucet
coughs, then makes a gurgling noise. Water bursts from the spigot.
“I have tools,” Antonio says.
“Where’s the valve? We just need a screwdriver and pliers.”
They go downstairs to the cellar. Pipes are vibrating, and they
find the valve next to a box meter. Murphy turns the valve left to200
Brandon Hobson
turn off the water. On the pliers, there’s corrosion between the gear
teeth. Murphy blows on it and hits it a couple of times against the
floor. They go back upstairs and Murphy disassembles the cold water
handle. With the screwdriver he chops at the plaster, then puts ev-
erything back together again. Antonio goes downstairs and turns the
water back on.
“Fixed,” Murphy says, turning the faucet on and off.
When Antonio comes back to the kitchen he is overjoyed. “You
fixed it, saved me money,” he says. He invites Murphy to stay for
coffee and dessert. “Rosa made pie,” he says. He gets plates from the
cupboard and cuts them both a piece of banana pie. They sit in the
kitchen and talk. Antonio tells Murphy he’s currently working in a
little machine shop downtown making nine bucks an hour. He re-
moves screws from a box marked “Made in China,” counts and cleans
the bits and then puts them in new boxes marked “Made in the USA”
and “Made in Taiwan.”
“Machines will count screws,” he says, “but they cost fifty thou-
sand dollars, plus software and maintenance. People are cheaper and
I need work.”
“My job isn’t much better,” Murphy says, and immediately feels
guilty for saying it.
“Be thankful it’s a good job,” Antonio says. “You do okay, make a
decent salary, right? I have four kids and a house payment.” He takes
a sip of coffee. “When I’m not worried about money I’m happy as
I’ve ever been.”
Murphy finishes his coffee and sets his cup on the counter. On the
way out, in the living room, Antonio’s son Freddie is standing by the
fish aquarium, staring into the glass. Murphy stops and kneels down
next to him to look. The filtering system is bubbling, but Murphy
can’t see any fish. He taps the glass. “Anything in there?”
“He’s in the castle,” Freddie says. “He’s asleep I think. Papa says
he’s sick, too.”
“Is he hungry?”
“He won’t eat. We gave him fish food. You can see it on the rocks.”
“Wake up and eat,” Murphy says, tapping the glass. It’s too dark to
see anything in the castle. Freddie puts both hands on the glass. HeG ra naby
201
coughs, stares into the glass with his mouth open. Murphy can hear
the rattle in his chest as he breathes.
Back at home, Murphy goes into Stephen’s room and checks on him.
Stephen is asleep, curled up under the covers. Murphy can see his face
in the dim light from the nightlight beside his bed. He closes the
door lightly, then goes into the kitchen and fills a glass of water in the
sink. Kate is standing in the doorway in her pajamas.
“Antonio needed me to fix his faucet,” Murphy says.
She looks at him. “Seriously?”
“I fixed it,” he says. He takes a last drink of water and sets the glass
down on the counter. “That Portuguese market,” he says. “I hate
going in that place. There’s a woman who works there.”
“I know,” Kate says. “You’ve already told me that.” She walks
down the hall to the bedroom. Murphy pours himself a cup of coffee
and sits at the kitchen table. He hasn’t slept well in months. Tonight
will be no different.21.
Graveyards
by Scott McClanahan
I didn’t even want to go to the graveyard, but Ruby told me I had
to. She was giving my uncle Stanley hell about it for weeks, until he
finally said: “Oh shit, Mother. That old road up there is rough as
hell. What are we going to do if I get my truck stuck up?” My uncle
Stanley just lived down the road, so he was always stuck with taking
us places.
But she kept going on and on about it, saying: “Oh Lordy, I’d like
to go to the cemetery. I don’t know when I’ll get back up there.”
She told us there was a grave up there she wanted to put flowers on.
There was a grave up there she needed to see before she died.
My uncle Stanley finally gave in. He picked up some plastic flowers
from the dollar store and drove her up to the graveyard in his truck.
He drove down into Prince and we listened to the radio—99.5 The
Big Dawg in country. Lord have mercy, baby’s got her blue jeans on.
We drove through the places where Ruby had given birth to babies
in shacks that no longer stood, and where my grandfather sold moon-
shine. We gunned it up Backus Mountain with my uncle Nathan,
sitting in the back of the truck trying to hang on with his palsy legs.
Then we finally pulled up the hill and into the Goddard graveyard.
Stanley stopped the truck, and on top of the cow-paddy hill we
got out.G raveya rd s
203
He said: “Damn, it’s bad enough being buried up here, let alone
having to come up here when you’re still alive.”
But my grandma wouldn’t listen to him and started walking
through the grass. I remembered to watch my step because my uncle
Larry stepped in cow shit one time up here when he was wearing
flip-flops.
I told Ruby I didn’t like graveyards. She told me it didn’t matter.
Even though I was only fourteen years old it was no telling when
the angel of death might come to get my ass.
I stepped over a big fossilized cow paddy and then I stepped over
another as Uncle Nathan laughed at us from the truck.
Earlier that day she fed me peanut butter fudge she made and told
me: Nothing lasts.
Now we walked past the graves of all the people she knew.
There was Grandmommy Goddard and Daddy Goddard and Great
Grandmommy Goddard and Virginia Goddard.
And there was her aunt Mag Goddard who starved herself to death.
Ruby stood in front of the grave and said, “No one knows why. She
just locked herself in her room and starved herself to death.”
Then there were other graves and she started walking through them.
She said: “I don’t think they’ve been mowing it very nice out here.”
Then she stopped in front of one.
I asked her if it was her mother.
And Grandma said, “Yeah, that’s Mommy. The day of the funeral
they tried putting her in the ground facing the west. I just hollered and
carried on ’cause she was facing the wrong way for the resurrection.”
Then she was quiet and smiled a gummy grin.
Then she walked on.
“Oh, look at all the little graves,” she said, walking past the grave
of her uncle.
She turned to it and said, “They had to bury him on his stomach.
He always said he never could sleep on his back. So he had them bury
him on his stomach.”
Then she said she never could sleep on her back either.
She had me pull away some tall grass from the graves.
She said that it seemed like all there was to do anymore was die.204
Scott McClanahan
That’s all people did in this day and age. She said she couldn’t even
get the ambulance to pick her up anymore when she needed them.
Of course, I knew that they stopped coming because she called every
day claiming she was dying. When they got her into the ambulance,
it seemed like she was always feeling better and just needed them to
just take her down to Rogers and get a gallon of milk. Finally one of
the ambulance people told her: “Now, Miss Ruby, you call us when
you’re having an emergency, not just when Nathan runs out of 7-Up.
The taxpayers can’t be paying for your trips to get Nathan’s 7-Up.”
But I didn’t say anything about it. She walked away from the graves
and I noticed all the tiny graves beside her mother’s grave. There was
a grave here and then there was a grave there—the stones all broken
off and covered up by the grass.
“Whose graves are these?” I asked and then I wondered: “Why all
these little graves?”
I knew the answer. They were baby graves.
I walked away, looking at the end where Ruby was.
And I thought about her own mother losing baby after baby after
baby after baby after baby and still going on—surrounded by the graves
of sons and daughters, brothers and sisters who never were. They were
in this ground—all this great big lump of flesh we call Earth.
I had even looked in the back of Ruby’s mother’s Bible with all of
it written in the back. There was a date and then—baby died. There
was a date and then—baby died. There was a date and then—girl
baby died.
So I said, “You want me to put the flowers down here? Are these
the graves you wanted to see?”
But Grandma just shook her head.
She pointed to a couple of graves at the edge of the mountain and
said, “That’s where I want to put them.”
THANK GOD.
Ruby moved her walker and started moving closer to the graves,
past the grave of her own little baby who died, and then past her hus-
band, my grandfather Elgie, who died of his fifth heart attack when
I was three.
I heard my uncle Stanley from far over at the edge of the field say:G raveya rd s
205
“Daddy would have shit himself if he knew you put him up here with
all these goddamn Goddards.”
Ruby got mean and said: “Well, I figured I wanted him where I
wanted him. And I put him where I put him.”
She hobbled along some more and I walked behind her.
She said: “This is the grave I wanted to see. This is the grave.”
I asked: “Whose grave is it?”
I walked in front of the stone and I saw...
... IT WAS HER GR AVE.
It was the grave of...
Ruby Irene McClanahan
bor n 1917. died . . .
. . . and then there was a blank space—the space where they would
put the date of her death.
She touched the shiny stone and explained how Wallace and Wal-
lace gave her a really good deal on the tombstone. She told me I
should start saving. It was a good investment.
So Grandma pointed to the grave and finally told me to put the
flowers down. And that’s just what I did. I put the flowers down on
my grandmother’s grave. Then she reached into her purse and pulled
out a camera.
She said: “Well, come on now, Todd. You want to have your pic-
tures taken by Grandma’s grave?” I told her for the thousandth time.
“My name’s not Todd, Grandma. My name’s Scott.”
My uncle Stanley shouted at her: “Ah hell, Mother. Just leave him
alone. He doesn’t want to touch your grave.”
Then she started in on my uncle Nathan, who was still sitting in
the back of the truck. “Hey, Nathan. You want to come and sit in
front of Mother’s grave? It’s a pretty thing.”
Nathan just sat in the back of the truck and shook his head like:
“Fuck no.”
I finally gave in and Grandma took my picture next to her grave.
Then she waddled over to the side of the shiny marble tombstone
and I took her picture.206
Scott McClanahan
I looked through the camera and all I could see was my grandma
Ruby standing beside her stone.
Ruby Irene McClanahan
bor n 1917. died . . .
and then the blank space.
Here was the date of her birth, and the date of her death, which
we didn’t know yet, but which we passed each year without knowing.
So I got ready to take the picture and I saw her smile.
I saw the graves filling up all around her and I saw how Grandma
would be here beneath it one day and then Nathan and then one day
Stanley, and then one day . . . me. So I saw her whisper “Oh, Lordy,”
and claim she was dying like she always did.
I wished we were already back at home so I could eat some more
peanut butter fudge. Nothing lasts.
I snapped the picture and it was like she was already gone.
It was like I saw that she was dying right then—real slow—and she
knew the secret sound. It’s a sound that all of us hear. It’s a sound
that sounds like this. Tick. Tick. Tick.
But there is a way to stop it. I promise you there is a way to stop it.
We can devote our hearts to its opposition.
So I ask you now. Will you? Will you devote your heart to its op-
position?22.
Head Down, Palm Up
by Mitchell S. Jackson
It’s hard to see Unc in the shade, with his being the same shade as
the shade, but you can always depend to watch his mouth, to track
that gold tooth, a glinting last to last extravagance. “It’s position, not
possession,” Unc says. “Not possession, but position,” he says, and
swanks into view.
Unc throws contemplative eyes to the sky. They’re the familial bug
eyes, impressive eyes, so big he might see the future, or maybe even
another dimension.
The man motions me closer, flaunting the only ring he wears—
probably his only ring left to wear—a pinky joint set with an ambit
of murky diamonds, and warns we can’t let this highgrade reach the
wrong ears. Then he pauses for what’s likely the sake of suspense,
pauses, and says, “You’ve got to have tools g o t d a m n y o u m e ,
meaning your rides, your crib, your clothes, your gold, you’ve got
to, but all you got’s a molehill without a mouthpiece.” He points at
his cracked lips, opened with a sliver of space between them, a pipe-
smoker’s lips, forever scorched. “And those gorilla moves,” he says,
“ i s w e a r f o g o d try em and see don’t they get you nothin less
than more of what you never wanted. That gorilla ain’t bout nothin,”
he says. “A smart one comes from here,” he says, and touches his
temple, “never from here,” he says. Unc assumes a southpaw’s stance,
shakes miniature fists with abnormally big unbruised knuckles, then208
Mitchell S. Jackson
switches to orthodox and whispers g o t d a m n y o u m e again for
God only knows.
Okay, now is as good a time as any to ask, good people, if you’d
please, please, preempt the hatetrocity. He’s my Unc, all right. My
real blood relative.
“Say, Nephew,” Unc says. “This how you play it. Soon as you knock
one, you keep your head down and palm up. Head down. Palm up,”
he says again, assuming the pose. He stands a while after, a Buddhist
maybe, lanky limbs hanging, lank neck sprouting out of his weath-
ered silk shirt, double-creased slacks, secondhand gators spraddled,
big-knuckled babyish hands unfurled to show nails long enough to
dredge coke, sharp enough to cut steak.
To be true, Unc is sympathetic almost with what the years have
done to him, with what he’s done to himself over the years, though
with the way he yearns he might make more years than us all, be
the only one alive the next coming, which is unsuspecting as shit,
considering advice you’d call unholy. Or might couldn’t. “Don’t turn
down nothin but your collar,” he advises, which helped him become
the first and penultimate around our way to hustle a plane, though he
now borrows hubcaps forever, hawks scrapmetal for rent, and sends
the mother of his youngest to a strip where the going rate is less than
you’d drop on prime sirloin.
Unc says i s w e a r f o g o d again for who knows why.
And people, you can say or think what you will, but my Unc might
not be, matterfact most likely isn’t, one of those old heads you can
pay no nevermind without it costing.
“Your rides,” he says. “Hellified mouthpiece or not, just you try to
knock one in a bucket. Just you try to knock one worth a damn with-
out a coupla rides from the year of and at least one American-made
manufactured when times was good.”
Unc says his bottom leaving tripped a weak run. “But that’s how
it goes,” he says. “One minute you’re up and the next—well, you
know.” He pitches his formidable bug eyes at me, eyes that can’t
anymore see past his past. He hops on a bench, plants a second-
hand gator on the seat and leaves another hovering. He rubs his puny
hands over a head of semireceding stubble, and says that normally theHead Dow n, Pa l m Up
209
high-grade is sold not told, but since I’m family and all, he’ll accept
an I.O.U. and a pack of menthols. He laughs and frisks the capacious
pockets of his double-creased slacks, pockets once laden with down
payment enough for anything, but now most often filled with less
than, with atoms, straight zeroth!
“Position not possession,” he says again, and warns never capitu-
late in so many words. My bad, I mean in so many words, the man
says it.
That’s Unc.
Now me.
My girl’s so bad, so bad, that to lay sight on her is as if accepting
a wound. In here, among these strobes and kaleidoscopes of color,
the early evening crowd can see what I see and I see them willfully,
achingly, damn near greedily receiving hurt from her. Unc asks me to
point her out and when I show him he says, “Now that, that i s w e a r
f o g o d , is a goldmine!” I say, in so many words, that I don’t have
the heart to ask, much less convince her. I tell him about what I feel
and so on and he says that not all of them is meant, but the ones that
is you can’t keep from sending themselves. “Nephew,” Unc says, “it’s
either in they nature or it ain’t.”
My girl’s a spectacle up there, syncopating and twirling and shim-
mying and stomping in heels tall enough to fall from and die, a sema-
phore for the sound. We sit tables away—how could I do anything
but sit tables away?—while my girl dances a song, a song, a song. I
watch her step down and hear the deejay ask us to give her a hand,
calling her by the name she’s named herself for here.
The crowd claps. Then stops all abrupt-like. The deejay tells us to
hold tight for a quick intermission, and meantime my girl sends me
that smile of hers that’s a constellation of white and leads one of the
harmed to a section reserved for special attention.
What I don’t tell Unc is, I’ve accepted so many wounds from her I
might be experiencing an afterlife. Then again, I might not be marred
enough for a rebirth.
As I was saying, my bad, I mean as I was about to say, my Unc is
vivid under the lights. His silk shirt is iridescent in HD! And you210
Mitchell S. Jackson
should see the grays glowing in his coveted stubble. I buy the man
a double shot of top-shelf and watch him sip with a snort-length
pinkie awry.
He says, “You got to have a name, g o t d a m n y o u m e . ’Cause
ain’t shit else more important.” He offers up choices, Broadway or
Bootleg or America or Famous or Slick. He says that he knew some-
one successful named Social. Tells me that I can name myself Super
anything except Man. “And be careful with those Pretty’s too,” he
says. “Pretty Tony, Pretty Ricky. It’s been enough already with them
ones named Pretty.” Unc warns when I’m ready, really ready, I’ve got
to choose. Choose maybe Maverick or Sir or Hero or Hype or Juice
or Slim or Quick or Charm. He says if I want to go for color I’ve got
Black or Red. “But since you brownskinned,” Unc says, “thou shalt
not.”
Unc waves his dinged-up diminutive fists—fists so small they might
be the Antichrist—back and forth and makes exclamations out what’s
borderline unmentionable. Those hands of his about the size mine
were when Unc was bulletproof, faster than you name it. Before in
ways that matter most to me, he couldn’t measure up—or wouldn’t,
previous to it being hard for me to trust a man who talks with that
much flourish.
“You listenin?” he says.
“Maybe,” I say.
“So now I guess you some kind of comedian,” he says. “Well, all
jokes aside, Nephew, scratch those gangster names too.” He says Jynx
and Pistol and Stitches and Killer are all absolutely out of the ques-
tion. He says to me for me to be leery of naming myself little any-
thing, and that’s ditto for small animals. “And somethin else,” the
man says, gesturing again with those timid-ass fists, “a good name
can’t be bout surprisin them with some shit they ain’t expected.”
“Sounds good,” I say, “but tell me what it is for real.”
“What it is, is what’s at stake, Nephew,” he says. “ i b u l l s h i t
y o u n o t , it’s always bout what’s at stake.”
“And what’s that?”
“The question is what it ain’t?” Unc says. “What the hell ain’t it?”
Unc serves more choices, Ten Toes or Dollar or Fly Guy or Champ.Head Dow n, Pa l m Up
211
He sweeps his collar for God knows why and reminds me that with-
out a name I ain’t certified. “But when you claim one,” he says, and
downs the last of his top-shelf, “the world knows you are not to be
fucked with.”
My girl dazzles over and sits herself near us and swipes at strands
of silky weave stuck to her face from sweat. I watch Unc eye her and
see he isn’t accepting any wounds but he also isn’t compelled to look
away. I touch her wrist—about the most I ever do in this place—and
she leaves it still. “This my uncle,” I say, and ask how her night’s
going.
“It’s goin,” she says, fixes her top, exhales what could be her soul.
She says to Unc that she’s heard so much, which, o n e v e r y t h i n g
i l o v e , isn’t the least bit a lie.
“How you diggin it here?” says Unc to my girl.
“I got a feelin,” she says, “this is not to be dug.”
“Believe, Baby Doll,” Unc says, “if it’s anybody know that, it’s me.”
Unc makes his remarkable front tooth something to behold and
prospects around before visiting a gaze on my sweet thing.
The two of them carry on until the music is too much anymore to
be heard without screaming. My girl gets up, kisses my cheek—more
than she usually does in this place—and virtually levitates toward the
exit. She comes to rest right before she reaches the threshold and gifts
me a smile with just those eyes.
“Trust, that ain’t one to send,” Unc says. “Not when she looks at
you like that.”
I want to ask Unc if he’s absolutely, positively, undoubtedly, irrev
ocably sure, but all I manage is some predictably silly-ass hesitation.
“Say, Nephew,” he says, “this uncle of yours ain’t gone hype you
on no half-ass truths. What I tell you bout this here is the best of
what’s best.”
Another girl comes in. Astonishing as mine? Yeah, fuckin right.
This girl, she’s holocaust-thin with a worn face and mottled legs, and
stutters around in a sequined two-piece with her unpolished toes
pitched over the ledge of low-heeled sandals. Unc glides his chair
out from the table, says about her before we leave that even an old
pro such as hisself would be hard-pressed. “Be lucky to check a tank212
Mitchell S. Jackson
of gas outta that one,” he says, blows on his diamond-spec ring real
dramatic, and buffs it on his wrinkled slacks.
Next thing, we’re in Unc’s ride from a year other than the year of,
from the past that’s kept him captive, a joint he keeps spotless, fra-
grant with evergreen, with its leather seats and dashboard glazed.
No lies, when he fires the engine, it sounds like breath.
“Ready?” he says.
“For what?” I say.
He crafts an eyebrow into a half moon and says remember the
rules, position, palms, collar.
I tell him in my own way that I’m not so sure if I got what it takes,
if I’ve been blessed or cursed with heart, and so on.
Unc says, “Listen g o t d a m n y o u m e , you got to be aggressive
bout this bread and meat.”
“But?” I say.
“But me-ass, Nephew,” he says. “We’re born, not made. Me and
you, we are born. We ain’t nothin like these squares.”
We listen to tunes while real laid-back-like Unc finger-steers his ride
from the year of decades ago to a street that’s always featured on the
news for something uncouth. He parks blocks back from a busy inter-
section, unbuckles himself, gets out, and throws on, with the utmost
suavity, a suit coat of innumerable buttons. Unc tells me to come on,
assures me all I got to do this time is keep my mouth shut and watch.
Next thing, the man angle-foot struts up to the only live body for
a block in any which way. Nearer, I see she’s semi-alive, see she’s pale,
almost martyrly thin, and needs to comb the tangles out her hyper-
colored shrub of synthetic curls.
“What it look like?” Unc says, looking every which way.
“Slow,” says Unc’s throwback broad.
He offers his palm and she spectates it a moment before excavat-
ing a meek-ass wad from the plunge of a fossilized lint-bulleted Lycra
number.
“Who this?” she asks.
“He’s a small part of your business,” Unc says, “till I make him
more.”Head Dow n, Pa l m Up
213
“Humph,” says Unc’s throwback minute moneymaker. I watch her
jerk her neck and tug the end of her high-ass hem. She even has the
gall to totter off proudly.
“See, it ain’t nothin to it, Nephew,” Unc says. “When it’s in them,
all you got to do is nurture.”
He folds her meager salary and, as urbane as ever, slides it into his
sport coat’s inside pocket.
Morning, my sweet thing smells of last night’s smoke and something
unsacred. I can’t explain it. For a time I’m content to watch her
sleep—I do this sometimes, more times than I’d admit—to count the
perfect knobs of her spine where the blanket is strewn off, to watch
the tiny heave of her shoulders. Can’t help sometimes but wonder
how far she’s gone. How far they’ve gone, or tried. Hard to touch
her the nights I’ve seen her with others, so work nights most nights
I don’t. We sleep with a healthy space between us. Or maybe, just
maybe, this space is sick. Either way, don’t bust me down about it—
please. This practice isn’t to be indicted, only conceded as the way of
things. And if she’s accepted it, then why can’t you?
The traffic outside translates to no more than a low hum. The rain’s
metronomic against the gutters. The early light is a big-ass universe
in our room, as is this stack of bills—all hers—on the nightstand. To
be true, what she brings home confirms I’m indefensibly less than.
What I can’t shake is the sense that I should be slapped or slap my-
damn-self for even, however brief, considering my sweet thing. I sit
against the headboard and wait, bracing for a righteous blow or light-
ning to strike. Who knows how long it takes before she stirs, before
my woman rolls over and touches me the way only she can.
“You up?” I say. “I mean coherent.”
“Close,” she says.
“So,” I say. “I been thinking.”
“About what?” she says.
“My Unc,” I say. “He’s been rappin to me about business.”
She says my name as if she wants everyone on earth to hear—God
too, and sits up, bare-chested, with those eyes of hers ringed with
half moons of old mascara.214
Mitchell S. Jackson
“You can’t be serious,” she says. “Don’t you see that man’s a has-
been?”
“Maybe so,” I say. “Probably so,” I say. “But that man’s my family,”
I say. “And what’s worse, a has-been or a never-was?”
Nights later, under a gauzy starless sky, listening to more slow tunes,
me and Unc cruise, or not so much cruise as patrol, slick streets that
seem empty as ever. Unc mutes the music at a stoplight and swoops
around to me. He does it real cinematic-like too. My Unc stays on his
theatrics. “Say, Nephew, you can wait on a life or take a life,” he says,
“but once you’re in the life—well, there it is.”
What I’m thinking is now, right here, this is the perfect time to
speak on it, opportune to mention what I feel. But guess what, I
couldn’t ever admit to Unc that it isn’t the starting, but not know-
ing where and how and if it ends. That what’s enough to make me
a punk-ass bronze statue, is the chance of what could be my life be-
coming the only life it could have been.
Does that make sense?
Whether it does or doesn’t, it’s no way at all I could summon what
I’d need to confide; okay, it’s a slim chance at best, with what Unc
knows, with what we know—shit, with what the world knows, of
how the man stepped in and stepped up.
And answer me this peoples: What’s that worth? Or more impor-
tant, what isn’t it worth?
We bend more corners, reach another part of the city, a block
where the traffic crawls and every other streetlight is either quivering
or flamed out. Unc parks his aged ride where it’s easier to see than
be seen.
“Ready?” he says.
“I guess so,” I say.
He says, “You see her over there? Go get it,” he says. “Go get all
of it.”
“Just like that?” I say.
“Just like that,” he says. “Any problems, tell her I sent you.”
Not until I get closer do I see who he’s sent me to. She swivels and
right away it feels to me as though there are no words between us for
as long as I’ve been alive.Head Dow n, Pa l m Up
215
“Oh. My. God!” she says. “What’re you doin here?”
I look every which way, including past her. I am careful not to look
into her.
“Unc sent me,” I say.
“That black bastard did what!” she says.
She shakes a golden weave around. “Get away from here,” she says.
“Leave!” she says, and resists a step.
My uncle vaunts out of the dark, dark as the dark, his miraculously
extravagant tooth glinting, a lit menthol in his scrawny sacrilegious
hands, the taps audible on his double-vintage gators, his infinity-
buttoned sport coat buttoned at his nexus. He calls her by a name
I’ve never heard.
“What seems to be the problem?” Unc says, and flares his menthol.
“How could you?” she says.
“How could I not?” he says.
I see Unc saunter closer, take an exaggerated drag, blow out a
stream of perfect O’s. “He’s got it by blood,” Unc says, “look like
in more ways than one.” Unc proceeds to stab his earth-sized eyes at
me, eyes that make me wonder what in the world he sees. “Nephew,”
he says, “we can’t stop no one’s nature. Me nor you can, no matter
what, stop it.”
I put my head down and reach out my hand, palm up.
My fucking word, I reach it out hoping in the shadows neither of
them can see the tsunami in it.
I leave it out with an incantation murmuring. Head down, palm
up. Head down. Palm up.
“To me,” she says. “Of all people, me,” she says. She calls me by
the name she named me a life ago.
“No,” I say. “It’s Champ,” I say. “Call me Champ,” I say, and pro-
nounce it stern, like I mean it, like it was for me. As if it was in me all
along—or should’ve been.
The tsunami shakes up my arm and floods my chest. An eon passes
or more before I feel a few crumbled bills alight, not many, but oh so
heavy. I clutch the mass of them and leave my eyes shut for how long
who could know, and when I open them, I see her down aways and
stumbling. I watch her stop and peer and turn away from us. Farther,
I see her slaughtered by shadow.216
Mitchell S. Jackson
Then it’s me and Unc under a frail spastic light. The man drops his
menthol and murders it under his shoe. This Unc of mine, he annuls
the little space between us and throws an arm over my shoulder. He
pulls me closer than he ever has, closer than I think he might ever
again, and just like that he whispers something I don’t hear for how
hard my heart is pounding. Unc but for God knows, for me and him
might never know why or will, he stops and turns us face-to-face,
laying his hand—gigantic, colossal, massive, immaculate—on me.
“It’s where you are in relationship to, not who you claim ownership
of,” he says, positions us eye to eye, and makes a comment that to my
mind means never capitulate.
Only Unc would never say a word like that.
And me neither.
Until now that I did. I mean till now that—shit, shit—I just have.
And please, pleeeeease dead the undisputed heavyweight hatetroc-
ity on my old Unc, cause say or think what you will, the man could’ve
killed me. Instead of only leaving me wounded.
Really wounded. Afflicted for all time, but alive.
Which is all— b e l i e v e y o u m e , r i g h t h a n d r a i s e d ,
t r u t h b e t o l d , o n e v e r y t h i n g i l o v e , o n e v e r y
t h i n g g o d l o v e s —my uncle, yes, my uncle, has done.
And do you know where I’d be, who I’d be, minus this man’s
compassion?
You don’t.
As a matter of fact, you couldn’t.
Me and my uncle swagger almost in tandem to the spot where
he’s parked his ride. He swings his door open, steps halfway in, and
flashes that expensive grin of his across the hood.
“Now,” he says. “Now, you ready?”
“Ready for anything,” says me, the man’s nephew, this man’s flesh
and blood.23.
Hers
by O. A. Lindsey
Mundleson asked if I wanted to come with her. She arched her thick
brown eyebrows, used the word latrine without awkwardness. They
had taken her makeup away, revealing a drama of settled red pocks.
Her dye-blond hair had no benefit of product.
I stared at her a little too long. Told her I had a fiancée.
“Oh. I’m sorry. It’s just that, well.”
It’s just that everybody was fucking in the latrines. Port-o-lets
labeled in Arabic whose plastic shells would rock and creak, emit-
ting bathtub sounds throughout the night. Just that we were stuffed
inside a corrugated-metal hangar outside Riyadh, were sweating,
scared, and unwashed, confined to ordered rows of olive-colored
canvas cots and duffel bags. SCUD missiles traversed the night sky
and the moon hung sideways. Half a million Iraqi troops were poised
for the Mother of All Battles.
We stared at each other for days. We picked out the weaklings and
placed bets against them. We cleaned, then re-cleaned our carbines.
Oiling barrels, breaking down sight assemblies. They knew better
than to issue us ammunition.
It’s just that, when not an activated Reservist, Evie Mundleson
bar-backed at Game Day, a strip mall sports bar in North Tuscaloosa.
Her body was losing to the free potato skins. Her nights were defined
by Misty cigarettes, dead kegs, and tip-outs. And she was okay with218
O. A. Lindsey
this, there, between walls covered in Crimson Tide jerseys and plastic
NASCAR flags. Here, she was scared beyond panic, wanting only to
be groped in the community toilet. Many felt the same.
They flew us to the front in the belly of a loud C–130. We sat in
cargo nets attached to the walls, bobbing in turbulence like babies
in bouncer seats, too low to see out the window. We landed in a gulf
of dust and were jammed into trucks and taken to the compound,
a small collection of tents inside a head-high berm of sand. A rocky
desert horizon surrounded. We were ordered to calm down but stay
sharp. Drink water.
Take chemical pills. Rumor was the pills were untested on humans,
yet we stood at parade rest every morning on the Iraqi border in
saggy, ill-fitting chemical suits, chewing the pills on command. It
had been raining for days, so everything was soaked and beige and
barren and slopped. (They had not briefed us on this wet climate.)
(They had briefed us that Iraqis use American tanks and planes—
we’d supplied them, after all—so the only way to discern the enemy
was if he was firing on you.) The chem gear felt like a fatsuit as you
lumbered around the compound, your boots sucked into the mud.
A–10 Warthogs and F-whatevers ripped the sky, unleashing their ar-
senal a few seconds north. Concussions from missile strikes buckled
your knees, and shook you awake at night. Breathing meant wonder-
ing about Sarin or VX asphyxia. A primary concern was whether your
gas mask was truly airtight, or whether the atropine needle would
break off in your femur when the time came to self-inject.
Take the pills. Drink water.
Atropine: often fused with opiates, used to quell the death rattle.
After a week, one woman refused. She said her body was messing
up because of the pills. Actually, she said “fucking up.” She was Af-
rican American, late twenties with short straightened hair. Thin legs
but huge torso. She was ornery, and said fuck that, because the pills
were fucking her up.
We took the pills. She would die from a SCUD. They told us she
was crazy, and told her “Suit yourself.” They snickered in her face,
treating her like another loud black chick with fat breasts and friedHer s
219
hair. Like them, I imagined her cruising the mall in Tuscaloosa, talk-
ing loud, dragging a baby boy by his arm.
She refused the pills. A couple of weeks later she had to go to the
medical tent. She wasn’t pregnant—they knew that much. But her
period had disappeared; she wouldn’t bleed, and nobody could tell
her why. The medical tent shipped her down to the battalion hospi-
tal, which shipped her down to the main hospital in Riyadh, which
shipped her back up to camp to pack. “Mother fuck,” she said. “All
I wanted in this life was to serve, then to get home and start me a
family. Now I can’t even have no babies.”
More tests were required. They sent her home. We never heard
anything else.
Spec–4 Janette cried about her kids. You went to the motor pool to
requisition a truck, ducked in the tent and saw their photos taped to
her field desk: two boys, towheaded, in miniature Alabama football
uniforms. Don’t ask if they’d been to the stadium on game day, or
Janette would tear up and tell you about Mike Jr., singing made-
up verses to “Yea Alabama.” (Danny had fallen asleep during the
Iron Bowl!) She talked and cried over them to nobody, while sitting
near you at chow. Raised her voice to nobody at all about DAN-
NY’S TURTLE DIED OH MAN WHY AM I NOT THERE? She
missed them while you ate breakfast, just off of guard duty. For hours
you’d sat alone in a hutch at the edge of the compound, in the dark,
facing the void through a slot between sandbags, your rifle aimed,
your mind confabulating structures from the blackness. (Republican
Guard Advance or geometric patterns, the mind must see something.)
You tried to forget that you’d spent your entire month’s furlough
stuffed into the back of a transport truck, breathing diesel exhaust
and eating dehydrated pork, in order to wait to use a pay phone to
hear your fiancée’s answering machine.
And missiles burst. And the rains passed and the mud turned back
to sand and windstorms engulfed everything for days, filling your
boots, your eyes, your lungs, covering you in rashes. And Spec. 4
Janette yapped.
In our twelve-man tent, talk cycled about her tight, workout body.220
O. A. Lindsey
One night, PFC Lomes tells everyone that during guard duty he
snuck into the motor pool to smoke and found Sergeant Cross pump-
ing her. Says it just like this: “Sergeant Cross was pumping her, man.
She had that good-hurt look on her face. Like, she was bent over her
field desk, gripping the corners!” While telling us this he throws his
hips like Sergeant Cross, grapples the air.
After Lights Out, in the break between jet screams, our tent was
alive with fists rubbing against nylon sleeping bags. Everyone coming
in silence.
When by-the-book Sergeant Motes was sent home for being too old
and sclerotic, Tetley Teabag and I became the de facto Supply and
Armory leaders. Benefits included our very own tent, just Teabag and
me. We bartered goods with other squads, companies, camps, armies,
whomever. Extra boots got us a large, in-tent ice cooler; surplus cam-
mies were good for two foam mattresses; tent poles meant a radio,
and so forth. We were sultans.
Tetley Teabag was a late-twenties, rural Alabama high-school
graduate, desperate to be seen as a hard ass. He had the mustache,
buzz cut, and accent, but was squat and soft and round. He also had
the toe.
The Tetley Toe. Stateside, just before deployment, Tetley had thrust
a post hole digger at the big toe of his left foot. This earned him an
odd reattachment and a relentless wound. The medics made Tetley
limp around on a so-called Chinese Jump Boot: an oversized medical
shoe constructed of royal blue canvas and white Velcro straps. The
roughnecks harassed him for this, as did the officers, and the women.
But forget the boot. The thing about Tetley was that he NEVER
went to the showers. Night after night he shut the tent flaps and
wiped himself clean with a wet rag. In the dim orange lamplight, he’d
turn his puppyfat back to me and use this propane-powered camp
stove to heat water in a tin basin. (By this point I was taking two,
three, four cold showers a day. They kept drilling us for an attack
that never came. The sand was everywhere. My lungs wheezed and
my breath stank with it.) (This was also after Charlotte had stopped
writing me.) As finale to Tetley’s cleansing, he would put pajamasHer s
221
on, then wrap a Tetley teabag around his blackened appendage. His
grandmother sent boxes of them, instructing him that a woman’s
remedy was the only kind of medicine a man could trust.
On guard duty one night I realized I had forgotten my gas mask,
and had to come back to the tent. Though Tetley curled up the
moment I cut through the flap, I saw what might be described as a
mole or a nub, protruding from the thick beard between his legs.
I did not care that Tetley had the penis of an infant. Conversely,
he seemed relieved to be uncloseted, because the next night, during
a violent sandstorm he confessed to me that he was a virgin. Said he
was worried about dying unfulfilled.
“Mundleson is lonely,” I yelled. We had to scream over the wind.
We lay on our cots with our goggles on and our mouths covered by
Government Issue scarves. Rubbers were unrolled over our gun bar-
rels to keep the sand out. It was no use looking at each other because
you couldn’t see anything.
“What?”
“I bet Mundleson’d be your girlfriend,” I shouted again.
“Screw that, man.” He called her pug-ugly, which was unfair, and
which failed to trump the fact that he could not expose himself in
theater. No two ways about it: to keep his secret and find a willing
partner, Tetley would have to get home and marry some Christian.
After the nonmenstruating woman was sent away, only two black
girls remained. Back home they went to the U. of A. One of them,
Davis, had screwed this cheeseball Joe Minetti in the toilet back at
Riyadh. So there was that, and somehow that had become attractive.
This, too, was after Charlotte stopped writing.
Davis was inspiring. Curvy and defiant and laughing, always sharp.
One morning, the X.O. ordered the two women and me to burn the
latrine waste. He didn’t say as much, but I figured this was my pun-
ishment for hiding in the showers. The black chicks did not have to
figure anything. Our company was all Alabama rednecks and Spec 4
Janettes, so they knew they’d just been born wrong.
We yanked large metal tubs from beneath seat-holes in the ply-
wood toilets and burned what was inside. Having been half-filled222
O. A. Lindsey
with diesel the week before, we found the tubs brim-high with turd
and tampax, vomit and ejaculate and toilet paper. And we lit all that
on fire, and then walked from tub to tub, hour after hour, taking in
putrid black smoke.
Diesel burns slow and won’t explode when you light it. Nor will it
penetrate the surface of the sewage. So you use a two-by-four to stir
the char, to expose the flame to the sludge below.
Scorching shit in the desert. You get used to it. After a few hours,
the three of us flirted around the feces. The sky was beige and gray.
The sliver of landscape we saw over the compound berm was as barren
as the moon.
“Y’all don’t date black girls in y’alls fraternity?” Davis asked.
“Probably not,” I said. “But I’m not against it.”
“You sayin’ you have dated a black girl?”
“Well, no. But I’ve thought about it.”
“I bet you have.” She laughed, then coughed.
She and I both knew a liaison would follow. She had overnight
guard duty, alone, at the far corner of the berm. She said she needed
company. I needed company.
Diesel will now and again race like gasoline. This happened as I
was stirring a tub: a flame shot straight up the two-by-four, which
I flung out of panic. It hit Davis across the chest, smearing on her
desert camo blouse.
“What tha hell was that, you?” she yelled.
“Sorry, sorry. Fire just jumped.”
“You out your goddamn mind?” She wiped her hands on me, then
peeled off her blouse and wiped that on me, too. She was not wearing
her required T-shirt and her breasts bulged from the top of her olive
green bra.
“Reaction,” I said. “I—”
“What kinda man throws a flaming sticka shit at a woman?”
Both women cursed me and left for other fires. Though I tried to
apologize several times, and soon bartered them both to the Frogs,
neither spoke to me again.
This, in slow motion: the soiled board, twirling like a helicopter
blade, aflame.Her s
223
* * *
I strung up a large piece of cardboard across the tent wall behind
my cot. I pinned photos on it of women I’d slept with, or whose pic-
tures with me indicated that I might’ve. Drunken hugs at fraternity
parties, suggestive poses, kisses on my cheek. These weren’t the only
photos I brought to combat. But after word got out that I’d spent a
week on suicide watch in the medical tent, it became vital that I not
be seen as a weak-ass, a Tetley.
Not Pictured: Charlotte, in a royal blue armchair near the window,
dressed only in a white cotton shirt that was unbuttoned at the top.
Sleeves gently rolled, her tan legs tucked under her on the wide chair
cushion. I lay on the motel bed, naked except for dog tags. The
windows were open, the transparent curtains billowed. She said we
should look forward to being married when I got back. I did.
They dragged rank prisoners down the dirt road beside camp like a
slave march. They had stains on the seat of their pants and dust in
their mustaches, and begged us for the chewing gum and the salt
packets from our MREs. Who knows where they went. Rumor was
that they were nobodies, just a bunch of haji towel-head farmers, and
we had better forget about them and get focused for the ground as-
sault.
There was nothing happening. It was all outside compound walls,
staggering by, exploding in the distance.
My grandmother wrote a letter in scrabbled blue ink. It was the first
she had written since World War II, when my grandfather had done
tours both in Europe and the Pacific. I do not know why she didn’t
send word to my father, in Vietnam.
When I was very young, going through a drawer, I found an old
black-and-white centerfold. Opening the tri-folded paper, I was
floored by this first vision of glorious sex. So much so that I did not
recognize the subject. My mother walked in and caught me ogling,
then nervously explained that she’d had her face superimposed on the
body as a joke for my father when he was in combat.
Every day, every war, everybody waits for mail call.224
O. A. Lindsey
* * *
At some point, reborn from a psych eval down in Riyadh, I came to
realize that war was more about dividends than killing. I needed a
product. I started to make wine.
This old Choctaw cook had deep gulleys in his cheeks and when
he spoke he emitted a soft whistle over the letter S: Sholdier, bishcuit,
misshile. He gave me a few packets of yeast, and taught me how to
make applejack. Soon after, I was trading liters of it, alongside grape-
jack, orange juice-jack and whatever-fruit-juice-I-could-get-jack, for
fresh chicken and near-beer and battery-powered speakers.
One morning, a couple of French troops appeared. Not because
they’d heard of my work as a vintner, but because they needed a
translator, and because one of the mechanics suspected that I might
know a little French, being a college faggot and all. I cannot remem-
ber what the Frenchmen officially sought, but the next morning, in
exchange for five gallons of two-week-old applejack, an entire pallet
of French rations was delivered to my tent. Tetley was angry. I told
him to get ready for the Perrier.
The French meals came in tins, not brown plastic sacks. You didn’t
heat them by dropping floppy packets into warm water, you set the
entire tin on Tetley’s propane flame, then let the food baste in its own
juices and herbs. Instead of Dehydrated Pork Patty, this was lapin
avec haricots verts.
“No shit, Tetley. It’s rabbit, man. Bunny.”
“No shit?”
“Yeah. And we got tons of bunny, man. Half yours, too. You can
bitch-bath in Perrier if you want.”
This was, indeed, a moment. A fine moment. Cluster bombs, tracer
rounds, intestinal parasites—avec haricots verts.
A five-gallon jug of bad wine was only worth a pallet of rabbit. The
Perrier was traded for information about the location of the female
sleeping quarters, when and where to cross over the berm, whether
the women drank, if they were easy, and so on. My French was better
than I thought, and my answers worth an ocean of bubbling water.
The next morning we were ordered to a meeting with our C.O.
He informed us that a bunch of drunk stinking Frogs had spent theHer s
225
night in the women’s tent. He said this was a war, not an orgy. Guard
duty was redoubled. I was ordered to latrine detail.
Charlotte wrote that she was pregnant. Then she never wrote again. I
burned shit in the desert and watched A–10s rip the sky.
The battalion colonel briefed us by saying that Intel had lost an
Iraqi Special Forces unit in our area—So Stay Sharp, Dogs. That
night I left my guard post, climbed over the berm, and walked into
the void. The red lens cover was on my flashlight; I aimed it forward
and followed the circle. Daybursts of missile hit just up the road,
briefly illuminating the blackness. I prayed for someone to fire on me
as I neared the front. Nobody did. Darkness swallowed me, though
the rocks and sand in the red circle of the flashlight vibrated with the
missile strikes. I lay on the ground for a while to feel this, then put
my ear against a large rock to see how it sounded. I got up and wan-
dered for an hour or so, scouring that landscape. I found a cluster of
three tiny white flowers—the only living nature I’d seen for weeks. I
yanked them, then went back to the tent and wrote Charlotte for the
last time, asking her to remember no matter what. To please make a
list of details about me from back home, from before. I put the flow-
ers in the envelope and was done.
One sunset, some general helicoptered in, gave us a ten-minute speech
about victory, then left. He had a slight gut but strong posture, and
he walked back and forth in his beige cammies as the red sun melted
down behind him. We never saw him again, but he made clear that
we would lead the invasion, would spearhead a 155-mile thrust into
Baghdad, “crushing any rag-wrapped cunt” who got in our way.
Every vehicle was armored. We sandbagged the deuce-and-a-half
truck beds; we welded metal plates on the dozers and dumps. We
jerry-rigged a .50 cal mount on a pickup cab and pretended to know
how to use it.
They said Go.
For a mute instant there was no gender. We charged north, trucks
and guns, past missile craters, charred vehicles and burned trash. It
was apocalyptic and eerie, and we were wonderfully on edge.226
O. A. Lindsey
We located a collection of goatskin-covered foxholes, and exited
the trucks. Our rifles set on 3-round semiautomatic burst, we stalked
up with gunstocks to our cheeks. The holes were empty save for Arab
pinups and empty water bottles and cigarette butts. The airplanes
had done all the killing. We pushed on, north, so very much in search
of death.
The convoy drove for hours on the same scab of earth, no enemy in
sight, our own tracks disappearing behind us in sand drift. At some
point the combat-support vehicles just stopped.
They had radioed and said to turn around. The war was over.
We got out of the trucks in the middle of Iraq and took our hel-
mets off. We yelled and unloaded our rifles, ejaculating brass casings
all over the desert. The silence was unbreakable.
Tetley and I were ordered to make a supply run and find a victory
feast. We cruised the desert highway, a crisp gray seam of asphalt
through the beige landscape. Out of nowhere, an enormous cloud of
sand rose ahead of us. Tetley drove straight into it, passing a massive
armament convoy. Flitting strips of red, white, and blue nylon tied to
tank antennae against the grainy Arabian sky.
On the shoulder to our right I saw a camel. She sat there, buckled
down on all fours, groaning. To our left, soldiers stood up in the
beds of transport trucks, whooping and dancing and grabbing their
crotches. Pop music blared, brakes squealed. The convoy trucks were
sluggish and clumped together, billowing the enormous sand cloud.
Armed Forces Radio announced total victory; President Bush de-
clared an end to the Vietnam era.
A thin film of sand coated the camel’s black eyes, and crusted her
eyelashes. The troops, many shirtless, their silver dog tags wagging,
yelled and waved, and danced, the exhaust stacks spewing and horns
blaring, the music cranked from boomboxes. All of it, us, charging
east–west in a horde along an unmarked two-lane in the desert.
Next to the camel was her calf. It had tire tracks on its belly and a
bunch of bloody black gut-ropes shooting out its ass. I was amazed
at how precisely indented the tread grooves were on the tiny ribcage.
Tetley never saw this. I looked over and watched him pump his fist atHer s
227
the soldiers, and I didn’t say anything. We passed the camels, the fe-
male’s head cocked upward, her eyes staring at me, her mouth open,
bleating.
When we started to break camp, Saudi farmers loitered outside the
compound, lured by our discarded plywood and burlap and such.
Given their gestures and keyword English, we determined that they
wanted to use the scraps to repair animal hutches, make sheds and so
forth. Do whatever it is farmers do with wood and corrugated metal.
Hour after hour, days in the sun, the men stood there, white robes
and red headscarves. They grinned and mock-saluted, standing just
beyond the compound wall next to their tiny white Datsun trucks.
We were ordered to give them nothing. Haji fuckers are tricky,
they said. You never know what kind of weapon can be fashioned
from canvas or particleboard.
After a few days the farmers brought their daughters out to greet
us. Not kids, not sons, but daughters, head to foot in black robes,
bearing the wind like polluted ghosts. Waving at us. When this had
no effect, the daughters were made to remove their veils. They pros-
tituted smeary lipstick smiles. (One of the guys who talked to them
swore it was house paint, not makeup.) Still, we trucked all of the
materials out, passing them by, diesel exhaust and catcalls from cabs,
en route to the burn site.
Tremendous pyres dotted the desert expanse around us. Streaks
of black smoke rose into the sky. Tents, tarps, plywood scraps; Meals
Ready to Eat, water jugs, candy wrappers, tires, extra uniforms . . .
All of it was stacked into large pyramids and set on fire.
The farmers still stood there, waiting. We tried to run them off.
Their enthusiasm waned but they still smiled, smiled and waved when
you took stuff to be burned, and we couldn’t look at them anymore,
and we yelled at them, or just waved and smiled and said “Hi, Haji
fuckface” or whatever, or swerved the truck at them just a little bit,
just enough to get them to jump back. We catcalled their daughters.
We spat.
Alongside the order to burn, we had orders that every single grain
of sand be removed from every single piece of equipment: dozers,228
O. A. Lindsey
pans, back-end-loaders, trucks, and so on. By no means would we be
bringing home any Holy Land. They built a massive parking lot in
the middle of the desert, then parked hundreds of vehicles there, in
rows. With the pyres littering the landscape around us, we washed
sand off of things.
Evie Mundleson and I were ordered to scour the ambulance with
power sprayers. It had never been used, so the detail was a joke. We
opened the bay doors and sprayed the metal walls and the metal
bunks and the open metal shelving. Sandy water poured onto the
ground. Three large black scorpions washed out.
I walked over, kicked the scorpions around for a minute. Laughed
while they pinched at my boot.
“Come on, man,” she said, then stomped them.
I asked her if she was excited to go home.
“No way. You?”
“Nope.”
Last stop was Khobar Towers, a residential building complex outside
Riyadh. In the courtyard between the high-rises the Army leashed
up a camel. You could pay five dollars for a Polaroid with it. They set
up vending, bad pepperoni pizza, and nonalcoholic beer, and kiosks
sold cheap Saudi souvenirs, prayer rugs and T-shirts. There was a
pool.
Amid the thousands in that sober Araby I ran across D. Garcia,
this skinny Mexican I’d grown tight with during basic training at
Fort Jackson. An Army truck driver, D. Garcia had logged over a mil-
lion miles in theater. I told him I only wanted to be back in that sand.
He wanted to be back on that highway.
That night—the last time I would ever see him—D. Garcia and I
falsified a requisition for a transport truck, a deuce-and-a-half, and
stole into some immigrant area of the city, Filipino, where he’d dis-
covered you could buy black market rotgut. It was nasty and clear
and came in plastic water bottles. We got drunk and skidded all over
back-alley Riyadh, screaming out of the truck cab.
Back at Khobar we staggered through the hallways, playing com-
mando. We gave hand signals like in the movies, and then snuck intoHer s
229
rooms. There, Garcia aimed his fingers at sleeping troops, mock-fired
several rounds, then stepped back into the hall and on to clear the
next quarters.
Behind one door we found the women, splayed out on cots, sleep-
ing in army green panties, a thin layer of sweat on their exposed skin.
Evie Mundleson was among them, asleep on her chest, shirtless, her
breasts all smushed out. D. Garcia cocked his eyebrow at me, raised
the barrel of his finger-gun to the roof, motioned for me to go inside.
I nodded. He pointed two fingers at his eyes, and then at me, and
then disappeared forever. I saw myself stumble over to her; I heard
the moan that would erupt as I yanked down her battlefield panties
and shoved it all straight up her ass.
I still don’t know what stopped me from doing this. Really, there
was no barrier left. Yet I’m pretty sure I went to my bunk and jerked
off in silence.
Families and cameras on the tarmac at Bragg. It was hot and humid,
and Charlotte was not there, though I couldn’t stop looking for her.
People hugged people, hugged children, hugged reporters. Every
hand waved those little American flags you find in the cemetery.
Someone handed out Southwest Asia Service Ribbons, the same
medal awarded to Vietnam vets.
That night we put a bunch of bottles together, tequila, Jägermeister,
Jack, whathaveyou. It was guys only. Everyone brought a fifth of the
liquor they’d missed most. We drank violently, sitting Indian-style on
the patio outside the barracks, our dog barks reverberating off the con-
crete into the warm southern evening. We piled into a minivan cab and
went to town. The driver didn’t even ask, “Where to?” He just dumped
us on a busy, soldiered street full of bars. We wandered among hun-
dreds of redeployed troops, amidst loud music and vendors and neon. A
barker talked us into one of the endless, nasty clubs.
Cigarettes and air freshener and terrible music. A brown-skinned
woman in a denim miniskirt and halter top marched up to me, and I
asked her for a beer. She said nothing, only yanked me to the back of
the room by my upper arm as the guys howled. She pulled me behind
a curtain, lifted her halter, placed my hands on her large breasts, then230
O. A. Lindsey
put her own hands over mine and began rubbing us in circles. It
made me think of a Laundromat.
“You like these tits?” she asked.
“Uh-huh,” I answered. She might have been Mexican. She walked
me into a small room with a lamp and an olive-colored military cot.
I had to put both hands on the wall to hold myself up as she undid
my pants and put a condom over me. She sat on the cot and started
to work me over like a machine, licking my anus for a few seconds,
mouthing my testicles, fellating me just enough to promote erection.
Straight-up checklist: hike miniskirt, panties to ankles, bend over.
Enfranchise me with hard statements about my masculinity as I pen-
etrate. I finished instantly but tried to keep going, accidentally lodg-
ing the condom inside her. I handed her all my money, then stumbled
into a bathroom stall and wept.
In Tuscaloosa I borrowed a pair of eyeglasses from a friend, pulled
an Alabama ball cap low on my brow, and went to see Charlotte, un-
announced. I had never worn glasses, so everything was blurry. My
clothes felt borrowed and dated, and were musty from a year in the
drawer. She answered the door and we stood there, saying nothing,
until finally she said she was glad to see me. She was sorry how things
worked out.
It had just rained and was July hot. There was no baby. You could
smell that the box hedges outside her apartment had just been clipped.
I had not re-acclimated to southern humidity and a constellation of
zits had erupted on my face. I asked if she wanted to go to the zoo
or something. I cannot remember if we went. I really have no idea.
I am positive, however, that the next time I saw her it was twelve
years later, far from Alabama. At the edge of the frozen fish section
at Costco Wholesale, in Chicago, Illinois. Another Bush was presi-
dent, and a war in the same desert was breaking wide open. And
there she was.
Only, I wasn’t nineteen. I was a grown man. One of thousands
who’d been slowly drawn away. Away from fathers who fought in
better wars, from male friends whose only interest was whether or
not they’d killed anyone. From churches in small southern townsHer s
231
where they were made to stand on Veteran’s Day. Instead of the VFW
or the VA, this crybaby diaspora sought out spaces both alien and
familiar: exurb, highway, divorce court, Costco. These were grown
men who shopped for discount liquor in bulk. Grown men whose
doctors could not explain the sensation of fire beneath the skin. Men
who could not pin their failed relationships on anything quantifiable,
who obsessed over the inability to recover the lives they saw on TV. A
grown man in a beige suede jacket that had lost its nap, and who had
spent the many previous days on the floor of his efficiency, watching
a new invasion unfold on a small television. Missile strikes at remove,
rabbit ears adjusted, a rerun that somehow eclipsed the original. He
showered and sobbed and masturbated.
Nobody ever asks about the grown women.
Charlotte was still pretty and soft-spoken, though now with a
master’s and a career, and the confidence to look squarely at the past.
We stood under the fluorescence, smiling past each other, eyeball-
ing bulk cod, scrod, halibut. Before I could ask, she got my phone
number, and said we should get a cup of coffee.
Of course, she never called.
“Why on earth would we ever go back?” was the last I ever heard.24.
The Highline Highway
by Nathan Oates
Driving across the country had been Jacob’s idea, but Sheila was the
one who insisted they return along the Highline Highway. Through-
out the trip she’d navigated and he’d done most of the driving, a com-
promise he’d insisted on to keep her from behind the wheel where she
turned into someone else altogether: obscene, misanthropic, possibly
homicidal. The route she plotted was circuitous—revenge, he sus-
pected—always avoiding interstates, opting instead for old two-lane
highways. The Highline fit right into that.
Jacob had suggested they just go south a bit, get on I–90, which
would take them through Bozeman. He’d show them where he’d
lived and the stadium where he’d played cornerback for the football
team. But Sheila said no, they’d stay up where they were. They hadn’t
come on this trip for a nostalgia tour.
Other than the miles that passed through Glacier National Park,
there was nothing to look at except endless fields of low-cut barley,
broken only by the syncopated thuds of telephone poles, and patheti-
cally small towns named after lonely men. Sheila said, “I can see why
you left this place.”
“I didn’t live here. Bozeman’s in the mountains.”
“I know, I know, so pretty, all that skiing, blah, blah. But this,”
she rapped the window with a knuckle, “is what I always sort of
imagined. This is what I thought you were running away from.” HerT he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
233
window was cracked open and dark hair blew around her face. She
kept pushing it behind her ears, but in seconds it was free again.
“It sure is bleak,” he said, to get her to be quiet, though he wanted
to say he hadn’t been running away from anything.
In the backseat, Janey had her headphones plugged into the iPhone
they’d bought her as consolation for coming away all summer with her
parents. For the past few thousand miles she’d poured her attention
into the little screen as if it were her last link to a dying civilization.
He’d known Janey wouldn’t want to come on the trip, but he hadn’t
expected the almost imperturbable sheen of indifference she’d put on
since the second day. She pretended not to hear them when they asked
her questions, and remained bored and annoyed even as they’d vis-
ited the Grand Canyon, the La Brea tar pits, and through the hike in
the Redwood Forest. She wanted to be home with her friends from
fourth grade, lying around the public pool, watching the older kids
flirt in their too-revealing suits. And though he’d been relentlessly
upbeat all trip, even Jacob was ready to get home. The Accord, which
he always kept immaculate, was littered with food wrappers, tourist
flyers, ripped-up maps, and the seats were sticky from spilled soda and
mashed crumbs.
“Did you ever come up here?” Sheila asked.
“No,” he said, too quickly.
“Never?” He didn’t look over, but could tell she was smiling at him.
“Maybe, I don’t know.”
She picked up the map and ran a finger along the page. “But isn’t
Bozeman just down here? It’s not far at all. For you Westerners.”
“I said maybe.” He knew he sounded defensive, but he couldn’t
help it. Twenty years had passed. Half his life. This place had nothing
to do with him anymore.
“When? When did you come up here?” She always knew when he
was hiding something, and could never let it alone.
“I don’t know. One time, I think.”
“For what?”
The lie surged up in a welcome rush. “With the football team. We
played an exhibition in Saskatchewan. I think it was a recruitment
thing. Up in Regina.”234
Nathan Oates
She turned the map over to the yellow mass of Canada.
The memories came steadily: Jacob had answered the door in his
boxers, mouth sweet from a night of beers, and blinked. Standing
there was a man with a white beard who said they’d been watching
him at practice. For a second he’d thought the man was a scout, but
that didn’t fit with the coarse black suit, the beard with no mustache.
In the old man’s hands was a large black hat with a wide brim. Behind
him was a younger man with the same hat, only on his head. They
had a proposition for him. Why didn’t he get dressed and they’d take
him to lunch?
“It’s kind of mesmerizing,” Sheila said. “Just goes on and on and
on. I think you’d go a little nuts, living here.”
“Sure would.”
“And there we go, one of the local crazies.” She pointed to a horse
and buggy, standing in the breakdown lane. “What’re they, Amish?”
“I don’t know.” He sped up, but the cart lingered in the rearview.
“They live up here all winter? Without electricity? With wood
stoves?”
“I guess.”
“That must be so cold. The poor kids.”
“Must be.”
Sheila turned and looked out the back window and when she
straightened out said, “Hey, why don’t you stop.”
He looked in the rearview, thinking she meant to help the cart.
An old man with a thick white beard had been kneeling beside the
wheel. “Why?”
“Just stop,” she said.
“I can’t, we’re on the highway.”
“What? Just do it, Jacob. There’s no traffic.”
“Jesus, Sheila, it’s dangerous. And Janey’s watching her thing.”
“So what? Janey can pry herself away for five seconds.”
“What do you want to stop for?” He could no longer see the cart.
It was probably miles back by now.
“I want a picture. Just stop.”
Easing into the breakdown lane he said this wasn’t a good idea,
but she turned back to Janey and snapped her fingers in front of theT he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
235
girl’s glassy eyes. Wind slammed into the door when he opened it. As
he made his way around the car a semi roared past, shaking the air.
“Here,” Sheila shouted over the wind, holding out the camera.
“Get one of us.”
Janey held her mother’s hand, dazed and compliant. They climbed
down the gravel slope so that when he looked at the camera they were
framed entirely by the yellow fields. They were beautiful, his ladies:
both with thick dark hair, pale skin, and translucent blue eyes. The
backs of their legs, he’d seen as they walked down the slope, were
red and impressed with the crisscross seat pattern, but through the
camera lens they were perfect, the finished version and the smaller
replica, both prettier than he felt he had any claim to hope for.
“Smile,” he shouted into the wind.
Sheila insisted on checking the image, wanted another, but he re-
fused, imagined the buggy catching up to them, imagined Sheila
striking up a conversation with the man. He walked around the car
and got behind the wheel, started the engine, and because he was
rushing he didn’t check the mirror and so didn’t see the truck, pass-
ing so close it seemed to hit him in the eyes, the horn blaring, the
wheels within inches of the hood, then the second set of wheels, and
he turned them back into the breakdown lane, wheels spinning in
the loose gravel. Only at the last second did he manage to correct the
turn and head back out onto the road, but too fast, so that they hit
the ridge of asphalt with a crack.
The truck disappeared into the distance. They drove in silence.
“Oh my god,” Sheila said
“We almost died,” Janey shouted. “We almost had an accident!”
She leaned forward, clutching Sheila’s headrest.
“Yes,” he said, pushing on the accelerator. Then, “Put your seat
belt on, right now.”
“What happened?” Sheila said.
“That truck just came out of nowhere.”
“You almost killed us.”
“On purpose, Sheila. I did it on purpose.”
When he looked over she was crying. “I’m sorry,” he said. “That
just scared the shit out of me.”236
Nathan Oates
In the lull that followed he noticed a rattle coming from the back
of the car. The noise got louder. Soon he could barely hear Sheila
shout they should probably stop next time they found a place.
The mechanic wiped his hands on a rag and said there was a crack in
the manifold. Could they drive? That was all they needed, just to get
home. They could, the man said, but if they hit a bump the whole
exhaust system might just fall out on the road.
“So how long to fix it?” Jacob said.
“Well,” the man said, looking back into the shop. “I’m pretty full.”
Jacob said he’d pay whatever it took. The man frowned, squeezing
the oily rag. “For another five hundred, I could probably do that.”
“Good. Great, fine,” Jacob said. With the cost of the labor and
parts that brought the total over two thousand, but what were they
going to do, sit it out in this road-bump town for a week until the
mechanic got around to them? Sheila would be pissed and blame
him. But she was the one who’d insisted on the Highline Highway. If
they’d gone his way they’d be in Bozeman, strolling through campus,
or driving slowly around his old neighborhoods. Now they were in
this nothing town, which he’d realized, as soon as they drove past the
welcome sign, he had been through before.
Twenty years ago, he’d taken the bus up from Bozeman with the
ticket the old man with the white beard, Elisha, had handed him
across the diner table. The bus would be more comfortable, the old
man assured him, than riding all the way up with him and his son,
Adam, in the buggy. They’d pick him up in this town, where I–15 hit
Route 2, and take him the rest of the way out to their community.
He’d heard of these people before, some sort of Amish, or Men-
nonite, or Anabaptists, he wasn’t sure exactly. He’d seen them a few
times while riding to football games in the bus.
How familiar was he with their community? the old man had asked
over lunch, which it turned out only Jacob was eating. Not very,
Jacob admitted, chewing a strip of bacon. They wouldn’t bore him
with the details, but one thing about their life was that they were
isolated, out in the plains above the Highline. The old man seemed
to be winking at him—a tick, but it drew attention to the old man’sT he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
237
eyes, sunk into a thicket of wrinkles, the whites distinctly yellow and
thatched with red veins.
“Must be tough,” Jacob had said, stupidly, as the man seemed to
want a response.
“We manage. By working together. We are a very close community.”
And that was also the problem. Elisha had hired a researcher at
the university to study their bloodlines and had been told that if they
didn’t get an infusion of new genes, the community would begin to
degrade. The truth was they’d already started to see this: stillbirths,
defects. “Mental retardation,” the old man had said in his weird
accent, as if he’d come over on a boat from Germany.
Jacob was about to say he didn’t have any interest in joining their
community, but the old man held up a hand. “You would only need
to come and live with us for one week, and we will pay you very well
for this.”
“Pay me for what?”
“Three thousand dollars,” Elisha said, leaning forward, clearly
awed by the number.
“For what? Three thousand dollars for what?” At the time, Jacob
had twenty-seven dollars and nineteen cents in his checking account.
“I explained,” the old man said. “We need new blood. You will be
the new blood.”
“For one week,” Jacob said. They wanted him to come up to their
community and give some of his blood. No, his genes. Fuck that,
his sperm. He almost laughed, but looked over at the old man’s son,
Adam, who was glaring with just-contained hate. Jacob wondered if
he’d be screwing this guy’s wife.
“That is all the money we have,” Elisha said, holding his calloused
palms up, as if to prove it. “We cannot offer more.”
“Okay,” Jacob said, sipping his coffee. “That sounds like a deal to
me.” Even that afternoon he’d wonder why he said yes. The money?
The plain weirdness of the offer? But he didn’t think it was even as
rational as that. He’d been hungover, which made him both euphoric
and depressed, and it was this swirl of feeling that had made him say
yes, a surge of hysteria. Then, as soon as he said yes, it seemed there
was no way to back out, though of course he could’ve at any point.238
Nathan Oates
There was no one he could tell about the proposition. His friends
wouldn’t have believed him, and what if they had? That might be
worse. So he was on his own to wonder, increasingly, why he’d said
yes, and why they’d chosen him. How long had they been watch-
ing him? Just this weekend, or had they been watching him walk to
class, watching him head in sweatpants and sweatshirt to the gym
each morning for weight training, head out to the fields in the after-
noon for practice? Had they followed him back to his apartment and
watched him through the kitchen window, shoveling mac ’n’ cheese
into his mouth? And what had they seen that had made them settle
on him? Why not any of the other guys on the team? He knew he was
good-looking, had always had an easy time with girls, could just wait
for them to drape themselves across the hard slabs of his shoulders
and soon they’d be moaning beneath him on whatever creaky bed
or sofa was on hand. He was six foot three, two hundred twenty-five
pounds, with a thick head of light-brown hair (which, in his mid-
thirties, had started thinning, leaving him bald on top, a trait Elisha
and Adam probably weren’t yet aware of), and he had a strong jaw.
His mother had called it a movie-star jaw. “My little leading man,”
she’d called him. They must have chosen him for his looks, since they
propositioned him before meeting him. His personality, such as it
was, didn’t matter in the slightest. He could’ve been anyone, a mur-
derer, a sadist. The old man’s plan was stupid and even dangerous.
For them, and for him. Out in their community he’d be surrounded.
They could kill him and bury his body in some barren field. But still
he’d packed a small duffel bag and, as soon as the semester ended and
the cold had gripped all of Montana, he walked through the creaking
snow to the bus station.
After the mechanic settled up with Jacob’s credit card—“I’m afraid
in this case I’m going to have to get it all now,” he’d said—Jacob
asked if there was a car he could use.
The man led him out to a back lot, through a chain link fence to
a battered old Datsun with South Dakota plates. The car barely ran,
the engine dry and raspy, and the seats smelled like body odor and
mold. Jacob honked for his wife from the lot of the diner and had to
step out of the car to wave when she didn’t recognize him.T he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
239
As they drove to the motel, a low-slung building like a supersized
trailer, bound on all sides by a field of weeds and small, wind-shaken
trees, he explained the situation.
“We have to stay here?” Janey said, glaring out the window at two
boys standing up on the pedals of their bikes.
“Just for tonight. It’ll be fine.”
“How much is it going to be?” Sheila said, face already hardened
with blame.
“Enough, honey, okay? It’s going to be enough.” Thankfully, she
let it go.
In their room, which cost eighty dollars a night, he asked what
they wanted to do.
“What exactly is there to do?” Sheila said. “Did I miss something?
All I saw was a Dollar Store and that disgusting diner.”
“There was that movie theater. Or we could just drive around.”
“To look at cornfields?” Sheila said, sitting on the creaking bed
and turning on the television. “I think we’ve done that.”
“Barley,” Jacob said.
“Whatever. The answer is no. I’m staying right here in our lovely
room.”
“Well, I’m going to go drive,” Jacob said. “If that’s okay.”
“Whatever,” Sheila said, waving him away.
“Janey?” he said. She shook her head vigorously, as if otherwise he
might scoop her up and subject her to some arcane torture.
“I’ll be back,” he said, hurrying out.
As he backed out of his spot the Datsun coughed and clattered, ex-
actly like a car he’d driven back in college, a clunker he’d bought from
a graduating senior for four hundred dollars, a car you could drive
drunk and not worry about, because what was the worst that could
happen? You’d crash the thing, but that was no big deal. They were
nineteen, twenty, invulnerable. He felt for a moment that sense of his
old self, his old confidence, was returning, as if the fabric between
the man as he was now and the man he’d been was lifted by a strong
wind. But then he caught a glimpse of himself in the rearview as he
backed out: his wrinkled face, the tanned top of his head, dusted with
the remains of his hair, grown too long on the trip, and the curtain240
Nathan Oates
fell heavily back in place and he was once more a thirty-nine-year-old
high school teacher and football coach in rural Pennsylvania.
He passed the garage where he saw his car parked in the lot, the
windows all rolled down, two other cars up on the jacks. The town
dwindled away to nothing after that.
When he’d come up on the bus twenty years ago, Elisha had been
waiting for him at the station. Elisha explained he wasn’t allowed
to park the buggy in the lot, but it wasn’t far. Jacob noticed people
eyeing them as they walked out onto the main street. Maybe Elisha
had come here first, made the offer to a few of the locals, before head-
ing farther down to Bozeman and the gullible college students who
had nothing at stake. All he’d had to do was call his parents back in
Pennsylvania and tell them he had to stay after the end of the semes-
ter, but only a few days, for a football thing. Anything having to do
with football had always been good enough for them. Throughout
high school, when he’d been a varsity starter from sophomore year
on, they’d prepared him for his time as a star, but by mid-junior
year it was clear he wasn’t good enough for Penn State, or any Big
Ten school, so he started looking through the letters sent him from
schools he’d never heard of, including Montana State University.
On the cover of the brochure there’d been a red brick building and
high, snow-capped mountains in the background, students walking
through pristine air. He’d known no one in Montana and though
he’d always made friends easily and did on campus, he’d felt com-
pletely alone the entire four years he was out west. Maybe Elisha had
seen something of this. Maybe the old man’s spartan, religious life
had allowed him some insight into the person Jacob was. Maybe he’d
be able to let Jacob in on what he’d seen.
Had they talked on that buggy ride out to the community? It’d
taken hours, but he didn’t remember saying a word. What he remem-
bered was feeling, as they rumbled along, that he was doing the right
thing. Elisha’s people needed one of the most basic things in life, and
he could provide it. But what the hell was going to happen, exactly?
Since that breakfast in the diner Jacob had masturbated many times
to fantasies of sleeping with young women, virgins, but also older
women, widows, or maybe even married women. But as they pulledT he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
241
out of town and started along the breakdown lane of the highway,
he started worrying about the details. Would there be specific rules?
Was someone going to be watching, to make sure he didn’t do any-
thing forbidden? As they turned onto a narrow road marked by two
white mailboxes—which were still there when Jacob drove in with
the Datsun; he braked hard, just making the turn—he started to get
afraid. What if this was actually some sort of death cult, some sort
of ritual sacrifice? He’d thought about getting a gun before leaving
Bozeman, of hiding it in his duffel, just in case. In the buggy, as they
were enveloped by the endless fields, he wished he had.
There was another turn off the state road to get to the community,
but he couldn’t remember where. He’d have missed it if not for the
family walking along with their cows, the mother leading the way,
two young girls beside her, all three women with black bonnets on
their heads, long black skirts brushing around their ankles. Behind
the cows were a father and son, the boy no older than five or six, the
father probably not much older than Jacob had been when he’d been
brought out here, which was how old his child, the child he’d been
brought to make, would be now. He’d been twenty and that was
nineteen years ago. His kid would be eighteen. Father and son wore
straw cowboy hats and stiff black pants rode up above boxy black
shoes and held long switches they brought gently down on the sway-
ing rumps of the cows. Jacob backed up and turned onto the narrow
dirt road. As he passed, the father looked up and touched the brim
of his hat.
When they’d arrived in the buggy, Elisha had taken him directly
to the house where he’d be staying. The building was behind Elisha’s
house, in the center of the community, a tidy cluster of white houses.
To Jacob it looked more like a glorified shed, a single room with a
bed, a wooden dresser, a single wooden chair. There was one window
without shutters or a curtain. On the wall beside the bed was a pot-
bellied stove, a funnel running up to the ceiling, and beside it, a pile
of chopped kindling. An outhouse was just down the path, and a
bedpan was under the bed, Elisha said.
“Does this look acceptable? We thought you might like this better
than staying in the house. We thought you might want privacy.”242
Nathan Oates
“Of course, it’s fine,” Jacob said, tossing his duffel bag onto the
bed, which creaked under the weight. When he looked back at Elisha
the old man was frowning, as if he’d expected something more from
Jacob. Thanks? Excitement?
“Everyone is at a meeting. They are waiting for me. Do you need
anything?”
Without giving Jacob a chance to respond, Elisha walked out.
Jacob thought he heard a lock turning, but when he tried the knob
a few minutes later it opened and he looked out. He found what he
thought was the church—there was no cross, but it was the biggest
building in town—and studied the windows, trying to see in, but
from that distance all he could see was the hint, now and then, of a
dark shape, and though he strained to hear complaints, shouts, pro-
tests, rage in the voices of the men who’d come and find him in this
shed and bludgeon him with the sharp edge of a shovel, he heard
nothing but wind.
There was a single gas lamp beside his bed, but he wasn’t sure how
to light it, so he used the flashlight he’d brought when dark came
early. He was looking at the white spot on the ceiling when Elisha
came in, stepping aside to make room for a woman, his wife. She set
a plate, covered with a towel, on the dresser. They’d brought him
some dinner. They hoped he was comfortable. Again, without wait-
ing for an answer they left and this time he distinctly heard the turn-
ing of a key, and when he tried the door he found it locked. Maybe
for his safety. After eating the entire plate of potatoes, green beans,
and chicken, he turned off the flashlight and was plunged into solid,
depthless black.
Jacob recognized the church, and farther on he saw Elisha’s house.
Behind it the gray shed looked even smaller than he’d remembered.
After that first night he’d thought maybe he was going to be locked
up in the shed all week, but the next morning Elisha took him around
the community and introduced him to the men. They greeted him
kindly, though once or twice the men seemed to squeeze his hand
harder than necessary. He wasn’t introduced to the women, but they
were there, walking past on the roads between the homes, nodding
to him, or maybe it was to Elisha. The same was true of the children,T he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
243
especially the little boys, tiny, creepy versions of their fathers with the
same hats in smaller sizes.
As he drove past, the doors of the meeting hall opened and chil-
dren poured out, little boys leading the way, leaping off the four white
steps and landing clumsily in the yard, then racing toward the play-
ground equipment, an elaborate dark wooden structure with swings
and a bouncy bridge. Back when he’d been here before, there’d been
no playground, and from what he’d been able to tell the kids hadn’t
spent much time playing, but now even the girls were climbing onto
the swings, which the boys had left empty, and soon they were rising
high, their hair trailing out beneath their bonnets, the thick pleats of
their skirts lifting up and falling down. The oldest looked like they
were not quite teenagers. Twelve, maybe.
His second night in the community he’d been led back to his shed
after dinner with Elisha, his wife, and their unmarried son, Mat-
thew, who was mildly retarded. Dinner began with a long, elaborate
prayer, and then followed in near total silence. Matthew kept looking
up quickly, as if continually surprised to find Jacob there, opening
his mouth, then snapping his thick lips shut again and staring down
at his plate. Back at the shed Elisha held open the door for him and
looked at his shoes.
“She will be here soon. I will leave you to prepare.”
“I’ll be waiting,” Jacob said, but knew that that sounded strange,
maybe too eager, so he smiled and tried hard to think of something
else to say. Then he saw the lamp and said, “Can you help me with
that thing?”
The knock that came a few minutes after Elisha left was barely au-
dible. “Come in,” he said, not sure if he should go to the door.
Her hand appeared first, gripping the edge of the door, then her
arm, covered in black, then her face. She couldn’t have been more
than eighteen, and perhaps not even that, he thought, as she came all
the way into the room and closed the door. She was at most seven-
teen. Maybe sixteen. Jesus fucking Christ, she might be fifteen.
“Hi,” he said, standing up. The room was too hot: he’d stoked the
fire until it was raging, pushing in most of his wood, so he’d probably
be freezing later.244
Nathan Oates
She folded her hands over her stomach and looked like she wanted
to run, but instead she stepped quickly over to him and put her hand
on his chest. She was more than a foot shorter than Jacob, her hair
in a thick brown braid down her back. In all his fantasies he’d imag-
ined some demurely beautiful woman, but this girl was plain, almost
dowdy, with a wide nose and a gap between her front teeth. Standing
in front of him, she was breathing hard, panting, almost, and her
cheeks were flushed.
“I’m Jacob,” he said.
Rising up on tiptoes, she tried to kiss his mouth, but he pulled away.
“I don’t think,” he started, but saw her face harden.
“Here,” she said, stepping out of her shoes and climbing onto the
bed. She hoisted her skirt, lifting her butt to get it all the way up.
She had on nothing underneath. Her pubic hair was a light brown,
tinged with red.
“Look, I think,” he started.
That’s when he heard something just outside the door. A man,
coughing.
The girl on the bed just stared at him and lifted her hips. He
unbuckled his belt, pushed down his pants, and climbed on top of
her. He was as gentle as possible, fumbling for a while trying to get
himself positioned, almost losing his erection, but then he’d looked
at her face and she’d turned to him, and he slid in, watched her gasp,
then roll her face away as he began to move.
As soon as he’d finished she slipped out from under him, pulled
on her shoes, and left the shed. He thought he heard her talking, but
Jacob just rolled his face into his pillow. Tomorrow he’d go home.
But he stayed. The next day he walked toward the more distant
farms whose land pushed up against the sand hills. Beyond town he
could see men working, leading horse-drawn wagons, repairing the
roof of a shed, doing something to a silo. Back at the shed he had
nothing to do, so he chopped the logs of wood stacked beside his
barn, then moved on to those beside the house. Elisha’s wife brought
him a bucket of warm water and a greasy bar of soap and shivering
behind the shed he washed as best he could.
That night, his third, the knock came at the door after dinner. ItT he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
245
took him a minute to realize that the woman standing before him
was the same as the night before.
“Wait, I thought,” he started, but stopped himself. But what had
he thought? Of course it had to be the same girl.
She lay down and pulled up her dress, just like the night before.
“I was wondering,” he said, as he unbuckled his pants and pushed
them down over his erection. “Maybe you could tell me your name.”
She blinked as if the idea had never occurred to her. Then she said,
“Rebecca.”
“Hi, Rebecca. I’m Jacob.”
She rolled her face away from him, toward the wall.
“Well, it was nice talking with you,” he said, kneeling between her
ankles, but he paused. “How old are you?”
“Shhh,” she whispered, reaching down and grabbing his dick.
The next morning, after breakfast, which Elisha’s wife left outside
the door, Jacob followed a narrow dirt track to the rising slope of the
hills where the fences ended. At some point he expected the ground
to turn to sand, like at the beach, but instead the crumbly dirt got
grittier, looser, the low, yellow grass sparser. Why hadn’t he brought
water? When he looked up, panting, he saw nothing in every direction
but the billowing swells of the hills, the shuddering yellow grass. The
sun was straight up overhead, so he couldn’t tell which way was east
and after wandering a little, he sat down and waited for the sun to
drop. By the time he was able to start back his shadow stretched, long
and thin in front of him and the wind had turned sharp out of the
north. He ended up too far south and had to trudge along the edge
of the hills until he found the cow trail. By the time he reached his
shed his lips were cracked, his face red and burned, his ears throbbed
from the cold wind, and his hands were numb. He drank the ceramic
pitcher of water and lay down in the dark.
The knocking didn’t wake him that night, and he only drifted out
of sleep when Rebecca poked his shoulder. “Wake up,” she said. She
lit the lamp beside the bed and he covered his eyes with his forearm.
“What?” Jacob said, forcing himself up on an elbow. “What are
you doing?”
“I’m here,” Rebecca said, folding her arms across her chest.246
Nathan Oates
“No,” Jacob said, collapsing back against his pillow. “Not tonight.”
“I,” she started, then after a pause, “no, you—”
“Get out,” he shouted. He could tell she was standing above him
still. “Get the fuck out of here,” he shouted, louder, and this time he
heard her hurried steps, the door slam. There might have been voices
outside and the door might have cracked open, a head peering in at
him, then the door closed with a click.
Rebecca was surely still here, in the community, he realized now
as he drove out to the edge of the town, and then did a five point to
turn to start back out toward the road. She’d be in her thirties now,
but with the cold and wind and working the fields she’d look older,
older by far than Sheila with her faint wrinkles and pale skin. Rebecca
probably already looked like an old woman. Presumably she’d been
married off and raised the child. His child. Except he didn’t really
think that. He knew that having a kid wasn’t just a matter of shoot-
ing your wad.
He slowed until he was barely moving, hoping to see something in
the women’s faces that would spark a memory of Rebecca, or maybe
something of himself in a young man, taller than the rest, with dusty
blond hair, a strong jaw, big shoulders. The young man would be
pushing a wheelbarrow in front of one of the white houses and he’d
glance up as the battered car rolled past. Through the dusty wind-
shield, they’d see each other.
He’d turned Rebecca away the fifth night as well, and the next
morning Elisha had came to talk to him. Was there anything wrong?
Was he uncomfortable?
Jacob was lying on his bed, his arms behind his head. Of course
not. He was fine.
Elisha considered him carefully, rubbing his white beard. Then he
said that it was important to remember that Jacob had been brought
here for a job. This was a job they had hired him to do. They had
agreed to pay him good money for his services.
“My services? That’s what you call it?” He sat up and took pleasure
in seeing the old man flinch.
“Please,” Elisha said, holding his hands out, “cooperate with us.”T he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
247
“Right, fine,” Jacob said. “No problem. I’ll cooperate.”
That night Rebecca came at the regular time and he was standing
naked just inside the door so the wind made his skin prickle.
“Are you ready?” he said. “Because I’m all set to cooperate. How
about you?”
She’d stayed by the door. He told her to come closer. Closer. When
she was nearly up against him he started to unbutton her shirt. She
grabbed at the flaps of her shirt, trying to fit them back together, but
he stopped her hands and told her to behave. He slid the shirt off,
then unlatched her skirt and pushed it over her hips. Trembling in
her heavy bra that looked more like a bandage and her wide, sagging
underpants, she started to cry. He turned her around and eventually
figured out how to undo the bra, so that her small, high breasts were
free. He ran his thumbs over her pink nipples, watching her face, but
she only looked afraid. Then he pushed down her underwear and
pulled her to the bed. She lay down on her back, eyes clenched shut.
He knelt above her, looking down at her pale, trembling body, then
he grabbed her hips. She let out a cry as he turned her over, lifted her
ass up, her face in his pillow. Unlike the other nights he didn’t finish
quickly, held himself back, drawing it out. At first he was angry, but
the longer it went on, the more he wanted her to let go of herself for
just a second, to moan, to rock her hips back into him, but she didn’t
make a sound, even when he reached around and rubbed her clitoris.
When he finally came she climbed quickly out of bed and dressed.
She left the door hanging open behind her so he had to get up to
close it against the cold.
Behind a house, framed by a large red barn, a woman was hang-
ing laundry. It wasn’t Rebecca. He hoped she never thought of him,
but he doubted that was true. Or maybe not. Maybe this kind of life
purified her mind, sloughed away all the nostalgia and grasping after
youth that was so much a part of his own life.
The last night, his seventh, she came to the shed as usual. All day
he’d been trying to think what to say when she arrived, because even
after what he’d done the night before, he knew she’d come. What
choice did she have? And he had to say something, but all he could
come up with was, I’m sorry. I didn’t mean to hurt you, worry you,248
Nathan Oates
frighten you. Those were bullshit, but there was no way he could get
at the truth, because he didn’t have any idea what it might be. Still,
he had to say something. He couldn’t leave her with the idea that the
father of her child, her baby, was a bastard.
When she came into the room she stared down at her hands.
“Come here,” he said, patting the mattress. “Come sit next to me
for a minute.”
She wouldn’t look at him, and he could tell form the tenseness of
her posture, and the way she leaned away when she sat down, that she
hated him. With good reason.
“I want,” he started, but then couldn’t think of anything to say.
He just stared at her profile, at the slight puffiness of her lips, the
perfectly straight line of her nose, her thick eyebrows, which were
probably not thicker than other women, but she didn’t pluck them.
“I wanted to talk to you,” he said.
“All right,” she said. “Talk.”
“I mean,” he said, forcing out a fake laugh. “I mean, I barely know
your name, you know? And you don’t know anything about me.”
She looked at him for the first time, a brief glance.
“I mean, considering all this,” he gestured at her stomach, “don’t
you want to know anything? I mean, anything about me.”
She shook her head, then said, “What should I know?”
“I don’t know. What do you want to know? Anything. You can ask
me anything.”
She pursed her lips, frowned and said, “All right. What do you
want to do? What kind of work do you want to do?”
Like anyone else, this was almost all he’d thought about during
college, but like almost everyone else he knew, he didn’t have an
answer.
“I guess I’d like to be a teacher,” he said.
She looked at him. “A teacher?”
“Yes. High school, I think. Or little kids. Either one.”
“What would you teach?”
“History,” he said. This was the first time he’d even considered
this, but as soon as he said it, he knew it was true. This was what he
would do. He was already majoring in history. So why not?T he H ig h l i ne H ig hway
249
“What history?”
He laughed and said, “Any kind. American. American history.”
She seemed to be considering this, then shrugged. “Okay.”
“See, isn’t that better?” he said. “Now you know something about
me. Come on. Ask me something else. Anything else.”
“I don’t know.”
“Come on. Anything,” he said, and he wanted to touch her, to
take her hand, to hug her, but instead he just bounced on the bed,
making the springs squeal. She shook with the bounce, and he did it
again, then again, and her smile widened.
Still bouncing he leaned over and whispered, “Come on, help me
out.” At first she didn’t move, just sat there, shaken by his movements,
and then she lifted her butt and brought it down and they went on
like that, bouncing the bed, the springs wailing. A few strands of her
hair, which had been tied up in a bun, drifted loose around her face,
catching in her half-open mouth. She left just as she always did, not
looking back at him, and he lay down on the bed that seemed to still
be vibrating and he closed his eyes, trying to hold on to that feeling.
He drove back through the community as quickly as he could.
Sheila and Janey were probably wondering where he’d gone. They’d
drive back to that diner, sit in a booth, play music from the little
jukebox on the wall, and tomorrow the car would be ready, and they
could finally get out of there and head back home.25.
House Guests
by Alan Rossi
Lisa has rules: a movie, but that’s all; a dinner, but that’s all; a walk
somewhere, a show, a drink out, but that’s all. I’m trying to find a
way to break her limits. Tonight she wanted to swim. We’re on the
bay side of the island where the waters are easy and the sand thick as
mud. You can step in spots and lose your legs in a minute, sinking
up to your knees. We’ve been here an hour and I’m out and dry, but
she’s still skimming the surface like a bug, pulling herself farther and
farther out and then dipping from sight. I’m in sinking sand trying to
sink as far as I can. The lights of town blink on and off in the water’s
reflection. The smell of fry oil dwells in the air.
You going to Pacheco’s after this? she calls, treading far out, her
voice thin against the wind and carried away.
I tell her no, I’m going to her house.
I saw him trying to surf last weekend, she says. He got so pissed off
he broke his board. On her back, she begins a slow swim in.
I wasn’t with him, I say.
He’s kind of stupidly violent, she says. Are you two still going to
the empty houses?
Sometimes we go, I say. You should come. It’s fun.
A salty wind sticks to my body and I watch her going under and
coming up. A few minutes later she gets to shore cast in orange-brown
light. A quiet splashing. The sun’s like a dying bulb seen through a
bottle of whiskey, cloudy and flickering through clouds.Hou se G ue st s
251
I’m gone, she says, stepping through tide pools warm and clear.
Time’s up, she says.
This is ridiculous, I say.
She stands in one large tide pool and sinks down some and I toss
a towel and watch the way her reflection is continuously sliced and
rebuilt on the rippling water.
Pacheco has three new surfboards and can barely stay up. He lives
in this bungalow near the beach and is selling the house he and his
wife lived in. She’s been gone two years and is so much less than a
memory for me, only a name; for Pacheco, I can’t say. The wind here
whips off the sea, the sky a raucous hot summer blue with blooming
blue clouds, but the waves are shit. Pacheco goes out every day and
tries. He shows me the bruises, the sand-scraped skin. He tells people
he lives in a beach house and surfs and smokes pot because it’s better
than having a life. I don’t know what this means, but I go see him.
It’s what I’m supposed to do.
This is what we do: we find who’s vacationing, then we break in.
We don’t steal, we only use: their food, their cable, their computers.
We get to live some other life a minute, be who we want to be.
Pacheco’s stretched out on a leather sofa, sunburnt and thin. We’re
playing Scrabble in the Parkers’ home, an older couple who’re up
north for the summer: it’s a dark, damp place, with condensation on
the windows and no air-conditioning so it feels and smells like being
in a crotch. Out the back windows is a deck, and beyond, the ocean, a
full moon above it. People shuffle by on the beach, flashlights lighting
like holy lamps, searching out sea turtles. I’m here and abiding until I
leave for home and get to think about how to break Lisa’s limits.
Tofu, I say, arranging the squares on the board. Fifteen points.
I need something very definite and dramatic to happen, Pacheco
says. I need to throw these Scrabble pieces across the room and yell,
You all fucked my life.
Please don’t, I say. I’m winning and this isn’t your house.
Two years ago, he told me his wife fucked some other guys. I later
found out she just started playing racquetball and going swimming. I
told Pacheco this and all he said was, Is that really what you think of
me? She lives alone now; she could be anywhere.252
Alan Rossi
I need a new mountain bike, he says, disregarding Scrabble. I think
that would fill some need.
Your turn, I say.
If not a mountain bike, then watching someone drown.
He’s brought a speed bag and has it hanging from a doorframe and
he goes to it and smacks it with quick punches, running it against his
fists. Outside, the flashlights move up and down the beach. He has
the bag thrumming, humming quick to his hands. With a hard right,
he smacks the bag so it clutters and viciously bounces. He’s mixed
martial arts; my father tried to teach me to box when I was younger
and then tried to watch boxing with me when I got older and I
now get to regret not doing either. Pacheco turns and comes back to
Scrabble. He flings a pillow from the sofa which I block. It hits the
coffee table and nearly knocks over a vase.
Be careful, I say. I have a smoothie machine you can borrow, I say.
A smoothie fills many of my needs.
Letting me borrow your truck will do it for me, he says.
Sold, I say. Your play.
Do other people want to see other people ruined? he says.
You like making us something we’re not, I say.
Later, with the house still dark and humid and outside great palm
leaves shuffling in the wind, he says: Look at me. Thirty years old.
I have sixty dollars in the bank. Do you realize we’re still children?
Outside, the ocean’s a constant hushing echo. The flashlights have
stopped and the moon hangs above the ocean, a sick cloudedness.
I want you to bring that Lisa girl around, he says.
Can’t, I say. She dislikes you. She more than dislikes you.
She doesn’t know me, he says.
I can’t be around him more than a few hours. I tell him I have
to go and he tells me he wants to test our balance, which means he
wants to do this kind of wrestling: he clears out the Parkers’ living
room so nothing breaks; we match right feet up, each with a left foot
back, a wide stance for balance; our left hands are free, our right
hands joined; low to the ground, calves and hamstrings burning. Go,
he says. We try to throw each other off balance. First to move a foot
loses. His right hand crushes mine, pushes me back, and my weightHou se G ue st s
253
swings to my back left leg, then he pulls me toward him, my whole
body shifting to my front right leg and I’m done and down on him
and we’re in a pile on the floor. Again, he says. You can do better
than that shit.
I lose, lose, lose, and after each time I go down I want to break a
vase across his face.
When I get up to go, I’m sweating and he gives me a Gatorade
from the Parkers’ fridge. He says, I do need to borrow your truck
on Tuesday. I’ll give you money. I hold the sweaty Gatorade; he
feels he has to pay and I agree he probably does. I give him what
he wants.
Some other night I drive over to Lisa’s late after work. I’ve closed the
restaurant down and prepped for the morning. The golf course spar-
kles under the water of sprinklers. An old man walks his dog along
the beach road and the quiet here is more than some can be com-
fortable with. The beach houses facing the ocean seem like broad-
foreheaded men, looking out for some ungettable thing.
At Lisa’s, she’s got the Ping-Pong table set up in her living room.
This means that after a best of seven in Ping-Pong, I’m going home.
I get a Coke from the fridge and she bounces the Ping-Pong ball on
her paddle, following me. She’s got this bandana in her hair, a pair of
sweatpants on, a T-shirt of a bunny holding a machete.
You with Pacheco? she says.
Nope, I say.
She gets on her tiptoes to turn off the ceiling fan and her T-shirt
stretches up, shows me her stomach, a ring in her belly button. I flip
on the lights, pull the blinds. Her apartment is spare, a white room
with new cream carpet. Little carpet ball fluff. She’s big into coffee
and has used mugs out on tables, the TV, the mantel. She’s told me
there’s a kind of coffee bean that has to be found in the shit of a goat
for it to taste right. The goat has to eat it. I was confused until I real-
ized the goat didn’t actually chew the bean. She’s told me this with
such passion, such knowing want.
We unfold the table, play three games, four. The crack and pong
of the ball fills the room. I’m up three–one, so I let her catch me by254
Alan Rossi
knocking backhands to her forehand so she can convert. And she
does. I have this vision of a life with her. I want to stay.
Don’t let me win, she says.
I’m not, I say.
It’s patronizing, she says.
Would it be patronizing if I said I was letting you win because I
wanted to be around you longer?
Yes, she says. I think.
It gets to three–two, three–three, then I win the last game. We
fold the table back up. She turns the ceiling fan back on. I’ll see you
tomorrow at work, she says.
This is ridiculous, I say.
Tomorrow at work, she says.
A man comes from the apartment upstairs and knocks on her door
and then comes right in. Let’s watch a movie, he says. This is Fred,
who does not matter at all to me.
Yeah, I say. I’m tired. I don’t want to drive. Let’s all watch a movie.
I’ve got some new Netflix, Fred says.
Fred’s got Netflix, I say.
Lisa looks at me: Your time is up, she says. Fred, if you want to
stick in that movie, go ahead.
I stay standing in the pale family room, Fred unsure if he should
start setting up the movie or not. Lisa moves her body across the
room, turns around in the kitchen in socked feet, her legs crossing.
Crosses her arms across her chest. I’ll see you tomorrow, she says
to me, then spins on the kitchen floor again and walks to the back
bedroom.
Good night, Fred says to me with a stupid grin.
It’s a Thursday night and Pacheco wants to go to the Heights, this
part of the resort town that huddles the golf course. We drive, win-
dows open, the damp smell of salty air. Palm trees line the main
roads. Spanish moss swings from everything. I once dropped a pile
of the moss on Pacheco’s bed to make him suffer some. He gave me
a black eye for it. This was when Molly was around. Molly with the
great swinging breasts and the terribly pale face, as if carved fromHou se G ue st s
255
wax. She liked Pacheco more around other people. I dropped moss
on their bed when I learned Pacheco had been filching my dope. The
moss has these bugs in it, you understand.
We get to the office. Pacheco’s got the desperate eyes for Lisa, but
I make him wait in the car.
Ask her to come with, he says to me out the car window.
I pretend I don’t hear him and go in.
She sits at her desk, tells me which homes are vacant. She’s got on
the work clothes: white starched collared shirt, black suit pants. Her
hair is amazingly straight, like crazily impossibly straight and black.
Try the Meyers’, she says. They’re gone for three weeks.
It’d be easier if you gave me the key, I say.
I’d give you a key if you weren’t doing this for him.
You should be nicer to Pacheco, I say.
He should stop being such a whiner, she says. He’s got a temper.
He’s harmless, I say. He could use somebody paying him some at-
tention. Really. It’d be nice if you at least let him know you see him.
How the fuck old are you two? she says. You think you’re using
him, she says. He’s using you.
We’re all using somebody, I tell her. That’s something they would
say in a movie, right?
And then you’d walk out that door and tip your hat at me and
maybe wink.
Then you’d give me a blow job.
Oh, that one has me, she says. That one definitely has me joining
you morons.
At nine, we pick up Lisa and the sitting in the car gets confusing.
Pacheco doesn’t realize he needs to let Lisa sit up front, so I have to
tell him, and in that time Lisa says, No, no, I’ll just sit in the back
and let you boys give each other hand jobs. Pacheco looks at me and
I don’t regard him. I want to smack him. Lisa kind of lounges across
the entire backseat. Not in work clothes; she’s got this sort of library
thing going on. She texts on her phone and I imagine it must be Fred,
the guy who lives above her apartment. I found myself falling in love
with her leather anklet one day, then her legs, then her jean shorts and256
Alan Rossi
frayed edges, Ping-Pong, cruelty, rules, and then, once I noticed Fred,
everything else.
We should just go to the Meyers’ first, Lisa says from the back. I
got something else to do tonight. You boys only get two hours of my
time.
That’s not how it works, Pacheco says.
The first house is a stone ranch Pacheco picks out. My dad lived
in one like it. We wait a few houses down from this ranch. We see
people out walking dogs, lights in houses going off and on, figures
in windows, all these lives going by quiet. I like the sitting part, the
waiting part. The waiting part, the part right before you touch the
door handle and it comes open, that’s almost as good as being inside.
I used to like coming home to my dad’s house and being the only
one up. Up at three a . m . and listening to the house do its breathing,
quietly walking by his room, some woman over. Now the house is
empty and I don’t know what to do with it.
I need to be a lawyer or a doctor, Pacheco says.
Lisa rolls down her window, rolls it up, rolls it down. She stretches
out and all I can see of her are her delicate feet hanging out a window.
That anklet.
I always wanted to work in an office building, I say. Where there is
a clearly defined thing I always have to do and then instead of doing
it, falling asleep in the supply closet.
Instead you’re a chef, Lisa says.
I need to save people from serious life dangers, then betray them,
Pacheco says.
Instead you work in a bank, Lisa says.
When we’re done waiting, Pacheco goes. His skinny figure ducks
around the back of the dark house. How he was ever in mixed mar-
tial arts is incomprehensible. Yet he’s put me in a hold I could not
escape from and took my breath and put me to sleep. A minute later
Pacheco’s back in the car.
Nope, he says.
Some houses have a key hidden, a window open, an easily picked
lock. Not all of them though, not even most of them. We’re persis-
tent. We’re that bored.Hou se G ue st s
257
We find a two-story angel, a pink thing, lightless inside. No way in.
Then: a brick job with a window everywhere, but nothing. Finally, a
castle, some kind of pillar sticking up where a fireplace might be. It’s
the Meyers’, the first one on Lisa’s list.
Your turn, Pacheco says.
I check the door then under everything: the flowered mat, the pots
of flowers, the bench leg, then in the mulch beneath a couple rocks.
I go around back. There’s a pool back there, skinned with leaves.
There’s a sliding glass door, patio furniture, and this fake statue in
blackface. I check under him and we’re in.
See, Lisa says.
We make drinks; open the cupboards; spread out cheese and meats
and bread that’s not bad yet. We light up the big-screen and keep the
lights down or off. These places, they’ve got dimmers usually, and
we sit in half-dark. A good silence sweeps up through our hearts and
we’re kings and a queen in a minute. Even Lisa goes around admir-
ing, grinning. We use the good china that’s propped up on little
plate-stands in glass cupboards. I rub the rim of my glass and make it
sing. How these people live is unfathomable, the depths of their joys
and sorrows or the lack thereof. The house makes us better: we share
our food, our wine, we clean our messes, we put the toilet seat up, we
wash our hands, we do the dishes, we put away the food, we arrange
everything as it was. One thing, though, we change. We’ve turned
paintings upside down; we’ve switched vases on end tables; we’ve
moved jewelry from jewelry case to nightstand; we’ve left a shoe in
the middle of the room; we’ve left the television on; we’ve put a pair
of her panties in his sock drawer. We leave a bit of ourselves behind.
I wish I could say this was my idea, but it was Pacheco’s. My idea was
to smoke a joint and leave that smell in the house.
Let’s change all the candles, Lisa says. Switch places.
Later, we get bored and the house is a house. It always goes like
this. Pacheco says, I want to ruin these people’s life. He’s taking
down a joint, the smoke clouding up the room. He’s lying stretched
out on the floor, I’m on the sofa, Lisa’s at the window watching the
leaf-lined pool.258
Alan Rossi
Defecating on their bed would ruin their life, Lisa says. I have to
get going, boys. Your time is up.
I want her sickeningly. I’m tired of Pacheco and him being there at
all, him even existing at all.
Defecating on their bed might scare them, but not ruin them, I
say. You’d have to do something way more drastic.
I wish we were animals, Pacheco says. I can’t play this way any-
more.
You don’t have the moxie, Lisa says.
We’re not men of action, I say.
You’re passive men, she says. And as a woman, I’m the one who’s
just here. This life is not for us, we’re just guests in it.
We have no moxie, I say.
Speak for your fucking selves, Pacheco says.
Please, I say. You’re the worst.
He passes me the joint, eyes all swampy and sad. I wonder what
happens if we get caught, he says.
That’s more like it, I say.
We can’t get caught, Lisa says. Me and him are employees.
I go to the bathroom, the master bathroom, up three stories, which
has a Jacuzzi and a kind of sauna, but not to go to the bathroom,
just to get away from Pacheco. The master bed is a four-poster with
a thousand pillows. Like my father’s. My father used to box and he
tried teaching me. He built his house, he had an earlier marriage an-
nulled, he didn’t cheat on his women, he invested his money well, he
had a broken nose from boxing in college, he fell asleep driving home
from the coast and wrecked his car and killed himself. I got some
money and the house. Sitting there on the four-poster is like sitting
in the dream of the life I wish I wasn’t living. I turn on the ceiling
fan, thinking that’s amusing.
It’s three stories I have to descend to the basement. I go through
each room and want to never leave. When I get to the basement,
I hear hard voices, and at the bottom of the stairs I see Pacheco’s
skinny figure in the dark atop Lisa. She’s telling him to get the fuckHou se G ue st s
259
off her and Pacheco’s got her in some kind of hold and she’s getting
louder, telling him that he’s hurting her.
You said you want to see what I do, Pacheco says. You want to
know what mixed martial arts is.
Get the fuck off me, she says. He’s got her pinned, knees atop her
chest, a forearm at her throat. I’ve never been that close to her. Her
legs are kicking air. Her face is red, veins cutting through her neck.
I stand at the bottom steps and back up one step and feel some
flip in my stomach, some sick excitement, something that feels like
when you slip off the high dive, when you think you might miss and
yet somehow know no matter what you’ll hit water even if you hit
board first. In a moment, I’ll go in there and push him off her. In a
day, Lisa will not talk to me anymore. In a month, she will not see
me anymore. In a year, she’ll be a memory, another person I get to
regret the losing of. But not yet. I stand motionless and needful to
make this last.
This is what I do, Pacheco says.
Do you see? he says.
Do you want me to let you up? he says.26.
I Like Looking at Pictures of
Gwen Stefani
by Elizabeth Crane
I like looking at pictures of Gwen Stefani. I do not need to know
any more about Gwen Stefani than that she looks really good in red
lipstick. Looking at pictures of Gwen Stefani in red lipstick with
pale skin and pale hair and a white tank top and a baby on her hip
provides as much information as I feel I need about Gwen Stefani
in order to imagine Gwen Stefani in the way that I want to imagine
her. Very occasionally, I like listening to Gwen Stefani, but listening
to Gwen Stefani does not affect the way I look at Gwen Stefani and
what I get out of looking at Gwen Stefani. When I look at Gwen
Stefani in her red lipstick I think maybe I should try red lipstick one
more time, just to be sure, though really I know the truth, and my
red-lipstick desires are almost fully satisfied by looking at pictures
of Gwen Stefani. All that said, had Gwen Stefani never come into
my line of sight, the likelihood is high that I would not feel that
anything was missing.
I like looking at photographs of New York City in the 1960s and
’70s to see if they remind me of something I forgot. I like looking at
old advertisements. I like looking at B movies on Spanish language
channels. I like looking at some of your pictures on Facebook, even
when I don’t know you. I like looking at your bookshelves. I likeI L i ke L o ok i ng at P ic t u re s of G wen Stefa n i
261
looking at everything in hardware stores and stationery stores. I like
looking at my grandmother’s sewing machines when I go out to
the garage; they look like snazzy old cars, though they each weigh
about forty pounds, I don’t know if they work, and I only ever look
at them when I’m looking for something else. I like looking at tall
shoes that cost a thousand dollars. I like looking at two men kiss-
ing. I like the slightly electronic thwacking sounds of the automated
postal machine, which I suspect could have been made to be silent
but were made to have this sound so that the user might feel a sense
of accomplishment, a certainty of delivery, and which could have
been any sound, a bell, or a chime, but which was decided, finally
to be a thwack. I like the sound of Car Talk in the background on
Saturday mornings more than I have a regular need for the content
of the program. I like seeing old maps on your wall. I like seeing
old black men wearing hats so much. I like seeing bodegas, though
I rarely go in. I like looking at sculptures by Jeff Koons. I like look-
ing at street art, sometimes, like when they cover lampposts and
things with sweaters. I like looking at craft websites. I like to look
at my craft supplies. I like to look at your craft supplies and see
how they’re organized so much more interestingly and efficiently
than my craft supplies. I like to look at numbers. I like looking at
the same old brownstones again and again and again. I like look-
ing at old warehouses with broken windows surrounded by vacant
lots filled with weeds and rabbits. I like looking at Girls Gone Wild
commercials in the middle of the night when I can’t sleep, the ones
on network TV with the body parts blurred out. I like looking at
videos of awkward twelve-year-old boys lip-syncing and dogs and
puppies and cats and kittens and anteaters and anteater babies and
unlikely animal friends.
Some of these things I would like in my house, some not, al-
though mostly that’s beside the point. At first I thought I should
simply say I look at these things, instead of I like to look at these
things, but because I look at them for as long as I do, or as often as
I do, I have decided that I must like looking at them, otherwise why
wouldn’t I look away? I dislike looking at as many things or more,
women in dresses with only one sleeve, new subdivisions with no262
Elizabeth Crane
trees, anything I’m told is intended to be “shocking,” grisly things
in movies, the trash that blew onto your lawn, and the big gray sky.
I dislike the word ugly, the sound, the meaning, the implication,
though it is occasionally useful in instances of describing a black-
ness of heart. There may or may not be rhyme or reason to any of
it. Sometimes I try to wish these things away that I do not like and
there they still are.27.
I’ll Take You There
by David Williams
She was in the claw-foot tub. She was in there with her flesh and her
bones and some suds, reading a book of stories. Ivy Coldwater was
her name. She had a short glass of beer on the yellowing tile floor
beside one of the claw feet. She took a sip of beer and set the book,
spine up, on the side of the tub. She sank low into those suds. Ivy
figured if the world ended right then, and wouldn’t that just be the
way, she’d at least be clean and only slightly tipsy.
She wondered how the world would end. She thought maybe a
flood. It would just rain and rain some more, carpet tacks and car-
penters’ nails, the great sky unsheathed. And then Ivy Coldwater, of
general delivery, Prophet, Mississippi, would float away in her claw-
foot tub, on the current’s whims, to heaven or hell or the swamps of
Louisiana.
Ivy loved claw-foot tubs. Once, as a little girl, she saw one walk
across the bathroom floor. This was in the big house on Peabody
Avenue, up in Memphis, before her daddy became a white-collar
criminal and was sent to country-club prison and her mama took up
with God and lost her sense of joy and wonder.
The tub took three steps on its claw feet and then seemed about to
break into a run. But it did not. Tub water sloshed and then settled
as the claw-foot tub hunkered anew. No more did it move. The tub
seemed enormously proud of itself, still and all.264
David Williams
When Ivy drew a picture of what she’d seen, the tub was up on
its hind legs, dancing something like the Dog. Bathwater was up to
the tub’s ankles—Ivy had given ankles to those claw feet and short
lengths of shapely legs, too, and a body that bowed and swayed. Ivy
had seen her mama dance the Dog with a perfect stranger.
The picture of the dancing tub was crayon on paper plate. Ivy was
a girl of eight, already an artist.
“Why, Ivy,” her mama said when she saw it. “That’s a lovely picture.”
“It really happened, Mama,” Ivy said. “Swear to Jesus.”
Swearing was much the fashion in the big house on Peabody
Avenue those days, most all of it sweet in nature. Ivy’s mama swore
to God and Jesus and the ghosts of soldiers, to the local law, Rock
City and the House of Bourbon. She’d swear to whichever singer was
singing on those records she always played. She’d stub her toe or spill
a swish of drink and swear to Fats Waller. She loved sly talkers, blues
shouters. She loved the old stuff.
“Well, that is something,” Ivy’s mama said with joy and wonder
and a voice like song itself. She had black hair bobbed like a flapper
girl’s and she carried a martini glass she used as an ashtray. “Why, girl,
I’d never seen that tired ol’ tub take more’n three steps and stop.”
This was all before Ivy’s mama went sane and stopped dancing the
Dog with perfect strangers and grew her hair out straight and let it
go natural; now her hair was the color of the mouse that lived under
Ivy’s kitchen sink. This was all before Ivy’s mama took to wearing
loose dresses and low heels and before she quit gin and cigarettes and
banished Fats and every one of his sly-talking cronies to the crawl
space of her mind.
“Ivy!”
The window over the tub was open and so she could hear her
mama’s voice from the sidewalk below. Ivy could hear her mama’s
voice from underwater. Ivy reckoned she could float clear to the
swamps of Louisiana, to the great ocean beyond, the vastness there,
and hear her mama’s voice over the awful racket of the world ending.
She slipped down into the water again. She imagined what her mama
was out there shouting. She well could guess. Her mama was saying,
Now, you get out of that tub and put on a loose dress and some low
heels and come to church with me, girl.I ’l l Ta ke You T here
265
Ivy was not a girl. She was a full-grown woman of thirty-three and
a third, like those old records her mama used to play. She was the age
her mama was when her mama went sane.
“Hey down there, Mama,” Ivy finally shouted back, after she’d
come up from under the suds. She wondered if she was going to go
sane, too. She did not think she could cope with the world if that
were to happen. The world was in the pisser, pretty much, was Ivy’s
view of the world. The varnish was off the old place. It was shabby
and worn and starting to smell, bit of rankness about. Maybe it really
was about to end. Maybe it already had but the government was keep-
ing it hush-hush and the newspapers had not caught wind. Ivy sighed
and waited for what her mama would say next.
“Hurry now, girl,” she said. “We going to be late for church.”
Ivy’s mama’s way of talking had taken a turn for the country after
she found religion. It was as if God was just a bit of a hick himself,
and so was naturally suspicious of that uptown city grammar.
“Come on up, Mama,” Ivy said. “Door’s unlocked. I’m not going
to church but you’re welcome to come in and hound me some.”
Ivy didn’t know why there needed to be church on Wednesday.
She didn’t know what the Lord needed with a second day. The Lord’s
ways and means were much on her mind. She sighed some more. She
took a sip of beer and set the glass by the claw foot. She stood and
looked out the window. Suds dripped from her skin and her bones and
onto that book of stories. She had been reading one about a man who
takes his son to the mountains. They weren’t going up there to fish.
Ivy shook her head at her mama’s loose dress and low heels and
her straight hair the color of a poor kitchen mouse. And she remem-
bered her mama in that flapper girl hair and that martini glass that
had cigarette ashes in it even when she was using it to drink marti-
nis. Ivy remembered her mama dancing the Dog with that perfect
stranger and wondered whatever did become of him. Maybe he’d
gone to country-club prison, too, on account of the scam he’d tried
to pull—selling the Coldwaters’ own house to Ivy’s mama, and get-
ting as far as her signing certain legal documents before they com-
menced to dancing and then to other things. Maybe he was cell mates
with Ivy’s daddy. Maybe they passed the days talking about a woman
they’d both known, black-haired and tipsy-wild, loved to hear Fats266
David Williams
Waller sing “All That Meat and No Potatoes.” Maybe they wondered
how she was getting on, what she was doing, wherever she was. Ivy
wondered, too.
Ivy missed her daddy some, but she missed her mama more.
“Hey there, Mama.”
“Mother,” her mama said, as if even country folk with their hick
grammar ought to carry forth with some small bit of dignity in the
eyes of God and small-town Mississippi. Ivy’s mama walked into the
house as she always did, with suspicion, as if she might be set upon
by beggars or addicts or God forbid some artists. “And hurry,” she
said. “We be late.”
“Late’s when you’re dead, Mama,” Ivy said. “You’ll be there when
you get there and they can wait or go ahead on. Besides, you know
every word Preacher Mull’s going to say before he says it.”
“His name ain’t Preacher Mull, Ivy.”
The preacher’s name was Mill, but Ivy called him Mull because
he couldn’t wish you a blessed day without worrying over it first. Ivy
didn’t blame him, for he was young and did not know his own mind,
much less have the audacity, the gall, to stand before a congregation
and tell its members what to think and how to think it, though they
had come for that very purpose.
“Mother,” her mama said yet again. “I prefer”—her voice turned
country-formal—“to be called Mother. And hurry it, girl.”
“You can be the Queen of Soul, if you like. But I don’t go to
church on Sunday, so I damned sure am not going on a Wednesday.
Mama, Mama, Mama.”
Ivy stood in the kitchen doorway in an old bathrobe that was yel-
lowing like those bathroom tiles. She had left her beer beside the
claw foot. She wished that tub would up and bring it to her. Maybe
she could train it, like with a dog. Teach it tricks and dance steps and
basic household chores, like dusting and straightening and bringing
her beer to her. If it could only go a few steps, all well and fine. She’d
meet it halfway. She was a reasonable woman.
Ivy sighed. Her hair was sopping. It was short and black but she
could not get it to look like her mama’s used to. Her hair was not toI ’l l Ta ke You T here
267
be tamed. It draped wild down in her dark eyes, and, doing so, drove
men of the region to bold acts. They wanted to steal cars for her, bilk
corporations, break banks, turn those Tunica County, Mississippi,
casinos back to cotton fields with their slick card playing and call it
White Christmas. And in that way, Ivy’s was much like her mama’s
used to be. But Ivy had pretty well had it with men. One had left her
for the war and another for professional baseball and one was a rock
’n’ roll star who sang songs of her on the radio. (Worth noting: A
man had never left Ivy for another woman.) But Ivy didn’t think the
world was ending just on account of she couldn’t hold a man. Men
were the least of it. There were the women and children, too—all of
humankind, really, and their general petty nature, their bickering
and instigating, their trifling ways and shiftless means, their bone-
meanness, and the way they drove like their cars were the only rocket
ships in the sky, and how they’d shoot one another over a chicken
wing or a rib bone, how they liked to draw blood, just generally.
It was everything, really. It took an Act of God to get them to act
half-civil to one another. And then they’d fall all over themselves, ass
over casseroles, to help a neighbor. A hurricane would do it. A flood
would.
“I sure did hate to hear about the levees,” Ivy said, feigning neigh-
borly human concern. “Here’s you a covered dish.”
“What, Ivy?”
“Nothing, Mama,” she said, and thought about that phrase, Act
of God.
She went to the refrigerator for another beer. Ivy drank Schlitz, like
Patsy Cline and Elvis’s mama, Gladys was her name, and James Earl
Ray and lots of people, some good and some evil, nobody ever heard
of. Ivy liked the taste of it, but mostly Ivy just believed in drinking
cheap. Ivy believed in a good many things: drink cheap, think twice,
sleep late, and never trust a man who carries his guitar by the neck
like it’s a chicken he’s just killed, were some of Ivy’s wisdoms.
That left a lot Ivy did not know, though, a lot for her to wonder
over and ponder on. She had a wondering mind, Ivy Coldwater. She
wondered, like for instance, if the eternal question wasn’t so much
“Why?” or “What’s next?” but “Huh?” Damned if Ivy Coldwater,268
David Williams
in her study of man, God, and the macrocosm, could divine a reason
for it all.
“It’s a hell of a god,” Ivy said now, “who’d act like that.”
“What’s that, Ivy?” her mama said. “What’s that about God?”
“Why don’t they call them Acts of the Devil? You know, hurri-
canes and floods and the like, that earthquake they say we’re going to
have. Every time there’s a flood or something and somebody calls it
an Act of God, I bet God’s got to pay the devil royalties.” But Ivy did
not believe in the devil. She thought he was made up and his story
told to everyone so they’d be kind to one another and not grow up
to rob the First National Bank of Clarksdale or shoot their spouses
over a chicken wing or a rib bone, though some of that bad stuff hap-
pened, anyway, and some worse—but how much worse would it be,
Ivy wondered, if people weren’t afraid of bein’ sent way down south
to the land of shackles?
Ivy sang a little of the old Skip James blues, “Devil Got My
Woman.” She sang, “I’d rather be the devil, than to be some woman’s
man.” Ivy could sing a little blues, all down low and scratchy, but she
couldn’t go up high and moan like only Skip James and some ghosts
could do. Ivy was pretty sure she believed in ghosts, though in a
straight-up practical sense it didn’t matter whether she did or not:
Ghosts believed in her. One night, late, she caught one taking a bath
in the claw-foot tub, reading that book of stories. He was reading her
Bible and singing, “Jesus Is a Mighty Good Leader” and “Be Ready
When He Comes.” Ivy detected a sly mocking tone. She stood in the
bathroom doorway in nothing but a Piggly Wiggly T-shirt and said,
“Are you real?” But the ghost didn’t say, just kept on reading and
singing. He didn’t seem to notice the near-naked woman standing
in the doorway, though he did go from “I Got to Cross the River
of Jordan” into a little snatch of the dirty blues number, “She’s Got
Jordan River in Her Hips,” and back again. Then, without even look-
ing up, the ghost slapped his thigh and laughed real big. You would
have called it a guffaw. The next morning, Ivy thought she’d dreamed
it all, but there were six empty Schlitz cans on the floor beside the
one claw foot and there was a ring about the tub. The Bible was open
to Revelation, the bit about Jezebel on a bed of suffering.I ’l l Ta ke You T here
269
There had been a time Ivy could have told her mama all about it,
asked her what it meant, and they’d have settled in the parlor and
pondered it together, over drinks and smokes. They’d have had a
good laugh themselves, the odd guffaw, and Ivy’s mama would have
said something like, “Why, I hadn’t seen that ol’ ghost drink more
than three beers and start looking for something to hump.”
Ivy called her little sister Jess up in Memphis instead. Jess said,
“Maybe you weren’t his type.” Jess was a scientist. She was trying to
cure cancer at the cost of untold hundreds of mice. She didn’t believe
in God or ghosts and only half-listened to what Ivy said and then
made as unpromising a reply as possible; she really had work to do,
cancer to cure, mice to poison. Ivy said, “You run across many men
up in Memphis, Sis, that near-naked aren’t their type?” Jess, who
preferred to be called Jessica or better yet, Dr. Coldwater, did not say,
one way or another.
“I really have to go, Ivy,” she finally said.
“You know, Jess,” Ivy said, “sometimes I wonder if you’d rather
be poisoning people to save the mice. Because mice don’t heap their
petty bullshit on you. They don’t burden you that way. They don’t
pull family rank on you.”
“Are you finished, Ivy?”
“I’m just getting revved, I think, Jess. But I won’t bother you any-
more. I’m sorry, about what I said just then. I am. It’s just—I don’t
know. I’m no better than anybody else. I’m marginally worse than
most. I’m a pain in the ass, I believe’s the technical term. But at least
I can see that, can see it all—life itself, I mean—for what it is.”
Silence on the other end of the line.
“Jess.”
“Jessica.”
“Let’s get together real soon, have some beers and talk. What say,
Sis? I’ll meet you halfway.”
“You mean, like, Rosedale?”
Ivy laughed and Jess seemed very nearly to join her. It was a
moment, however small.
“Yeah,” Ivy said. “What the hell, Rosedale.”
But Jess had gone cold again. The flash of old times, of the girl the270
David Williams
woman used to be, passed, as flashes do. She said, “I don’t know, Ive.
I, you know. I can’t get away just now.”
Silence again.
“Good-bye, Dr. Jessica Coldwater,” Ivy finally said. “Tell Jess I
love her, still and all. Tell her I miss her, and Mama, too.”
“You always push things that little bit too far, Ivy,” her sister said.
“You always did.”
“The devil is real,” Ivy’s mama said now, as if she might have been
reading her girl’s thoughts, as if doubts and wonderings were visible
things, dust mites in the air or flies a-buzzing.
“I know, Mama. And Jesus, he’s a mighty good leader.” Ivy thought
of a couple of words—battle royale—but did not say them. She loved
her mama, still and all.
“Don’t mock,” her mama said. “You need to get right, girl. You
need to get you some of that old-time religion.” She about broke into
song, the way she said it.
Religion, Ivy thought. That’s the worst of it. Why couldn’t they
just stop at faith? You could keep faith in your pocket, like a lucky
stone or that quarter she had from her little-girlhood, smashed by the
Pontotoc Rocket train as it made for Memphis. Nobody even had to
know it was in there. Ivy Coldwater didn’t have much faith, but it was
hers and she kept it close.
“Oh me of little faith,” she said.
One other night, Ivy awoke and heard singing from down the hallway.
There was not a soul or a ghost in the claw-foot tub, but in the kitchen
at the table she saw Jesus, reading As I Lay Dying to the kitchen mouse.
Or anyway, Jesus was reading it and the kitchen mouse was there, rapt
as a thing can be that only knows to skitter and zag and flee, that
knows no home but the lam and no art but the chase. Ivy stood in the
doorway and listened for the longest time to the master’s words, to the
savior’s melodic way with them. Ivy had forgotten what a funny book it
was, for it being about a woman’s dying. She awoke the next morning
curled in the doorway of the kitchen. The mouse was a foot away, its
face scrunched and knowing, but mostly sad, it seemed.I ’l l Ta ke You T here
271
“You feeling low, little fella?” Ivy said.
The mouse did, in fact, look a little pink, what Ivy’s mama used to
call peaked. Pee-kid, was how she said it.
“Well, if it’s the cancer I can send you up to Memphis to my sister
Jess. She’ll finish you off. Won’t hurt but a little bit.”
The mouse skittered and zagged and fled.
This, though, was a dream. Unlike the ghost business, it had not
happened except in the mind’s romp of our girl’s fitful sleep.
“Mama, you know that story about God telling Abraham to take his
son up to the mountains?”
“God was testing Abraham. God tests us all, Ivy.”
“I’ve been reading that one. That and other stories. The Old Tes-
tament, you know.”
“You’ll like the New Testament better. It’s nice. Jesus is there.”
“Nice?” Ivy about laughed. “You make it sound like Gulf Shores,
Mama.”
“Oh, it’s nicer than all that, Ivy.” There was something like slyness
to the way she said it. “’Course, it don’t matter where you find Jesus,
so long as you do. It can be up in Memphis or down to Hattiesburg.”
“I had a dream about him, Mama,” Ivy said. “Not the dream
where he was reading Faulkner to that mouse, but a different dream.
I better not tell you more.”
Ivy’s mama didn’t pursue that bit about Faulkner and the mouse.
She just said, “It’s between you and your savior, daughter.”
Ivy said “Woo-boy” to that.
A week later, they were back in the kitchen. They were at it again. It
was ritual now. It had become a religion of sorts, or anyway a service:
There were holy rites and airings of the psalms, hymns, brimstone.
There were tender moments and sometimes they laughed, though
never at the same thing. Mostly they shouted across the gulf, the
canyon, that had split the kitchen like the parlor act of some supreme
being with too much of something—time, perhaps: damned eternity,
anyway—on its hands.
Ivy still was reading that story about Abraham taking his son up272
David Williams
to the mountains but not to fish. She kept reading and rereading it,
could not shake it.
“If you could just tell me that God was having a bad day, just that
once, I’d say all right, okay. Even God has a bad day, forgets himself.
I guess Lincoln had days he’d just bite heads for spite. That I could
believe. I wouldn’t even think all that less of God.”
Ivy’s mama pondered this for the longest time.
“God is God, Ivy,” she finally said. “I mean, he’s God.”
Time passed like a month of Wednesdays.
“Ivy. Ivy. What’s so important you cain’t come to church with me?”
Her mama was making for the door; the woman clutched her purse
as if some freshly unearthed religious artifact of the Delta region, the
Shroud of Itta Bena or some such, were inside.
“I’m talking to you, Mama. Please. This is important. This is more
religion than anything that’s going to happen in that church of yours.
I want to know. I need to know.”
“You asking does God talk to me, Ivy?”
“Yes, Mama. And other things.”
“He does. Why, just this evening he said, ‘Junie Coldwater, here’s
what I want you to do, daughter. I want you to go fetch that heathen
artist girl of yours’”—Ivy watched for some slight curve of lips, the
hint of a smile, the falling away of years. But nothing—“and take her
to church with you, if you got to carry her.”
“Mother,” Ivy said, “you’re killing me.”
“Well, roll away the stone, girl, and come to church with me.”
Ivy’s mama was back the next week and the week after and the weeks
that followed. There were righteous pleadings and prophesies of
doom. There were readings of the holy word. There was singing,
crying. Bawling, really. It was about this time that the kitchen mouse
moved out.
“Ivy, did you hear me?” her mama said now. “Girl, are you drunk?”
But Ivy did not say. She was done with the arguing. She was think-
ing. She was thinking she’d get the big silver pail that was atop the re-
frigerator and fill it with ice cubes and as many beers as it would holdI ’l l Ta ke You T here
273
and tote the pail out back to the shack behind her little house and
then paint and drink and listen to some old soul songs by the Staple
Singers on the boom box, “I’ll Take You There” and “Heavy Makes
Me Happy,” and see if there was a joint left in the tackle box and
smoke it slow and get a little high, six feet or so, and look down at her-
self as she painted. Ivy Coldwater had a wild, dripping brush for a left
hand. She painted specters and visages and black polka dots, snatches
of Bible verse, and old blues laments. Lately she painted Jesus, almost
exclusively. She painted Jesus turning tin cans into tallboy beers. She
painted Jesus dancing the Dog. Jesus in the claw-foot tub.
“You’d call it sin and blasphemy so let’s not go into it, Mama. Let’s
just say you’re going to your church and I’m going to mine.”
“Church,” Ivy’s mama said.
“Or anyway, religion. I think we all have our own, or ought to.”
“You’ve been drinking, Ivy.”
“Christ, Mama. I’m free and legal and only slightly tipsy, so what
if I am?”
Ivy’s mama left in something like a huff. She may actually have said
the word itself, huff, as she huffed away. She may have let slip with a
harrumph, even. It was the closest she got to swearing, these days.
And Ivy, she repaired to the little shack out back, there with a
fresh beer from the silver pail and a little bit of a joint, with her wild
brush of a left hand dripping paint in bold hues, with her visages of
a world about to croak in its sleep or drown on its own drool, one.
And she thought, as she so often did in these last, dying days of ours,
of Sweet Jesus.
She had so much to ask him. It might be days before they’d dance
the Dog, weeks before she’d have him in that claw-foot tub. They’d
just be together. They’d just be. They’d go on long drives to nowhere
in Ivy’s blue pickup truck, wind up at some catfish shack and go
inside. They’d ask for a table in the back by the open window. They’d
just talk and talk and he might help her to understand every little
thing and some of the big things, too. They’d clink tallboy cans.
He’d squeeze lemon on her catfish. He’d have eyes as soulful as one
of those old songs by the Staple Singers.28.
In the Manner of Water or Light
by Roxane Gay
My mother was conceived in what would ever after be known as the
Massacre River. The sharp smell of blood has followed her since.
When she first moved to the United States, she read the dictionary
from front to back. Her vocabulary quickly became extensive. Her
favorite word is suffuse, to spread over or through in the manner of
water or light. When she tries to explain how she is haunted by the
smell of blood, she says that her senses are suffused with it.
My grandmother knew my grandfather for less than a day.
Everything I know about my family’s history, I know in fragments.
We are the keepers of secrets. We are secrets ourselves. We try to pro-
tect each other from the geography of so much sorrow. I don’t know
that we succeed.
As a young woman, my grandmother worked on a sugarcane planta-
tion in Dajabón, the first town across the border Haiti shares with the
Dominican Republic. She lived in a shanty with five other women, all
strangers, and slept on a straw mat beneath which she kept her rosary,
a locket holding a picture of her parents, and a picture of Clark Gable.
She spoke little Spanish so she kept to herself. Her days were long and
beneath the bright sun, her skin burned ebony and her hair bleached
white. When she walked back to her quarters at the end of each day,
she heard the way people stared and whispered. They steered clear.I n t he M a n ner of Water or L ig ht
275
They were terrified by the absence of light around and within her.
They thought she was a demon. They called her la demonia negra.
After saying her prayers, after dreaming of Port-au-Prince and
lazy afternoons at the beach and the movie house where she watched
Mutiny on the Bounty and It Happened One Night and The Call of the
Wild, after dreaming of the warmth of Clark Gable’s embrace, my
grandmother would tear her old dresses into long strips so she could
better bind the cuts and scratches she earned from a long day in the
cane fields. She would sleep a dreamless sleep, gathering the courage
she would need to wake up the next morning. In a different time,
she had been loved by two parents, had lived a good life but then
they died and she was left with nothing and like many Haitians, she
crossed over into the Dominican Republic in the hope that there, her
luck would change.
My grandfather worked at the same plantation. He was a hard
worker. He was a tall, strong man. My grandmother, late at night
when she cannot sleep, will sit with a glass of rum and Coke, and
talk about how her hands remember the thick ropes of muscle in his
shoulders and thighs. His name was Jacques Bertrand. He wanted to
be in the movies. He had a bright white smile that would have made
him a star.
My grandmother is also haunted by smells. She cannot stand the
smell of anything sweet. If she smells sweetness in the air, she purses
her lip and sucks on her teeth, shaking her head. Today, when we
drive to our family’s beach property in Montrouis, she closes her
eyes. She can stand neither the sight of the cane fields nor the with-
ered men and women hacking away at stubborn stalks of cane with
dull machetes. When she sees the cane fields, a sharp pain radiates
across her shoulders and down her back. Her body cannot forget the
labors it has known.
Now, the Massacre River is shallow enough to cross by foot, but in
October 1937 the waters of what was the Dajabón River ran strong
and deep. The unrest had been going on for days—Dominican sol-
diers determined to rid their country of the Haitian scourge went
from plantation to plantation in a murderous rage. My grandmother
did the only thing she could, burning through a long day in the cane276
Roxane Gay
field, marking the time by the rise and fall of her machete blade. She
prayed the trouble would pass her by.
It was General Rafael Trujillo who ordered all the Haitians out
of his country, who had his soldiers interrogate anyone whose skin
was too dark, who looked like they belonged on the other side of the
border. It was the general who took a page from the Book of Judges
to exact his genocide and bring German industry to his island.
Soldiers came to the plantation where my grandmother worked.
They had guns. They were cruel, spoke in loud, angry voices, took
liberties. One of the women with whom my grandmother shared her
shanty betrayed my grandmother’s hiding place. We never speak of
what happened after that. The ugly details are trapped between the
fragments of our family history. We are secrets ourselves.
My grandmother ended up in the river. She found a shallow place.
She tried to hold her breath while she hid from the marauding sol-
diers on both of the muddy shores straddling the river. There was a
moment when she laid on her back, and submerged herself until her
entire body was covered by water, until her pores were suffused with
it. She didn’t come up for air until the ringing in her ears became
unbearable. The moon was high and the night was cold. She smelled
blood in the water. She wore only a thin dress, plastered to her skin.
Her feet were bare. When a bloated corpse slowly floated past her,
then an arm, a leg, something she couldn’t recognize, she covered
her mouth with her hand. She screamed into her own skin instead of
the emptiness around her.
Jacques Bertrand who worked hard and wanted to be in the movies
found his way to the river that ran strong and deep. He moved him-
self through the water until he found my grandmother. He tapped
her on the shoulder and instead of turning away, she turned into
him, opened that part of her herself not yet numb with terror. She
found comfort in the fear mirrored in his eyes. His chest was bare
and she pressed her damp cheek against his breastbone. She slowed
her breathing to match his. She listened to the beat of his heart; it
echoed beneath the bones of his rib cage. “An angel,” she told me. “I
thought he was an angel who had come to deliver me from that dark
and terrible place.”I n t he M a n ner of Water or L ig ht
277
My grandparents bound their bodies together as their skin gath-
ered in tiny folds, as their bodies shook violently. Jacques Bertrand,
who worked hard, who wanted to be in the movies, wrapped his arms
around my grandmother. In a stuttered whisper, he told her the story
of his life. “I want to be remembered,” he said. She cupped his face in
her hands, traced his strong chin with her thumbs, and brushed her
lips across his. She followed the bridges of scar tissue across his back
with her fingertips. She said, “You will be remembered.” She told
him the story of her own life. She asked him to remember her too.
My grandmother still hears the dying screams from that night. She
remembers the dull, wet sound of machetes hacking through flesh
and bone. The only thing that muted those horrors was a man she
knew but did not know who wore bridges of scar across his back. I do
not know the intimate details, but my mother was conceived.
In the morning, surrounded by the smell and silence of death, my
grandparents crawled out of the river that had, overnight, become a
watery coffin holding 25,000 bodies. The Massacre River had earned
its name. The two of them, soaking wet, their bodies stiff and on the
verge of fever, crawled into Ouanaminthe. They were home. They
were far from home. My grandmother laced her fingers with my
grandfather’s and they sought refuge in an abandoned church. They
fell to their knees and prayed and then their prayers became some-
thing else, something like solace.
When night fell again, the Dominican soldiers crossed into Oua-
naminthe, into a place where they did not belong. My grandfather
was killed. He saved my grandmother’s life by confronting three
soldiers, creating a window through which my grandmother could
escape. Jacques Bertrand died wanting to be remembered, so my
grandmother stayed in that place of such sorrow, took a job cooking
and cleaning for the headmaster of a primary school. At night, she
slept in an empty classroom. She gave birth to my mother and later
married the headmaster who raised my mother as his own. At night,
my grandmother took my mother to the river and told her the story
of how she came to be. My grandmother knelt on the riverbank, her
bones sinking in the mud as she brought handfuls of water to her
mouth. She drank the memories in that water.278
Roxane Gay
When my mother turned twelve, she, my grandmother, and the
headmaster moved to Port-au-Prince. The school had closed and
the headmaster took a new appointment in the capital. At first, my
grandmother refused to leave her memories, but the headmaster put
his foot down. She was his wife. She would follow. My mother recalls
how her mother wailed, her voice pitched sharp and thin, cutting
everything around her. In the front yard of their modest home, a
large coconut tree fell, its wide trunk split neatly in half. The fallen
fruit rotted instantly. My grandmother went to the Massacre River,
her long white hair gathered around her face. She took river mud
into her hands, eating it, enduring the thick, bitter taste. When my
mother and the headmaster found her, my grandmother was lying in
a shallow place, shivering beneath a high moon, her face caked with
dry mud.
In the capital, my grandmother was a different woman, quieted.
The headmaster consulted Catholic missionaries, houngans and
mambos in case she had been possessed by a lwa or spirit, and needed
healing. Finally, he resigned himself to living with her ghosts. He
loved her as best a man whose wife loves another man can. He fo-
cused on my mother’s education and waited. Sometimes, the head-
master asked my mother if she was happy. She said, “My mother does
love you.”
It wasn’t until the day my mother left Port-au-Prince that my
grandmother became herself again. I’ve been told that the headmas-
ter and my grandmother stood on the tarmac white with heat, the
air billowing around them in visible waves. My mother kissed her
mother twice on each cheek. She kissed the headmaster. She turned
and headed for the staircase to board the plane, a heavy wind blowing
her skirt wildly. My grandmother didn’t run after her only child but
she did say, “Ti Coeur.” Little heart. My mother stopped. She didn’t
turn around.
My mother is a small, nervous woman. Her life began, she says, the
day she got off the Pan Am flight from Port-au-Prince in New York
City. She sat in the back of a yellow taxicab driven by a man who
spoke a language she did not understand. She stared out the dirty
window and up at the tall steel buildings. She was twenty-one. MyI n t he M a n ner of Water or L ig ht
279
mother found an apartment in the Bronx. She took a job as a seam-
stress for Perry Ellis making clothes she loved but could not afford.
She learned to speak English by reading the dictionary and watch-
ing American television. Once a month, she wrote her mother and
the only father she knew a long letter telling them about America,
begging them to join her. My grandmother always wrote back, but
refused to leave Haiti. She would not leave the ghost of a man who
could not be forgotten.
My mother went to doctor after doctor trying to find someone
who would free her from the sharp smell of blood that has always
suffused her senses. Each doctor assured my mother it was all in her
head. She took the subway to Chinatown and tried acupuncture. The
acupuncturist carefully inserted needles into the webs of her thumbs,
and along her body’s meridians. As he placed each needle, he shook
his head. He said, “There are some things no medicine can fix.”
When I asked my mother how she met my father she said, “I wasn’t
going to marry a Haitian man.” She rarely answers the question she
is asked. My father is an ear, nose, and throat specialist. He is the last
doctor my mother consulted. When she told him she could only smell
blood, he believed her. He tried to help her and when he couldn’t,
he asked her to join him for dinner. Eventually he asked for her hand
in marriage. She didn’t say yes. She told my father she would never
return to Haiti, that he would have to accept that her life began a
year earlier. She was a seamstress whose senses were suffused with
the smell of blood, who didn’t know her father and couldn’t under-
stand her mother. They were married in a Manhattan synagogue,
nine months after they met.
My parents remained childless for many years but never discussed
the matter. If my mother was asked when she would start a family,
she would say, “I am very much in love with my husband.” When she
learned she was pregnant with me, at the age of forty, it was a hot
July afternoon in New York, 1978. She ran out to the street, threw
her hands in the air, stared into the incandescent sun. She cried as
the light spread over her. A joyful sound vibrated from her throat,
through her mouth and into the city around her. She went to my fa-
ther’s office and told him the news. He cried too. When I was born,
I was crying lustily. We are a family unafraid of our tears.280
Roxane Gay
My mother has never been able to accept that she will never know
her real father. She worries that her mother has woven the story of
her conception into an elaborate fable to hide a darker truth. My
mother has an imagination. She knows too much about what angry,
wild soldiers will do to frightened, fleeing young women. My mother
looks in the mirror and cannot recognize herself. She only sees the
face of a man she can never know. When I was a little girl and we
sat together at the dinner table, my mother often stared into the
distance, grinding her teeth. My father would take her hand and say,
“Jacqueline, please stop worrying.” She never did. She was the keeper
of her mother’s secrets. She was a secret herself.
Every summer, once I turned five, my parents took me to JFK and
sent me to my grandmother’s for three months. I was dispatched to
do the work of dutiful daughter in my mother’s absence. My grand-
mother and the man I know as my grandfather, the headmaster who
took in a scared young woman whose skin had burned ebony, whose
hair had bleached white, who bore a child with no father, they were
kind to me. I brought them pictures of my parents and money my
mother carefully stuffed in my shoes. I brought cooking oil and
pantyhose, a VCR and videotapes, gossip magazines, corn flakes. I
knew never to bring anything sweet.
My grandmother kept her promise to Jacques Bertrand. Each time
she saw me, she offered new fragments of their story or, if my mother’s
fears were correct, her story. I looked like him, had his eyes and his
chin. Like my parents, my grandmother and the headmaster doted
on me. When I returned to the States at the end of each August, I
would try to ask my mother questions, to better piece things together
but she would only shut herself in her room, rub perfume across her
upper lip, lie on her back, her eyes covered with a cool washcloth.
When I was thirteen, the headmaster drove my grandmother and
me to their beach property in Montrouis for the afternoon. Just
before leaving New York for the summer, I had celebrated my bat
mitzvah. The three of us sang along to konpa, and the adults listened
to me chattering from the backseat. It was a good day. I longed for
my mother to know there was so much joy to be found in the coun-
try of her birth. As we pulled into a gas station, beggars suddenlyI n t he M a n ner of Water or L ig ht
281
swarmed our car, a throbbing mass of dark, shiny faces and limbs
needing more than we could possibly give. There was a man with one
leg and one old, wooden crutch. His face was disfigured by a bulging
tumor beneath his left eye. He planted his hands against the glass
of the window, leering at me, the skin over the tumor rippling with
his anger. It was the first time I understood the land of my mother’s
birth as a place run through with pain.
Each time I returned to New York and the comforts of home, I
brought pictures and long letters and special spices—these affections,
mother by proxy. My mother always took me for lunch, alone, at the
Russian Tea Room the day following my return. She had me recount
my trip in exhaustive detail, inhaling from a perfume-scented hand-
kerchief every few minutes, carefully probing so as to get the clearest
sense of how her mother was doing. Once in a while, I forgot myself
and asked my mother why she didn’t just go to Haiti to find out for
herself. In those moments, she gave me a stern look. She said, “It is
not easy to be a good daughter.”
When I turned sixteen, I went to summer camp in western Massa-
chusetts because I was young and silly. I wanted to do normal things.
Haiti was too much work. I was tired of the heat and the smells and
the inescapable poverty, how my sweaty limbs caught in mosquito
netting, how I had to go to the well for water when the cistern wasn’t
working. I was sick of the loud hum of generators and tiny lizards
clinging to window screens and the way everyone stared at me and
called me la mulatte. Summer camp was a largely disappointing ex-
perience. I was a city girl and the Berkshires were far too rural for
me. I wasn’t any kind of Jewish the other girls at the camp could
understand. I spent the summer sitting on the lakeshore reading, la-
menting that I could have been at a real beach in the Caribbean with
people who loved me and looked like me. It would be ten years before
I returned to Haiti.
The next summer, my father took me to Tel Aviv. He showed me
the apartment where he grew up in Ramat Aviv. He showed me his
parents’ graves, told me how much they would have loved me. I saw
all kinds of people who did indeed look like me, who didn’t laugh at
my stuttered Hebrew. We spent a week on a kibbutz, my father in his282
Roxane Gay
linen shirt and shorts, tanned, laughing, home. I felt a real sadness
for my mother, who couldn’t take such joy in the land of her birth.
We went to the beach. We went to Jaffa and looked toward the sea
and Andromeda’s rock. We cried at the Wailing Wall. I understood
that Haiti was not the only place in the world run through with pain.
The year after I graduated from law school, the headmaster died. I
called my grandmother to ask how she was doing. She said, “I have
been a good wife.” She was ready to return to Jacques Bertrand. I
told my mother we had to go see her mother. She was lying on her
bed, rubbing perfume across her upper lip. She had not taken news
of the headmaster’s death well. He was the only father she ever knew.
She turned to me and said, “This is my home, where I am needed.”
I said, “You are needed elsewhere,” and she waved a hand limply,
conceding the point.
My father prescribed my mother some Valium, and the three of us
flew to Port-au-Prince. By the time we landed, my mother was suf-
ficiently sedated. As we disembarked and walked into the terminal,
she dreamily asked “Are we there?” My grandmother and her driver
were waiting for us. I inhaled sharply as I saw her for the first time in
a decade. She was impossibly small, a frail figure, her dark flesh much
looser now, her features hollowed, her white hair swept atop her head
in a loose bun. She and my mother stood inches apart and stared at
each other. My grandmother took her daughter’s face in her hands,
nodded. That night, in our hotel, I heard my mother whisper to my
father that she could hardly breathe but for the smell of blood.
After a few days in the capital helping my grandmother settle her
affairs and visiting the headmaster’s grave, she was ready to return
to Jacques Bertrand. Despite our demand she stay in the capital or
return to the States with us, my grandmother was resolute. We drove
across the country to Ouanaminthe on the only passable road. It took
hours and by the time we arrived, we were all tired, sweaty, sore, and
irritable. Ouanaminthe was not the city it had once been. It was a sad,
hopeless place, crumbling buildings everywhere, paint peeling from
billboards, the streets crowded with people, each person wanting and
needing more than the next. Most of the roads had gone to mud fromI n t he M a n ner of Water or L ig ht
283
recent flooding. The air was stifling and pressed down on us uncom-
fortably. As we stood in the courtyard in front of the small concrete
house my grandmother had purchased, men hanging from a passing
Tap Tap leered at us. My father stood in front of me, glaring. My
mother rubbed her forehead and asked my father for another Valium.
My mother and her mother kept to themselves for the first few
days, huddled together, trying to make up for nearly thirty years of
separation. There was no room for my father and me in what they
needed from one another. On the second night, I went to a local
bar where everyone stared as I took a seat at the bar. I drank watery
rums and Coke until my face and my boredom felt numb. I danced
to Usher with a man named Innocent. When I snuck back into my
grandmother’s house, I found her sitting in the dark. She nodded
to me but said nothing. On the third night, the moon was high and
bright, casting its pale light over and through everything. I lay be-
neath mosquito netting in a tank top and boxers, one arm over my
head, one arm across my stomach, my body feeling open and loose. I
listened to the sounds of everyone else sleeping. I tried to understand
the what and why of where we were.
Just as I was on the verge of drifting asleep, I heard a scratching at
the door and sat up, pulling the sheets around me. My grandmother
appeared in the doorway. She curled her bent fingers, beckoned. Slowly,
I stretched myself out of bed, pulled on a pair of jeans and flip-flops.
I found my grandmother by the front door. My mother was standing
next to her, fidgeting, shifting from one foot to the other, clutching
at her perfume-scented handkerchief. “What’s wrong?” I asked. My
grandmother smiled in the darkness. “Come with us,” she said.
We walked nearly a mile to the banks of the Massacre River, my
grandmother pressing her hand against the small of my mother’s
back. In the distance, we could see soldiers keeping watch at the
checkpoint, their cigarettes punctuating the darkness. I heard hun-
dreds of frightened people who looked like me splashing through
the water, searching for safety and then, silence. My grandmother
climbed down the damp, steep riverbank, my mother warning her
mother to be careful. She waved for us to join her. I slipped out of
my sandals, took my mother’s hand, helped her into the river. We284
Roxane Gay
stood in a shallow place. I curled my toes in the silt of the riverbed
and shivered. I had pictured the river as a wide, yawning and bloody
beast, but where we stood, the river flowed weakly. The waters did
not run deep. It was just a border between two geographies of grief.
My grandmother pointed down. The hem of her dressing gown
floated around her. “Here,” she said softly.
My mother’s shoulders shook but she made no sound. She gripped
my arm. “I cannot breathe,” she said. Then she dropped to her knees,
curled into herself. She said, “I must know the truth.”
I knelt behind her. I held her, tried to understand her. I said,
“You can breathe.” My grandmother said, “You know the only truth
that matters.” Again I heard hundreds of frightened people splash-
ing through the water, keening, reaching for something that could
never be reached. The ground beneath us trembled from the heavy
footsteps of roving soldiers. I smelled their sweat and their confused,
aimless anger.
We knelt there for a long while. My grandmother stood, whis-
pering the story of how she came to know and remember Jacques
Bertrand until her words dried on her lips. I stroked my mother’s
hair gently, waited for her breathing to slow, her back rising into my
chest with a melancholy cadence. We mourned until morning. The
sun rose high. Bright beams of light spread over and through us. The
sun burned so hot it dried the river itself, turned the water into light.
We were left kneeling in a bed of sand and bones. I started crying. I
could not stop. I cried to wash us all clean.29.
Jail Break
by Matt Stewart
My mom is driving me to prison. She’s pretty drunk, but she’d know
the way coked out too, which she’ll be on the way back. I’m ditching
the last of my stash with her.
“Don’t fraternize,” she says.
“Ma, c’mon.”
“People talk. I know what happens in there.”
“I’ll be fine, Ma.” And I truly am a lot less jittery than last time,
having invested last year’s profits into buying protection from the
Aryan Brotherhood for the next six to nine years. “Pass the Scotch.”
She swigs a mouthful and sends it over. I take a sip, pour a little on
my hair, dribble a line down my back. Thirty years old from a craggy
island in Scotland I’ll never get to. “This is the kind of shit I should
do,” I confess. “Make something beautiful, that people have for their
last drink before prison.”
“Scotch is basically cocaine for rich people,” my mom says, which
makes it clear that she doesn’t know cocaine that well, since cocaine
is really crack for rich people. I’d say Scotch is more like cocaine for
people too chicken to risk mandatory sentencing guidelines, but then
again here I am on the losing end of that one.
“Jerry will be done with school when I get out,” I realize.
“I hope he makes it,” she says, followed by her first swerve, dodg-
ing an imaginary cyclist.286
Matt Stewart
“Why wouldn’t he make it?” I wonder, helping myself to more of
the Scotch, dousing my nose, slurping from the bottle like Gatorade
after a basketball game.
“It’s right around the age kids go bad in this town,” she says, veer-
ing to avoid an invisible chicken, a dog, then banking hard for the
mail truck. “Benjamin,” she says. “Daniel. Kerri. Caitlin.”
“Caitlin was a fuckup from the start,” I point out.
“That may be true, but fourteen’s when she got violent,” Mom
says. And I remember when Caitlin came back from her first tae-
kwon do class, all nunchucks and jump kicks, how she beat me purple
on the front lawn and still it was the most fun I’d had since Street
Fighter broke at the arcade and you could play all day on a single
quarter. I pass Mom the Scotch and she gulps it, spraying it back at
me in a tropical mist.
“But Jerry?” I wonder. “I hear he’s getting decent grades. Can
make a jump shot here and there. A good head of hair on his shoul-
ders. Where’s the trouble in that?”
“Crapohontas!” my mom exclaims, then yanks the wheel toward
the shoulder and up a small incline, braking hard at a scenic overlook
of a dung-splattered cow field and an assortment of decomposing
motor homes under a lemon-lime sun. She caps the Scotch and hurls
it into the backseat, then slaps her face into serious, frown tips hang-
ing limp like a pervert’s mustache. “Look, Jason. When it’s your own,
you don’t see it coming. One day your daughter’s helping clean the
toilet; two days later she’s out-dancing you at the wet T-shirt contest.
And I got five kids’ worth of statistical proof that the fourteenth
birthday is always the day in the middle. Present company included.”
“You too?” I wonder, and I suppose I can see it, the old pictures
of Ma with electric orange bra straps and hair styled like elaborate
topiary and puddles of purple and green makeup, PCP and stickups
radiating in her eerie yellow smile.
“Me too,” she admits, wiggling the steering wheel. “You too. All
of us. Makes you wonder if we were decent at sports or school, how
things’d’ve gone.” Translucent froth drips from her nose, leading
me to wonder if her brain has gone to mush and is leaking out her
orifices, finally, until I spot the coke clumps like unmixed sugar, her
headstart on the stash.Ja i l Brea k
287
“Well, we’ve all been pretty good at the cop sprint,” I point out.
“There is that,” she agrees.
“Caitlin had her tae kwon do blue belt. Daniel made the spelling
bee once. Kerri could draw bird pictures like they flew right onto the
page. And Benjamin, well,” and it is a reach on Benjamin, two years
younger than me and a life of canned chili and video games and In-
ternet futzing and silence, “he can stay up for two days straight if we
have enough Red Bull on hand.”
She stays quiet. The engine chortles and traffic screams and blue-
grass pops and slides on the radio. “Danielle’s looking after Jerry,”
I note, “and I’d appreciate it if you could check in on him now and
then.”
“Danielle’s even loonier than Caitlin!” she exclaims, and I recall
why I divorced Danielle in the first place: how she drove motorcycles
blindfolded and threw dinner plates at mailmen and left the oven on
all night with the entire contents of the bathroom cabinet inside. “I
got two jobs and guardianship of three other grandkids and a suit-
case worth of snow to sell,” my mom continues, “now give back the
Scotch.”
Yellow-tipped fingers foxtrot over the armrest, itchy and devas-
tated like squished caterpillars. I dig out the Scotch from the back-
seat, give it a shake like a Magic 8 Ball, except no answer surfaces and
I’m forced to take a long ruminative pull before I send it over. “Let’s
go see him,” I decide. “Jerry.”
I get the cowed look back, sorry and sad and too scared to say it.
“What time are you due?” she asks.
“I’ll be fine,” I tell her, and now it’s an order: “Let’s go.”
She points the truck off the highway and we backtrack down local
roads for twenty minutes, rolling through identical suburbs and past
identical strip malls until she tucks in at one of the identical Star-
buckses. “His school’s across the street,” she says.
“Good,” I say. “Here’s money for coffee.” I slip her a twenty and
catch her wrist, squeeze her palm, as close to a hug as I get.
“Be nice,” she urges, “and try to listen,” but I’m out the door
before I catch the brunt of her lecture.
The school’s done up like an old Spanish mission, with a wide
courtyard paved over and stocked with basketball courts, an audito-288
Matt Stewart
rium doubling as a chapel, nifty white-arched classrooms offset by
grungy temporary units arranged like boot camp barracks. It is hid-
eously sunny, the worst kind of school day. I tip my baseball cap at a
custodian hosing down a pile of mats on the sidewalk and look over
at a ramshackle guard building carrying a hand-painted sign that
says office , a pride of bulky Hispanic women chitter-chattering and
a platoon of dazed students ambling in mindless orbits like penguins
on a hot day at the zoo.
I walk, fast, out, away, charged, striding beside a bashed fence
laced with hot-dog wrappers and soda bottles, waiting, waiting, feel-
ing time slip, time dripping like sweat, the hot stupid sun, pulling
down my cap, creating more and more distance, feet on top of miles
on top of months on top of years. Halfway around the block I hear
scrapes and murmurs, a wave of radio static. I creep up on a green
Dumpster in a secluded nook walled off by trees and a chain link
gate, perfect for trying out cigarettes and adventurous girls so long
as they can take the smell. Boys flip skateboards off a curb and swig
energy drinks, their backpacks piled in a trash heap, rap music fuzz-
ing from cell phones. Leaning on a guardrail a near-teen kid with
Jerry’s square chin and Danielle’s hazel eyes and my monstrosity of a
hairdo scrawls into a notebook held two inches from his face.
I step out from behind a parked van and it’s like I’m knocking
off liquor stores again, six sets of spooked eyes deciding whether to
pretend to be a tough guy or not. “Get out,” I tell them, and kick
the Dumpster hard twice for effect. They snatch their backpacks
and shoot out for the street, but when I jab a finger in Jerry’s ster-
num he coughs hard and stays put, neatly folding up his notebook
and plumping his hair hedge and rubbing his hands on the back of
his jeans. The spot stinks of fry grease and fungus, and I’d bet all
the cash buried in my backyard that yesterday’s lunch special was
fish sticks.
“Hey, man,” I offer. Then, to be clear: “It’s me. Dad.”
He coughs, then spits, then frowns, staring at the Dumpster,
scratching his neck, his cheeks softening like water put to oatmeal.
“How you doing?” I ask, and he stands perfectly still for at least a
minute before I slap my hands together in front of his face.Ja i l Brea k
289
“Don’t mean to be rude, but I don’t have much time,” I explain.
He’s hunched over and blank as a bus seat, waiting for me to lose
interest and leave, like usual. “Say something,” I order.
He grunts and shuffles and snorts before risking eye contact:
“Hiya, Pops.”
Which makes for the first time I have ever been addressed that way
seriously. Laughter pours out of me like the first beer of the night,
but when he tries to turn my handshake into an eight-part gangster
breakdance I clamp on to his shoulder instead.
“Good to see you,” I say, though I haven’t actually decided yet, the
kid’s sprouted from bungling toddler to life-sized human being since
the last time I tuned in, complete with a regulation-size basketball
taking up the entirety of his backpack and four wisps of hair on his
lip matted up to imitate a mustache. “Whatcha writing?”
He unfolds his notebook, shakes open a page. “Lyrics,” he admits.
“Nice. What kind of song?” I dredge up the pictures Danielle
posts online, mostly Jerry cowed around a birthday cake or leading a
fast break, though it’s possible I’ve seen him buried in the back row
of a marching band or church choir, hoisting a beat-up guitar around
a campfire, staring out a truck window singing along to Toby Keith.
“Hip-hop,” he says, with a salty sneer that says he’s proud of it.
“Ha!” I exclaim, though it’s less a laugh than an alligator bite.
“Well, let’s hear it.”
He glances straight at me, just enough waver in his eyelid to tell
me he’s scared. “It’s not that tight,” he says.
“I just want to hear it,” I insist. I pop onto a knee and build up a
grin, sequestering off the Scotch for a few seconds of good-natured
get-up. “I’d appreciate it pretty bad.”
He looks around for witnesses, flips through his notebook and
back again. He hasn’t gone bad yet, you can tell by the fluttery eyes,
the watery-sick breathing, the sweat bubbles amassing on his fore-
head. His duct-taped sneakers begin heel-tapping and words spill out
of him, not a flow, not a river, not a babbling brook, nothing peaceful
or natural but rather human-made and purposefully ugly, like a sewer
or gutter runoff. He rolls through a list of profanity and sexual posi-
tions and narcotics terminology laced with gibberish, made-up words290
Matt Stewart
that don’t come close to rhyming, like a harsh and sickly Eastern Eu-
ropean language that’s relegated to long-distance phone calls and bad
memories. The number finishes with a massacre of thirty-five gangsta
enemies topped off with a seven-woman orgy back on his yacht, the
musical equivalent of running seashells through a lawnmower.
He looks up at me with a pink sheen over his eyes. Sour liquor
pulls my scalp, the first pangs of a world-class still-drunk hangover.
“That’s good,” I lie. “Real good. Dang!” I paste the smile back on,
shake out a wink. His teeth form a wobbly sliver, and it’s the best
chance I’ll ever have.
“Do you need any money?” I ask.
“What?”
But it’s not an offer I’m inclined to extend twice. And as Jerry
stands there wondering if he misunderstood, if I was serious, how
much—or, worse, not wondering at all but instead waiting, for me to
repeat myself, for somebody else to do something—I am seized with
a rare fatherly vision.
Running with the same bozos when he gets up to high school.
Landing his first bust doing somebody else’s dirty work, selling a
dime bag or fencing an iPod or riding shotgun on the wrong night.
Vacationing a few months in juvie before graduating to dropout-
land, revolving through lockup and small-time gangs, stealing old
clunkers, snorting battery acid, screwing insane women, and bad-
rapping his way to a pile of nothing, until the second strike hits and
he’s tracking down his kid on his way to federal prison without a
single thing to say.
“Stick to the music,” I tell him, “you’ve got promise.” I make a fist
and tap it gently to his shoulder, then spin out to the street, hulking,
enraged, dying of thirst. I will get the Scotch and drink it and then
I’ll call the police and turn Jerry in, I’ll plant cocaine on him, it’ll
be easy, he’ll go to juvie and the process will begin now, the crimes
will come and the prison cycles will rotate and he’ll be done with it
sooner, the stupid shaken out of him. Maybe he’ll uncover a mentor
along the way, a basketball coach or English teacher who puts him to
work sinking his free throws and learning to craft a bankable rhyme.
Somebody who would rather be honest than awesome.Ja i l Brea k
291
A cop car glides down the road and I flag it down with both hands.
A bald patrolman hangs an elbow out the window, his sunglasses
tight enough to leave ear rash.
“Officer,” I state. “I think I may have observed some illegal activ-
ity.”
“Don’t pester the kids,” he says.
“What?”
“We got a couple calls about you harassing boys by the Dumpster.”
“They were skipping class,” I point out. And it strikes me that I
have never once in my life called the police, whereas at least two of
those kids called the police within the last fifteen minutes.
My third strike.
“That’s not your concern,” he says.
“One of them’s my son,” I press, “and I’m going away.”
“Take care of it at home.”
My mom jogs down the sidewalk with one of those new Starbucks
coffees the size of a bathtub, and it’s impossible not to grin at her
old-lady jiggling. It is a fine final memory. “I’m not going home, you
dumbass,” I tell him. He gets out of the car and I could hug him as
he puts me in the backseat, as he hears me out and calls in the request
and nods and drives, heading back out on the highway, the rest of the
way to prison.30.
Jon and Maeve
by David Backer
At the bar the lights were low and green and everyone’s faces were
close together and they were laughing and talking loud so they could
hear each other over the music and some of them played pool and
others sat at tables and leaned forward into one another and others
played darts and everyone brought up beer bottles or glasses to their
mouths and sipped them and the bartender took orders for drinks and
the men and women who bought the drinks held them at the height
of their stomachs and they laughed and when there were pauses in the
conversations they would sip the drinks and look away or laugh and
sometimes they all sipped their drinks together.
Maeve Fesnying sat with Vicki Sord who was a reporter at the Blue
Ash News and they laughed and talked and Sord had thick blond hair
that was curly and she was thin and wore bright red lipstick and tight
purple pants and Maeve talked and laughed and drank her drink with
Sord and their faces were close.
A few stools away a man with a beard and a round face and auburn
hair mixed with gray and dark brown sat by himself with a mug of
steaming tea in front of him and his shoulders were slumped over
and down to the bar and there was an oval stain of blood on the
right thigh of his khakis but no one could see this because his thighs
were tucked beneath the bar and his head hung over the mug so the
steam of the tea rose up into his face and he breathed the steam in
and sighed it out.Jon a nd M aeve
293
Maeve laughed a loud laugh and the man with the tea and the
beard looked up at her and his eyes rested on her for a moment and
his eyes rested there for long enough to see that her hair was curly
and her face was sharp there in the dark by the bar and that she
was wearing a purple button-down shirt with large orange buttons
and the man with the tea sat upright and his shoulders turned back
and his lower lip tucked into his teeth and he stared at Maeve for
a few seconds and Vicki Sord wiped her red-lipsticked mouth and
excused herself to the ladies’ room and Maeve watched her walk off
and turned to face the bar and sip her drink and she looked to her
left and noticed the man with the tea and the beard staring at her
and even in the low green light of the bar she could see his eyes were
very blue and she saw the roundness in his cheeks and she sipped her
drink again and leaned toward him and said into the noise and the
music of the place,
“Do you have a girlfriend?”
The man with the tea blinked and wagged his head and looked
around and away from her eyes and her eyes were smiling and he said,
“I’m sorry, I wasn’t . . . ”
“But do you?”
“Do I what?”
“Have a girlfriend.”
“No. I’m . . . No. I don’t.”
Maeve leaned in closer to him and blinked a slow blink and said,
“Well, I do. I have a girlfriend. Just to let you know.”
The man shook his head and put his shoulders down again and said
into his tea,
“I’m sorry.”
“What?”
“I said, ‘I’m sorry.’”
“I didn’t mean to make you feel sorry. It’s just a line I use on guys
that stare at me in bars.”
The man took a deep breath and looked into his tea again and
brought his face up to Maeve and said,
“Sorry. I just couldn’t help noticing your shirt.”
Maeve looked down at herself and she moved closer to him and said,294
David Backer
“You like it?”
The man brought his hands up to the bar and they were shaking
and he sipped his tea with his shaking hands and said,
“I bet I know where you bought it.”
“Really?”
“Yup.”
She leaned in and he could smell her breath and she said,
“Five bucks says you can’t.”
The man put his elbows on the bar and put his face in his hands
and rubbed his face and looked back at her and said,
“It’s not really new, is it?”
“To me it is.”
“You bought it at a thrift store, right?”
“Nope,” she said and sipped her drink.
“Yes you did.”
“No I didn’t.”
“Yes. You bought it at a thrift store in a town in Iowa. Ottumwa,
Iowa.”
When he said this Maeve’s eyes opened wide and her face went out
to his face and she said,
“Get the hell out of town! How did you know that? I was just in
Ottumwa for work last week.”
“The Salvation Army, right? Next to the Target and the court-
house.”
“Stop it! Yes, absolutely. Yes. How the hell did you know that?”
“Do you really want to know?”
“Yeah. Yes. I do.”
The man tucked his lower lip into his teeth again and said,
“I just donated all my parents’ clothes to the Salvation Army in
Ottumwa. That’s my mom’s shirt.”
“Why’d you donate their clothes?”
“They died about a week ago.”
Vicki Sord was out of the bathroom now and talking to a woman
by the dartboard and didn’t see Maeve drop her drink on the floor but
she heard glass shatter and Vicki looked in the direction of the noise
and she saw Maeve hug the man with the tea and hold him there at the
bar while the steam from his tea steamed up from the mug.Jon a nd M aeve
295
Maeve hugged him and kept hugging him and he put an arm
around her and her breath was on his ear and it was warm and she
was warm and she pressed herself into him and he let his hand rest
on her lower back and his nose pressed into the purple shirt and it
smelled like home to him and he said,
“Thanks.”
“I’m so sorry. I can’t believe it,” she said.
“It’s okay, thank you.”
“No, I’m sorry. I’m so, so sorry.”
The man laughed and it was first time anyone had touched him in
a long time and Maeve released him and looked at him and lunged
into him again with a big hug and locked his arms to his sides so he
couldn’t move and she said,
“I can’t believe your parents died and I’m wearing your dead
mother’s shirt. I’m so sorry.”
“I appreciate it. Thanks.”
She leaned back and looked down at herself again and started un-
buttoning the orange buttons of the shirt and she wasn’t wearing
anything underneath it and the man put his hands out to stop her
and said,
“Oh, no, please, it’s fine. Keep it on . . . ”
“No. I can’t believe I’m wearing your mother’s shirt and your
mother’s dead.”
“Listen, please, I—I don’t even know your name yet.”
Maeve stopped and took a breath and put a hand on her forehead
and she wavered around and smiled and looked at this man and said,
“Hah!”
Vicki Sord walked over to the bar and sipped her drink and said,
“What’s going on over here?”
Maeve turned around and blushed and said,
“Give this man five dollars.”
“What?” Sord asked.
“Give him five dollars. He deserves it. He won a bet.”
“What bet?”
“It’s nothing,” he said.
“Nothing?” Maeve asked.
The man’s face fell back to his mug of tea and he put his hands296
David Backer
around it to warm them and his shoulders fell again toward the bar
and he said,
“Don’t worry about it.”
Maeve looked at Vicki and Vicki’s eyelids were drooping and she
was smiling at everything and said,
“Do you have your little pad, Vick?”
“Yeah I do.”
“And a pen?”
“Yeah, yeah hold on.”
Vicki reached inside her purse and handed Maeve a journalist’s
notebook and then reached in again and picked out a pen and handed
the pen to Maeve and Maeve took the notebook and the pen and
pushed them to the man with the beard and the tea and said,
“Write your name and where you live and I’ll bring you the shirt
back.”
“It’s really not necessary.”
“No, no, no. Let me. I’ll bring five bucks with it or something.”
And the man looked at her and her hand was on her hip and her
hip was out and he saw her Converse sneakers and the curve of her
thigh where her hand rested and he said,
“Okay.”
Then he took the notebook and the pen and he wrote his name
and an address and a phone number and he slid the pad and pen back
to Maeve and she ripped the paper out of the pad and folded it and
put it in the pocket of her jeans and she stuck out her hand and said,
“Good. I’m Maeve, by the way.”
“I’m—”
“No, wait!”
She took the paper out of her pocket while holding his hand in
mid-shake and read it aloud:
“Nice to meet you, Rubber American Jon Sowse.”
“Rubber American’s where I work, it’s not . . . ”
“Jon, it’s a pleasure.”
“Well, it’s nice to meet you, Ma—”
“Maeve, like May with a ‘v’.”
“Maeve,” he said.Jon a nd M aeve
297
“Right,” she said.
“So I’ll see you tomorrow or something?” she asked.
“Okay.”
“Good.”
Then Maeve turned back to Vicki and Vicki asked,
“Did you just get his number?”
“Yeah.”
“But you’re gay, I thought.”
“No, no, no, no, no. You got it all wrong. I’m not anything.”
Then Vicki and Maeve laughed and the music was loud and Maeve
drank her own drink and put the piece of paper back into her jeans
and she looked back to Jon whose dead mother’s shirt she was wear-
ing but he was gone into the green light and the music.31.
Miss November
by Matthew Norman
I’m in my pajamas looking out the window, peering through the
blinds like a weirdo, watching my neighbor move out of his house.
He’s stretched this out over the course of the last week, showing up
at ten each night, backing his douchey Land Rover into his driveway,
and going about the process of leaving his wife one cardboard box
at a time.
I’m morbidly fascinated by this, which explains why I’m rubber-
necking through mini-blinds. Why doesn’t he just get a U-Haul? He
could get it over with in one fell swoop. And why does he show up
so late? He’s got a normal job, just like everyone else. Maybe he did a
Google search and found that it’s less traumatizing for kids if they’re
asleep when their dad loads his golf clubs and diplomas into the back
of a $90,000 car.
His name is James. Not Jim—James. He’s one of those guys who
wears his cell phone on a plastic clip attached to his belt. He’s talking
on it now as he Tetrises another box next to some other boxes. I’ve
found that there are two types of guys who clip cell phones to their
belts: sweet nerds who fix your computer at work and white-collar
criminals who guzzle Red Bull and swindle old ladies out of their
Social Security checks.
I suspect that James is among the latter.
Sometimes Ellen, his wife, comes out and stands there in the drive-M i s s November
299
way and watches him. She wears these brown clogs and her nighttime
things and crosses her arms. She hardly ever says anything to him. In-
stead she just sort of stands there glaring either at him or out vaguely
at their browning front yard.
He’s smiling as he talks, standing in the driveway. His teeth are
startlingly white. I can see them glowing from here. My guess is he’s
talking to her—the other woman. She’s a pharmaceutical sales rep,
of course. My wife and all of the other wives refer to her, simply, as
“The Blonde.”
Kristine comes into our bedroom. I don’t really look at her be-
cause I’m pretty busy leering at James, but I get just enough to see
her drop a magazine onto our bed. “Do you think that asshole got
his teeth whitened?” I ask. “Does that really work? Maybe I should
pick up some of those white strip things at CVS next —”
“I found this in Bradley’s room today,” she says, stopping me.
“What?”
When I look over I see my wife standing at the side of our bed
next to a Playboy magazine. My first reaction is to laugh, because this
is funny, but I bite my lower lip instead, like I’m being thoughtful.
I’ve learned this trick slowly over the last fifteen years. I bite a little
harder when I notice Kristine’s shirt. T ake M e D runk , I’ m H ome , it
says across her chest in faded letters. It’s mine. I bought it in stupid
Dewey Beach years ago to be funny. It’s too big on me—way too
big—and so it’s downright cartoonish on her.
I sit down on our bed and pick up the magazine. It’s all wrinkled
and dog-eared, and the girl on the cover is blond and airbrushed
to the point of looking like a slightly blurry computer animation.
Breasts and lips and hips and a crop-top thing and a gleaming navel
ring. We got rid of our movie channels last year, and so it’s been while
since I’ve seen a girl dressed like this.
“Well, it’s . . . good to see him reading.”
Kristine is prepped for this sort of reaction, and so without pause
she says, “I don’t think it’s funny, Mitch.”
“It’s kind of funny?” I say. I add a question mark at the end in an
attempt to lighten the mood with punctuation, but no luck. On the
TV, the day’s baseball scores are running across the screen. I find300
Matthew Norman
myself wondering about the TV in James’s new apartment in the city.
I imagine it’s the size of a foosball table, which is a thought I keep
to myself.
“No,” she says. “It’s pornography.”
The word sounds weird. My wife has a slight speech impediment,
like she’s talking with a very thin sheet of paper at the back of her
tongue. You can hardly notice it, but it f lares up on oddball words
like cinnamon, chrysanthemum, and, apparently, pornography. She
touches her mouth, hiding it—a ref lex wired in since adolescence.
“Weelllll,” I say, drawing the word out. And for a while that’s
all I say, as if this, alone, is a solid argument. “Let’s keep things
in perspective here. Remember that freaky kid with the vampire
teeth? The one on the news—from Towson? He shot up that TJ
Maxx last month with the hunting rif le. They found cat skulls in
his room.”
“They were squirrel skulls,” she says. “And it was a K-Mart.”
I’m not sure how these details weaken my point, but somehow,
strangely, they do, and so I just sit there for a moment, deflated. On
the Playboy’s back cover, there’s an ad for cologne. A good-looking
actor I kind of recognize from a cop show is having a pillow fight with
a pretty brunette girl in her underwear. I briefly consider grabbing
one of our decorative throw pillows and smacking Kristine across the
face with it. I wonder what would happen. Would she laugh and strip
to her underwear and forget, if just for a moment, about our pervy
son down the hall?
It seems doubtful. They should include a warning at the bottom
of the ad in legal type: *Outcome unlikely in most situations involving
wives.
Outside, there’s the gentle thud of a car door closing. I can still
hear James’s voice, blathering on into his cell phone. I can’t make out
any words, just happy mumbling through our well-sealed windows.
“I’m just saying . . . it could be worse, right?” I say.
She shakes her head and sighs. I’ve found that women sometimes
pretend to be more infuriated with men than they actually are in
order to make larger, more general points. But I can see by the look
on her face that she’s genuinely mystified “How can this not make
you mad? Are you really that . . . clueless?”M i s s November
301
“Kris, have you heard of the Internet? Do you know what kind of
stuff is on there? Compared to that, this magazine is really kind of
charming. The fact that we haven’t caught him watching fetish videos
on the computer represents probably our greatest achievement as par-
ents. You didn’t have brothers. You don’t know boys like I do. Trust
me . . . this is perfectly natural.”
She’s prepped for this, too, and her eyes roll. I get the feeling she’s
been rehearsing this conversation with a stunt husband. “Oh, right,
right,” she says. “The ‘it’s natural’ argument. That’s very in-fashion
right now, huh? You’re all just animals. It’s all evolutionary. There’s
no way to control you or your overwhelming masculinity. We should
all just get used to it, right?”
This seems like something different than what I just said, and I
briefly consider hiding out in the bathroom and pretending to brush
my teeth. But then something dawns on me. “Wait. How did you
find this thing anyway? You weren’t going through his stuff, were
you? He’s not a little—”
“No, I wasn’t going through his stuff. It was sitting in his under-
wear drawer, Mitchell.”
“His underwear drawer?”
“Yes. I’m his mother. I was putting away his laundry.”
To articulate her point, she moves to the basket of unfolded clothes
that’s been sitting on her reading chair for three days and starts an-
grily balling socks into haphazard pairs. This seems like a little bit of
a stretch, barefoot and folding laundry. She’s a corporate lawyer who
makes twice what I do. And so as she continues taking her frustration
out on our clothing, I think about the Catholic-guilt-ridden Play-
boys of my own youth. When I was Bradley’s age, I hid five of them
elaborately with Cold War paranoia in the false bottom of a giant
cardboard box of baseball cards. My goal—and I’d actually thought
this through—was to hide them so obsessive-compulsively that if I
were to die in some freakish, crazy accident, no one, particularly my
goddamn mother, would ever find them. My knuckleheaded son has
been a hell of a lot less careful, and now we’re both paying for it. It
doesn’t seem fair.
“What if it was Ella then?” she says. “What if you found a maga-
zine with naked guys in her room?”302
Matthew Norman
I shudder at this. I know that’s usually just an expression, but I
actually do.
“You think men are the only ones who think about sex, Mitch?
Like it’s all just Dancing with the Stars and Lifetime movies for us?
Come on . . . we just know how to actually control ourselves. It’s a
novel concept.”
“But Ella’s not a woman, Kris. She’s nine. Thanks for the imagery,
though . . . it’s every father’s dream.”
And here we are, in this place we’ve been before. Right now we’re
pretending that we’re actually talking about what we’re talking
about. We’re pretending that this conversation about our children
and a creased, six-year-old girlie magazine isn’t happening a hundred
some-odd feet away from the exact spot in which Kristine’s friend is
being replaced by someone younger.
She sighs at the laundry and bites a cuticle. There’s a 50/50 chance
this conversation is over. Some stop suddenly. Others drift on aim-
lessly for weeks, like British costume dramas. So I flip through the
magazine. There are more ads for cologne, and some for sports cars
and body spray, and then it falls open to the centerfold, Miss No-
vember. She’s prettier than the girl on the cover—seemingly less
computer-generated. She’s lying on a beach chair, smiling, kind of
shy—or at least pretending to be kind of shy. A tiny green bikini top
lies cast aside in the sand, and she’s making a halfhearted go at cover-
ing her breasts with her hands. I’m not sure how this lovely girl and
her mostly naked body are supposed to make me feel, but sitting here
in my pajamas, I feel suddenly a little sad, and I think about Dewey
Beach again, back before we got way too old to go there anymore.
Lazing next to Kristine on towels because we we’re too broke and
disorganized to get beach chairs. Dizzy and stupid from daytime
drinking in the sun. The wind blowing her hair all over the place.
Picking grains of sand from her navel while she laughs and swats me
away. Her skin bitter from saltwater and sand and sunscreen.
“Mitch,” she says. She’s given up on the laundry bit, and she’s
standing in the middle of our room tugging at her lower lip in my
giant T-shirt. “I want you to talk to him.”
“And what am I supposed to tell him?”M i s s November
303
Her irritation with me is palpable, like smoke in the room. “Tell
him his mother doesn’t want that thing in the house,” she says.
“Think you can manage that?”
For no legitimate reason, I peek in on Ella first. She’s right where
she’s supposed to be, sprawled out sleeping in her bed at weird angles
like a gunshot victim. If she’s currently hiding horrible penis maga-
zines in her underwear drawer, I hope I never find out.
Kristine has gone downstairs to make an unnecessary amount of
noise. She’s knocking plates around and opening and closing cup-
boards and cabinets. The cat’s probably ditched the scene by now
and curled up behind the dryer. It’s his go-to spot at the first sign of
unpleasantness. Maybe later, I’ll join him.
From the window in the hallway, I can see the front of James’s car
next door. I wonder what his plan was. What did he take first? What
has he left until the end?
Standing outside Bradley’s bedroom door now, I clear my throat
and fake a few coughs to give him some fair warning so he can cease
and desist whatever unholy thing he’s doing in there. When I knock,
he answers fast—“Yeah?” he says. I put the Playboy behind my back,
which seems unnecessarily cruel, but it’s too late now. His room
smells like a teenage boy and the décor he’s chosen is what a local
Foot Locker might look like if it got hit by a grenade. I step over a
pair of red and black Adidas basketball shoes and a largely ignored
backpack filled with schoolbooks.
“What’s up, Dad?” he says.
“Hey,” I say, and then I pull the magazine out like it’s some sort
of prize and every muscle in my son’s body tenses at once. Streaks of
heat darken his face, and I wish I’d chosen a method that wasn’t so
much like an ambush. “We need to talk about this, buddy.”
“Oh, dude,” he says, but that’s as far as he gets. He pulls a lone
earbud from his ear and hangs his head, defeated. I expected more, if
I’m being honest—an escape attempt or, at the very least, a passion-
ate denial. His little flat screen is on in mute. He’s watching the same
thing I was.
“It’s all right, Brad. I’m not mad. I just . . . ”304
Matthew Norman
He waits for me to finish this sentence, which makes two of us.
I should have had Kristine write me a script. At least some talking
points.
“Where’d you even get it, anyway?”
I can read his mind right now and I watch as he considers the rami-
fications of being a snitch, like he’s a low-level mafia goon. The fact
that I don’t seem to be madding is throwing him off. He’s trying to
figure out my angle. “Uhhh,” he says.
“Brad, I’m not gonna waterboard you. Just tell me where you go it.”
“Luke Hackman,” he says, giving up. “This guy from school. I
traded him an A-Rod rookie card for it.”
“Wow, Luke Hackman got screwed in that deal,” I say, and then
I surprise us both by laughing. Bradley just watches, a little dopey-
looking, as I sit down at the side of his bed and flip through the
magazine again. Apparently it’s impossible for even a reasonably in-
telligent grown man to hold a Playboy without looking at it. Miss
November, whose name is actually Amber, has filled out one of those
idiotic questionnaires. I scan her answers and wonder what infuri-
ated my Rhodes Scholar wife more, the fact that this twenty-year-old
girl has allowed herself to be so shamelessly objectified or that she’s
dotted the Is and Ts in her answers with an apparently random com-
bination of bubbly hearts and smiley faces.
Bradley sees me reading. “Her favorite movie is The Notebook,”
he says.
I read on and, of course, he’s right. “She likes horses, too,” I say.
“That’ll come in handy if she ever fulfills her dream of becoming a . . .
wow . . . large-animal surgeon? Is that even a real thing?”
“Arizona State’s got a really good Pre-Vet program, Dad,” he says.
“It’s, like, ranked and everything.”
I’m surprised suddenly then by a drive-by hit of love for my son.
It leaves me a little dizzy atop his wrinkly New York Yankees sheets.
These debilitating waves of affection are more commonly directed at
Ella, who wears butterfly clips in her hair and tells me that I’m the
best ten times a day. But I love this skinny punk, too, and his crack-
ing voice and his impossibly big Adam’s apple. He’s the same boy I
was a hundred years ago. The same boy we all were. He studies MissM i s s November
305
November’s loopy words at night over and over after the rest of us
have gone to bed, memorizing them along with the thrilling details
of her body and wonders if a girl like this—if any girl at all, really—
will ever let him see her naked.
“Okay,” I say. “I wish Dr. Amber here all the best. But we need
to talk about your mom. She’s not exactly thrilled about this, Brad.”
“What? Mom? Oh. Oh God. Does she . . . like . . . think I’m a perv?”
“Well, maybe a little. Here’s the thing you gotta understand.
They’re not like us. To your mom—to women—this isn’t just a mag-
azine. It’s more like a . . . a worldview. She thinks that this is how
you see women. As . . . sex objects?” Another question mark creeps
in, but this one’s less choreographed. I’m not articulating myself very
well. “Does that make sense, Brad?”
“Um,” he says. “I guess so. Kinda.”
That means no. I can tell by the completely blank look on his face,
and now I have an overwhelming urge to slap the back of his head. A
moment ago I loved him, and now I’m contemplating low-level child
abuse. That, basically, is fatherhood.
“Okay, let me simplify it for you, then. Playboys are going to piss
your mom off. So next time maybe think about a better hiding place.
Your underwear drawer, Brad? Are you kidding me? Did you think
about just cutting out the middle man and duct-taping it to her steer-
ing wheel?”
“Huh?”
“Brad, you’re busted. Give up the stunned look. She found this
thing in your underwear drawer. She told me herself.”
“What? Nu-uh. It wasn’t in my underwear drawer. Seriously, I’m not
stupid, Dad. I had it over there, with Grandpa’s Sports Illustrateds.”
“What are you talking about?”
He hops out of bed, all ropy in baggy gym shorts, and kneels down
to the bottom shelf of his bookcase where he keeps my dad’s old
Sports Illustrateds in three leaning piles. “See, I had it here. Middle
pile, fifth one from the top.” He counts out five magazines and lifts,
revealing a boozy looking baseball player from the ’70s instead of a
Playboy. “She must have, like, found it or something.”
“Jesus,” I say.306
Matthew Norman
“What?”
Bradley doesn’t see what I see. His mother didn’t stumble ran-
domly on this thing while perusing antique Sports Illusrateds. She
was looking for it—or for something like it, at least. She probably
started with me, riffling through the harmless crap in my desk and
nightstand, and then moved on to Bradley, a not-so-innocent by-
stander. I look down at Miss November again. She’s looking back
at me all pouty and oblivious, and I know exactly what my wife was
thinking. If this is what men like James want—if this is what they’re
willing to leave their wives standing in their driveways for—then
maybe it’s what we all want.
“Dad?” says Bradley. “Are you still, like, not mad at me?”
“Go back to bed, Brad,” I say. “Tomorrow you’re apologizing to
your mother.”
“But—”
“But nothing.”
“I mean, what do I say?”
“You’ll think of something.”
I drop the stupid magazine into the recycling bin in the kitchen, but
I rethink that and move it to the garbage. As the metal lid closes with
a satisfying bang, it feels definitive.
She’s standing in the kitchen, looking out over our dark yard and
onto the street. There’s a bag of Oreos open on the counter, double-
stuffed. For a while, I look at her from behind. One bare foot hooks
gently around its opposing calf. In silhouette, she’s like one of those
long birds at the zoo, resting on one leg and pretending no one’s
looking at her.
Just then, the street over her shoulder and out the window lights
up and James’s Land Rover passes with a hum of European accelera-
tion, and then it’s gone. I wonder how many other households this
dickhead has disrupted this week. Maybe if he comes by tomorrow
night I’ll slash his tires. That seems reasonable enough.
“Well, Brad feels like a complete pervert now,” I say, popping an
Oreo into my mouth. “You can look forward to an incredibly awk-
ward apology tomorrow.”M i s s November
307
She bites a cookie and keeps staring, holding its remainder in her
fingers like a cigarette.
“If it makes you feel better,” I say, “I think he actually did read
the articles.”
“Where’d he get it?” she asks.
“The city last week. He and his friends found it sticking out of
a Dumpster. Some little creep named Luke Hackman dared him to
take it.”
I’m not entirely sure why I’ve told her this. I guess I’m protecting
Brad. Or maybe I’m just covering for all of us. It’s probably better
if they think our behavior is less calculating and more a recurring
symptom of our own hopeless stupidity.
The cat slinks by silently, assessing the situation in his snobby cat
way. The unpleasantness in the house has passed. Just a small, do-
mestic storm.
“Do you ever feel old, Mitch?”
I do, all of the time—right now, in fact—but I don’t answer her.
It’s dark in the kitchen. Just a row of low lights illuminate the wine-
glasses in the cabinet. The green light over the oven has been blinking
7:22 for as long as I can remember. I put my hands on her hips and
turn her around and kiss her on the mouth. Nothing serious. Noth-
ing cinematic. Just a small, Oreo-flavored kiss, our tongues touching
only for an instant. When we were young, I spent large sums of energy
concentrating on the strawberry-like surface of Kristine’s tongue. I
thought if I put my mind to it, if I really thought about it, I could
identify the slight imperfection that caused the occasional word to
gently slur like it did. I loved it about her, and now it’s just another
thing that I don’t even really think about anymore.
“You can’t kiss me,” she says. “I’m eating Oreos.” Her fingers
move to her lips again, but I don’t want her to hide from me so I take
her hands and pull them down to her sides. There are things I want
to tell her—that I should tell her. I’m not sleeping with a pharmaceu-
tical sales rep, and I’m not planning to. There’s no secret in my desk
or my nightstand, just a bunch of ATM receipts and golf tees. I think
belly button rings are kind of trashy-looking. I didn’t impregnate our
foreign housekeeper and keep it a secret, even after becoming gover-308
Matthew Norman
nor of California. I didn’t get a blow job from an intern. I didn’t have
Twitter affairs and send teenaged girls in Delaware grainy pictures of
my junk. Our son is a good boy. He’s not a misogynist or a future
date-rapist. He’s just a kid. I love her, and I’m not as bad as she’s
gradually beginning to fear that I might be. Not even close.
She’s waiting for me to say all of these things. But I don’t know
where to begin. And so I say the first actual words that materialize.
“Only a complete asshole would spend ninety thousand dollars on
a car during a global recession.”32.
Most Wanted
by Eric Raymond
The Mexican girl at the west Texas rest stop faced New Mexico as if
New Mexico was all of tomorrow’s problems stretching before her
in rust and fire. She was en route to nowhere, standing by the vend-
ing machines, her beat-to-hell Tercel parked where the state troop-
ers would not see her expired plates. My Peterbuilt rig idled in the
painted light. We were on the westbound side of I–40, close to the
ghost town of Glenrio. Texas was where the night’s long-haulers
would roll in from. She was short and round-cheeked, hair tied up in
a bouquet of auburn corkscrews, eye shadow lavender. In her line of
work, it was early. In mine, the middle of a long day.
Her youth was bent from a scarcity of comfort. Or maybe that’s
what I projected. I had this bad habit of seeing the girls working the
truck stops as victims, especially the young ones. But I knew that
if you let your guard down, you’d be left pondering how it all went
wrong so fast. She tracked me the whole time without meeting my
eyes. She had watched me step down from my cab and walk up with
the missing flyer in my hand.
“Mira, por favor.” I held up Sarah’s picture. “Conoces? Mira aqui.”
“No,” she said with a scant glance.
I stapled the paper four cornered to the inside of the lean-to shel-
tering the vending machines.
“Maybe you rest?” She lifted her eyes the direction of my rig.310
Eric Raymond
“No rest,” I said.
I walked back to the rig and looked up the grade to where the girl
was little more than another signpost along the road. I refrained from
lecturing them, but I thought a few good thoughts for her, for at least
enough mercy to keep her leg from turning up in a coyote’s mouth
one morning. I couldn’t remember if her toenails were painted, or
if she had any visible tattoos. Those things were important, as they
would connect her to this world again if my well-wishing didn’t hold.
I was out of flyers. Five hundred down, another five hundred to be
printed. In my cab I emailed a new master copy to an Office Depot
in Albuquerque, where a stranger would prepare Sarah again for me.
She was always ahead of me and behind me and yet nowhere.
From this rest stop and a hundred others, two pairs of Sarah’s eyes,
fourteen and eighteen, gazed unblinking onto the rivers of interstate
traffic and the insides of doorless bathrooms.
She rode along with the sympathetic long-haulers and territorial
state cops, lay taped down to convenience store counters between
the herbal methamphetamines and headache powders. She crumpled
under the backseats of family SUVs, tucked politely away on others’
vacations, then promptly forgotten, mashed with the clay, candy, and
dog-shit shoe soles of other people’s children.
The ink and toner of Sarah as she was and Sarah as she might be
ran in the sleet, baked in the sun, and withered in the rain. When
the staples holding her fast gave up, she stared into the empty sky
from littered ditches, among the cellophane discards and chucked
lug nuts. I replicated and distributed, shared and asked, scanned her
and posted her, and as always, in the end, it was the same. I left her
behind.
One of the lucky breaks amid the compound fractures of my di-
vorce from Miranda was the fact that we sold the house at the height
of the real estate boom. We were gifted in our quitting. We sold,
divided, and quickly relinquished the painful sight of one another.
In less than a year, everything else collapsed. I went through truck-
ing school just as the safest real estate you could own was portable.
My rig was the only six-figure loan I carried. I went from a priest
in the church of home and hearth to a full-time nomad on eighteenMost Wa nted
311
wheels in under a year. If Sarah swam out willingly, or against her
will on the back of one of these big alligators, I would swim with
them, too.
I made the Office Depot in Albuquerque a half hour before close. I
locked the rig with its engine idling and trotted across the soft black-
top to work the stiffness out of my legs. I was forty-two and begin-
ning to feel it. It was easier to freeze up as I got older. I tried to keep
off the weight I’d lost. I ate a lot of canned tuna and did pushups in
parking lots and playgrounds.
A few kids slouched on ruined Hondas. I counted three guys
and two girls. I never stopped looking at boys of that age without
imagining what I’d have thought if Sarah had brought them home.
Maybe I stuck on it because I last saw her on the cusp of full-blown
high school adolescence and never had to get acclimated to the boys
coming to the house, never had to divine their true natures beneath
junior varsity jackets and drugstore, body spray deodorants.
It was much the same way when I went to truck-driving school.
Scrawny redneck kids without the granddaddy that owned a fern-
ery, poorer than the migrant workers because they didn’t even have
family, buying a case of Budweiser and shoplifting a jar of peanut
butter every week to stay alive. I knew those kids personally after
so many weeks in the driving classes, and I still couldn’t keep from
looking at their axle grease nails and thinking If Sarah had brought
one home, I would have choked him at the door.
I smelled sage and lavender on the desert wind before disappearing
into the shrink-wrapped air of the Office Depot. The clerk behind
the print counter wouldn’t even have been a contender. He was a
smeary white stoner with dyed blond hair and tribal tattoos, the sort
who went vegan in the desert and filled up on drum circle, his vacant
head drifting with tumbleweed stories of an older cousin who went
to Burning Man.
“Picking up. Name’s Robbie.”
He scanned the shelves below the counter.
“Flyers?” he asked. His eyes flicked over my face. Having done this
in a dozen copy centers across as many states, I developed a story to
cover for the fact that the girl on the flyer was my stepdaughter.312
Eric Raymond
“Part of the program,” I said. “Truckers for the Lost? Ever heard
of it?”
“Nah,” he said. He scanned a bar code taped down to the counter
and entered in the number of flyers.
“It’s a good organization. They send the flyer, I post it along the
way. Back and forth,” I waved my hand in the air. His eyes tried to
track it. He was anxious to close, high already.
“Mind if I post one near the door? That okay with your manager?”
“I am the night manager. Go wild.”
I peeled a fresh color copy of my Sarahs from the cardboard box
and rubber-banded the box closed again. The kid looked at her and
made a show of scratching the black soul patch under his lip, a kind
of burner’s bad acting for careful consideration.
“You ever find one like her?” he asked.
“What do you mean, ‘one like her’?”
“A runaway.”
“I never said she was a runaway.”
Maybe he put it together, maybe not. I didn’t think Sarah looked
at all like me.
“Well, yeah, I guess she coulda been kidnapped. But she looks like
a runner.”
“What makes you say that?” I looked at the young version of her
for something I’d missed over years, but it was the same photo, a
yearbook shot with the false blue sky-and-cloud background.
“Takes one to know one, maybe? I was a runner. She’s almost
jumping out of that picture. Like she was thinking about it when
they took it.”
Outside, the night was not any cooler, but had come alive with
a wind. I held the box of flyers under my arm. One of the boys I’d
counted on my way in was looking at my rig. He had his back turned
to me. They looked like high school dropouts. I scanned their hands
for spray paint cans, in case they planned on tagging my trailer. The
two girls and two remaining boys idled near their cars, a few bottles
poorly hidden in white McDonald’s bags by the tires.
“Evening,” I said outside of the kid’s striking distance. It was a
well-lit lot. Not empty, but you could never tell.Most Wa nted
313
I expected him to return to his friends, but he stood unperturbed
by my presence, hanging around as though he’d been waiting for
the guided tour to start. I unlocked the cab and stepped up. The
kid craned his neck to see inside. He was wearing a no-known-color
hoodie, hands stuffed in the kangaroo pocket. His jeans slouched
far below his waist. His mouth was open enough for me to see the
drunken clutch of teeth forming his overbite.
“You can sleep in there, right?” he asked.
“Yep.”
“I knew it,” he said, like he’d nailed a game show question. “Hella
tight.”
“Mind taking a look at something for me?” I asked him. I wanted
to see his hands.
“You one of those Jesus freaks? Highway holy roller?”
I unbanded the box, pulled out a flyer at arm’s length, and put
the box on the stairs of the cab. He looked back to the car where his
friends watched with the girls. He leaned forward to look at Sarah.
“Here, take it.” He took it and bit the quick of one thumbnail.
“Hey, Tanya!” he shouted over to the cars.
“What?”
“Come here!”
“A.J., leave that guy alone.”
“Get your skank ass over here.”
“Best watch how you talk to me,” she shot back. “I’m not your
bitch.”
She sulked over with her bagged bottle. She was the youngest in
the group, on fire to burn the brightest, the one with the most fear of
being left out. She was short, a little splay-footed and skinny-hipped,
built like a Little League t-ball player with tits. Out-flourished orange-
blond hair in a midlength Japanese helmet, two different drugstore
hues. She’d taken on the boys’ mouth to cover up the fact she was
about fifteen and wearing tough around like it was the one nice pair
of jeans she owned.
“You seen this girl?” he asked her. She drank from the bottle
openly.
“No.”314
Eric Raymond
One of the boys, his black hair parted in the center and smoothed
to his knobby head, loped over to where we stood. They were all by
the rig now, including the third boy, a stumpy, muscled, pimply kid
who looked like he had a religious devotion to steroids and Big Macs.
The girl with him looked Navajo. She had an unlit cigarette between
her fingers. She stood behind him and picked at the filter with her
nail. The muscle kid stepped up, and by the way he parted them, I
could tell he was their alpha dog. He had a moon face, a shiny black
ponytail, and a dust-brush mustache as fine as baby’s hair. His biceps
must have seventeen inches around.
“All you truckers like crystal, yeah?”
The kids seemed to draw together then, an unspoken change in
the flock, a less significant me standing before a unified them. The
first one, A.J., turned his back to me and put his hand on the muscle-
head’s shoulder. “This dude ain’t no tweaker, Ali.”
“They all tweakers. Wheels ain’t turning, he ain’t earning.” He
folded his hands in front of his waist. “What do you say, Dad?”
No one ever called me Dad. Not even Sarah.
“You ought to be more careful,” I said.
“Why’s that? You a cop?”
“I’m not a cop.”
“Don’t matter. I didn’t make you no offer. Just asking if you got a
substance abuse problem.”
“You’re a drug counselor, then.”
“That’s right. You gonna hate on that, I show you how I handle my
business.” He lifted the edge of his shirt, revealing an inch of pistol
stock and gothic lettering above his elastic waistband. The Navajo
girl moved in closer to the Ali kid and draped her arms around his
shoulders. She was a little taller than he was, no longer a young girl
but not the ground-out woman she would become. Her beauty was
cutting her to pieces and she couldn’t feel a thing.
“How much?” I asked.
“How far you wanna go? Forty get you through tonight. Sixty,
you have a little extra just in case.”
I took out my wallet. Ali slit his eyes at A.J. and fired a shaming
laugh. “What I tell you. You gotta listen to me, homes. They all
tweakers. Go get his shit.”Most Wa nted
315
“Skip the shit.” I picked up a stack of flyers from the box and held
the two twenties on top of the stack with my thumb. “Take the forty,
keep your shit, and hand these flyers out.”
Ali took the stack of flyers and stuffed the twenties into his front
pocket. He frowned.
“Give them to your customers, the guy who’s cooking the shit
for you, anyone who might know where girls go when they can’t be
found.”
He showed Sarah’s face to the Navajo girl on his shoulder. She
looked at Sarah’s face, then to me, and unwrapped herself from Ali.
Ali considered Sarah, then threw the stack of flyers straight up into
the air.
“Fuck your flyers.”
They fluttered and caught in the breeze of the diesel. He rested
his hand on the gun stock under his shirt and slinked off a few steps
before turning back to the cars. The Navajo girl stuck the unlit ciga-
rette into her mouth and followed him.
“Let’s ride,” Ali shouted at A.J. and the mouthy girl. A.J.’s jaw
tensed as his only apology. He followed, but the mouthy one didn’t.
I picked up the flyers that hadn’t escaped yet. I could hear the girl
take another drink. She dropped the bottle in the bag on the asphalt
and it rolled away. I pulled a flyer from under her dirty white Keds.
“Tanya!” A.J. shouted from the open door of his Civic. “Now!”
I looked up at Tanya, her face smoldering where the booze had
doused her fire. A.J.’s patience expired. He slammed the door and
started the engine. Bass and a razzing electronic music Dopplered
past as he sped out of the lot, chassis sparking on the asphalt.
Tanya watched him go, unperturbed by abandonment. The truck
rattled its sweet rattle and a downdraft brought the warm exhaust
across my neck.
“You think you know what you’re doing, hanging around guys
like that.”
“You don’t know me.”
“No. But I recognize you. You think you’re invincible.”
She scoffed. “No I don’t.”
“You want to end up on one of these flyers?”
“Depends.” She was so full of herself.316
Eric Raymond
“It depends?”
“Depends on what got her on the flyer.”
“It’s a missing flyer,” I shook it at her. “What do you think got her
on the flyer? She disappeared. No one can find her.”
She took the smeared flyer from my hand and looked at Sarah’s face.
“Alls I’m saying is, how do you know where she is now ain’t better
than where she’s from?”
The lights in Office Depot darkened.
“Is that really what you think when you see a girl’s face on a miss -
ing flyer? It’s a sign of her good luck?”
“Maybe she got something better and kept it to herself.”
I could see the shadow of the Office Depot stoner behind the big
windows. He pushed the automatic doors open with his bony arms,
stepped outside, then closed them and locked up.
“You don’t think that hanging out with drug dealer assholes and
talking to strangers in parking lots at night is a more likely reason to
end up on a flyer?”
She returned a look of impenetrable indifference.
“Sweetie, if it’s such a good idea, why don’t you climb up in that
cab and hit the road with me?”
She looked at the twilight interior of the cab and smirked. “You
don’t seem like you’re going somewhere better.”
I stepped closer to her, into the radius of her candy perfume and
Kool-Aid booze. She stood her ground, may have even leaned in a
little. I lowered my words on her head.
“You know who the biggest serial killers in this country are? Long-
haul truckers.”
She raised Sarah’s flyer between us and pulled it tight against her
face like a mask, her features distorting the twin photos. She twitched
her head left and right with each mocking word.
“You’re. So. Scary.”
I surprised her when I ripped the paper from her hands. But she
was fast, and she decked me with a closed fist before I could step
back. She threw a right cross like she learned from older brothers.
The blow caught me across the cheekbone, glancing over the bridge
of my nose. My eyes stung. I caught myself before slapping her back,Most Wa nted
317
which was a good thing for a lot of reasons, the first of which was the
night manager, jogging toward us across the empty lot.
“Hey!” he shouted.
“You like that, you fucking psycho?” she spit.
“Go home!” I shouted at her. “Go!”
She reached down and picked up her bottle from the ground. I
backed away and she pitched it into the side of the rig, where it shat-
tered in the bag and rained on the ground. I scooped the box of flyers
into the cab. They sloshed onto the floor.
“Think I can’t protect myself? Fuck you!”
I slammed the door to the cab, but I could hear her outside.
“You go home! Run! You ain’t never going to find that girl! That’s
a curse on you, motherfucker! Never in your fuckin’ life!”
I ground the gears bad, my eyes watering, my heart unused to
the adrenaline. I heard something solid hit the side mirror of the rig
and the glass fell out in a funhouse spider web. I gripped the suicide
knob and hammered the gas, the cab bucking over its air shocks. The
rig heaved away in a large arc, tilting from the girl still screaming
profanities and the jabberwocky night manager by her side. The big
diesel roared. I felt the load shift and the trailer start to get light on
me. Horns lit up. I bounced across two lanes, let off, and tucked it
in just before pulling head-on into oncoming traffic. Four hundred
copies of Sarah sloshed around me.
At 4 a . m ., I parked in a rest area near Barstow. Getting socked in
the face by a teenage girl was about as good as crystal for keeping you
up all night. I replayed the image of her with Sarah’s flyer pulled to
her face. There was no sleep in the air, just the absence of any image
in the busted side mirror, which was doubly disorienting when you
expected to see your own exhausted face.
I watched a lot lizard climb out of a sleeper cab down the line of
rigs, a midriff jean jacket flung fast over her shoulders. Her red hair
was perm-fried and cab-tussled. She scanned the lot self-consciously,
looking for the twilight cockpit of a state trooper, gentlest of her nat-
ural predators. The rig she climbed out of kicked on the low beams
and lurched into gear. The guy got his rocks off and had to start
turning those wheels.318
Eric Raymond
I blipped through the dead channels on the CB radio until I
heard a guy singing a spiritual in a strong, low voice. The last note
carried and died. There was a long emptiness, and then someone
squawked back “Amen, brother,” and then it was silent again and
stayed that way. Nobody looking for conversation in the holy pre-
dawn hour.
It was about this time of night Sarah disappeared. No more talk-
ing. That’s what the abandoned phone had meant. She was like a
satellite that had just broken orbit, momentum carrying her deeper
into the void with each passing minute.
Six years on and I often woke at this hour, unable to sleep. The
stars would be over soon. Idleness was no good when you were solv-
ing for peace in the long division of estrangement. I squared up Sar-
ah’s flyers and peeled one off the top of the stack. With my staple gun
hooked in my belt loop, I stepped down from the cab.
In the men’s room, the tireless war between vandals and the manu-
facturers of automatic hand dryers continued. On the women’s side of
the building, I could hear the hooker gargling, brushing her teeth.
Time passed in the click and running intervals of the water conserva-
tion faucets. My cheek was swollen. I had a scrape on my nose where
the girl’s ragged, bitten fingernail grazed me.
On the narrow grass island by the bathrooms was a hutch protect-
ing a faded map behind a scratched up Plexiglas panel. On the map,
the roads and landmarks were redacted by hieroglyphics of paint pen.
It was the legend for the underworld beneath the trucker’s atlas. I
found a clear spot on the side of the hutch, facing east. The sky was
lighter by degrees, dawn coming. I stapled Sarah’s flyer looking at the
miles I’d covered. The sun would fade her fast, but it would be a good
view while it lasted.
The hooker bought a Coke and a pack of peanut butter crackers
from the vending machines. She perched on top of a picnic table with
a passing glance my way. I flattened out a rumpled dollar bill and
fed it to the machine. The machine rejected it. I fed it again; again
rejected. I worked the bill on the side of the machine in two hands,
ironing out the wrinkles, but the bill ended up wet from the dew.
The machine scorned it a third time.Most Wa nted
319
The hooker walked over and reached around me to feed four quar-
ters into the change slot. She pulled the tongue of my damp dollar
from the machine and pocketed it. She returned to her breakfast.
“Thanks,” I called after her.
She raised her hand in my direction. A gesture between you’re wel-
come and be quiet.33.
The Mountain Population Is Me
by Shane Jones
It began as a joke. But soon I found myself in our dirt-pit of a back-
yard, gazing at the empty horizon over the flat grassy fields that dom-
inated our lands, and imagined what the mountain would look like.
Not a large mountain, I told Gwen, but definitely big enough that it
would never be considered a hill. A hill is something Sammy builds
from snow. I told Gwen what the sun would look like coming up and
over the peak of our first mountain. She pointed at the horizon, and
with an extended finger, drew a triangle on the sky.
The elders were the most difficult to convince. At our town hall
meeting they took turns standing, hollering, and shredding a textbook
featuring other countries’ most beautiful mountains. Several were con-
cerned, after eighty or so years of flat living, that their legs wouldn’t
move in a motion for mountain walking. Standing at the front of the
room, I told everyone to practice, and marched in place while smiling.
They took turns, slowly moving their thighs upward until horizontal,
and complained in a chorus of phlegm-coughs and boo.
“Wait,” said one elderly man who I knew as Johnson. “What would
the air be like up there, on a mountain?”
I explained how for hundreds of years the air quality of flat living
had polluted us. That from my research, using a type of weather bal-
loon, an invisible smog had formed a sphere one hundred yards sky-
ward. The benefits of building a mountain would be tremendous.T he Mou nt a i n Popu lat ion I s Me
321
Think of future generations, the children, I said. Concentrate on a
future where you look out your window and see a mountain.
The children, of course, were the easiest to convince. I told Sammy
about sledding, skiing, downhill cycling, and hiking. I showed her
my sketch of a playground in the sky, near the peak of the proposed
mountain. Afterward, I watched her from the front window of our
home lifting her bicycle over her head in the middle of the street, her
arms trembling to balance it at a severe downward angle.
The town meetings continued, and one by one, the residents began
to agree that a mountain was a feasible and good idea. During the
traditional fifteen-minute break after an hour of debate, I’d stand
outside smoking and notice more and more of the elders using the
Practice Hills, exclaiming to loved ones that it didn’t hurt their legs
too bad to climb. Others proudly rattled off my list of new animal
species that would flourish in the deep forests of our first mountain.
Many predicted an influx of athletes to our country, which the politi-
cians translated as increased revenue.
Construction of the mountain took a year. There were deaths. Sev-
eral men hadn’t properly prepared their lungs by jogging the Simu-
lation Scaffolding, a massive structure made from wood and metal
slightly half in height of the proposed mountain. A few workers
simply couldn’t handle the idea of a mountain—a pile of dirt and
gravel—bringing them closer to the sky, and took their own lives via
self-burial. Two men were murdered by residents desperate to ascend
the mountain, which was related to something important I didn’t ac-
count for: building a mountain so grand that no one could touch it
until it was finished, which is why I’m currently here, alone, on the
mountain.
Even Gwen had her moments. I’m thinking of the night I found
her in the backyard, lying flat on her back, crying. She had pasted her
face with dirt, and she said her entire life was physically contained
on one flat plane. I told her that was true, that the mountain would
be completed soon. The next night, Gwen was again in the back-
yard, but I didn’t go out to bring her back inside. Instead, I watched
from the bathroom window while Sammy brushed her teeth next to
me, my wife running full speed through an open field and sliding322
Shane Jones
stomach-bare across the flat grassy surface, her body halting into a
crumpled pile of sobs.
Security was an issue. Many were arrested during dark hours for
trespassing as the mountain grew with each truckload of dirt, and the
tutorials that replaced the town hall meetings about what to expect
when first climbing the mountain were attended less and less fre-
quently.
But what really surprised me was that, after all the initial desire,
the ridiculous drive to first experience the mountain, people not only
stopped caring, lost interest, but soon came to view the mountain as
a symbol of fear, and soon after, hatred. A black pyramid had been
built, and it was my fault.
Opening day was a disaster. I remember standing at the base of the
mountain in my best suit, surrounded by a half-crown of politicians,
a fat red ribbon tied to two big trees, and looking out and seeing only
Gwen and Sammy, a few of the other men and women’s family mem-
bers and children. Everyone bored. The protests to dismantle the
mountain would come later. I cut the ribbon, turned, and applauded
the mountain to soft background clapping.
On my first walk up, I too, wasn’t very impressed. Sure, the air was
better, and the forest sections with deer and squirrels were eye-catch-
ing, but it didn’t seem to matter much. Like everyone else, I missed
our flat country because it was once just, and only that, a flat coun-
try. I found myself walking in rings around the mountain, surveying
others who shrugged at new foliage; children who rode their bikes
downhill were only interested for several trips. Even they missed the
uniqueness of a country once described in a tourism magazine as “ . . .
flatter, and sweeter, than a field of syrup-drenched pancakes.”
What had I done?
I was prosecuted for crimes against “the history of our flat, long
ago once beautiful land.” That’s to say, after several years of the
mountain driving residents to madness, nights where they hand-
dug dirt in pathetically collapsing piles at their feet, many needed
to blame someone for destroying our country. I still remember the
elderly man Johnson, even as I sit alone at the top of this mountain
(Gwen, Sammy, so very far below, perhaps simply watching a ball rollT he Mou nt a i n Popu lat ion I s Me
323
effortlessly along a flat field) looking at me across the long-forgotten
town hall meeting room telling me that I would be the only friend
of the mountain.
I’m not sorry for what I did, because at the time it seemed like the
right thing to do. My love for mountains was an infection. They say
I will be executed if I leave this mountain. They say I have made our
country like every other country. No longer, the judge told me, can a
man stand in a field with his family and spin in a circle seeing noth-
ing but expanding grassy fields. I understand what I’ve done. Sitting
on this mountain peak, rubbing a leaf between thumb and finger, I
know who will bury me.34.
opal one, opal two
by Tessa Mellas
opal one—insect smallness, brown-gray girl, who scurries on spindly
legs. so busy crossing empty spaces, sometimes she doesn’t breathe.
thus the miniature hiccups. staccato sounds that lurch from her
throat. pinprick hiccups. and pit-pit patters, raindrop feet pocking
patterns on the floor. little daughter. watch her flutter. little daughter.
watch her twirl. she darts. she spins in circles. so pretty when she’s
flitting. a blur of brown-gray limbs that look like wings. but when
she sleeps, her features crumple. eyes and nose so close together. fore-
head furrowed. wrinkled chin. scrunched little face like a moth. edda
thinks opal is more ruby’s daughter than hers.
edda—sews seams with the sight of her fingers. sews robes for
all the priests. for prayer. for choir. for blessing water in baths of
birds. edda with thread spinning under her fingers. toes tapping the
pedal that powers the lever, that moves thread through the needle.
the needle sharp. the needle thin. all that sewing, and opal always
whisking away. past the edges of edda’s glasses. to the peripheral
fog of muddy eyes. such frenzy. like edda’s sister ruby. whose voice
was always zip-zip zipping. throat erupting with words. a pulse that
buzzed in edda’s ears. and only ceased when ruby took glass on her
tongue. melting it with her breath. the vaulted roof of her mouth
bending it round. unlatch the lips. to release the rose-colored lens.
that mends the muddy eyes. that colors the world. until the glass
outlives its time. and the eyes get muddier still.opa l one, opa l t wo
325
father babcock—singing his way through all the hymnals. kneeling
in pew number eight. the singing such work he’s split a seam in his
robe. the flesh of his elbow pokes through. he sings to sister mau-
rice who rubs oil into the altar. he sings to crucified jesus. and one-
dimensional mary, piecemeal, soldered with lead, spider-line crack
splitting her face in two. three sheep on a hill behind her. the sun
intersects the hill, shines green on the bald of his head. a cap like
peter pan. all he needs is a feather. bathed in the green of the window.
singing a string of hallelujahs. a moth cries for help in the rafters. he
looks but can’t find it in all the wood.
opal one—fond of the big machine’s rumble. purring needle. warm
light from its tiny sun. when she comes close to her mother’s fin-
gers, edda blows at her shadow and opal is swept away, suspended
on breath from her lungs. whisked to the window. where two little
girls excavate worms from the dirt. opal might like to uncork a worm
from the ground herself. but she is not a sister. so she stays inside and
goads the needle. with her nine-hundred thread-count flesh. today
too close. the tip of the needle catches her skirt. leg stitched into the
seam, sewn into the robe. dark in the crease of the hem. ecclesiastical
velvet, a mask that muffles her tongue. saliva leaks into velvet. cloth
transposes to moss under her head.
edda—furious whir of the needle. manic winging of opal’s legs. the
buzzing resurrects ruby. ruby five years dead. poor ruby. glass in her
lungs, shards splintering into her blood. remember ruby clenching
her fists. remember ruby pursing her chin. everything tight because
everything hurt. because glass was etching her insides, burrowing into
her organs. little razors under her skin. but edda didn’t believe her,
told her to stop her clenching or she’d grind her teeth to nubs. she
was always shushing her sister. saying still those pulsing lips. now no
sister to shush. only snot erupting from nostrils. spittle caught on her
tongue. sogginess steams her lenses. and she doesn’t see opal under
her fingers. hears the thread knot. hears the cloth catch. then in the
silence. the wind through the window. a bird in the mulberry tree.
antoinette—mud. mud. mud. squishy squish in the hands. scrippity
scrape on the legs. sands the bump of the elbow. rubs fur from little
girl arms. softens the skin. eases the itch. covers sister’s rosy smell.
rosy sister squeals, keep the dirt to yourself. so dirty sister does. mud326
Tessa Mellas
on the worms instead. worms weave through the tines of her fingers.
stretch over her palms like cello strands. their bellies smooth on her
cheek. the pentamerous beating of hearts seeps into her skin, does jigs
on her tongue. where’s opal? dirty sister needs a partner to dance to
the rat-tat-tat of the worms. gone from the window. nobody’s sister.
drop a worm in the jar for opal. opal dances alone.
edda—tangles and knots under her fingers. the pit-pit patter gone.
floor space quiet. except the breath of the dust. everything still like
rubble. except the bird perched in the mulberry tree. spreading her
wings. puffing the fringe of her throat. hysterical chirping. manic
scissoring beak. tizzied creature. like opal. dear god. where’s opal?
has opal turned into this bird? oh ruby. sad suffering sister. edda’s
comeuppance earned. come back, edda calls to opal. the tree shifts
its branches. the bird startles, leaps out of the tangle. the sky swal-
lows her up. edda lurches. thinks exit. but her leg is snagged in velvet,
velvet caught under the chair. cheek slams to the floor. rose-colored
lenses splinter. eyes begotten by ruby. bowed by the might of her
tongue. a shower of rose-colored seeds disperses. color leaks from the
world. and edda escapes the house.
opal one—mother crashing down. mother gone the house. opal
all alone. hung from the weave of scalloped threads. stitches pierce
the toes, and cuff the bone to the cloth. lick the dark cocoon. lap the
velvet smooth. fed on the juice of the tongue, velvet blooms into a
coppice of moss. mossy meadows creep. over brown-gray skin. weasel
under the arms. wrap wreaths around the womb. hold the daughter
tight. rock the daughter still. cup mossy hands to her eyes, but leave
the ears unblocked. let her listen to the rattle of rose-colored seeds.
shells split open. seeds let loose a chorus of tiny screams.
helen—shaking a jar of worms. the glass blurs pink with skin. an-
toinette holds the spoon that does the digging. antoinette with dirt
on her tongue. dirty sister. wash her down with the hose. then tack
her to the clothesline. hung by her dirty hair. dirty sister points to
edda. edda rushing down the road. to see the jar of worms. is that
opal? she asks the children. antoinette shakes her head no. edda looks
at the sisters. exactly the same. except one holds a jar of skin to her
chest and the other holds fistfuls of dirt to hers. helen leads, and an-opa l one, opa l t wo
327
toinette follows. they walk and edda goes too. quick little heel-to-toe
steps. a parade marching. cobbled road to cobbled church.
father babcock—such a day. a moth lost in the rafters. edda’s opal
lost in the clouds. terrible trouble. what to be done. first, the ab-
ducted girl. ripped through a tear in the sky. send sister maurice to
staple it shut. then rip a hymn from the hymnal. the one illogically
transposed. too many sharps to be sung. scribble message to minor
angel. send second daughter. send soon. fold into a bird. set out on the
wind. such work, clerical robe splits up the back. never mind. the
sewing’s halted. light a candle instead. now bless the fretful mother.
bless the jar of worms. and also this: the dirt on dirty sister’s tongue.
edda—home again, but no opal. rose-colored seeds sprout rose-
colored fruit on the floor. velvet rots to moss on the table. moss spills
from metal mouth of broken machine. moss covered needle. moss
covered thread. everything tangled. gather it up in a bundle. stow
it away in the cedar chest at the foot of ruby’s old bed. chest filled
with lace. dowry for damaged daughters. one with muddy eyes. the
other with glass in her lungs. lace knit with delicate fingers. fanati-
cal mother. who knit with the bones of birds. her thread the silk of
spiders. so many harvested webs.
opal one—dark in the thick of the moss. cedar smell feeds belly
noises. hushes hiccups. cedar seeps into her tongue. ruby’s room with
ruby’s ghost. mother’s voice through the wall. singing the hymn sent
away with the bird. opal wriggles around in the moss. moss holds
tight to her leg. flexes her toes. reaches her hands through the lichen.
gathers fistfuls of lace buried below. pattern of knots in her fingers.
grandmother’s worries like braille on her skin. worried the birds will
forget the maps inked on their cerebellums. the clouds slip from their
perches. moths knock their spines apart butting against the moon. so
many worries wear opal out. smell of cedar swaddles. dear opal. sleep
long, sleep well.
helen—stars recite insomniac sermons. treetops moan from hold-
ing so many leaves. owls cooing to ivy. ivy tapping morse code mes-
sages into the brick. helen tiptoes through yards, avoiding pockets
of space where language passes through darkness. looking for opals.
white rocks with rainbows glittering under their skin. granite pebbles328
Tessa Mellas
sprinkled in gardens. almost opal. the best she can get. pick prettiest
pebbles. put in pockets. bring to edda’s stoop. leave them with other
gifts: mulberry pie. basket of fruit. gold leaf bible. and something left
by dirty sister. her arm unstitched, fist full of dirt.
edda—wakes with ache in her organs. crawls out of bed. feeds ache
with rose-colored fruit from the floor. thinks of ruby. glass lungs and
glass intestines. vessels of blood a lattice of crystal, brittle between
her bones. icicle hair breaking off behind her. feet crumbling on cob-
bles. glass teeth raining out of her mouth. coffin a pile of shimmering
shards. for days, edda watched over the corpse. stroking the shards
of shiny sister. finger pricked, sliver of sister entered her blood. grew
into a daughter. now the daughter lost. edda goes to the door. but no
opal. just offerings. who else but the clouds? hurl pie and fruit and
bible back. the sky gives guilty gifts. gather the pebbles. gather the
arm with a fistful of dirt. good gifts, come inside and sit on opal’s bed.
father babcock—heavy bellied clouds graze shadowed steeple. stones
in churchyard shiver. buried bodies call father babcock out. buried
bodies wearing church clothes. can’t get church clothes wet. father bab-
cock with wheelbarrow full of umbrellas. pinwheel colors. sister maurice
helps wedge them into the ground. look, the graves wear little fedoras.
little yarmulke caps.
watch out, sister maurice. that cloud’s dripping soupspoons. a fork
hits father babcock’s head. it’s edda on the steeple. fist full of kitchen
utensils. hurling cutlery at the clouds. a war on the thief that stole
her daughter. a daughter made from velvet and glass and guilt. sister
maurice, huddle under the yellow umbrella. keep close. we’ll wait
it out. a butter knife reels through the air, pierces the sky. gold leaf
pages leak out of the clouds. catch one on your tongue. the gospel
according to mark.
antoinette—gold leaf pages raining. raincloud raining fruit. dig
faster clumsy elbow. scoop harder wrong-handed hand. the one-
armed girl is saving the world. dirty girl, you better hurry. or the
worms will drown in psalms. have to shovel them out. helen, hold the
jar a little closer. helen, help dirty sister dig, soupspoon for a spade.
two hands only holding. hardly helping. lazy girl. now too many
psalms in the soil. pink worms bloat under the weight of the word.opa l one, opa l t wo
329
knock Helen over the head. lazy sister, you let them drown. swollen
worms split out of their skin. tackle selfish sister. scoop out her ear
with the silver spoon. selfish sister lies in the grass and yelps. tell her,
still those pulsing lips. blessed be dirty sister. so says the word of the
worms. go forth dirty sister. with helen’s hearing hidden. in a jar of
muddled skin.
opal one—slumber slipping away. roused by a hum in her ear.
grandmother’s voice soft like steam. grandmother’s voice thick like
milk. opal’s tongue so dry. she suckles the moss, pulls water from its
plumes. there there, sweet girl. ruby’s fingers in her hair. stroke her
head. opal feels the glass. little pointed stars. quills that prick the
scalp. shush, ruby says to the stars. allay that burning glow.
father babcock—travels cobbled street. umbrella for a head. um-
brella knocks away shiny missiles. protects the tattered robe. and sac-
erdotal crown. sabbatical leave from cobbled parish. to halt crusade of
mournful mother. launched on odious clouds. father babcock stands
on stoop, hand lifted to the door. paper bird falls through fingers.
lands on jar at father’s feet. jar with an ear cupped in a cradle of
worms. look, it’s solomon’s bird with wisdom at his beak. father bab-
cock reads the bit on its wing. bird advises break the girls. and share
their holy skin. father babcock runs. back to cobbled church. sounds
the message from the bells. hailing christian mothers. with fleshly
daughters in their homes. split the bread of your wombs.
antoinette—waterlogged worms. entrails spilled through a rift in
their seams. to mend: roll garbled flesh against softest stone. roll
with the palm of the hand. roll until flesh is smooth. then drop
them back in the dirt. you’ll have to mend them alone. selfish sister
sleeping. missing absent ear. no girls to help dirty sister repair the
damage. all girls tucked in bed. nursing open wounds. mothers
line the sidewalk. baskets on their arms. bringing gifts for griev-
ing mother. unstitched from goodly daughters. stalwart soldiers, get
used to phantom limbs.
edda—second daughter. laid out on opal’s bed. pieces puzzled into
a body. parts of goodly daughters. head of little lamb. stitch the parts
together. fill gaps with rose-colored fruit. fill hollow space with peb-
bles and worms. stitch on eyebrows. stitch on dimples. drip honey in330
Tessa Mellas
her mouth. kiss her downy forehead. hold her trembling hand. she is
opal too.
opal one—sweetness seeps into ruby’s room. crawls through key-
hole. into cedar chest. smell of fruit clambers into nostrils, rouses
opal. stirs the sap in her stomach. pricks the freckles on her tongue.
so hungry she nibbles the robe. so hungry she bites the lace. she eats
and she listens. quiet in the chest. the ghosts are sleeping. but there
are nighttime sounds in the house. a clatter in the hallway. slanted
rhythm of hobbled feet. the clunk of mistuned bones. not at all the
delicate patter of opal’s delicate feet.
opal two—seeds rattle in her belly. pebbles clink against her ribs.
percussive girl on mismatched legs. she shambles over cobbles. limbs
aligned at awkward angles. matted tufts of woolly hair. all the girls
throw pebbles, chase her into the mulberry tree. perched aloft, watch-
ing the clouds. remembers dirt trickling down her chest. remembers
granite marbles in her fists. and also the heat of a mouth. grains of
a tongue pressing the body round, and bleeding roseate swirls into
the skin.
edda—opal in a tree. rose-colored fruit swelling through the
house. clouds ogle second daughter. mother shoos away the clouds.
ushers daughter down. come, help mother harvest fruit. pluck bulg-
ing berries from the stems. squeeze fruit in iron pot. feed fire. add
honey. stir until juice leaks from your thumbs. ladle into teacups.
serve to girls with missing parts. watch them gulp. juice dribbles
down their chins. stack teacups into tower. carry tower into house. so
much work, mending malcontented neighbors. wears on mishmash
body. stresses newly anchored limbs. rose-colored sap seeps from
stitching, sweetens seams, scents the house. rose-colored worry seeps
into the pillows. drips down the eaves. stains the walls.
opal one—crowded in a box with grandmother’s worries, ruby’s
ghost, mountain of moss. stiffness in the limbs. heaviness in the
throat. moss for breakfast. lace for lunch. sounds of mother and
daughter for dinner. indigestible bits: harden to glass in the lungs.
father babcock—sunday sermon. parish full. mothers and damaged
daughters, goodly glow around their heads. bonnets and capes to
hide the missing pieces. munificent daughters, who give of them-opa l one, opa l t wo
331
selves. tiny sips of wine. melt the bread on their tongues. father bab-
cock presses prayers into their foreheads. closes his eyes and feels
their breath on his nose. his robe, a gauze of tears and tatters. a moth
weaves in and out of the holes.
antoinette—paper bird lands on finger. chirps. where are the
worms? how to explain. the worms couldn’t be mended. all that roll-
ing. squashed their little heads. chirps. where is sister? sister making
bonnet to cover empty ear. sister doesn’t speak to antoinette. chirps.
do i look like a bird? antoinette shakes her head no. unfolds it wing by
wing. a message. rose-colored house. tea at noon. antoinette shakes off
the dirt. puts on pretty dress. sews spoons to the hem. metal clinks
against her knees. now she sounds like opal two. opal two can be her
sister. they can clink and clack together. every day. through cobbled
streets. go on, and clatter to her house. underfoot: the smoothness of
stones. overhead: a paper flock of folded birds.
opal two—damaged girls, it’s time for tea. edda’s gone for honey.
opal two passes the cups. the girls sit in a circle, skirts whispering at
their knees. a one-legged girl pours tea into her hollow stub. the one
beside her (noseless) blows steam away from her cup. antoinette goes
tinkle tinkle. her spoons clink as she sips. earless sister scowls. swats
at dirty sister. topples rose-colored platter from opal’s hands. the cake
goes splat. the platter splinters. rose-colored seeds disperse, fall at
their feet, grow into fruit. earless sister hurls cake and fruit at opal.
the others follow and opal flees the room. pebbles knock in her belly.
seeds rattle in her chest. antoinette chases opal, juice dripping from
her lips. she rounds the corner. but opal’s gone. which door hides the
second sister? the right or the left?
edda—jar of honey in her hands. just in time for tea. but all the
little girls gone. except the one wearing spoons. rose-colored fruit
drips from the ceiling. pink frosting splatters the walls. teacups top-
pled. earl grey rivers run around archipelagos of crumbs. where’s
opal? edda asks. opal one or opal two? either, edda says. antoinette
shrugs, and the spoons hit together like bells.
opal one—ruckus in the house. smashing plates. thumping feet.
the door of ruby’s room screeches and slams. now the rattle of mis-
matched limbs. a sliver of light at the top of the chest. the lid bangs332
Tessa Mellas
shut, and a girl falls through the moss. slips through pockets of lace
and ruby’s ghost and grandmother’s leftover thoughts. comes to
rest by brown-gray sister’s head. fingers touch her scrunched little
face. knees collide with spidery legs. opal two licks her sister’s skin.
belly hungry for f lesh. just a little bite. from the gauze of brown-
gray wings.35.
A Plain Kiss (Letters to Allison, 2006)
by Jamie Quatro
1.
Tell a dream and people quit listening. Will you quit if I tell you
mine?
I’m sitting on a pew in a sanctuary full of worshippers. The min-
ister is delivering the homily, and I’m playing the violin. I intend to
create a soft background music to the text, which is from the Old Tes-
tament—desert wanderings, tabernacle. I play in a minor key. From
his elevated dais the minister looks down at me.
Thank you, he says. You play very well. But your gift is drowning
out the gospel.
I place the violin in my lap.
When the boys have nightmares—Parker about dead parents, Win-
ston about robbers—I tell them: we dream about what we fear will
happen, not what will happen. I want to turn them away from the
notion of the prophetic dream. But can I be honest? Sometimes I
just repeat the things Mom told us and hope they’re true. Those pro-
phetic dreams are all over the Bible. Nebuchadnezzar. Peter’s sheet
of animals. Or Joseph’s dreams: Give him the name Jesus. Hie thee to
Egypt. “Drowning out the gospel?” That sounds prophetic. But what
gospel? It was the Old Testament. Drowning it out for others, or for
myself? And what gift?334
Jamie Quatro
I heard from Dad last week—he sold two of the paintings you left
in the Dumpster to a gallery in Santa Monica. And one in La Jolla,
on Prospect!
Everyone wants your work now. You need to know this, Ali: you
were the one with a gift.
2.
Did I ever tell you about Parker’s violin lessons? Eight free sessions
from a college student who needed a child for her pedagogy class.
In eight lessons, Parker never bowed the violin. Instead, the teacher
showed him how to lift tissues from the ground by curling his thumb
and middle finger into an o to get the feel of the bow hold. After
mastering tissue, Parker graduated to crumpling newspaper to build
strength in his hand. The final lesson, I held an empty paper towel
tube while Parker bowed through it to practice the proper angulation
of the wrist.
Parker also had to learn the note names of the open strings: G, D, A,
E. I made up an acronym to help him remember: Good Dogs All Eat.
Like the treble clef—Every Good Boy Does Fine—although, accord-
ing to the violin teacher, today’s kids are demanding edgier acronyms:
Empty Garbage Before Dad Flips, Even George Bush Drives Fast.
Before sending the violin back to the music store, I handed it to
Parker.
Bow away, I said. Scrape up a ruckus.
But neither of us knew to tighten the knob that pulls the horsehair
taut, nor did we find the round chunk of rosin, hidden in a plush red
compartment inside the case. Parker bowed and bowed and never
struck a note.
3.
I’m thinking about joining this program. It’s for people who aren’t
recovering anything, and want to talk about the things they’re not
recovering from.
For example: I am considering having an affair. In this program, I
could talk about what it would be like to recover from it.
Does it shock you, that I would consider such a thing? It shocksA Pla i n K i s s (L et ter s to A l l i son, 20 0 6)
335
me. The older I get, the more I shock myself. Sometimes I make a
mess in our bathroom—powdered makeup on the floor, soap left in
a puddle in the sink—just to see if Daniel will clean it up. So far, he
always does. He says it gives him joy to serve me this way.
The program encourages people who worry about the fact that
they have nothing from which to recover to look back and see what
they can dig up. Think of things you’d be embarrassed for anyone
else to know. Write them down. Here’s what I’ve come up with so far:
1) I tried bulimia for a month in high school. I used
those long Benders padded hair rollers instead of my fin-
gers, because they were soft, and because I didn’t want
to get vomit on my hand.
2) I mark up library books in blue ink. I believe that I’m
helping the next person see what’s essential in the text. I
don’t return the books until the notice comes from the
collection agency. Then I buy the books, because I feel
guilty about returning them all marked up.
3) When I practice the piano, I imagine someone’s
breath is taken away.
4) My last semester at UCLA, Dr. Muller gave me an A
for four independent study units in eighteenth-century
poetry, a course for which I never read a page or wrote
a word. She gave me the A, she said, because she’d seen
enough of my work to know that, had I written the
papers, they would have been As. I promised I’d do the
assignments over the summer. She lent me her books
and, as I turned to leave her office, she pulled me back
and kissed me on the mouth. I returned the books along
with a letter apologizing for never having finished, and
thanking her for the grade, ten years later.
If I had told you these things, would you have written She is the
good sister, I am the bad on the mirror? In the bathroom, where your
roommate found you, pills scattered on the tile around your head—
would you have called me?336
Jamie Quatro
I want to keep telling you. I want to tell you about this affair I’m
thinking about having.
I have considered it twice, adultery. (Let’s use the weighty word;
“affair” just trips off the tongue, doesn’t it?) Both times I confessed
the temptation to Daniel. The first time it was in grad school. Jeremy,
one of Daniel’s MBA buddies, said he’d go pick up the pizza for their
study group, which was meeting at our apartment. I said I’d go along
to get drinks. When he parked we didn’t get out of the car. Jeremy
pointed to the moonlight on the hood of the truck. Bright, he said.
I leaned over and put my head in his lap so I could look up through
the windshield. He stroked my bangs. Daniel’s a good man, he said.
That ended things.
The second time, I was thirty-three and the man was twenty-eight.
Latino. His son and Winston were on the same mini-mites hockey
team. At one of the games in Conejo, he told me, in my ear, that he’d
dreamed about making love to me. I’d imagined the same thing—
was imagining it even then.
I said, Daniel’s a good man.
When I told Daniel about Jeremy, he punched the closet in our
apartment and left a hole. When I told him about the Latino, he put
Parker and Winston in the car and drove all the way up to Ventura.
Later, in bed, this is what Daniel said. Both times, this is what he
said: Show me what you would have done with him, if you had.
I showed him. And I thought, How could I cheat on a man like
this?
4.
I know what I look like on the outside. A perfect marriage, unstained
faith. But I want to tell you something I can’t tell people here (we left
San Marino; Daniel took a transfer to Chattanooga, buckle on the
Bible belt): I am a double-minded woman, unstable in all I do.
I joined that program, by the way. We’re supposed to read books
about people doing shocking things so that we experience them vi-
cariously and, as a result, feel less like we ourselves are boring. It’s
cheap therapy.
Remember the matching Bibles Mom gave us? What happenedA Pla i n K i s s (L et ter s to A l l i son, 20 0 6)
337
to yours? I looked everywhere in your apartment, after. I still have
mine, binding has split, but I hold the two halves together when I
read. That double-minded thing is James on prayer.
In my case, the older I get, the further away from double-minded I
become. I worry that, without any help, I’ll be entirely single-minded.
On the wrong side. Purity of heart is not to will one thing. Kierke
gaard was wrong. Purity of heart is a lost cause: we will and will and
will things, some of which align with God and some of which fly in
his holy face, but worrying about this is also a sin. Otherwise, why
did his son die? Wasn’t it exactly so that I could rest easy about my
lapsarian will?
Lapsarian. Now I’ll show you how it is with me. I look up the
word. It’s not in my dictionary, so I look up lap. It has either to
do with a large genus of rough-pubescent herbs (lappula), or, more
likely, it derives from the Latin lapsus—fault, error, fall, slide. Back-
sliding. Or the Greek laparos—slack, loose. Unstable in all we do.
“Lap dancing” is the next entry: “seminude performer gyrates on
lap of customer.” I look up gyrate, from the Greek gyros, rounded.
Rounding my lapsarian hips. It is one of the shocking things I’ve
never tried, and therefore desire to try, against the will of God if it is
not done overtop of Daniel.
But I want to lap dance on this man I’ve met.
After you’d left Bryan and were living back at Malibu Horizon
(you were painting those giant butterflies on panels, which I found
under your bed—I’ve kept them all), you said during a family session
that I was a Pharisee. Hanging on to the exterior trappings of religion
out of fear. You were right. Even I’m impressed with my exterior.
But it’s the old whitewashed tomb. When I was twenty I thought my
mind was a walled city. Now I know it’s a dark highway to which any-
thing can obtain access. The only thing I’m learning is not to trust it.
Do you want to hear more? I want to tell you more.
1) Email from this man excites me. That bolded subject
line. Sometimes I ask Daniel to hide my computer. He
always puts it in the cupboard with the leftover buckets
of paint.338
Jamie Quatro
2) Remember that bikini I bought on our Young-
life trip to Newport? I shoplifted it in a boutique on
Balboa—with $200 cash and Dad’s American Express in
my purse. The owner caught me. She called the police,
but decided not to press charges when our team leader
told her I was a doctor’s daughter, from an upstanding
family. When I paid for the suit, the owner wrapped it in
pink tissue and tied it with raffia.
5.
Yesterday I dialed your apartment in the Palisades. I imagined, had
you been there to answer, you would have left paint smudges on the
receiver.
The man’s name is Kurt. I met him at the Chickamauga Battle-
field ten-miler in October, right after we moved; we finished the race
together, a personal record for both of us. He’s got dark hair, like
Daniel’s, but curly. He lives in Nashville—ABD in theological stud-
ies at Vanderbilt. He’s married, no kids. Neither of us is looking for
anything. We’re both in love with our spouses.
A group of us from the track club is training for the Country Music
Marathon, and Kurt drives down every other weekend to run the river
front with us. We distance ourselves from the rest of the group. We
discuss sullied words like “perfection,” how it has retained its origi-
nal sense—a property of something that has been completed—only in
music (a perfect cadence) and grammar (the perfect tense). We dis-
cuss the ontological versus cosmological arguments for the existence
of God; we discuss causation, whether the universe exists in esse like a
house (deism, Aristotle) or in fieri, liquid in a vessel (theism, Aquinas).
And then he says things that choke me up so that I have to stop
and pretend to tie my shoe. How his grandmother died with her
arms up, gasping “Jesus, Jesus, my sweet Jesus.” How waiting for
God to answer prayer is like standing in line at the farmer’s market.
The farmer is your best friend, but he’s helping other people and
seems not to notice you standing there, waiting. He’s handing out
sunflowers and honey and fat eggplants and zucchini, and here youA Pla i n K i s s (L et ter s to A l l i son, 20 0 6)
339
are, his best friend, and he’s ignoring you. You turn to leave and fi-
nally, finally you hear your name. Wait, he says, and pulls out a basket
of perfect grapes: the very thing you were there for. He says, I was
saving these for you.
One evening around the holidays, we stopped to stretch in front
of a shop window that had a Christmas tree decorated with beaded
oranges and lemons. The ornaments sparkled, and I said the tree
looked beautiful, that the fruit was a noble attempt to mimic nature.
He said that decorating a dying tree as if it were alive was an appro-
priate emblem for today’s church.
Our collective moral collapse goes way beyond personal ethics, he
said. He was stretching his quads. He said: People say Christianity’s
just about a personal relationship with Jesus, but no one talks about
rebuilding the ruins of God’s world, about getting politically active—
an entire continent dying of AIDS while American evangelicals are
hunkered down trying not to commit any gross moral failings.
I don’t know. I think I want to have an affair with him because I’m
in love with God. My body is so mixed up with my soul I’m not sure
there’s a difference anymore.
6.
What was it like, to wash your hands of religion? I think I know
what it would be like for me. I’m running, it’s hot out, I move to the
shaded side of the road. The run gets easier.
I had a dream about one of your paintings. The colors had col-
lapsed into the bottom of the canvas, all mixed up in swirls. But the
suggestion of the form was still there; if I squinted my eyes, I could
make out what the painting used to be. There was this tiny thread
running through the canvas and hanging off the bottom like the
string on a slack puppet. If someone pulled the string, the image
would right itself, the collapsed colors would disentangle and lock
back into their proper places like stained glass. (That night I had read
The Human Body to Winston; when he pulled the tabs, the bones,
organs, and muscles slid into place.) The solution was already part of
the painting. Someone just needed to pull the string.
That day on Westward Beach, the year Mom died. I was twelve,340
Jamie Quatro
you were ten. Dad was throwing ice cubes at me, a plastic tumbler
full. He was really pelting them, sitting low in his chair, wearing
headphones. I took it. When one hit me in the head you knocked the
glass onto the sand and ran, swimming out past the breakers. I sat
up—I could see you out there, treading water, sunlight on your wet
hair, yellow tie around your neck. You were giving me the thumbs-
up. Did you wonder, then, why I didn’t follow you? Why I lay back
on my towel?
I needed his love more than yours.
7.
Today Kurt and I are supposed to meet for a run, lunch afterward.
It’s not a regular track club day. It’s Tuesday. Daniel’s in Orlando on
a consulting engagement. The boys will be in school.
How do I know he wants to commit adultery? When we bump
elbows, I say I have a cramp just so I can stop to catch my breath
after the surge. When we’re stretching on the pedestrian bridge over
the river, I hold on to the rail with both hands to keep myself from
leaning against him, slipping my hands into his and asking him to
pray for my purity of mind. Maybe I’m the only one thinking these
things, but his coming today makes me doubt it.
I wish I could say that all I want to do with him is have sex. That
would be the shocking thing to say. But from where I am, I don’t
think it’s possible to go directly there. Adultery happens by degrees.
I lean against his chest. Maybe try a kiss. A plain kiss would be
enough—I think it would startle me back into faithfulness, the feel
of someone else’s lips after fifteen years. Wouldn’t Daniel forgive me,
for just a plain kiss?
The truth is, I’m not sure I’m even capable of such a gross moral
failing as adultery. I think Daniel sees my body in palimpsest, current
breasts superimposed over the breasts I had at nineteen. What would
my breasts look like to someone seeing them for the first time, now,
after two children? Could I let Kurt touch my C-section scar, when
Daniel was the one who saw the incision open to reveal a still breath-
less newborn? When he was there to squeeze my hand while the nurse
pinched out the staples?
Daniel takes the boys fishing at the pond next to their school; heA Pla i n K i s s (L et ter s to A l l i son, 20 0 6)
341
shows them how to release the fish, first moving them back and forth
underwater a few times to circulate the water through the gills. He
tells them never to throw the fish back into the water: “Reentry can
be disorienting.” After a fight, he sends me emails from work that say
things like Sometimes it’s bliss, sometimes it’s blah. Always it’s you. We
fight about sex now, because he wants to more than I do. I say it’s be-
cause I’m so satisfied, but it’s because, when we make love, it’s Kurt’s
hands I feel, his voice I hear in my ear, and I feel so guilty about this
I’d rather not have sex. But Daniel feels better about himself, and
about us, when we do. So I end up telling myself that the sin of the
fantasy is less destructive than the sin of depriving him.
It’s adorable, how Daniel worships you, my friend Eileen says.
But I want to be the worshipper. The one whose breath is taken away.
8.
Do you remember what a burden it was, to see your own sinfulness
all the time in front of you? The remedy, they told us, was this: for
every glance at your own sin, glance twenty times at the cross. Every
sin you commit will make the cross appear bigger. The more sin you
see in yourself, the more thankful for Christ you become.
This is what is supposed to happen in the life of a true believer.
Dad coming into our room to say good night. The hard, wet kisses
all over our faces and necks; the way he cried and said mom’s name. I
would sing This Old Man in my head to see how many verses I could
get through. When it was your turn—those times you spit in his face
and he pulled you up by the hair and said ungrateful—do you know
what I was thinking? This old man, he played eleven, he played knick-
knack up to heaven.
9.
I know you thought I’d never have a dog, with three cats in the
house. But we got a yellow Lab puppy when we moved. (We actually
have land now.) Here’s what I’ve learned since we got Hank: raise a
cat, you learn about cats; raise a dog, you learn about yourself. Yes-
terday, from the kitchen, I watched Hank dragging this giant branch
across the yard toward Daniel. It was so undignified, the joy of a re-
triever, retrieving. He ran to Daniel in a crooked lope, head angled,342
Jamie Quatro
intent on proving that he was worthy of the call. And then the eager
bounce away and turn back, driven by delight to do again and again
what he was bred to do. He was dog fully dog, too absorbed in the
joy of his task to think about dignity, or love—he attained them for
lack of trying.
Augustine says worship of God is the thing for which we were cre-
ated, the only thing that will bring joy. And C. S. Lewis says (you
won’t mind if I quote him, will you?) our desire for heaven is “the
secret signature of each soul, the incommunicable and unappeasable
want, the thing we desired before we met our wives or made our
friends or chose our work, and which we shall still desire on our
deathbeds—when the mind no longer knows wife or friend or work.”
Every now and then, I feel this longing.
More often, I long to feel Kurt’s whiskers on my inner thighs.
10.
I remembered something else. Your rehearsal dinner at Geoffrey’s.
Dad never even looked at Bryan—who I know, now, was stoned, his
shock of long unwashed hair pulled into a low ponytail—and that
night when you said Dad hates him, sitting on the edge of your mat-
tress, a joint quivering between the tips of your fingers, I saw the
reason you were getting married. I should have said something. In-
stead I flushed your bag of weed down the toilet—because I thought
that’s what a good sister would do.
11.
We’ve done it, Kurt and I. This is how it happened.
We met at the bridge, ran a couple of slow miles. Very little talk-
ing. I said, You up for this today? And he said, Let’s go back and have
that lunch. We walked back to the bridge and I realized we’d never
walked before and it was incredibly sensual, the walking, it gave me
time to experience our accustomed route in slow motion, to see and
smell and hear things that, running, we’d never seen or heard or
smelled, and then we came to the tunnel at Ross’s Landing.
There wasn’t even a plain kiss.
But when you thought I’d done it, was there a moment where your
heart released me?A Pla i n K i s s (L et ter s to A l l i son, 20 0 6)
343
Reality is, I made a fool of myself. I leaned into him. He took me
by the shoulders and pushed me away.
People need to see your faithfulness to God, he said, more than
you need to see if God will remain faithful to you.
He spoke of Daniel, Parker, Winston, my parents, Daniel’s parents,
all the people who know us, who receive our Christmas cards.
And he said, I’m sorry if I’ve misled you.
12.
Listen to me, all these letters. I think I’ve made such progress, when
I don’t even know if I’m capable of loving my own family. The read-
ing to them, the snuggling, the driving to and from this practice and
that music lesson; my delight in their achievements and their smiles;
the clean, decorated home, the sexual fidelity—I don’t think any of
it is for them.
I never went to meet Kurt for that Tuesday run and lunch. (You
might have known from that speech I wrote for him.) I stayed home
and uprooted every invasive plant I could find around the border of
our property. How’s that for cliché? For trite symbolism?
Please don’t stop listening to me.
I’ve decided not to run with the track club anymore. I told Daniel
about Kurt and asked him to forgive me.
For what? he said. You didn’t do anything.
For thoughts, I said. For considering.
For being human, he said.
And when we made love, it was comfortable. Predictable. Safe.
I’ll never be shocking, Ali. Nothing beyond the ordinary temp-
tations. My attempt to prove anything to you only shows I’m too
invested in God to disengage. How could I leave him, when he saw
every mistake I’d ever make before I made them and said, It’s okay,
I’ve got your back? An incomparable burden, an incomparable relief.
Maybe this is a temporary thing. A postponement. But until the
singing sun stops turning me loose—until I stop noticing the sub-
lime—I belong to him. And to Daniel. And (I swear) to you.
Would you still be here if I had told you these things?
Love me again, please, won’t you?36.
Plank
by Kayden Kross
The sleep would spit you out into mornings that were so harsh you
would stay behind with the rustle of the tent, all of the canvas and the
weatherproofing, still slick with dream and the sound of the sleeping
bag rubbing on itself. Then you would know where you were and
slowly come back into the world. You’d feel the rocks beneath you
through your spine, feel like a princess high on a stack of mattresses,
discerning, feel like a cowboy in the muscle, like a pauper and a king
and every necessary piece of a conflicting whole. You feel your part in
it. You feel like your roots might go straight back through the fabric
and to the ground.
You feel the heat and where it ends, right at the line of your body,
hard where it stayed on the surface and blurred where your energy
absorbed into the dirt. You feel constant. You note the outline as
proof of yourself when you shift your shoulders to the side and listen
to the voices through the tent, close, close enough to bind together
and bring themselves back to the source, to drop their guards and
tell their stories, mix their children, lay the world out to dry by the
fire and stare openly over the flame. You hear them with their pots
and their pans banging together, mixed and matched, their coffee
that you’re too young to need. You hear the water being poured from
one thing to the next and you know it’s freezing or it’s boiling and it
came straight up out of the land. You know that it matters. You hearPla n k
345
the dogs barking, one, two, three, four, one for every family, dog-
sized dogs, the hardware on their collars hitting a high note where
they spin and carrying for miles on the clean lines of clean air. You
can name each person by the footstep, by the motions muffled in
their shirtsleeves and the layers underneath. You can hear their but-
tons done up to the neck.
You turn over and you listen again. Now it is to the breathing of
your brother, your sister, shallow and untroubled, sweet the way the
mouth falls open and stays wet. You hear the teeth coming through
the gums and you remember how you were there for the birth, the
screaming and the wet, the first broken bone, screaming and wet,
twisted ankles, your kisses on the stitches and scraped skin, scream-
ing and wet, perfect life trying to stay in place with heels dug into the
dirt as it’s pulled along, screaming and wet, screaming and wet. You
want to reach down and wrap the wounds with yourself and the way a
child breathes with your same blood rushing over his lungs you know
you would. You would and you would never look back.
You hear the murmur of the voices again over the pans and flannel
shirts, quieted for you and the children and other children in other
tents with their own sweetness and their sleep. They quiet the dogs
too and move the kettle just before it squeals, they heat the gristle of
the meat and hot slick balls slide and pop from the pan. They think
of you when they unpack small plastic plates, the odd ends of old
cutlery, heat chocolate over a gas flame with their foreheads tilted
into each other when they speak, their voices passed on the same
breath, eye contact dropped while they watch the camp and breast-
bones turned to the world because they would fight it for you. They
would fight it and they would never look back.
You shock yourself now with the way that you are. You’ve watched
clothes float above the ankle in a season and you’ve watched boxes
overflow with the things that you used to be, sloughed off, hauled
away with thick-tipped markers taken to the flaps and sealed shut with
tape in the garage. You didn’t eat green this time last year and now
you take your sugar a little less sweet. You sweat. You made a true
friend and it took time. You’ve grappled with honor and fell short and
you’re aware now that you can do wrong, real wrong, things beyond346
Kayden Kross
a child’s wrong and things you can’t change. Some days you feel like
every next step forces you to cause pain or ease it and the best you
can throw at it is a blind guess. You miss. You’ve killed things because
you thought it would help and others for sport. You’ve been drug in
yourself, screaming and wet, thrown down in the dirt with the words
that you couldn’t keep. You grow. Then some days you know what’s
right on your own and you wonder how.
Yesterday you made a marker in your memory when you thought
you’d be safe if you stopped at the shore. You stood with your toes to
the water and watched it lap and pool where they spread and watched
the sand inch up and back again, never making progress but some-
how already closer to landing somewhere else, becoming bone dry
but never settled. You lurched. You watched a stick float in the dis-
tance and needed an anchor, something to stay in place to show you
that it could. For one long low breath you were able to hold on but
then when you blinked it was somewhere else too. You exhaled. The
wind moved and the water washed over you again and already the
trees were a little higher. You threw your head back and faced the sky
and watched the way the green never caught up to the blue, watched
the way they spun when you tried to stay too still. You realized that
it would all be gone in a moment and you pressed your lids hard over
your eyes and flattened it down and made it clear. You knew it was
worth holding on to because something new was happening and this
was the last of another thing but you didn’t know what. It was new
like the first time you noticed, really noticed, the things that were
hung on the walls of your home. The first time you saw that other
people had lives outside of yours, everyone had a man named father
and every mother was a daughter too.
You suck in your air suddenly, drowning, bobbing your head be-
tween the lake and tent. Then you are present. You count the hours
backward to the stick moving away from you, impossible to pin down,
cold washing over again. You face the way you can’t look head-on at
the sky for too long, the way each time you examine it there is a larger
gap. You count how much closer you have come to the next ten years
in the span of a breath. To twenty years. To thirty and thirty more
and then you see each night’s sleep as the plank that you will walkPla n k
347
into the morning’s change. You always knew but had never believed
that you will grow eye level to your father. The children will grow out
of themselves and more will come and then some will belong to you.
They will pour from you and you will hollow yourself out trying to
tuck them back in. You are aware, irrevocably, of things bigger than
yourself. Bigger than your parents and your summer, cold things, op-
portunistic and unjust things. Things that don’t stop at the crosswalk
on your street.
There is an impatience now with what you don’t know and what
you will learn. You fear you will learn why poor men go to the front
lines of the rich man’s war, why fur doesn’t come cheap, why strang-
ers shouldn’t need your name and skin color changes at the train
tracks. You will learn that not all dogs die quickly and that whole
countries can be drug in by the cat, left on the back porch, all of the
pieces fluttering and broke, your fault because you lived there. You
will learn that right and wrong floats like a stick in the water and the
waves you make moving toward it are the same that push it away.
When the tent wall falls down beneath the zipper and the morning
spills in with the smell of bacon and soot you turn your face to your
mother and for the first time see that she is flawed.37.
Poof
by Joseph Scapellato
My nephew said to me, “What’s your favorite thing?”
He was five or six, a crazy-haired smirker tall enough to tug my
shirt. He tugged my shirt. I scooped him up, gave a goofy look, and
waited for him to get that I’d given my answer.
“Speak up,” he said.
Speak up—exactly what his ma would say whenever she had you
where she wanted, at the wrong end of her questions. Awful ques-
tions, the kind she used to cut you open. A lousy woman, but there
she was, a piece of her in my nephew’s throat—my nephew whose fate
it was to turn eighteen, get good-looking, and talk, spilling every-
thing he thought he had, grabbing at my arm to tell me he’d been
cooked down and carbonized, was needing weight, real weight, the
kind you carried in your chest. My nephew who would borrow my
van (my suggestion), pack it with his buddies (my suggestion), and
hit the road in May, in the summer before college was supposed to
put him and us and all his friends in separate places.
His ma would slap me on the ear and scream, “You think we think
you didn’t know?”
I didn’t know how long, how heavy: he would come back that
August by himself on a bus, broke and sunburnt, a scar like a stain
on his neck.
“Speak up!” he said, and tugged with both tiny hands.Poof
349
We were at a clump of picnic tables in the woods, waiting, like
every other knucklehead, for Auntie Rossella’s mostaccioli to arrive
in pans the size of suitcases. Gnats burst up wherever you walked.
Cicadas went to town in every tree. Cousins from the South Side,
Cicero, Kenosha, Carbondale, they’d all come out to the wooded
western burbs to see our weepy Nanu turn ninety-five, wave his wrin-
kled arms, and press any nearby hand to his face. “Family,” he was
famously saying, tottering to each of us, “you, and you, and you!”
while we stood, rooted, looking like bad sketches of each other, want-
ing guiltily to go back to bocce, briscola, beers.
“Speak up speak up speak up!”
“You speak up.”
“You speak up!” he shouted, so I gasped and mimed together the
dreaded drill-fist, popping it from an imaginary case. He squealed. I
switched the drill-fist on and tickled until he fell squirming into the
grass, his armpits, his ribs, his little plank of a belly. It might have
been I was trying to dislodge his mother.
My own uncle used to say, “Some hearts, they beat in the belly.”
When I was growing up he’d sometimes spend all day laying cement
in the neighborhood and pop by for dinner, sweaty, crusted, un-
invited, always looking like he was hugging what he said. My ma,
charmed, would rip open an extra pound of pasta. It didn’t make a
difference, there’d be hardly any leftovers. That’s not to say my uncle
was too much. He just made the many messes on his plate disappear,
so gracefully, in breaks between grins. This alone astounded me. At
the time I couldn’t clean my plate, I’d push the food around and push
the food around.
He’d tell a story about his job, about almost losing it. “What can
you do?”
My ma would shake her head but be beaming. “When you gonna
get yourself together?”
“Burner’s on,” he’d say, pointing. When she turned to look he’d
switch our plates.
In this way my uncle was a magician: pasta, jobs, wives, money.
His whereabouts: poof.
He’s in me more than in my brother, whose plates he never350
Joseph Scapellato
switched. In the him in me, I hope, is a heart inside a belly. Even if
it leads to poof.
I’ll say it: I hope it’s in my nephew, too. However low this hope,
however lousy, however much my brother and his wife won’t answer
when I knock or call or write.
When the kid came back that August and was not himself, even his
ma couldn’t cut to how or why. He’d been opened up and emptied by
a sharper blade than family. He’d looked at everyone with eyes that
weren’t anybody’s.
He’d said to me and me alone, “I’ll tell you when I have it.”
Before the month was up, he left again. I think he took a bus. Not
a word from anywhere.
I let him drill me back, his knuckles lost inside my love handles.
His mother was watching from a hundred feet away, flanked by her
skinny cousins. Their faces gorgeous.
“Show him good,” said my brother, walking by, his arms crammed
with spent beers. Then gone.
The little guy leaned into my throat.
“I’ll talk,” I choked.
“Speak up!”
Instead I hooted “Gotcha!” and stood fast, snatching his ankles.
He kicked but I swung him up and off the ground, into circles,
watching the woods and my family smear along the barrel of his
body, Nanu, trees, cards, bocce. He was laughing, his eyes tearing.
“Let go,” he shrieked, “you let go!”
“You sure?”
“I’m sure!”
“I’ll do it!”
He screamed.38.
Some Kind of Rugged Genius
by Greg Bardsley
The new guy walks right through Accounting eating a rat on a stick.
Roasted rat on a stick. Kid you not.
I see him first, can’t believe my eyes. He’s content and happy,
eating that rat on a stick. Like a kid at the fair polishing off a corn
dog, humming happily as he parades past me and Danzig with this
rat on a stick, his teeth tearing away at the meat, like it was the most
natural thing in the world.
Danzig stands up, his eyes giant, his mouth open. “Hey,” he mut-
ters, and that’s all he can say.
The new guy keeps walking.
Danzig walks over, invades my space. “Who was that?”
“The new guy.”
“That thing had legs.” Danzig’s breath is atrocious. It’s like he just
opened a jar of rotting meat and sour milk. “You see that thing?”
Gently, I push him away. “That thing was a rat.”
Danzig looks at me like I’m the one with a rat on a stick. You can
nearly see his mind doing the math.
That was the new guy.
The new guy eating a rat on a stick.
We’ve all been hearing great things about the new guy.
Fitzroy can’t stop talking about the new guy.
The new guy, some kind of out-of-the-box thinker.352
Greg Bardsley
Fitzroy’s new genius.
Finally Danzig says, “You think they taste like chicken?”
The new guy doesn’t look like us. He has this whole I-don’t-give-a-shit
scene going. Long dark beard that comes to a point near his sternum.
Big head of black, wavy hair. Big, thick tribal tattoos on his long,
muscular arms. Dark sunglasses, worn indoors. Heavy, charcoal-
gray jeans, worn-in T-shirts and big black boots. Yeah, he’s a pretty
jarring sight around here.
I wish I could dress like the new guy. Then I stop and ask myself,
Well, could I? Sometimes these days, I wonder what people would
do if I came to work rebel-style—my dick and balls flapping in loose
jeans, my feet free in hemp flip-flops, my T-shirt untucked, my whis-
kers out for everyone to see.
God, that would be something.
Lately, Janice from Finance keeps bugging me for the master doc
for the Procurement PMO. She’ll come over with her face in a knot,
all worked up, snapping, “Waddlington needs the PMO master doc
for the P5s by EOB. And if you can’t get the Q1 POD results sooner,
then we’ll need to put the P6s into the FOD, and that includes the
L2s and L6s.”
Danzig will holler from across the aisle, “And don’t forget the
SWAT reports for the L10s and L16s in FOD.”
My throat is so dry, I feel like it’ll crack.
Sometimes when I’m passing Fitzroy’s office, I look in and see the
new guy at the white board, sketching something out—God knows
what—and Fitzroy is sitting there listening, completely attentive,
nearly blown away, like they’re uncovering the secrets of the universe
right then and there.
Yeah, the new guy doesn’t worry about L16s in the FOD. Or Janice
from Finance. I’m sure of it.
The new guy is sitting in the break room, wiggling his tongue through
the rat, getting at the meat. Penny from Legal walks in, gives him a
double take, drops her Swedish meatballs, and trots out of the break
room. We can hear her retching in the women’s room.S ome K i nd of R ugged G en iu s
353
We watch him from afar, through the glass.
“It’s a stunt,” Danzig says.
“Maybe,” I say, “maybe not.”
“Oh c’mon, you think he just loves rat?”
More people join us.
Gasps abound.
Several folks have to turn away.
“Well,” I say, “in Africa, a field rat is a real treat. Millions of people
eat them.”
“But this guy isn’t African.”
“So you’re saying only Africans should eat rats?”
Danzig stiffens. “I’m saying, this is America. People don’t eat rats
in America.”
Carol from the second floor says, “But Fitzroy loves him.”
“Out-of-the-box thinker,” I add. “That’s what they’re saying. ‘Out-
of-the-box thinker, out-of-the-box thinker.’ On and on and on.”
Barbara from Analytics joins us and squints into the break room.
“That’s Fitzroy’s new guy.” She watches him. “Some kind of rugged
genius.”
Danzig snaps, “Genius? Who said that?”
“Well . . . ” Barbara watches. “They say Fitzroy loves him.”
Fitzroy is the boss—the boss’s boss’s boss.
“What’s he eating?”
“Rat.”
“Rat?” Barbara straightens her blazer and clears her throat. “We’ll
see about this.”
She charges in.
We all look at each other and decide to follow.
Barbara stands over the new guy, hands on her hips.
“So you’re the new guy.”
The new guy looks up, licks his teeth. Slowly, he grins. “Yeah.”
He says it nice and slow—lazy-California-surfer style. “That’s right.”
Barbara seems unfazed by the glistening rat skeleton that’s now on
the napkin in front of them. “Where are you from?”
The new guy pulls his head back, grins. “All over.”354
Greg Bardsley
Barbara frowns. “No I mean, where were you working before this?”
The new guy grins wider. They’re nice teeth. “Long story.”
I like this guy. It’s like he’s saying, “Fuck you, lady,” smiling nice
and easy the whole way.
Danzig feels brave now. He leans in, over my shoulder. “So what’s
the deal with the rat?”
New guy turns and looks up at Danzig.
Long silence.
“Well . . .” The new guy waits extra long. “. . . what do you think?”
Danzig studies him. His voice is high from the stress. “Fitzroy
loves you.”
Those dark shades, that grin growing.
“They say you’re some out-of-the-box thinker.”
He smiles and nods, like he’s saying, Okay, man, it’s cool. I hear you.
Barbara bursts out, “What are you going to do here?”
Slowly, the new guy turns to her.
“Are you familiar with the California Stink Beetle?”
Barbara squints.
“Well, the Stink Beetle can thrive in some of the world’s harshest
environments—like a desert—even though it’s this big juicy insect.
So the question one might have is, What gives? How can this black
beetle thrive in a place like that?”
Barbara’s still squinting.
“So here’s the deal.” The new guy straightens. “The deal is, the
Stink Beetle innovates. At dawn, it ‘drinks’ from the moist air simply
by positioning its rear into the breeze and opening its anus.” His
smile is gone. The new guy is dead serious. “Now that’s innovation.”
He looks up at Barbara, an eyebrow emerging from behind the
shades. “So the thing is, maybe it’s time to open your own anus to
the moisture that breezes over you each and every day.”
Barbara loses the squint. She’s frozen, speechless.
Danzig says, “So it stinks or something?”
The new guy turns to him. “You fuck with the Stink Beetle, it’ll
stand on its head and expel some seriously nasty gas.”
Danzig mouths the words.
The new guy folds his arms. “Yeah, I dig the Stink Beetle.”S ome K i nd of R ugged G en iu s
355
* * *
We circle the wagons at Armadillo Willie’s.
Danzig is working on a chicken wing, his face shiny with grease.
“I can’t believe that guy.”
Barbara pulls the meat off a baby-back rib, slurps it in. Her cheeks
bulge as she chews. After a big swallow, she says, “Someone should
file a report with Business Conduct.” She thinks about it and squints.
“Eating a rat, saying that to me.”
I stick to listening. I mean, what good will protesting or whin-
ing do? The new guy is gold. Fitzroy loves the new guy. Nothing is
gonna happen to the new guy.
Barbara gazes into space a moment, thinking. “You think the new
guy was repeating something Fitzroy said about me?”
“What do you mean?”
“I mean, do you think Fitzroy wants me to ‘open my anus’? You
know, innovate?”
Danzig leans over the table, makes a weird smile, and I fixate on
the chicken strands wedged between his teeth. “Either way, we need
to do something out of the box.”
Barbara snaps, “But what?”
“Doesn’t matter what. Just needs to be out of the box.”
Barbara nods, her eyes almost crossing. “That’s the thing now.
Out of the box. We need to get out of the box.”
“So what do we do?”
Long silence.
Finally I say, “How about eliminating some of these reports no
one reads?”
Silence.
Barbara says, “What if we shaved our heads bald?”
Danzig frowns. “Smells like a stunt.”
“Well, let’s keep the ideas coming.”
No one says another word.
Next day, Fitzroy scares the shit out of me.
He walks right into my cube.
This is unusual. There are about four levels of management between356
Greg Bardsley
us, and I always figured he didn’t even know I existed. So now I’m
thinking, He’s gonna can me. Fitzroy does that a lot—can people, lay
them off, by the thousands. But the thing is, he always has HR do it.
He leans over me so I have no chance to stand up.
“Hey, Roger.”
It is only now, at this close range, that I see how bloodshot his eyes
are, and how deeply sunken they sit in their darkened sockets. His
skin is marked by broken capillaries, his gray hair is thinning, and
his neck is so gaunt that he reminds me of a turkey. And he’s only
forty-three.
“Morning, sir.”
He puts a cold hand my shoulder. “What are you doing today?”
I stumble. “Oh, I’m putting a few PLDs into the FOD for the
Q3—”
He blinks, cuts me off. “Don’t worry about that today, okay?”
“Okay.”
“Yeah, I want you to join us this afternoon.”
“Okay.”
Fitzroy tells me I’ll be joining him and the new guy for an after-
noon offsite. Something the new guy set up.
“It’ll be fascinating,” he says, a grin developing.
“Just us three?”
He nods. “Don’t worry about that. It’ll be fun.”
“What’s the topic?”
Fitzroy lifts an eyebrow. “Preemption.”
I want to ask, Why me? But I can tell he wants to leave already, and
I don’t want to annoy the boss’s boss’s boss.
I nod, as if to say, Cool.
A toothy smile spreads across his face. Damn, those are long teeth.
Dark, too. Probably all that coffee he drinks. Hell, his admin has a
steamer outside his office so she can make all those espresso shots he
throws back throughout the day. If I drank that much caffeine, I’d
be vibrating.
“What are you, by the way?”
“Sir?”
“What are you, six-four? Six-three?”S ome K i nd of R ugged G en iu s
357
“Oh.” I feel my brow crinkling. Weird question. “I’m around six-
three, I guess.”
Fitzroy nods, looks away like he’s embarrassed. “Yeah, I was just
figuring you must have played ball in school.” He forces a smile. “I
mean, you look like it.”
“Yeah, I played a little.”
“Tight end?”
“Linebacker.”
He brightens. “Even better.”
I look down. It’s always weird talking about my football years.
“I bet you were a bouncer on the side, eh? Easy money.”
I chuckle. “Nah.”
“Oh well, linebacker is good.” Fitzroy turns away. “Come to my
office at ten, okay?”
“You bet, sir.”
It’s easy to find the new guy’s car in the parking lot. It’s a beige,
mud-caked Oldsmobile—probably a ’72 or ’73—surrounded by a
sea of candy-colored SUVs, BMWs, and Hondas. I scribble the plate
number and call my wife’s cousin at the DMV. The name he gives
me doesn’t match. Alias—I knew it. So I call my buddy in HR, the
buddy with access to the name of every employee who’s ever worked
at this dump, even the ones who were laid off eight years ago on the
other side of the country.
We’re so deep into the Santa Cruz Mountains that if we had to yell
for help, no one would hear us.
We have fern branches tied to our backs, green grease smeared over
our arms and faces. The new guy has removed his shades; he’s got
enormous green eyes. Intelligent eyes.
“Put it that way,” he whispers, and points Fitzroy and his crossbow
away from us. “And be careful.”
This is our offsite, hiding behind a cluster of redwoods, waiting
for deer.
I ask, “So what did you do at Robards International?’
The new guy shoots me a glare, whispers, “Paradigm rationalization.”358
Greg Bardsley
What the hell kind of job is that?
Regardless, he’s a liar.
“You work with a guy named Livingston over there?”
It’s a trap, and the new guy isn’t biting. He waves the question
away, shushes me.
We sit in silence for twenty minutes. Fitzroy is still focused on
the forest before him, still gripping the crossbow, still waiting, his
upper lip curling back in some kind of demonstration of predator
lust. “Nothing,” he announces through gritted teeth, his eyebrows
arching. “I see nothing out there.”
Finally, the new guy tells me to walk up the hill, travel east a bit
and then loop back down in hopes of flushing out deer, sending them
toward Fitzroy’s position here.
“You sure?” I ask.
“Just be open to the process.”
Fitzroy is still staring into the forest, his crossbow still pointed
outward. “Stay here, Roger.”
The new guy looks flustered, throws his hands up.
Fitzroy turns toward us, the crossbow turning with him. “Because
if you—”
Thud.
“. . . Oh, shit.”
I blink twice, look at the new guy. The end of an arrow is sticking
out of his chest. His eyes widen as he sways from side to side. He tries
to spin, and I see the arrow tip sticking out of his back. Both sides of
his T-shirt are darkening, and he’s coughing up blood.
Fitzroy can’t suppress a grin. “Oh, shit.” A giggle escapes as he
peers into the new guy’s eyes, takes a step closer. “Sorry, man.”
New guy drops to his knees. Fondles the arrow with both hands,
smears the blood with his fingers.
Fitzroy drops the crossbow, turns to me, forces a serious face. It’s
so obvious he’s enjoying this. Fitzroy, the predator, preying on the
prey. “Thank God you were here to see this. No one would believe
me, otherwise.”
The new guy topples over.
“They’d think I murdered him.”S ome K i nd of R ugged G en iu s
359
I back away.
The new guy gasps for air.
“When in fact, all we have here is a very unfortunate hunting ac-
cident involving an established executive and a disgruntled, laid-off
employee posing as a change consultant.”
I nod.
“And a witness,” he says, cheerful. “A most important witness.”
I find myself saying, “It was an accident, sir. I know.”
The new guy is in spasms.
Fitzroy turns from me, walks to the new guy’s big backpack that
is propped against a redwood. “Why don’t you go find some help,
Roger? I’ll see if I can resuscitate him.”
I mumble something.
He peeks into the backpack, pulls out two pairs of handcuffs, then
a buck knife, then some rope, and then a Taser gun. “I knew it. He
was gunning for us, Roger.” He looks up to me. “Go, Roger. He
doesn’t have much time.”
I back away. “Okay.”
“And Roger?”
The new guy gurgles and chokes.
“Yes, sir.”
“Roger, my guess is you’d love to retire early, really early.” He
pauses, bites his lip. “If you had sufficient funds.”
“Oh, well . . . I just—”
He stops me. “Roger, consider it done. All this blows over, we’ll
send you on your way, set you up. Put you on retainer as a consultant,
help you create that life you always wanted.”
I don’t know what to say.
“Okay, you need to get help, Roger.”
I turn and head up the hill, toward the car, where I can flag down
a motorist. But after a hundred feet or so, I look back. Fitzroy is
kneeling beside the new guy as he smears the blood over his hands,
around his mouth. He’s not helping the new guy, but he’s saying
something to him. I can’t hear a thing, but I can imagine the words.
Something like, You think you’re smarter than Stephen Franklin Fitz-
roy? You think I wouldn’t do my own background check? You think I360
Greg Bardsley
didn’t see this coming the first week you arrived, that I wouldn’t kill you
before you could kill me? Don’t you realize I was just playing with you,
just toying with a loser?
It’s hard to imagine him saying anything else.
I continue up the hill, panting.
The new guy wanted to kill us.
I reach the top, head down the other side, and breeze through the
forest, wondering how long I’ll need to wait before I can tell Janice
from Finance that I’m finished being her bitch, that she and her FOD
reports can fuck off, that our relationship is EOL’d ASAP.
Finally, I reach the road.
Approaching Fitzroy’s black Beemer, I imagine the new guy stand-
ing there, leaning against the front fender, legs crossed at the ankles,
the shades back on. He’s saying, Hey man, you’re better than this. Way
better than this.
And I say to the moist air that’s washing over my newly opened
anus, That’s what you think, dude.39.
What Good Is an Ark to a Fish?
by Kelli Ford
I
I pad around my house in the morning, turning on faucets and lights
to assure myself that the apocalypse is still self-contained over a
thousand miles away at Mother’s doorstep. Texas border states have
already begun rationing plans. Through their television noise, scien-
tists and preachers scramble to understand such centralized tragedy,
use incantations and formulas to predict where this may go if it ever
leaves Bonita. Some claim aliens.
II
To be clear, I’m not speaking in metaphor when I tell you the end of
the world began on my wedding day. Leaves littered Mother’s lawn.
Dried bits the grasshoppers left behind turned Bonita parking lots
and roads a pale green ocean. A case of wine left too long in a truck
exploded. Trees stood naked, bare arms raised to the sky as if seeking
answers.
Mother’s temperature gauge read 112 that day more than a year
ago, but I was in love, if sweaty, in my sundress. Outside, grasshop-
pers crunched underfoot. We kept a broom handy to push them out-
side, letting three in for every one swept out. Mother, embarrassed,
ran her well dry trying to turn brown grass green, as if the weather362
Kelli Ford
and bugs were a reflection on her and her housekeeping, not a sign of
what was to come.
III
I fill the bathtub each night. When the faucet squeaks to life come
morning, I water the plants, fill the dog’s bowl, and empty the tub,
watching the clear water swirl away to nothing. Plant stalks swell
and leaves droop. I wander out to check the sky for dangerous cloud
formations, kneel and place both palms upon the ground. Neighbors
wave, keep walking. Leaves shift in the breeze, lazy and unconcerned.
My Idaho sky is blue for days. Rainbows come and go in the sprin-
kler’s twirl.
I don’t know if a thunderstorm would make me feel better or worse
at this point, so I turn on the television. Bonita’s apocalypse is grow-
ing old for the rest of the country. No news for almost a week.
IV
It’s probably true that we all have our own self-centered versions of
when this started, when we decided to believe, or stop believing in
coincidence. The tornado that ripped off a section of Mother’s roof,
causing her to box her sequined tops and fall upon her knees, was
weather and nothing more in my mind. Her fundamentalist upbring-
ing wouldn’t allow her the luxury. She heard the roar of the wind
twisting metal and dislodging bricks. The sky took her bobtailed cat
and left her half a home. She was chastened by the rain that pelted her
carpet, only to watch the clouds dry up with not a drop of relief for
months on end. She looked to God for answers. As far as I could tell,
he wasn’t speaking, so she looked behind her, made a list of trans-
gressions and underlined mother in red.
I thought I had run far enough away to be sure I saw things back in
Bonita clearly. I couldn’t have known that, in my flight, I would for-
ever keep one eye over my shoulder, and in doing so would circle back
again and again. When the second earthquake hit, shortly after the first
round of fires I’d called plain old bad luck, I knelt in my closet and tried
piecing together my own prayer, unable to remember anything beyond
“Thy kingdom come.” Disaster close to home had not given the words
new meaning, so I left supper to burn on the stove, called home.W hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
363
V
I work her every way I can from my Idaho kitchen to hers, our voices
ones and zeroes pinged through space satellites. I tell her we’ll load
the horses, haul them across the canyons and mountains, and put
them in the backyard. Bring your chickens. Just brick and wood,
I say of the three-bedroom home she’s scraped for, the patched-up
house whose mortgage will probably outlive her. I hear her switch
the phone to the other ear, bang a door shut. I brag on the depth of
our town’s reservoir and the snow at the tip of the mountains you can
see in August. A preacher buzzes radio noise in the background. I’ve
never even heard of a tornado in Idaho, I say. You can carry your gun
on your hip in the grocery store! She sits there, jaw set in silence I can
see. Then—You know the story of Job, she says. What if God picked
the wrong person for the job?
VI
NPR finally runs a story, a color piece on Bonita’s R iders for
Christ—a group that takes its message almost as seriously as its
method of delivery. Before all of this, they opened rodeos per-
forming cowgirl tricks against the backdrop of fireworks and “God
Bless the U.S.A.” Now sword-packing R iders sit sentry at each of
the cardinal directions outside of town, certain the Four Horsemen
will gallop down from the heavens any day in need of spangled
escort. Steve Inskeep says a few have liberal enough interpretations
to pack rif les, which has created something of a rift, and those
R iders man only the southern outpost, where the group’s leader-
ship think the Horsemen least likely to appear. Steve outlines sto-
ries for tomorrow’s program in the event the rapture doesn’t occur
overnight. Then he cues Blondie. I pick up the phone to make sure
Mother hasn’t found herself a sword.
VII
Every day before she died, my grandmother bowed her head and prayed
for Mother’s gambling and carousing to stop. She prayed for Mother
to humble herself before the Lord and care about what good Christian
people thought. She prayed for Mother to get out of that mess she was in,364
Kelli Ford
as she referred to Mother’s second—and then third—marriage. Both
adultery in my grandmother’s eyes, though my only memories of Moth-
er’s first (and God-recognized) husband are the blue welts he made of
her eye, the way the bruises bloomed purple, then yellow on her chest
and back, the way he swung the red suitcase as he walked down the
hallway of our apartment building, as I followed, crying for him to stay.
Grandmother prayed for God’s love to rain like fire from the heavens. I
wonder if this is what she had in mind.
VIII
There will always be those ready to don a cowboy hat and ride the
bomb down with a yippee-kye-yay, those who sell hats and work the
levers. While the Bible church holds twenty-four-hour prayer meet-
ings, sinners filter to the casino and the VFW, filling up the dark
places, no need to conserve, no need to conceal pent-up desires.
Faithful to no end the time is nigh.
Mother refuses to step into a church, but she’s taken to covering
her head, wearing long dresses. I find myself in the unexpected posi-
tion of suggesting she go to the casino to keep some semblance of
normalcy. She won’t hear of it. Mysterious are the ways.
IX
I get an all-networks-busy recording and punch end and send until I get
a crackly ring and she picks up. I don’t tell her I’m half-believer. I insist
that, while surely some kind of geo-seismic shift has occurred beneath
her very feet, this does not necessarily mean that the Christian God of
Fire and Fury has returned. I tell her it probably has to do with all the
oil Texans sucked up. Arrogant Texans messed up the tilt of the earth,
perhaps. Somehow altered weather patterns, I say. I was never good at
science, and she reminds me of this. I duck, jab. Ask if she’s taken up
embroidery or churning butter, ask if Laura Ingalls is the First Saint
of the New Apocalypse. She sets her jaw. Okay, the end of the world
maybe, I say, but show me this God.
X
What do I love the way I used to love the mystery of my mother, her
strength in suffering?W hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
365
XI
Today I ask if she wishes she’d left before it got so hard, come to live
with me and my husband in the high desert where we could listen to
the end of the world over the airwaves and cook frittatas still. This
is what we do when there is nothing new to report and the line goes
quiet. This is how we push back at the distance and the catastrophe.
Do you wish you’d stayed, she says. I am afraid she’s getting religious.
XII
CNN runs a segment on the Mayan calendar. A reporter runs around
interviewing people in front of the Mall of America, asking for views
on the Texas apocalypse and the End of Time. I wonder what the
Mayans had in mind as they toiled, fashioning stone chink by chink:
a twenty-four-hour news cycle, complete with a running Twitter
ticker of the apocalypse?
An African American woman claiming Mayan and celestial ances-
try speaks during the second half of the segment. She wears a purple
tunic with strange lettering. Says this whole Mayan hysteria is a big
misunderstanding. The Mayans didn’t create a calendar, and 2012
isn’t the end of time. They were measuring divine light, outside of
time. One the back of a Chinese take-out menu, I try to doodle light
and circles of time. In the end it all looks like lightning bolts and
cyclones.
The anchor seems relieved until the Mayan lady places a hand
upon her polyester arm and explains that just because the Ancients
weren’t concerned about our modern world, doesn’t mean the events
in North Texas aren’t indicative of what’s to come. We must prac-
tice seeing with our eye-eyes, she sighs, before we can see with our
mind-eyes. And then: North Texas is now. When she smiles into the
camera, she seems sad for us. I hear my husband’s key in the door,
home from giving a final, and I turn off the television, fold the menu
into a tiny square and cram it into my back pocket.
XIII
My husband is a skeptic. He thought the grasshoppers were a nui-
sance last August, nothing more. Of the heat, he said, it’s Texas in366
Kelli Ford
August, what did you expect. When I speak to Mother, he opens the
computer, goes quiet. As soon as I hang up, he closes the laptop,
and his sigh misplaces the rest of the air in the room. I don’t think
he does this for my benefit. I think he does not appreciate what he
cannot tie down with reason. I think this is why he loved me in the
first place: I am a good challenge.
XIV
At first nobody danced at the wedding, or Mother’s Event, as I
began calling the night. The Legion Hall filled with Bonitans and
relatives of Mother’s third husband, the one who died in a freak
accident when his pony horse spooked into the crowd at the track,
crashing into the pane glass window of the V.I.P. suite, crushing
fancy hats and knocking my stepfather stone cold dead. Few friends
made the trip to Texas, and when I bemoaned the fact, Mother
knocked back her white zin and said, Yes, it’s too bad you have a
family that loves you.
As ladies in tight jeans and men in broad-brimmed straw hats
streamed in, they brushed one another’s backs, checking for grass-
hoppers, made quick for cold Dos Equis and napkins to dob sweat.
The swan-carved melon soon sat empty, save the black seeds. People
fanned themselves. Mother cocked her brow toward the empty dance
floor, so I gave up on Rebirth Brass Band and put on the AC/DC
that she had insisted I load onto the playlist. As soon as the bells
began to ring out and the guitars snarled to life, cowboys began set-
ting down drinks, clasping hands with their women, marching bow-
legged toward the rented speakers. I took a hard pull off my beer. She
knows her crowd, my husband said.
I told you, Mother said, and led us onto the sawdusted floor, “Hells
Bells” echoing off the walls. My husband shrugged his shoulders,
pushed up his glasses, and proceeded to get down, banging his head
and bouncing his ass off Mother’s as I clapped them on. In those
sweaty three minutes, Mother was right—everything was, somehow,
just right. But soon I’d had two beers too many, and barefooted and
half-cocked, I was out Bonita-ing the Bonitans. I woke up the next
day as ready as ever to leave and never come back.W hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
367
XV
I get the all-networks-busy signal for two days before I decide I have
to go. My husband calls the plan hopeless and vague. He says we need
to save our resources. He quietly reminds me of my job search. When
he asks me what my goal is and I shrug, he walks away, comes back to
say she is a grown woman who can take care of herself and never has
been inclined to listen to reason. That’s easy to say, I blab, when it’s
not your mother living on the brunt end of the beginning of the end
of the world, which is mean because his mom died years ago.
Being the man he is, he agrees to go to Texas if I wait for him to
enter final grades and agrees to use his credit card to pay for the gas
that has skyrocketed. Despite rationing, you can still travel freely if
you have the money and don’t live at the end of the world. He tells
me I am about to put an end to that freedom on both accounts. Then
he squeezes my hand hard and begins to pack.
I pack with one hand, work the phone in the other. Sending,
ending. Sending. I fill my backpack with Ziplocs and wool socks.
I check the tent for stakes. My husband packs a few shirts and un-
derwear and fills his bags with books on Greek philosophers whose
names I can’t pronounce. When I come in with the orange cat-hole
trowel, he takes it gently from my hand and puts it back in the garage.
I don’t know how to pack for the end of the world, so I imagine a
backpacking trip.
XVI
Mother picks up as we’re driving through the red rocks of Moab
listening to a classic rock station. It’s Don Henley’s birthday, and
every station seems to be in on the awful celebration. When I hear
her voice, I punch off the radio and sit up. Everything is fine, she says.
A trembler, not too big. She tells us to turn around and go home.
Or head west—everyone should see the Grand Canyon, she says. She
sounds tired.
Why don’t we all go see it together, I say. You know, she says, it’s just a
few miles from one rim across to the other. Imagine all that sky, she says
and fades off before adding, People die all the time trying to get across.368
Kelli Ford
We’re coming, Mama, I say and snap the phone shut. I lean my
head back and close my eyes. All I see are burned-out buildings and
twisted metal. My husband touches the side of my face and pushes
the car faster.
XVII
A fierce wind greets us when we pull to the top of the hill outside of
town. A line of delivery trucks waiting to move into Bonita has us
backed up alongside the roadside park. From the looks of it, the park
was recently a happening place, but news teams have mostly aban-
doned makeshift camps. My husband points out that Texans favor a
liberal definition of the term park—it’s just a couple of cement slabs
with picnic tables and a trashcan off the highway, usually devoid of
much else besides prickly pear or bluebonnets in springtime.
I point to the farthest table, tell him this is where Mother and I
came to watch the sun set when I was a girl. I absorbed as much at
that time as I could, that time after work and school before she reap-
plied her lipstick and walked through a cloud of perfume and out our
front door where she’d spend the night dancing the sun back up as
I slept.
Now tarps pop and snap in the wind, strain at the lines holding
them to earth. One guy in a dingy brown suit huddles on a bench
squinting into his phone. We roll down the windows despite the
wind. A brown beer bottle rolls across the cement slab. Plastic bags
flutter against the table legs, trapped just east of the freedom stretch-
ing ahead on the endless Texas prairie.
Toward town, things appear just about normal, aside from a gas
well that billows orange flames and hazy, electric smoke. My husband
is taken aback by the sight, but I tell him this happens from time to
time in oil country, even when there isn’t an apocalypse going on.
XVIII
Mother, speaking on good authority I assumed, had always told me
nothing good happened after midnight. I have a feeling that’s when I
was conceived. I know it was sometime the summer before her ninth-
grade year, not long after she started to sneak bell-bottoms to schoolW hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
369
where she changed out of her holy-roller dress and put on eyeliner she
stole from the drugstore. I can imagine her scrubbing her eyes red to
get the makeup off, rolling the jeans into a neat ball and putting them
in the bottom of her locker, walking back home at the end of the day
defiant but looking like the holiness girl she was supposed to be.
Mother told me plenty, wanting to make certain I didn’t follow
in her footsteps. I listened close, until late one night my junior year
when I let a stout little running back named Bunzy sweet-talk me
into going to see a well fire that had erupted when drillers hit a
gas pocket. We left a party around eleven, me peering out the back
window every few minutes, sure that every set of headlights belonged
to Mother. After parking his truck in a ditch, we followed the orange
glow through pastures, carrying a bottle and blanket over tree-lined
fences until we got to the flame.
I snuck into the house close to sunrise and tiptoed past my step-
father’s snores, and only after I was tucked deep into my bed did
I smile to myself, excited at the new life that awaited me outside
Mother’s hypocritical rules. The next morning, I discovered a hickey
the running back had left, like a badge. He told everyone except his
girlfriend that he got further than he did.
You could say I got the last laugh—he turned into a meth-head,
still in and out of jail. Mother always swore it was him who broke
into the house and stole the change bucket. I was long gone by then,
of course. Cause and effect, my husband says, and inches the car
forward.
XIX
Two rangers lean against their Mustangs at the front of the line.
Just beyond them sit two women atop paint horses holding purple
f lags emblazoned with a golden cross and sword. The horses shift
and stomp. Flags pop in the wind. Would you look at that, my hus-
band says. They wear cowboy boots and white tunics gathered at
the waist. Wide leather belts and giant gem-encrusted cross buckles
hold their swords in leather scabbards. I hope they’ve got Gold
Bond in Bonita, my husband says, but he doesn’t laugh. I raise my
hand toward them, but they don’t seem to see. Over the wind you370
Kelli Ford
can hear the thrust of the gas-driven f lames from the well fire.
The women stare beyond us out toward the western horizon in
certainty. One dismounts and kneels in prayer, her voice lost to the
wind and f lames.
XX
The rangers let us pass after we explain our purpose, sign a dos-
sier, and complete a few forms. They assure my husband that the
fire will burn itself out and that there’s no reason to call 911. Don
Henley’s been running through my head since Moab, and as the
Ranger waves us past, I sing, You can check out any time you want,
but you can never leave. Not funny, my husband says, and acceler-
ates past the snaking f lames that dance high into the sky welcoming
me home.
XXI
On the stretch into town a hand-painted sign warns, Welcome to
Pretty. Slow down—rough going. My husband says the road could
be buckled from the heat, but I think earthquake. You can see where
the earth bucked and bowed, picking up the two-lane road and set-
ting it several feet off to the side, leaving the double yellow stripe
misaligned. Infinity broken. What was a major geo-seismic event is
now simply a few bumps that our steel-belted radials take with ease,
nothing to it.
XXII
While we were busy packing tent stakes and books, it never occurred
to us to bring more than road food. The stupidity strikes us at the
same time when we see the beat-up grocery store in the middle of
town, which is really just the middle of a highway. There never was
much to Bonita, especially before the casino. A few gas stations. The
VFW and Legion Hall. Two drugstores. One or two grocery stores,
depending on the year. Plenty of churches and a rodeo arena. After
the heathens voted the town wet, there was never a shortage of liquor
stores, and the sign for one is half lit just down the road. That will
be the next stop.W hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
371
The gas station across the street is nothing but charred rubble and
bits of metal that skitter in the wind. Gas lines ruptured in the last
earthquake, and dust coats the cars in the grocery store lot. A boy
who can’t be more than ten stands in the back of a pickup holding
a shotgun. His little brother is yanking on a kid goat’s ear. Not that
unusual, I say to my husband who’s gone quiet. When I open the car
door, my husband stays put. She’s not going to leave, he says. I nod at
the boy with the gun, but he just shifts feet and stares at me. I can’t
believe we didn’t bring bacon, I say.
The checkout lady recognizes me, though to me she is only a face.
She tells us that a few other places have reopened but they’ll rob you
blind if you don’t watch. Tell your mother we miss her at the V, she
says. No sense moping around waiting on the big one. She smiles,
and her teeth are stained from coffee or cigarettes, both likely. Her
eyes are lined in dark blue, and you can see where the powder has
settled into the wrinkles crisscrossing her face. She doesn’t smooth
her rouge, just leaves the circles be, like setting suns.
XXIII
When we pull up to Mother’s, the place looks empty without her
usual array of petunias and marigolds. A blue tarp still covers the
roof on the east end. It’s buttoned down tight with bungees in
all directions, looks professional. Her horses run up to the fence
and nicker, toss their heads at us. They’re skinny. Mother’s told
me grain’s hard to get and she’s down to her last few round bales,
but it’s still hard to see them looking like the horses kept by people
who aren’t horse people—people who stake a horse to a lead in the
backyard and cram three kids on the bony animal to ride through
the streets unshod during parades. I wonder what those horses look
like now. I wonder what those kids look like.
XXIV
Mother walks out and stops, as if we are a vision she can’t trust.
Standing there on her cracked concrete porch with sagging steps,
arms crossed, she seems small. The bonnet covers her eyes. Then she
bounds down the steps and grabs me up and feels again as whole372
Kelli Ford
and big as the world. My husband stands back watching us. When
we don’t let go or stop our crying, he begins to unload camping
gear. Bless you babies, Mother says, stroking my hair, Bless my sweet
babies. Those are my grandmother’s words, not Mother’s. I pretend
not to notice and hold on tight.
XXV
I don’t know my father, but I have my mother’s hands. Our left
lateral incisors each stick out just a hair. When I’ve drunk too
much, my husband reminds me that I have more than her hands
and mouth.
XXVI
The wind knocks out the electricity at night. The tarps covering the
unrepaired portion of the roof rumble across the ceiling with each
gust. Mother’s heeler burrows beneath a pile of quilts stacked in the
corner. Mother doesn’t seem fazed even though it’s her night on the
grid. She goes around muttering prayers and lighting candles. When
she’s not squeezing my hands and stroking my hair, it’s almost like
she’s not even here. My husband fills the lantern I brought. I ask him
if he’d like to play Frisbee with his laptop.
XXVII
It turns out the end of the world has been subsidized. We must, how-
ever, convince Mother to accept the food FEMA ships in. God will
provide, she says. It’s for us sinners, we say, and she gets a worried
look, grows quiet.
When we pull up to the Tuesday pickup, my husband says in a
big, booming voice, BEHOLD GOD FEMA. Great, I say, on the
seventh day God created formaldehyde trailers. He says the end of
the world is making us dumb and walks away to grab a box. I’m
happy he’s making jokes, and when he comes back I’m grinning.
Hey look, two-by-two, I say, dropping cans of tuna and chicken
into the box.
Why would a fish need an ark, he says. What good is an ark to
a fish?W hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
373
XXVIII
Time moves slowly at the end of the world. Each day Mother cooks a
breakfast to end all, but won’t eat. She’s in there cracking store-bought
eggs before we wake up. When we shuffle into the kitchen, she shakes
her head at the pale yolks in apology. The hens have stopped laying
her prized multicolored eggs with the hard shells and yolks like setting
suns. With a set jaw, she flips the sizzling sausage that we splurged on
when there was no bacon, plates the biscuits and the FEMA milk gravy,
and sets it out on the counter. When we finally sit down to eat, my
husband and I exchange looks as Mother blesses the food and the day
and gives thanks for everything from the table and chairs to the hairs
on our heads. She only smiles standing over us while we eat. We do our
best to keep eating.
Mother spends the rest of the day in her room. When I’m not
recovering from breakfast, I drive my husband crazy with my ency-
clopedic store of Don Henley songs. I don’t know how I know so
many or how to stop singing. He retreats to the garage to read. Or
stares at the blue roof, his face smashed in concentration, muttering
numbers and supply lists. I can see he feels bad that he’s not a son-in-
law who can swoop in with a hammer and make things right again.
Sometimes I see him standing next to the barbed-wire fence trying
to work up the courage to climb over and pet the horses.
I go to the bedroom to lie down beside Mother while she reads
the Bible. Sometimes I stand on the bed and sing all she wants to do is
dance. I remind her of her disco days and toss my hair like a stripper.
I find her box of sequins and play dress-up. She doesn’t get angry.
She smiles and reaches out to pull my hand to her mouth where she
breathes it warm and kisses it. We have to be ready, she says.
XXIX
On Day Four, my husband comes into the kitchen and plops down
a grocery sack of toilet paper, pulls out a packet of powdered eggs.
Fresh out of the real ones, he says. He starts to say something, then
trails off, smoothing the edge of the fake eggs as if what he wants to
say can be found there and coaxed out.374
Kelli Ford
People were talking about cattle dying, he says finally. The guy
hauled them to a sale because he didn’t have any grass or water left
on his property. When he let them out, they trampled each other
trying to get to the water. Within minutes, they all collapsed. Water
intoxication. And if that isn’t bad enough, he says, the bag boy says
there’s a sex room at the VFW.
I squeeze the toilet paper to my chest like an idiot and sing: We’ve
been poisoned by these fairytales. It works because he hops onto the
counter, and sighs, All right, which song? I shrug my shoulders and
dance a little more. Then he surprises me and says that maybe we
should just go to the V and have a drink.
Eyes Wide Shut II: Apocalyptic Cowboys and Hellbent Barmaids?
No thanks, I say. Do you remember the lady at the grocery store?
Do you really want to see her naked? He rubs his eyes, says things
may be getting to him, says I need to think about what I want to do.
Then he picks up a leftover biscuit and walks into the garage. The
weather has been calm for two days, the skies blue. It’s making us
all a little crazy.
XXX
Before all of this, my husband loved that Mother wasn’t like his first
mother-in-law, following him around tallying up his shortcomings,
holding secret court with her daughter over the telephone. While
he feared what harsh truth might come out of Mother’s mouth,
especially when she was onto her second red eye, he loved that she
was a let-it-loose kind of lady who wore too much eye shadow and
did her lipstick every hour on the hour. Sometimes he walks back
to her bedroom and stands in the doorway awhile before he turns
and walks back out. I think he’s starting to worry about that with
which he cannot reason.
XXXI
I approach Mother with half a plan. She is lying on her bed with her
hands clasped, Bible open beside her. The wind has picked up. You
can hear it whistling through the small spaces and moaning through
everything else. Out the window I see a dust devil moving across the
pasture. The horses are running. A large limb cracks in the tree thatW hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
375
stands bare in the front yard. I watch, waiting for it to fall. When it
doesn’t, I sit on the bed. Let’s take a drive, I begin. I tell her we need
to fill up the car. The corrugate gate is banging against a fence post,
ringing out again and again. God wouldn’t want you in here hiding
behind prayer, I say, pushing.
The birds are all gone, she says. I tried feeding them, but the little
things blew off. Tumbled away one after another when they gath-
ered for the seed. I guess I shouldn’t have. The ones didn’t catch on
the fence rolled right across the pasture. Haven’t seen a bird in two
months or more.
I look out the window for a sign of something okay, something
not terrifying. A yellow grasshopper thunks onto the screen. Mother
begins to massage the top of one thumb with the other. What if you’re
right, I tell her. What if God’s decided, Well, so much for Earth and all
those little people down there. And you know, I think I’ll stretch it out,
make them suffer good. If this is all we’ve got, then what? I want to
hear you laugh. I want to hear you say, throw dirt on it, and give the
finger to anybody who doesn’t like it. I need you to fight. I need you.
She doesn’t say anything, but her eyes fill with water. I pull her
hands apart, wrap them in mine. I raise her hand to my mouth, take
her index finger, and run it over my sticking-out tooth. Then I run
my finger along hers, feeling the bump of imperfection. Remember
when you used to come into my room when I was dead asleep and do
this, I ask, leaning my forehead against hers. Looking into her eyes is
looking into my own. You’d open the door, say Are you asleep, before
barging in to lay down and tell me about your night.
You needed your rest, Mother says. I start to say something but she
cuts me off, says, He’ll come like a thief in the night. She picks up
her Bible. Well, I say, if he’s a thief, he’s not a very good one making
all this noise.
XXXII
When I poke my head into Mother’s room to tell her we are going to
leave for a bit, she is sitting on the edge of her bed. Her purse is at her
feet, and her head is covered in a silk scarf tied beneath her chin. She
looks tiny there, and older than I’ve ever imagined she could be. I
wonder if she’s been hiding these old lady purses and scarves beneath376
Kelli Ford
her bed for years, just waiting for the right moment to become this
person I see before me. She smiles thinly and hugs her purse tight
against her chest. The uncertainty I see in her eyes tells me it’s not
faith keeping her in her bedroom.
The wind has let up some, I say. It’ll just be a short drive. Honey,
she says, it’s not the wind I’m scared of.
XXXIII
The sun’s close to setting, and as we pull out of the drive, the
wind blows us onto the gravel shoulder before my husband yanks
it steady. I’ve left him up front alone so I can sit in the back with
Mother, like the new moms I see on the road, unable to let their
baby rest buckled behind their backs for a second. When she didn’t
fight the seat belt like she always has, my husband gave me a look
that said We’ve got to get out of here as plainly as if he’d written a
note. I make soft cooing sounds and hear myself saying, There,
there. We’ll be just fine.
Remember our sunsets, I say. Remember how we’d pack an ice-
chest with baby beers and Dr. Pepper and go up to the hill and watch
the sun go down? How it’d stretch for miles, lighting up the sky
blood orange and blue and everything in between? Mother looks out
the window, and I imagine that she smiles.
My husband fiddles with the radio up front. He passes a fuzzy
news station long enough to hear that a tornado has ripped through
downtown Oklahoma City. A big one. They’re interviewing the
police chief who sounds confused. His voice catches. It’s just gone,
he says. I lean forward and punch it off. There’s no sound for a
while except the sound of the tires on the road and the wind.
Always the wind.
Finally my husband speaks up. I know Oklahoma’s close, and I feel
for them, he says. But isn’t this good news, in a sense? It’s weather,
just horrible weather. Science.
Mother is praying to herself. Her whispers grow louder. I find his
eyes in the rearview and give him the please-shut-up look. He jerks
his head over his shoulder toward Mother, says, We need to talk.
I lean my head over onto Mother’s shoulder and think about a newW hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
377
apocalypse unconstrained by precedent or the absurdity of town bor-
ders. Words run through my head: Mother and plenty of water. Safe
haven and plenty to eat. Understanding and safety for the man driv-
ing us, love. I can’t tell if I’m begging for these things or thanking
something or someone or both. As if awoken from a dream, Mother
looks down on me and says, It’s been forever since I’ve watched the
sun go down from the hill.
XXXIV
When we pull up, the well fire still hasn’t burned out. My hus-
band just shakes his head, giving up on understanding anything,
I’m afraid. One of the R iders is leading her horse toward a trailer
at the base of the hill. Her head hangs, stiff from sitting on top of
a horse for God knows how many hours. The wait can’t be easy on
the faithful either.
Two new Rangers man the exit out of town and past the roadside
park. My husband stops, and one of them sticks his head in. Got ev-
erything you need, he asks. I lean forward and tell him we just want
to catch the sunset. My husband doesn’t protest when I say we’ll be
right back, but I know we’re going to have to make a move quick. I
can let you go, the Ranger says, but they’re shutting down unofficial
entries. The man does not put up with any kind of reasoning or logic,
so my husband puts it in reverse and pulls perpendicular to the road.
He puts the car in drive, leaves his hand on the gearshift. Ahead,
a horse trailer pulls onto the road. The Rider raises a weary hand.
Finally, my husband speaks, but I have to lean in to hear him—We
could just go.
XXXV
I turn to Mother. What do you think, I say. Want to grab some
things? Somewhere things are better, somewhere things can still be
okay. We’ll visit the library, go to a restaurant. We can swing wide
and see the Grand Canyon. The animals need a new round bale,
Mother says. And they’ll need another one after that. My husband
slams the car in park, and when he sighs, I have to roll down the
window to get some air.378
Kelli Ford
XXXVI
Mother picks up her purse, opens the door, and steps out. You
know we can’t stay here forever, my husband says. I love you, and
I’ll help you tie her up and make her go, or I’ll hold you when we
leave her, but I’ve had enough of whatever you want to call what’s
happening here.
Do you even know what you’re asking me to do, I say. I hit the
seatback with both hands and begin to cry. Mother is holding a crum-
pled tissue to her mouth, teetering across the cattle-guard, heading
toward the well. I fling the door open and say, Do what you have to
do. He’s still sitting there when I look back.
When I catch up to her, she’s standing at the base of the flame,
close enough that when I take her hand it’s already warm. You can’t
imagine heat, she says. You have to feel it for yourself.
XXXVII
Flames dance shadows across Mother’s face. Heat vapors make the
world look unsteady, dreamlike. Please, I say, but this close to the
flame, its roar swallows the word. The pressure comes and goes, whips
in and out, a giant blowtorch below the earth’s surface beginning to
run itself dry. An orange ball billows twenty feet or more into the
sky before the flames shrink down and snake wispy in the wind. The
fire makes its own wind, and I feel it moving through my clothes,
pushing back stray hairs. My husband crosses the cattle-guard but
stands back a ways watching us. He shrugs his shoulders and gives
what smile he can. Mother offers him her hand, and he comes over
and puts his arm around my waist, working to be the person I need
him to be a while longer.
XXXVIII
Above us, the new Riders keep watch on the hill, silhouetted by
the setting sun. They step high in their stirrups and lean forward,
bracing for something we can’t see. We stand there, staring into the
flame until it begins to grow dark outside our circle. The wind picks
up, whips the flame around, lighting up our faces. Mother pulls myW hat G o o d I s a n A rk to a Fi sh ?
379
hands close, turns them over, studies them like she used to when I
was a girl. I’m not crazy, she says. I don’t think so anyway.
I know, I try to say, but she cuts me off. To tell you the truth, she
says, I don’t know if it’s suicide or salvation. If I did, maybe I could
go. But you, she says, you were always my perfect angel.
She wipes my face, leans her forehead against mine, and tells me,
I’m glad you’re not like me in the ways that count. I hold her gaze,
try my best to see past my own reflection, to see her as she is right
now, as she must have been all those years ago, defiant but afraid.
Space opens up, the sky goes soft, and I know she won’t be in the
car when we drive away. I see what’s before us, I see what’s been,
and I see out past the sun where stars explode and life starts anew.
When I’ve seen more than I can take, I give in, close my eyes, feel
the warmth of her skin. I imagine her as big and whole as the world,
pretend her words were lost to the flame.40.
You Can Touch This!
by Jim Hanas
Steven had just finished a cigarette and lofted the butt off the loading
dock when Bitsy appeared and told him there was barf in the interro-
gation room. This was no surprise. There was always barf somewhere.
In the interrogation room, in the supermarket, in the post office, in
the dentist’s office. In the nail salon.
Steven arrived in the interrogation room to find a woman holding
a crying child by the hand. Wherever children played and ate cake,
some of them barfed. Usually the smaller ones. Steven threw a wad of
paper towels down and told everyone to clear out. The name of the
place was You Can Touch This! but barf was an exception. No one
touched barf but Steven.
The interrogation room looked like a real interrogation room, only
much shabbier. All the furniture—like most of the furniture at You
Can Touch This!—had been donated, in this case by the local police
precinct, on the (entirely true) premise that anything grown-ups did
for real, kids would enjoy pretending to do. Bitsy and her partner,
Tina, had done a reasonably good job of removing the rusty metal
parts from donations like these—and covering the electrical outlets
and fuse boxes, and so on—providing beleaguered parents a guilt-
free environment in which they could let their children roam around
like wild animals. Bitsy had a marketing degree and she understood
the market.You C a n Touch T h i s !
381
There was a table in the middle of the interrogation room sur-
rounded by three aluminum chairs and a lamp that could be trained
directly on the “suspect.” In one corner, there was a cart with wheels
on it, on top of which sat a broken polygraph machine. The thin
metal arms that had once recorded vital signs were bent like a tangled
clot of coat hangers, but kids still loved attaching each other to it. Its
surface was dappled with fruit juice and icing. The half dozen photo-
copied flyers posted around the room—featuring a clip art image of a
tank—had failed to prevent this. They said: “Absolutely no food and/
or drink in the Interrogation Room.”
Steven locked the door behind him. The kids could still see him,
through the window and via the surveillance camera that broadcast
the contents of the interrogation room on a screen outside the door.
Foreheads lined the window and children’s eyes peeked just above
the sill. Steven cleaning barf was suddenly much more interesting
than the operating room, the telemarketing center, the broken MRI
machine, or the forklift with no engine. Steven swirled his mop self-
consciously until Bitsy’s voice came over the intercom, informing
everyone that a puppet show was about to take place.
The foreheads vanished from the window, and soon Steven heard
Bitsy’s husky voice from the other side of the warehouse in the twin
roles of Fairy Godmother and Prince Charming. Steven sprayed de-
odorizer in the air and closed the door behind him.
Steven decided it was a good time to go to the bathroom. He was
aware how dangerous it could be to go to the bathroom at You Can
Touch This! It took only one hysterical child—and, as far as Steven
could tell, it was the rare child who was not hysterical—to report that
you had touched them inappropriately, and your job and your life (as
you knew it) would be over. This was what had happened to Steven’s
predecessor—Randy—whose picture now appeared on a popular
government website devoted to the criminally touchy. Bitsy and Tina
seemed to think that in Randy’s case this was deserved—that he had
in fact done some touching—but Steven thought this just proved that
once one hysterical, sugar-crazed kid started talking, suspicions never
really went away.
Steven did not take chances. He made it his policy never to be alone382
Jim Hanas
in a closed room with anyone younger than eighteen, even though he
himself was only sixteen and a virgin. Most of the time this was easy.
Like the interrogation room, every room at You Can Touch This!
had half walls or a window to prevent just this kind of secrecy. The
official policy was to leave the doors to the bathrooms open—accord-
ing to the photocopied flyers that appeared above the mirrors and in
every stall—but Steven felt this left him vulnerable. He preferred to
wait until the children were trapped in the puppet theater and then
go to the bathroom by himself, locking the door safely behind him.
He had tried other strategies, including clapping his hands while he
was in the bathroom—to make it clear he wasn’t touching anything
at all—but this made it difficult to handle his business and he was
always peeing on himself.
After Steven locked the door and sat down, he f lipped open his
phone. No messages. As he was finishing up, he received a text
from Tina—this is how they found him when they couldn’t find
him—announcing a “juice spill in the copy room.” The copy room,
in this case, was the actual copy room, where Tina and Bitsy made
copies of the warnings and instructions that were taped up every-
where—always in layouts involving clip art of clowns or dinosaurs
or tanks.
Steven unlocked and opened the bathroom door to see that a line
had formed. The puppet show was short. There was a woman shep-
herding five little boys, one of whom looked up at Steven with a
confused look.
“What are you supposed to be?” he asked.
This question made sense. Bitsy and Tina not only put on the
puppet shows and served pizzas to parties in the private rooms that
had been constructed along one side of the warehouse, but they
dressed up too, based on the season and occasion. They dressed up
like princesses and queens and witches and lady golfers and whatever
was required, really.
But Steven was not wearing a costume. Steven was being Steven
(or so Steven thought), with his blue hair and his black fingernails
and his pierced nose with a chain that ran to a clip that gripped the
rim of his right ear. They had agreed on an answer to this question,You C a n Touch T h i s !
383
however, which he was to provide whenever kids asked what he was
supposed to be. That way, Bitsy said, he would fit right in.
“A zombie,” he said, brushing the hair out of his eyes and smiling
vaguely. The boy—like the woman and her other charges—seemed
satisfied.
In the copy room, it was Tina who had spilled her juice, laced as
it always was with Southern Comfort. The paper was jammed and
Tina was stabbing at the Copy button, producing a steady stream of
useless beeps. Steven rolled his eyes and told Tina to step aside. In
some ways, Bitsy and Tina were as hopeless and irritating as his own
mother, except that they weren’t ashamed of him and they gave him
someplace to stay.
He carefully dried the buttons with a series of paper towels and
opened up the machine’s various hatches to relieve the jams before
running off a dozen copies of a page with a dinosaur on it that
warned of a “$10 fee for cleaning up of ‘accidents.’” He wasn’t
quite sure what Tina was after, but he figured she meant the barf
in the interrogation room and he wondered who would get the ten
dollars.
He taped the flyers up in the interrogation room, in the supermar-
ket, in the post office, in the dentist’s office, in the nail salon, and
in the pond of rubber balls, which was basically impossible to clean
when barfed in. He then took his spot at the cash register. The last
of the day’s parties were getting ready to leave, but they’d first have
to clear the gauntlet of goodies Bitsy and Tina had amassed by the
exit in an attempt to generate incremental income. (Bitsy understood
the market.) These items ranged from the arguably educational (balsa
wood models of triceratopses), to the frivolous (candy jewelry), to the
ethically questionable (toy soldiers painted in desert tones). Never-
theless, the area where they were sold was impossible to avoid. Bitsy
had turned it into a sort of corral through which all traffic had to
filter. On the way into You Can Touch This!, children flew through
without distraction, hypnotized by the promise of fake teleconferenc-
ing centers and cupcakes with blue frosting. By the time they were
leaving, however, their ability to resist was compromised by sugar and
fatigue and that terrible childhood sense that the best day of your life384
Jim Hanas
is coming to an end and can’t it please, please, please last just a little
bit longer?
Parents huddled outside the enclosure, hoping to hustle their chil-
dren through quickly enough to avoid delays, whining, and discre-
tionary spending. Some succeeded, but many did not, and Steven
waited at the register for negotiations to wind down in screams and
tears and final, desperate purchases. Once the last child had extorted
the last candy cocktail ring, the silence inside the echoing expanse of
You Can Touch This! practically rang.
“Holy fuck!” Bitsy groaned like a bear while she stretched her
back. “I thought they’d never leave.”
She said this every night and Tina, tipsy, always laughed. With
the kids gone, they all smoked cigarettes while Tina tallied the day’s
receipts and prepared to close for the night.
“Need a ride somewhere, Stevie?” Bitsy asked. “Want to catch a
movie?”
He rolled his eyes and shook his head. He thought he might die of
embarrassment, even though no one was around.
“Too cool to be seen with a couple old lesbos?” Bitsy said, grab-
bing the much smaller Tina around the waist and poking her face
over her shoulder, like they were posing for a picture.
“I’ll just stay here,” he said.
“Suit yourself, Champ,” Bitsy said as she and Tina left the mer-
chandise corral and headed out the front door. “Catch you in the
morning.”
Steven checked the lock on the steel door by the loading dock,
shut off the industrial lights that hung far overhead, and settled
into the Holiday Inn Express Child-Friendly Accommodation. The
bad part about the Holiday Inn Express Child-Friendly Accommo-
dation was that it had to be referred to by its full name. Holiday Inn
Express had donated it to You Can Touch This! on this condition.
The good part about it was that it was an exact replica of an actual
Holiday Inn Express Child-Friendly Accommodation, which meant
that Steven had a hotel room where he could stay for as long as he
wanted. That’s why Bitsy and Tina had been able to take him in
when his mother had thrown him out for being, as she said, a totalYou C a n Touch T h i s !
385
queer-bait. The only other slightly bad part was that children played,
and fought, and peed, and jumped on the bed all day in the donated
Holiday Inn Express Child-Friendly Accommodation, so it was a
mess and it smelled like milk. Steven didn’t mind too much. The
television worked and if you kept the lights off, you couldn’t see the
fingerprints all over the screen.
He shook the bedspread to rid it of giant plastic toys and crumbs,
then carefully smoothed it out on top of the bed and propped him-
self against the headboard. The remote control was nailed down,
but he’d gotten good at operating it without looking. As he surfed
for horror movies, his phone buzzed in his pocket. He pulled it out
and slid it open to see a text from his father. “Call your mother,”
it said.
Steven tossed the phone on the bed and zoned out to an airing
of Near Dark he’d been lucky enough to find. He was startled when
he heard the door by the loading dock rattle. The warehouse was
creepy at night, but Steven liked its stray creaks and its weird hollow-
ness. Who knew what could be lurking where? It was his milieu. This
noise was not mysterious, however. It was someone trying to get in.
His father, or his mother maybe, with the police. He turned off the
television. He got up and slowly crept out of the Holiday Inn Express
Child-Friendly Accommodation and to the power box to turn the
overhead lights back on.
Almost as soon as he threw the switch, which made a big sizzling
click like something in Dr. Frankenstein’s lab, he heard a shriek by
the loading dock. He ran across the warehouse as fast as he could,
slipping on the smoothed concrete floors in his socks, to reach the
room just beyond the dentist’s office. But the banging and shrieking
was not coming from the outside. Right by the door was a little boy,
crying and thrashing at the door with his fists.
Steven froze. Images of Randy’s image on that government website
flashed before his eyes, and this—this was so much worse. Here was
a child who could not be more hysterical, in a situation where they
could not be more alone. In a warehouse? It was like a joke. Steven
searched his mind and couldn’t discover a single reason why this was
not, in some sense, a kidnapping.386
Jim Hanas
The child didn’t notice Steven. He just kept pounding and
crying. He was maybe five, although Steven had trouble distin-
guishing ages from four to fourteen. He was blond, and pale, and
had a round face that was now as red as a tomato from crying.
Steven worried that the zombie explanation wouldn’t go far this
time, but he had no choice, so he approached carefully and leaned
down toward the boy.
“Can I help you?” he said. He knew this was ridiculous, but the
kid turned and looked at him full face, blubbering, and fell into his
arms. Steven cradled him awkwardly—he would have preferred to
handle barf—and tried to calm the kid down. He reached for his
phone and realized he’d left it in the Holiday Inn Express Child-
Friendly Accommodation.
“It’s all right,” he was saying. “It’s all right.”
Steven could not remember the last time he thought anything was
all right.
“All right,” he said. “Calm down. What’s your name?”
He was careful not to scratch the boy with his nose chain.
“Ashton,” the boy said.
“Action?” Steven clarified.
“Ashton!” the boy said, impetuously, rubbing one of his wet eyes
with the heel of his hand.
“Okay, Ashton, we’re just going to get my phone so we can find
your parents. Can we do that?”
Ashton nodded limply.
Steven stood up and took Ashton by the hand and led him through
the dentist’s office, the supermarket, and the post office to the Holi-
day Inn Express Child-Friendly Accommodation. His phone was
where he had left it. He picked it up and—without letting go of Ash-
ton’s hand—dialed Bitsy’s number.
“Bitsy, Bitsy,” he cried when she answered, relieved to be freed of
total responsibility. “There’s a kid named Ashton . . . Ashton, what’s
your full name?”
“Ashton Jacob Hunter.”
“Ashton Jacob Hunter, and he got locked in, and he’s here right now,
and we’ve got to find his parents, and you’ve got to come right away.”You C a n Touch T h i s !
387
“Son of a bitch,” Bitsy bellowed into the phone. “We’ll be right
there.”
Steven sat on the bed and looked at Ashton, who was just standing
there, staring at him. Help was on the way.
“I’m hungry,” Ashton said. “I need to go to the bathroom.”
The bathroom. The word was like a knife in Steven’s heart. Here
they were, already so far past his well-considered comfort zone, and
now the bathroom?
“There it is,” Steven said, pointing to the fully-functioning bath-
room in the Holiday Inn Express Child-Friendly Accommodation.
“I need help,” Ashton said.
“Help? Are you sure you can’t hold it?”
“I need to go!” Ashton said. Steven, aided by more images of Ran-
dy’s image on that government website, quickly calculated whether it
would be better to have a happy, satisfied Ashton when help arrived
or an angry, impetuous Ashton. He plucked the child from the bed
and took him into the bathroom. He got down on his knees, undid
the button and zipper on Ashton’s corduroys and picked Ashton up
and sat him on the toilet seat. And there they were, facing each other,
their noses just inches apart. A shiver of relief worked its way through
Ashton’s little body.
“What are you supposed to be?” Ashton asked.
“A zombie,” Steven said.
Ashton pulled his pants up on his own, and Steven helped zip and
button them. He took Ashton by the hand again and led him back
through all the rooms and the dentist’s office just as Bitsy was throw-
ing open the steel door from outside, along with a policeman and a
frantic woman who was Ashton’s mother.
“Ashton, oh my God,” she screamed as she ran up to him and
plucked him from Steven’s side. “Oh my God, honey, what have they
done to you?”
“Now let’s not jump to any crazy conclusions,” Bitsy said. She
remembered Randy too. “It was an honest mistake. He’s fine.” She
reached out and tousled Ashton’s hair with one of her big hands.
Ashton’s mother pulled the boy away from Bitsy angrily.
“What did this man do to you?” she asked the boy.388
Jim Hanas
“What man?” Ashton asked earnestly. “What man?”
Ashton’s mother hustled him away from the loading dock and
toward her car, the policeman right behind her. “He’s not a man,”
Ashton sang as the woman buckled him into his car seat. “He’s a
zombie.”
“A zom-beeeeeeeee,” they could hear the boy happily wailing as
the car wheeled around and turned toward the exit of the industrial
park. “Zom-beeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee.”Ben Greenman is a writer in Brooklyn, New York. @bengreenman
Sharon Goldner is a writer in Baltimore, Maryland.	
Michael Ramberg is a writer in Minneapolis, Minnesota. grebmar.net 	
Catherine Lacey is a writer in Brooklyn, New York. catherinelacey.com
D. Foy is a writer in Brooklyn, New York. dfoyble.com
Adam Wilson is a writer in Brooklyn, New York. adamzwilson.com 	
Karon Luddy is a writer in Charlotte, North Carolina. @franceskaron
Adetokunbo Abiola is a writer in Akure, Nigeria.
  adetokunboabiola.blogspot.com
Blake Butler is a writer in Atlanta, Georgia. @blakebutler
Eliezra Schaffzin is a writer in Cambridge, Massachusetts.
  eliezraschaffzin.com
Jess Walter is a writer in Spokane, Washington. jesswalter.com 	
Mesha Maren is a writer in Asheville, North Carolina.
  meshamaren.blogspot.com
Paula Younger is a writer in Denver, Colorado.
  facebook.com/paula.younger1
Alexander Lumans is a writer in Boulder, Colorado. @oldmanlumans
Laura Jane Faulds is a writer in Toronto, Ontario. @laurajanenever
Brady Hammes is a writer in Los Angeles, California.
  bradyhammes.com
Lindsay Hunter is a writer in Chicago, Illinois. lindsayhunter.com 	
Kyle Minor is a writer in Toledo, Ohio. kyleminor.com
Daniel Browne is a writer in Brooklyn, New York.
  daniel-browne.tumblr.com
Brandon Hobson is a writer in Stillwater, Oklahoma. @bwhobson
Scott McClanahan is a writer in Beckley, West Virginia.
  hollerpresents.com
Mitchell S. Jackson is a writer in New York, New York.
   mitchellsjackson.com 	
O. A. Lindsey is a writer in Austin, Texas. oalindsey4@gmail.com
Nathan Oates is a writer in Brooklyn, New York. oatesnathan.wordpress.comAlan Rossi is a writer in Spartanburg, South Carolina.
  stories-like-stories-you-know.blogspot.com 	
Elizabeth Crane is a writer in Austin, Texas. elizabethcrane.com
David Williams is a writer in Cordova, Tennessee.
  davidwwilliams.blogspot.com
Roxane Gay is a writer in Charleston, Illinois. @rgay
Matt Stewart is a writer in San Francisco, California. matt-stewart.com 	
David Backer is a writer in New York, New York. fictiondaily.org
Matthew Norman is a writer in Baltimore, Maryland.
  thenormannation.com
Eric Raymond is a writer in San Francisco, California. @pontiuslabar 	
Shane Jones is a writer in Albany, New York. @hishanejones 	
Tessa Mellas is a writer in Cincinnati, Ohio. tessamellas.weebly.com
Jamie Quatro is a writer in Lookout Mountain, Georgia.
  jamiequatro.com 	
Kayden Kross is a writer in Los Angeles, California.
  unkrossed.com [NSFW!]
Joseph Scapellato is a writer in Lewisburg, Pennsylvania.
   josephscapellato.wordpress.com 	
Greg Bardsley is a writer in San Carlos, California.	 gregbardsley.com
Kelli Ford is a writer in Boise, Idaho. kellijoford.blogspot.com 	
Jim Hanas is a writer in New York, New York. jimhanas.comBooks by Your Favorite
40 Stories Authors
What He’s Poised to Do
Stories
By Ben Greenman
ISBN 978-0-06-198740-3 (paperback)
A diverse and moving collection of witty,
fabular, haunting stories about love,
infidelity, and the vanishing art of letter
writing.
“It’s been a long time since I’ve read a story
collection as assured and persuasive as
Ben Greenman’s What He’s Poised to Do.
. . . Astonishing precisely for its depth of
emotional engagement.”
—Los Angeles Times
Celebrity Chekhov
Stories by Anton Chekhov
Adapted & Celebritized by Ben Greenman
ISBN 978-0-06-199049-6 (paperback)
You’ve never read the immortal stories
of Anton Chekhov quite like this before.
Thought-provoking and funny, Ben
Greenman’s literary experiment reshapes
Russian literature’s most celebrated stories
around America’s most popular pop culture
icons, such as Tom Cruise, Brad Pitt, Kim
Kardashian, and Owen Wilson.
“Celebrity Chekhov might be the first
literary mashup that actually adds to our
understanding of the original work.”
—The Observer’s Very Short ListThere Is No Year
A Novel
By Blake Butler
ISBN 978-0-06-199742-6 (paperback)
A wildly inventive novel of family,
sickness, and the birth-wrench of art,
from one of the most exciting and
influential young writers in America.
“Deeply honest and emotional.
. . . This novel is a thing of such
strange beauty [that it yields] the
rewards that only well-made art can
provide.”
—New York Times Book Review
(Editor’s Choice)
Nothing
A Portrait of Insomnia
By Blake Butler
ISBN 978-0-06-199738-9 (paperback)
Daring novelist Blake Butler explores
his epic struggle with insomnia, and
its unexpected consequences on his
imagination, his creative process, and
his perspective on reality.
“Lyrical. . . . A weird, waking-dream
of a memoir superbly illustrating
the relentless inner spin of the
insomniac.”
—Kirkus ReviewsDomestic Violets
A Novel
By Matthew Norman
ISBN 978-0-06-206511-7 (paperback)
Tom Violet always thought that by
the time he turned thirty-five, he’d
have everything going for him. But
instead, his life is crushing his soul—
and he’s decided to do something
about it in this brilliant and beguiling
story of a man finally taking control
of his own happiness—even if it
means making a complete idiot of
himself along the way.
“Domestic Violets is a fast, fun,
hilarious read.”
—Jessica Anya Blau, author of
The Summer of Naked Swim Parties
and Drinking Closer to Home
We Only Know
So Much
A Novel
By Elizabeth Crane
ISBN 978-0-06-209947-1 (paperback)
A funny and moving debut that
follows four generations of a singular
American family all living under one
roof as each member confronts a
moment of crisis.
“The kind of book that inspires
a person to see the beauty in the
ordinary, to stop concentrating on
others’ failings long enough to see
their spark and maybe rediscover his
or her own.”
—Susan HendersonFlatscreen
A Novel
By Adam Wilson
ISBN 978-0-06-209033-1 (paperback)
A hilariously voiced suburban epic,
Flatscreen tells the coming-of-age
story of Eli Schwartz, as he copes
with the loss of his home, the
abandonment of his parents, the
success of his older brother, and the
cruel and frequent dismissal of the
opposite sex.
“Adam Wilson’s Flatscreen is the sort
of novel we’ve heard nobody is
able to write anymore: erudite and
hilarious, raunchy and topical, and
flat-out fun.”
—Darin Strauss
Cash Out
A Novel
By Greg Bardsley
ISBN 978-0-06-212771-6 (paperback)
After years of writing corporate-speak
riddled speeches for a corrupt CEO,
Dan Jordan has finally found a way
out. But with only three days to go
before he can officially cash out, slow
down, and reconnect with his family,
all hell breaks loose. He’s kidnapped,
stalked, nearly killed, and forced to
turn to his lunatic outcast neighbors
to save the day.
“Tight, serrated, brutal, nine kinds of
twisted, and funny as hell.”
—Doug Dorst, author of
Alive in NecropolisBeautiful Ruins
A Novel
By Jess Walter
ISBN 978-0-06-192812-3 (hardcover)
A dazzling, yet deeply human, roller
coaster of a novel, careening from
the coast of Italy in 1962 to the back
lots of Hollywood today, tracing the
stories of a young Italian innkeeper, a
troubled American starlet, and a cast
of flawed yet fascinating characters.
“Why mince words? Beautiful Ruins is
an absolute masterpiece.”
—Richard Russo, author of
That Old Cape Magic
The Financial Lives
of the Poets
A Novel
By Jess Walter
ISBN 978-0-06-191605-2 (paperback)
After gambling everything on a an ill-
advised business idea, Matthew Prior
wakes up jobless, hobbled with debt,
spying on his wife’s online flirtation,
and six days away from losing his
home. . . . Until, one night he falls in
with some local stoners, and they end
up hatching the biggest—and most
misbegotten—plan yet.
“Made me laugh more than any other
book published this year.”
—Nick Hornby, Parade
